Authors
Laura Clifford
Number of Reviews
203

Title
Review for Made (2001)
Bobby (Jon Favreau, "Swingers") is an aspiring boxer who's intensely loyal
to his boyhood screwup buddy Ricky (Vince Vaughn, "Swingers"), his stripper
girlfriend Jess (Famke Janssen, "Rounders") and her young daughter Chloe
(Makenzie Vega, "The Family Man").  Bobby works as Jess's driver, but hates
having to watch her work.  When a guy gets too grabby at a private party,
Bobby boils over and a brawl ensues.  He's called in by Max (Peter Falk),
the local mob boss both he and Jess work for, and is given one last chance.
Against his better judgement (and a grudge for stolen carpet cleaning van),
Max allows Bobby to talk him into letting him partner with Ricky, but only
if he'll vouch for him, in writer/director Jon Favreau's "Made."
Favreau brings together elements of his "Swingers" success and a good dose
of the cast of "The Sopranos" for his feature directorial debut, "Made."
While the sharp dialogue that made his "Swingers" script such a success
can be found in Bobby and Ricky's banter, the writer/director's story stumbles
for lack of character background.
"Made" is" a comedic buddy road movie where two disparate green guys are
sent to the Big Apple as hired thugs to play in the big leagues of what
they believe to be a major drug drop.  While Bobby is level-headed and
responsible, Ricky is an impulsive, none too bright, self-serving blow
hard who can only be counted on to screw up any situation in as spectacular
a manner as possible.
The first recipient of their Mutt and Jeff routine is their flight attendant,
who finally puts Ricky in his place when he attempts to have her round up
women for their first class convenience.  Driver Jimmy (Vincent Pastore, 
Big Pussy in "The Sopranos") amazedly keeps darting his eyes in the rear
view as Ricky plays with opening and closing the barrier between limo driver 
and passengers.  Jimmy acts big with their bell boy (Sam Rockwell, "Box of
Moonlight"), flashing money for a room upgrade.  He begins squandering 
their per diem by ordering room service - from Bobby's room, of course.
They're brought to meet Max' client Ruiz (Sean 'Puffy' Combs), whom
Ricky immediately riles.  Given a second chance, Ruiz' right hand man
Horrace (Faizon Love, "The Replacements") tries to help the duo out, but
is horrified when Ricky uses the inside info he's given him on their
drop 'the Welshman' (David O'Hara, "Braveheart"), making fools of them
all.  Eventually, they do all make their way to the final meet in
Brooklyn with surprising results, only to be met with even more surprising
results on their return home to Jersey.
Favreau and Vaughn reprise their "Swingers" personas and their banter is
always entertaining.  However, Ricky's character is such a total jerk and
so completely unreliable that it's nonsensical that Bobby would ever
vouch for the guy.  Favreau the writer never provides anything that would
explain why Bobby would be so beholden to Ricky, an essential flaw of
his story, unless he means to portray Bobby as a complete patsy.  This
last supposition isn't implausible, given how Bobby's other relationships
are resolved and while the final scene provides a funny wrapup, the film
itself becomes instantly forgettable.
Favreau's blessed with a supporting cast who can't be faulted for his
story flaws.  Sean Combs is surprisingly natural as Ruiz, smooth and
intimidating, but not too intimidating.  Faizon Love is likeable as
Horrace and Pastore has reassuring presence as Jimmy.  Janssen is as
good as she can be with her underwritten character.  Makenzie Vega is a
child actress to watch.  Falk is stern and little else.  The film also
features Federico Castelluccio (Furio in "The Sopranos") as a bouncer
and Drea de Matteo (Adriana in "The Sopranos") as a party girl.  Jennifer
Esposito ("Summer of Sam") is the girl who changes her mind about Ricky.
Favreau employed no less a cinematographer than Christopher Doyle whose
stylish work in Wong Kar Wei's "In the Mood for Love" is replaced by meat
and potatoes treatment here.
Bobby and Ricky's squabbling routine is funny stuff.  Too bad Favreau's
"Made" never gives them a reason for being together.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Cats & Dogs (2001)
Professor Brody (Jeff Goldblum, "Jurassic Park II") is on the verge of 
discovering a cure for human allergies to dogs.  This doesn't sit well
with Mr. Tinkles (voice of Sean Hayes, TV's "Will and Grace"), a pampered
Persian seeking to return world rule to his fellow felines.  When the 
Brody's dog, a canine agent named Buddy, is catnapped, the canine underground's
attempts to plant a new agent is foiled and it's up to a Beagle puppy
named Lou (voice of Tobey Maguire, "Wonder Boys") to protect the humans
and foil the felines in "Cats & Dogs."
After the successful anthropomorphics of the "Dr. Dolittle" and "Babe"
movies, "Cats & Dogs" would seem a natural.  But a slew of special effects,
Jim Henson's creature shop and trained animals can't make up for witless,
charmless writing.
After the somewhat amusing catnapping episode, we settle in to watch a
film that simply lays there.  Dogs drive vehicles to headquarters and use
surveillance devices.  Ninja cats and a Russian Blue attack Lou.  The 
professor forgets his son's soccer practice.  Mr. Tinkles gets driven 
around in a limo.  The Brody's are held for the ransom of the allergy drug, 
which Mr. Tinkles plans to reverse and distribute via a horde of mice.
All of this is numbingly boring.
The dogs at least look like real dogs, although the vocal talents of Susan
Sarandon, Maguire, Charlton Heston, Joe Pantoliano and Michael Clark Duncan
are wasted.  Alec Baldwin's Butch, an Anatolian shepherd, is the most likeable 
character in the film, although even he is forced to say lines like 'Son of
my mother.'  (Baldwin now has the distinction of appearing in two of the worst 
children's films ever made with this following "Thomas and the Magic 
Railroad.")
The cats are all clearly puppets, an uneven distraction.  In fact the cats 
of "Cats & Dogs" bear more resemblance to Gremlins than to actual household
pets.  Yet even these cats fare better than the human cast.  Jeff Goldblum 
appears to be in a drugged stupor, his apparent reading of an absent-minded 
professor.  Elizabeth Perkins ("28 Days") is embarrassingly stiff and young 
Alexander Pollock ("Big Bully") is bland.
I couldn't be cattier - "Cats & Dogs" should be relegated to the pooper
scooper.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Cell, The (2000)
A serial killer (Vincent D'Onofrio, "Men in Black") who likes to watch 
his victims drown in his special chamber falls into a coma while his 
latest capture still awaits her fate.  Psychotherapist Catherine Deane 
(Jennifer Lopez, "Out of Sight") attempts to enter his twisted mind in a 
race against time to discover the location of "The Cell."
"The Cell" is the feature directing debut of noted visualist Tarsem Singh,
whose commercials and videos are held in the permanent collection of the
Museum of Modern Art.  Is "The Cell" art?  It's magnificent to look at,
but at the half way mark the visuals get so far out they cease to serve
the sketchy story.  
Mark Protosevich's script is standard stuff which takes one concept
already explored in "Manhunter" (the original Hannibal Lecter movie) a
bit further - instead of a serial killer hunter thinking like his prey,
here people can hook themselves up to a Neurological Cartography and
Synaptic Transfer System, which, along with psychotropic drugs, allow
them to truly enter the mind of another (or allow another into their mind).
Otherwise, the story is simply plotted like "The Bone Collector," where
several people try to put together clues in order to save a victim within
a designated time period.
We're introduced to the device (where people hang suspended in musculature 
suits looking like the patients in "Coma"), as Catherine attempts to
interact with Edward, the seven year old son of a billionaire (Patrick Bauchau, 
"Twin Falls Idaho") who's threatening her boss, Dr. Miriam Kent (Marianne 
Jean-Baptiste, "Secrets and Lies"), with pulling funding if he doesn't get
tangible results soon.  Unbeknownst to us, we're already in Edward's
mind as the title credits roll - a land of red sand dunes against a 
brilliant blue sky where Catherine, in a white feathered gown, rides to
him on a black horse.  The African location cinematography by longtime
Tarsem collaborater Paul Laufer is stunning.
Then we meet Carl Stargher as he drives his black pickup out
to two lone silos in the middle of a wheat field.  Beneath the ground is
his cell, a small glass chamber (not unlike Lecter's cell in "The Silence of
the Lambs") where a woman floats, dead.  Carl takes the body home where
he 'processes' it before enacting his ritual, which involves suspending
his body from the ceiling by the steel rings pierced through his back (shades
of "Hellraiser").
FBI agents Peter Novak (Vince Vaughn, "Psycho") and Gordon Ramsey
(Jake Weber, "U-571") track down Stargher via clues left with his last
victim (albino dog hairs and vehicle identification) and raid his home,
only to find the schizophrenic killer has lapsed into a coma on his
kitchen floor.  A medical specialist hooks them up with the dream team at the
Campbell Center and Catherine agrees to attempt to make contact.
"The Cell" is creepily suspenseful right through Catherine's first mind
trip, where she makes contact with a young Carl (Jake Thomas) in subterranean
murk with Lynch-like horror tableaus of vibrating dogs, bloody bathtubs,
garishly posed bleached victims and a horse which gets cross-sectioned
before her eyes.  A second trip also features some creeps, but the script's
weak stab at serial killer profiling begins to strain (Carl was an abused
child, but what's up with his white fixation?).  When Vince Vaughn
joins the fun to 'save' a non-responding Catherine, logic is thrown to the
wind and things begin to get ludicrous - just why would a serial killer's
mind be full of Oriental art, harem imagery and sea creatures (the water
imagery from his past involves a river, not the ocean).  Things go further
downhill when Novak takes off from Stargher's mind on a sudden hunch and 
Catherine rashly goes back to save Carl's inner child.
Technically, "The Cell" is of the highest order.  Production design by
Tom Foden ("Psycho"), art direction by Guy Dyas and Michael Manson, costume
design by Eiko Ishioka and makeup by Heather Plott and James Ryder show
collaberation of imaginative artisans.  Original music by Howard Shore
("The Game") features discordant horns with an Arabic tinge.
If "The Cell" was stripped of all pretensions of storytelling it could
play as an intriguing experimental art film (the sectioned horse was ripped
off from artist Damien Hurst's cow, after all).  It hasn't, though, 
and the mind-bending visuals only take us so far.  It would be interesting
to see Tarsem collaborate with Lynch, a man with a little method behind
his madness.
Catherine Deane (Jennifer Lopez) is a talented child psychotherapist who is a
member of a research team that has developed an experimental technique for
entering the inner depths of the mind of a patient. A psycho killer is captured
by the FBI, but only after the madman kidnapped a new victim and has her
stashed away. The killer falls into a coma and FBI agent Pete Novak (Vince 
Vaughn) seeks Catherine's help to delve into the killer's mind to save the 
girl before time runs out in "The Cell."
Award winning music video director Tarsem Singh makes his feature film debut
with a psychological, science fiction drama that, quite literally, digs into
the human mind. Working with a script from another newcomer, Mark Protosevich, 
the director utilizes high-powered visuals, special F/X and flashy set design 
and costume to propel us into the psyche of a serial killer. The killer, Carl
Stargher (Vincent D'Onofrio) has the modus operandi of sealing his victims in a
glassed-in room, slowly flooding it while videotaping the poor woman's panic,
suffering and, finally, death.
The FBI, under the leadership of Novak, has been dogging the trail of Carl for
some time, collecting data and, slowly, closing in on the killer. Carl made a
boo-boo at his last killing and left some dog hairs, from his albino German
Shepherd Valentine, at the scene where the body was found. Accurate forensics
and quick legwork allows Pete and his team to get the drop on Stargher and
arrest him - but not before he drops into a coma. They learn of yet another
kidnapping and, knowing Carl's MO, realize that the latest victim has less than
40 hours to live with no way to find out where Carl's lair is located.
Enter Catherine and here research team who have developed a "neurological
synaptic transfer system" that allows a therapist to get into a patient's head
and, in theory, help cure that patient of whatever mental demons are tormenting
them. With so little time left to save Carl's latest victim, Catherine decides
to forego protocol and try the transfer system to get into Carl's mind and find
out where the girl, Julia Hickson (Tara Subkoff), is hidden. The
psychotherapist, necessarily, casts caution to the wind and enters the mind of
the murderer and is able to begin to bring out the troubled boy inside Carl's
head, but not the location of Julia.
Pete Novak, who has studied the killer and his methods from the very first
murder, thinks he can get the required info and both he and Catherine enter
Carl's sick mind. Revelations take place and Pete, with his newfound insight,
knows he can save the day. Catherine, the penultimate psychotherapist, throws
personal safety aside in order to save the scared, troubled little boy in the
near demonic Carl's megalomaniac mind.
Performances, as we see time and again with F/X extravaganzas, take a back seat
to the visual effects and the eye candy that the technicians on the film have
crafted so nicely. Jennifer Lopez is OK in her acting as the dedicated
Catherine, but stands out more when impressively costumed and coifed in her
journey into the killer's head. She's more object than character as things play
out and the actress's striking looks and physique help center the visual tone
of the elaborate production.
Vince Vaughn and Vincent D'Onofrio are interchangeable actors who could have
been selected for their respective roles by a draw of straws. As such, neither
gives much character to their roles as the dedicated cop and the sick psycho
loony. Supporting cast is uniformly wasted. Dylan Baker ("Happiness") and
Marianne Jean-Baptiste ("Secrets & Lies"), as research scientists Henry West
and Dr. Miriam Kent, are left the task of pushing buttons and watching the 
inert, futuristically clad bodies of their patients (the action is in the mind)
without much involvement. At one point, it looked like the story was going to 
take a twist and Jean-Baptiste was going to get an expanded role. She didn't 
and the writer went for the routine hero-heroine story. Jake Webber ("U-571") 
playing Pete's partner, FBI agent Gordon Ramsey, doesn't fare much better as 
his character is left in the wake of Novak's single-handed bravery.
Of course, if you've seen the trailer, you can readily see that the special F/X
and surreal quality of the film are the draw to get you to see it. Despite the
flaws and inconsistencies in the story and the lack of depth to the principle
characters, the visual acuity of "The Cell" is enough to recommend it. It is
reminiscent of "Coma" and is the first film to delve so deeply into the human
mind since Ken Russell's 1980 film, "Altered States." The film is stunning to
look at and tech credits are superior. Photography, by Paul Laufer ("Frankie
Starlight"), is slick, sometimes beautiful, and is a major credit to the movie.
Production design, by Tom Foden (Gus Van Sant's "Psycho"), costuming, at
different times by April Napier ("Your Friends and Neighbors") and Eiko Ishioka
(Academy Award for "Bram Stoker's Dracula"), and make-up, by two-time Academy
Award winner Michele Burke ("Quest for Fire," "Bram Stoker's Dracula"), all
work to make this a superior looking flick. The F/X team, led by Clay Pinney
("Independence Day") and Kevin Tod Haug ("The Game"), are excellent.
One point the script makes in the midst of all the psycho babble that permeates
the film is that the FBI solves crimes and saves people by their understanding
of forensics and their doggedness in following clues, even insignificant ones,
to get their man. The story does not downplay the hard work of America's
crime-fighters in doing their difficult jobs.
There is more to a movie than just F/X and flash and good looks. A carefully
constructed story and three-dimensional characters are needed, too, to make a
film great. "The Cell" makes it part way and I give it a B-.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for America's Sweethearts (2001)
Eddie Thomas (John Cusack) and Gwen Harrison (Catherine Zeta-Jones) were 
America's favorite Hollywood couple, appearing in one blockbuster after 
another together.  But when they teamed up with genius filmmaker 
Hal Weidmann (Christopher Walken), Gwen began an affair with her Spanish 
supporting costar Hector (Hank Azaria, "The Birdcage") that drove Eddie 
into an asylum and Gwen off the box office charts.  It's now up to Lee
Phillips (Billy Crystal) to get the two together for the press junket of
Weidmann's film in "America's Sweethearts."
Lee's not only dealing with warring costars - Weidmann is holding his film
hostage and Lee has to keep the press preoccupied so they don't notice they're
not seeing the movie. Lee puts the focus on the separated couple, leaking
videotape of an apparently masturbating Eddie outside of Gwen's cottage
followed by a picture of them canoodling in a car.  This brings the jealous
Hector out to the desert resort to beat Eddie senseless and provide more
publicity.  Meanwhile, Gwen's sister/assistant Kiki (Julia Roberts), who's
shed sixty pounds since Gwen and Eddie's breakup, has consummated her long 
time crush on Eddie by falling into bed with him.
Writers Billy Crystal and Peter Tolan ("Analyze This") had a brilliant idea 
to anchor a screwball comedy, but while they sprinkle the script with several 
brilliant bits, their story begins to deflate just when it should be reaching 
its comic climax.  They neglect to develop some characters, most notably 
Eddie, and their big moment, when Weidmann finally unspools his film, is 
painfully unfunny.
"America's Sweethearts'" all star cast, therefore, have varying degrees of 
success bringing this thing to life.  Firstly, Julia Roberts must be given
credit for creating the most human, audience empathetic, character in
Kiki.  Long subjected to the petty demands of her spoiled sister, Kiki 
soldiers on, coordinating hundreds of details lest Gwen encounter reality
('Is that the water with the electrolytes?  I only drink water with the
electrolytes.')  Julia nails the film's best scene, where Kiki finally has
her meltdown over a hungry man's breakfast, like the superstar pro she's
become.  Unfortunately, the flashback scenes which feature her in a fat suit
merely make her look stiff.
Most comical of the film's cast is Catherine Zeta-Jones as the high maintenance
movie diva.  She wheedles and pouts until her supreme unalienable right to
be the center of the universe is granted.  In a hilarious bit, as Lee is
convincing her to attend the junket, we see her Doberman attack a window
washer outside, bringing the man to the ground, mauling him.  When Lee informs
her of this as the huge beast bounds into the room, she coos 'puppy!' 
obliviously.  
The always dependable John Cusack tries to inject his 
considerable charm into Eddie Thomas.  While he's marginally appealing, 
the character has been so neglected by the writers that he comes across 
shallowly.  Hank Azaria starts off well, doing what appears to be a parody 
of Antonio Banderas, but his lisping, heavy accent gets wearisome quickly.  
Crystal's given himself many of his movie's best lines, but he barely breaks 
a sweat creating his PR guy.  Christopher Walken's miscast as the Hal 
Ashby-like director who edits his films in the Unabomber's shack, which he's 
had transported to the grounds of his estate.  Stanley Tucci is fine as the
hand-wringing studio head beholden to Phillips after having fired him, while
Seth Green disappears into the background as Lee's protege who was to have
replaced him.  Alan Arkin amusingly plays the 'Richard Libertini role' of 
Eddie's self help guru.
The Hyatt Regency Lake Las Vegas Resort is a good location choice for this
glossy production, luxurious yet remote.  Unfortunately, the cast
careening around its grounds keep the audience remote more often than 
they allow them to luxuriate in classic comedy.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Goűt des autres, Le (1999)
THE TASTE OF OTHERS (Les Goutes des Autres)
Have you ever misjudged someone, treated them badly, then felt horrible 
about it?  This and other aspects of the human condition are explored
in cowriter/director/star Agnes Jaoui's Best Foreign Language Film Oscar
nominee "The Taste of Others."
The film begins by following the seemingly unrelated conversations of two
tables of diners.  Castella (cowriter Jean-Pierre Bacri, "Place Vendome") is 
a businessman attempting to sneak a sweet past his controlling wife Angelique
(Christiane Millet) while also carrying on a business lunch.  At another
table, storytelling Franck (Gerard Lanvin) and literal Bruno (Alain Chabat, 
"French Twist") appear to have little in common until we learn that Franck
is Castella's bodyguard and Bruno his driver.
Castella interviews Clara (Anne Alvaro, "Danton") as an English teacher, but
dismisses her when she doesn't produce a fun technique.  Later, when he's
dragged to a stage production of Berenice by his wife (his niece has a small
part in the production), Castella is entranced by Clara in the lead role and
begins to ardently pursue her, much to her dismay (she needs his English lesson
money, but finds him boorish and uneducated).  Meanwhile Bruno encounters Manie
(Agnes Jaoui) tending the bar at a cafe and she informs him they once slept
together.  While they aren't successful rekindling the former flame (Bruno
can't believe he didn't remember while Manie can't believe she did), Manie
begins a relationship with Franck.  Manie's also buddies with Clara and 
the rest of the theatrical troupe customers, closing the circle of the main
cast.  A subplot, where Angelique forces her interior decorating skills
upon her sister-in-law Beatrice (Brigitte Catillon, "Artemisia"), most
literally conveys the film's title.
This warm, funny, all too human story is about how people's myopia can lead
them astray in their search for happiness.  It's an assured, typically French
(conversation heavy) piece of work by Jaoui and her costar Bacri.  Jaoui gets
top notch work from her entire cast.  (Oddly, the central characters all
resemble American stars with Jaoui herself looking like "Ally McBeal's"
Courtney Thorne-Smith, Bacri like "L.A. Law's" Alan Rachins, Clara like
Lily Tomlin and Bruno like Peter Riegart.)  The film is beautifully editted
(Herve de Luze), sometimes for comic effect (Flucky, Angelique's puffball
little dog who 'always bites for a good reason,' gambolling about) or to
jump across time while one character glides from one encounter to the next.
"The Taste of Others" is both heartbreaking and hopeful.  Alvara's final smile
is like something out of a constellation while Bruno's mysterious, solitary
flute playing is given satisfying closure for both the character and the film.
Small moments, even when anticipated (Castella placing his newly purchased
modern painting amidst his wife's flowery, fluffy decor), bring large payoffs.
"The Taste of Others" is a real treat.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Everlasting Piece, An (2000)
Colm O'Neill's (screenwriter Barry McEvoy) house sits at the crosshairs 
of the Catholic and Protestant neighborhoods of Belfast, hooded by a 
homemade firebomb protection.  When Colm begins a new job as a barber at 
Ballylackey Mental Hospital, he finds a fast friend in Protestant poetry
lover George (Brian F. O'Byrne, HBO's "Oz").  They're tipped off to a 
wide open market opportunity, when the owner (Billy Connelly, "Mrs. Brown")
of the only men's hair piece company in Northern Ireland lands in their 
institution for scalping clients in director Barry Levinson's ("Diner") 
"An Everlasting Piece."
While "An Everlasting Piece" doesn't strain at the yoke to offer up
twee Irish charm like this year's  "Saving Grace," it's tale of rugs set
against 'the troubles' that wears a bit thin overall.
Colm and George manage to convince 'the scalper' to hand over his list of
clients to begin their new side endeavor.  They immediately run into problems
with their first client, Mr. Black (Des McAleer), who confuses their doorway
sales pitch for a hair piece as a speachifying on herpes (the Irish poking
fun at their own accents?).  They sell him their sample after the initial
confusion, but in their eagerness to make the sale, they take a check, which
inevitably bounces.  McEvoy strains his screenplay with a character that
refuses to pay in order to get Colm to take the piece back by force, only
to be chased by a group of Black's lads, then run down by a pack of dogs
(did Black pack a steak under that piece or what?).  Colm's been abandoned
by George, who took off in their car after being accosted by an apparently
released Scalper (a never more wasted Billy Connelly).
This is a film about the Irish conflict, so of course, the two get stopped
on a lonely road by the IRA, one of whom buys that same dog-chewed hair
piece.  When the duo ends up being questioned by the police, Colm refuses
to turn the IRA in.  Conflict ensues between the two budding businessmen,
who are also being challenged by the Toupee or Not Toupee company in a sales
showdown.
"An Everlasting Piece" is a pleasant enough little comedy, but there were
so many wrong moves which could have been avoided.  Did McEvoy really believe
that his audience would be amused to see Colm's mother appear with different
styles of underwear on her head, ostensibly her 'eccentric' way of protecting
her hairdo from her own cigarette smoke?  Is he such a fan of The Talking
Heads that he had to cut to inexplicable, gratuitous scenes of Colm and 
girlfriend Bronaugh (Anna Friel, "A Midsummer Night's Dream") in a movie 
theatre playing "Stop Making Sense?"  Why is Colm's 'gesture' to save the
business late in the film any less distasteful than what George has 
objected to in Colm's behavior?
Director Barry Levinson has a diverse roster of films behind him, but I
must admit confusion as to what drew him to this small offbeat tale.  While
setting the Irish conflict against the rug trade is an inspired idea (based
on the screenwriter's father's experiences), the telling dawdles and never
quites finds its course.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Yi yi (2000)
Winner of the Best Director award at this year's Cannes Film Festival,
"Yi Yi (A One and a Two)" is a broad, philosophical look at modern life
in Taiwan.  NJ (Nien-Jen Wu, writer/director of "A Borrowed Life") is a 
middle aged father of two who's facing a crisis at his electronics firm 
and the unsettling appearance of an old flame (Su-Yun Ko) while
his wife Min Min (Elaine Jin, "A Brighter Summer Day") suffers a breakdown.  
His teenage daughter Ting Ting (Kelly Lee) is involved in a love triangle 
complicated by musical competition with her best friend.  Eight year old 
Yang Yang (Jonathan Chang) has an unrequited crush and a budding passion for 
photography.  NJ's live-in mother-in-law (Ru-Yun Tang) is dying and his 
brother-in-law Ah Di (Hsi-Sheng Chen) is still being pursued by his old 
girfriend even though he's newly married to an expectant bride.
Writer/director Edward Yang's ("A Brighter Summer Day") "Yi Yi" is one of
the year 2000's most satisfying films on many levels.  The story, while 
playing like a soap opera on the surface, is chock full of wry human
observations while showing great affection for its characters.  Technically,
the film is striking in every aspect.
Nien-Jen Wu gives a note perfect performance as the beleaguered NJ.  With
little dialogue, Wu is always sympathetic as his character provides an anchor
for the confused adults who orbit around him.  NJ himself is only able to turn 
to Ota (Issey Ogata), the Japanese businessman NJ wishes to partner with.
Ota looks like the makings of a long time friend and provides much needed
advice cloaked in metaphor.  The other anchor in "Yi Yi" is the dying 
grandmother, another character of few words.  Min Min believes her life is 
empty after realizing that she tells her mother the same things daily and 
it 'only takes a minute' while Ting Ting obsesses over the drama in her life.  
In the film's opening scene, Ah Di's old girlfriend 'apologizes' to the 
grandmother at the wedding reception hall for not marrying her son.  Young 
Yang Yang waits for the film's closing funeral to speak his oddly mature and
though-proking piece.
Every woman in the film has her moment of hysterics except for grandma and
the moody, melancholy Ting Ting, who is at the receiving end of her best 
friend's condemnation for seeing her boyfriend, Fatty (Pang Chang Yu).  
Sherry, NJ's former fiance now married for the third time to an American in 
Chicago, arranges to meet him on a business trip to Tokyo obviously hoping to 
resume the relationship only to spend the weekend haranguing him for abandoning
her all those years ago.  Most of the film's gentle humor comes via Yang Yang
whether he's arriving home drenched and unnoticed or patiently explaining
to his uncle Ah Di that he's taken pictures of the backs of peoples' heads
as a service because they can't seem them themselves.
Yang and his cinematographer Wei-han Yang have created  a bold color design 
which shifts from reds (Ah Di's wedding), to yellows (Ting Ting's first
love) and blues (NJ's Tokyo interlude) before finally giving over to black
and white (grandmother's funeral).  Characters are framed in storefronts,
by pillars, trees and doorways and reflected upon by the outside world.
The film's editor, Bo-Wen Chen, expertly cuts among all the interweaving
plot threads, never more beautifully than when Sherry describes her and NJ's
first date as Ting Ting repeats the action in another time zone.  Kai-Li
Peng's score subtly creates mood.
While not every character's story line is as compelling as the others, such
is the way of life, and life is celebrated in all its glories, tragedies,
foolishness and profundity in "Yi Yi."
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Bless the Child (2000)
The Bethlehem star shines bright one Christmas and a child is born beneath it
on December 16.  Nurse Maggie O'Connor (Kim Basinger) arrives home a week
later to find her drug addicted sister Jenna (Angela Bettis, "Girl,
Interrupted") huddled in her doorway clutching a newborn which she abandons
with Maggie.  Six years later, during a string of child murders, she returns 
as the wife of Erik Stark, (Rufus Sewall, "Dark City") founder of The New Dawn, 
a Scientology-like organization for young drug addicts.  But Maggie discovers 
The New Dawn is really a front for Satanists looking for a special child in
"Bless the Child."
"Bless the Child" is the anti-"Omen."  It also borrows copiously from other
Satanic horror flicks such as "The Prophecy" and "The Exorcist." 
The horror genre is a tough one to succeed in as can be seen by the enormous
amount of dreck one must sift through in order to find the gems.  With that
in mind, "Bless the Child" isn't all that bad, mostly due to it's unusual
emphasis on the good part of the 'good vs. evil' plot and some imaginative
special effects.  It's also derivative to the max, perfunctorily acted
(except for Sewell's over-the-top perf) and features some outright howlers
(of laughter, that is).
Cody (Holliston Coleman) is quiet to the point of being diagnosed as autistic
so attends a special (conveniently Catholic) school where she resuscitates
dead birds and makes votive candles burst into flame.  Her nightmares are
telepathetically shared with Aunt Maggie, who races to Cody's bedroom to
find the child held hostage by red-eyed rats while being leered at by the
gargoyle outside her window.  Cody's head banging incidents scare away
Maggie's dates.
Once Cody's snatched by Stark, Maggie crosses paths with FBI Agent John Travis
(Jimmy Smits), a former seminarian who's on the case of the murdered children
(all, like Cody, born on December 16).  He believes Stark's involved but needs
to prove it.  Maggie gets tips, follows them on her own and gets into 
enormous jams that Travis can then save her from.  Meanwhile Stark's trying
to 'turn' Cody to use her special powers for the dark side.  He tries to
convince her by lighting bums on fire and sweet talking her into jumping off
their building's roof, but she's not buying it.  The whole things ends on
Easter Eve in a gothic mansion where Cody must accept Satan or die.
Kim Bassinger frets a lot and Jimmy Smits looks earnest.  Sewell gets mileage
out of the freekiness of his lazy eye.  Holliston Coleman is quite believable
as the troubled Cody.  Lumi Cavazos ("Like Water for Chocolate") is luminous
as a nun.  Christina Ricci is wasted (both literally and figuratively) as
a former New Dawn goth chick.  Angela Bettis nicely traverses the road from 
strung out to brainwashed.  Ian Holm's nothing more than a classy credit, 
appearing in one unnecessary scene.  It's truly fun to see Dimitra Arlys again, 
(so good as the diner waitress who tries to kill Robert Redford in "The Sting") 
here playing the demonic nanny right out of "The Omen."
The screenplay adaptation (Tom Rickman, Clifford and Ellen Green) of Cathy
Cash Spellman's book contains a few nice touches.  Travis prays for help
and a janitor offers some encouraging words - when he leaves the dead lillies
on Travis' window sill are abloom again.  A pretty woman uses her umbrella
to open subway doors Maggie and Cody are running for, then is nowhere to
be seen when Maggie turns to offer thanks.  It also offers such idiocy as
a rescue attempt at a dentist's office and blatant ripoffs such as having
Maggie's housekeeper leave her rosary under Cody's pillow (straight out of
"The Exorcist").
The best thing about "Bless the Child" are the special effects by Glenn
Neufeld ("Terminator II") and Joel Hynek ("What Dreams May Come").  They
create demonic creatures which Maggie begins to see when evil is afoot.
Their hovering and skittering are truly creepy, some resembling the flying
monkeys of "The Wizard of Oz."
"Bless the Child" is mostly derivative junk, but its few novel touches 
are worth noting.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Atlantis: The Lost Empire (2001)
Linguist/cartographer Milo Thatch (Michael J. Fox) dreams of following in his
explorer grandfather's footsteps searching for the lost civilization of
Atlantis.  Instead he tends to the boiler in the basement of a museum whose
board of directors will not hear his proposal.  When mysterious blond
seductress Helga Sinclair (Claudia Christian, TV's "Babylon V") leads him
to the home of millionaire Preston B. Whitmore (John Mahoney, TV's "Frasier"),
Milo discovers an unknown friend of his grandad's is now prepared to
fund his expedition complete with a crack team of specialists.  But that 
team contains two with a mercenary agenda which will threaten the civilization
Milo dreams of studying in the latest Walt Disney animation "Atlantis:  the
Lost Empire."
While Disney faces an uphill battle against the likes of the family-friendly
"Shrek" and early mixed reviews from NY and LA, animation fans should delight
in this gorgeous, eye-popping widescreen adventure tale.  While the story
(Bryce and Jackie Zabel, screenplay by Tab Murphy and Josh Whedon) bogs down 
in its midsection with fantastical New Age crystal mumbo-jumbo better suited
to the "Pokemon" films, the large cast of characters are all entertaining,
the adventure set pieces rousing.  It's like "20,000 Leagues Under the Sea"
cast with improvizational comedians, dastardly villains, 'good' aliens
and kindly sidekicks as led by "Peter Pan's" bespectacled John Darling.
This PG Disney film immediately marks its difference by opening with a Plato
quote and the subtitled destruction of Atlantis (an Atlantean language was
invented for the film).  While the animation recalls past Disney efforts,
such as the great deep canvas effect created for "Tarzan" to produce 
multi-planed backgrounds, it also has a new look based inspired by the works of
comic book artist Mike Mignola, ("Hellboy") who assisted in production design,
exhibited most startlingly in the drawing of Helga.
The voice cast is simply outstanding led by Michael J. Fox who gives Milo plucky
depth.  Corey Burton gives the film's weirdest character, Gaetan "The Mole"
Moliere, a burrowing expert allergic to soap whose eyeballs appear to rest
at the end of his night vision goggles, a nifty Gallic babble.  Don Novello
of Father Guido Sarducci fame is Vinny Santorini, a comical explosives ace.
Florence Stanley, best known for playing Fish's wife on TV's "Barney Miller,"
gives hilariously guttural asides as the chain-smoking Mrs. Packard.  The
late Jim Varney makes his final appearance as "Cookie," the cook who worships
beans and bacon grease.  Phil Morris makes the giant Dr. Sweet gentle with
his smooth smoky delivery.  Commander Lyle T. Rourke is given stature by 
veteran actor James Garner.  Leonard Nimoy is also on hand as the King of
Atlantis whose daughter Kida (Cree Summer) teams up with Milo to save their
world.
Veteran Disney animation directors Kirk Wise and Gary Trousdale ("Beauty and
the Beast") have delivered something different from the usual Disney
animation, while maintaining the high quality we've come to expect from the
mouse house.  While the fast-paced adventure slows to establish its
ill-conceived object of contention, this high caliber production delivers on 
every other front.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Tillsammans (2000)
When Elisabeth's (Lisa Lindgren) husband Rolf (Michael Nyqvist) hits
her for the second time, she bundles up her kids Stefan (Sam Kessel)
and Eva (Emma Samuelsson) and moves into her brother Goran's (Gustaf
Hammarsten, "The Best Intentions") commune.  The wildly divergent commune
members and the people Rolf meets now that he's alone will take each
member of this family on a unique journey that ultimately brings them
all back "Together."
Writer/director Lukas Moodysson ("Show Me Love") creates a warm
comedy about a group of people forced to reconsider preconceived
notions and how only those willing to take a chance on change are able
to make the connections that count in life.  While Moodysson doesn't give
equal weight to all his characters, making his film's structure unbalanced,
his fine cast and true human observations are ultimately what count.
Goran tries to be all things to all people, including his sex-mad girlfriend
Lena (Anja Lundqvist), whose proclamation of and action upon their 'open 
relationship' is slowly driving him mad.  Medical student Lasse (Ola Norell) 
humorously speaks his mind, summing up situations in a no nonsense manner that,
while it may sting, is always on target.  His ex-wife Anna (Jessica Liedberg)
embraces meditation, hairy armpits and lesbianism, while homosexual 
Klas (Shanti Roney) yearns for nothing more than to be a housewife for Lasse.
Erik, (Olle Sarri) a strident member of the Communist, Marxist, Leninist, 
Revolutionary League, argues that his welding job keeps him from 'rotting
at university.'  Signe (Cecilia Frode) and Sigvard (Lars Frode) are hippies
who reject meat and materialism.
When Elisabeth and her kids arrive from the bourgeois world (just as Lasse's
dropped his pants in protest of Anna's bottomless kitchen attire!), everything
shifts.  Anna immediately sets her sights on Elisabeth, loosening her up
and strengthening her resolve to stay away from Rolf.  The kids suffer
until Stefan connects with Tet (Axel Zuber), Lasse and Anna's Vietnam War
named son, over forbidden Legos, war games and 'playing Pinochet' and Eva 
begins a tentative romance with Fredrik (Henrik Lundstrom), the equally 
four-eyed outcast son of next door's disapproving neighbors Margit (Therese 
Brunnander) and Ragnar (Claes Hartelius).  Meanwhile, after a disastrous 
evening with his kids which ends with him drunk in prison, Rolf quits the booze
and strikes up a friendship with lonely widower Birger (Sten Ljunggren), who 
urges him to woo back his wife.
Moodysson's nostalgic look back at 1975 Stockholm of 'ugly clothes and
bad music' proves that styles may change, but people pretty much stay
the same.  His gradual reconfiguration of the Tillsammans household is
canny and uplifting and his cast are uniformly excellent.  Except for
its small imbalances (the action shifts away from the household for too
long a stretch, Signe and Sigvard exist only to leave in protest), the
film's lone drawback is the amateurish cinematography by Ulf Brantas
("Show Me Love").  Brantas zooms and pans like someone with their first
videocamera, although editors Michal Leszczylowski and Fredrik Abrahamsen
make the most with the footage they have.
"Together" is a life-affirming comedy.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Shaft (2000)
In 1971, Richard Roundtree starred as "the cat who won't cut out, when there's
danger all about" in Gordon Parks's seminal blaxploitation film, "Shaft." That
film spawned two sequels and a TV series. Now, nearly 30 years later, Samuel L.
Jackson reprises the role of the title character, this time as the NYPD cop and
nephew of the legendary black private dick. John Singleton ("Boyz 'N the Hood")
directs the new "Shaft" and puts an updated and contemporary spin on the
original concept.
John Shaft is a well-respected New York City detective assigned to a case
involving the brutal beating of a young black man in a racially motivated
incident. The prime suspect is Walter Wade Jr. (Christian Bale), the scion of a
powerful, billionaire real estate tycoon with huge clout in the city. When
Shaft arrests the arrogant young man, he learns that there may have been an
eyewitness to the assault. The victim dies and Shaft becomes the champion of 
the murdered boy's mother and vows to take Wayne Jr. down.
Money talks, however, and Wayne is released on a pittance of bail, only to flee
the country to escape prosecution. The witness, Diane Palmieri (Toni Collette),
has also gone to ground, so Shaft's vendetta against Wayne comes to an abrupt
halt with no culprit and no witness. Flash forward two years. Shaft gets a tip
that the younger Wade is sneaking back into the country and catches the killer
cold. But, once again, political influence and money are more powerful than
justice is and Wayne is released on bail. Shaft, disgusted with the corrupt
proceedings, hurls his badge at the judge and vows to quit the force and
resolve the gross miscarriage of justice himself.
Shaft realizes that the only way he is going to take Wayne Jr. down is to find
Diane. Wayne knows this, too, and hires a small time drug dealer, Peoples
Hernandez (Jeffrey Wright), to ferret out the only person who can put Wayne
behind bars. Peoples contracts a pair of corrupt detectives to help out in the
search by tailing Shaft and reporting his moves. It becomes a race against the
clock as the disgruntled detective lays his life on the line to protect Diane.
John Singleton co-wrote the screenplay with Richard Price and Shane Salerno and
they come up with a hip, fast-moving action adventure that pays homage to the
original and the best of the blaxploitation genre. From the opening credits,
with the familiar sound of Isaac Hayes singing the original title song, to the
cheesy wipes between scenes and the sometimes equally cheesy score, we are
seeing a film that dedicates itself to the genre. But, the new "Shaft" still
maintains its modern, edgy nature that has evolved in film since the 70's.
"Shaft" is a heartfelt homage to the genre.
Samuel L. Jackson is John Shaft personified. The actor has always been a
favorite of my mine and I had high expectations for him as the new age Shaft.
He does not disappoint. The actor captures the sassy, irreverent nature of
Roundtree's original while giving the role his own imprint. Jackson has the
ability to switch from amiable to brutal in the wink of an eye, which suits the
character perfectly. If there isn't a sequel or two coming out of this, I'll be
hornswaggled.
Supporting cast is first rate with Jeffrey Wright making the biggest splash as
the flamboyant Hispanic drug dealer, Peoples. Wright is an extraordinary
character actor and almost leaps off the screen as the small statured, but
volatile and violent, drug lord. The actor is a true chameleon in his acting
and gives an attention grabbing perf. When a shootout ends in a tragic loss 
for the Peoples, the agony and vengeance he feels is palpable. The actor 
maintains his edge from beginning to end.
And the rest of the cast isn't shabby, either. Vanessa L. Williams goes
completely out of her usual glamour roles and plays a tough, capable cop, and
Shaft's friend and partner, Carmen Vasquez. It's hard to hide the actress's
beautiful looks, but her costuming as a no nonsense police officer does a good
job of hiding her inherent sexiness and allows Carmen's persona to come to the
surface. Christian Bale does a mini version of his recent, outrageous Patrick
Bateman in "American Psycho," but with a cocky toughness, not lunacy. He's
overshadowed by Wright's brilliant performance, though, and becomes more an
object than a character by the end of the film. Toni Collete, who can be
terrific, is merely OK as the fugitive witness, Diane. It's not her fault,
though, as there is little for her to do except be the target of everyone's
search. Richard Roundtree gets to play up the gracefully aging private eye and
ladies' man as John's Uncle John.
Tech credits are tops with cinematographer Donald Thorin capturing the feel of
the original but with an up to date image that is slick and new Millennium. The
frequent night shots are crisp and the action scenes and shootouts are tight.
Costume designer Ruth E. Carter gets high marks with her design of Shaft's
mostly black wardrobe, making him look like an avenging wraith when in action.
Editing is brisk and suits the fast pace that Singleton maintains in the just
over 90 minute flick. Brevity has its charms.
The only problems with the all-new "Shaft" are some enormous plot holes and a
trite, almost perfunctory ending that doesn't quite satisfy, detracting from
the rest of the film. I had me some good fun, still, and give it a B.
Director John Singleton ("Boyz in the Hood") breaks out of a slump with a
suprisingly adept, worthwhile remake in his modernized "Shaft."  Samuel
L. Jackson is John Shaft, newphew of the original John Shaft (Richard
Roundtree, who appears in this film as well) from the 1971 film which
epitomized the Blaxploitation film.
This new Shaft begins as a member of the NYPD (Uncle John was and still is
a P.I.) whose vigilante urges cause a despicable hate crime murderer (Christian
Bale as rich kid William Wade) to make bail and leave the country.  Shaft
hurls his badge at the judge and becomes a true vigilante (when he's not
bedding the numerous women lining up for the privilege) until we see the
'Two Years Later' subtitle which precedes Wade's return to the U.S.  (In
a major plot hole, which is either a result of editting for run time or a
huge problem with Shane Salerno's ("Armageddon") screenplay) the audience
is never given a single reason why Wade would return to face murder charges,
except for the arrogance of wealth.)
Wade encounters another Shaft adversary, drug lord Peoples Hernandez (Jeffrey
Wright, "Basquiat"), once Shaft's ensured Wade's weekend in the clink, and
Peoples is drawn to Wade's lifestyle (Peoples covets class).  Wade, knowing
that Shaft has an ace-in-the-hole witness (Toni Collette, "The Sixth Sense," as
Diane Palmieri), approaches Peoples to take her out, once he's infuriatingly
out on bail for a second time (the judge's concession to not being totally
bought this time around is to demand empoundment of Wade's passport).  Peoples
asks for admittance to Wade's world, which Wade dismisses out of hand, but
Peoples gets his revenge for when Wade gets mugged of the hit payment
(oh yeah, there are two corrupt cops playing everyone against the other, too,
although Shaft is clever enough to pull off the mugging and lay it at their
doorstep as a betrayal of Peoples) and is forced to deal drugs for him.
There are some big plots holes, mostly concerning Wade's storyline, but
Singleton keeps the story moving along so energetically and stages the 
action so kineticly (kudos to cinematographer Donald E. Thorin, "Thief,"
as well) that the film's coolness and entertainment value outweigh it's
problems.  Heck - this is far better than the original.
Samuel L. Jackson oozes cool as John 'It's my duty to please that booty'
Shaft.  He blows the Grade-B Richard Roundtree off the screen with his
formidable acting chops and screen charisma.  Yet even Jackson takes a second
seat to Jeffrey Wright, who gives a Best Supporting Actor Oscar
nomination-worthy performance as Peoples (as in "I takes care of my peoples"),
the class-craving, carved facial hair, icepick poking drug lord who's
entertaining to be around until Shaft shoots his brother during a 
standoff - then he gets real ugly (not to mention psychotic).
Bale does a twist on his "American Psycho" persona as Wade, throwing a 
bit of New York Irish into the mix - he's good, but suffers from the way
his storyline is handled.  Vanessa Williams is surprisingly effective as
an NYPD officer who stays loyal to Shaft - her looks don't get in the way
of her believability in the role.  Toni Collette is mostly wasted as the
witness to Wade's crime whom everyone's after.  Rapper Busta Rhymes is
fun as Rassan, a guy who's called to pay back favors by Shaft.  
The distinctive "Shaft" theme is updated and effectively used to cue
Jackson's every move by Isaac Hayes.
This is the first surprise treat of the summer multiplex season.  Who's
the man - Shaft!
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for King Is Alive, The (2000)
A missed plane changes the itinerary of a small group of European and American
tourists so they're put on a bus to make their next connection.  Liz (Janet
McTeer, "Tumbleweeds") frets that the journey is taking too long and is fed
comforting words by her husband Ray (Bruce Davison, "X-Men").  But when night 
turns into day, they discover that the compass bus driver Kanana (Peter 
Kubheka, "The Air Up There") has been relying on doesn't work.  Stranded in an 
abandoned mining town 500 miles from anywhere, English actor Henry's (David 
Bradley, "Prick Up Your Ears") idea of staging 'King Lear' sets the stage for 
the full range of human emotion in "The King is Alive."
Cowriter(with Anders Thomas Jensen)/director Kristian Levring is
the fourth founder of Dogme 95 (along with Lars von Trier, "Breaking the 
Waves;" Thomas Vinterberg, "The Celebration;" and Soren Kragh Jacobsen, 
"Mifune"), making his feature directorial debut with "The King Is Alive."
The ensemble cast create unique and complex characters that form a
microcosm of society.  Jack (Miles Anderson, "Cry Freedom") is the adventurer,
who gives the group the five rules of surviving in the desert before setting 
off for help.  Henry is the artist whose exercise of writing out the roles of 
King Lear from memory casts him as the group's director.  Drawn to him is 
Catherine (Romane Bohringer, "Colonel Chabert"), a young French woman who 
fancies herself an intellectual yet turns down the offer of 
Cordelia's part.  That goes to Gina (Jennifer Jason Leigh), an
American vamp disdained by Catherine but looked upon fondly by Henry (and 
lasciviously by the other white males).  Paul (Chris Walker) is a coarse, loud 
Englishman accompanied by mousy wife Amanda (Lia Williams) on a trip designed 
to bond with father Charles (David Calder, "The World is Not Enough").  Ray and 
Liz are a married couple whose suppressed accusations don't withstand the 
first evening's alcoholic blowout.  Ashley (late character actor Brion James, 
to whom the film is dedicated) is the initial Lear, done in by the DTs.  
Local Kanana is the object of scorn, lust, revenge and racism.
Moses (Vusi Kunene, "The Air Up There") is a hermit found in the village who 
acts as the story's narrator.
Levring and Jensen use 'King Lear' as a springboard for alliances,
cliques, divisions, betrayals and ultimately madness.   Yet for all the 
fascinating behavior so finely created by the cast, the screenwriters 
overindulge with several melodramatic sexual alliances - lust in the dust 
indeed.  These people may have something to prove, but Levring so ably 
makes us feel his characters discomfort ('I feel like a pig! I want
a bath!' proclaims Liz) that sex seems an unlikely outlet for them.  Gina's 
sacrifice for her 'art' via a most unlikely pairing plays especially false 
despite the actors' craft.  Still, the dialogue is often devastating.  Newly 
awakened Amanda tells Paul 'I knew you were nothing special but I 
didn't let that bother me because I wanted a peaceful life.'
Using three handheld digital video cameras, Levring achieves a
rich, color-saturated look at his exotic location of Kolmanskop, Namibia which 
is truly the star of his film.  The ever shifting sands provide texture, Gina's 
lip gloss and chartreuse satin shirt reflect light and splotches and streaks of 
paint on interior concrete walls provide both character definition and a 
modern art background.  Editor Nicholas Wayman Harris makes offbeat, 
unusual choices.  A one second cutaway of a woman's midriff from a
closeup of her face punches up the montage.  The sudden lack of sound during 
aerial shots intensify the utter isolation while allowing us to soak in the 
spectacular beauty of the terrain uninterrupted.
"The King Is Alive" attempts to encompass the human condition via a
woefully off course tourist bus.  Despite a couple of wrong turns, it takes us 
to places both known and uncharted.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Visit, The (2000/I)
Alex Waters (Hill Harper, "He Got Game") is in prison for 25 years for a rape
he swears he didn't commit.  As members of his estranged family visit him,
he dreams of each relationship in a musical interlude.  He also dreams of
travelling on the trains which pass by the prison walls, gradually opens up
to prison psychiatrist Dr. Coles (Phylicia Rashad, TV's "The Cosby Show"),
and prepares for his first meeting with the parole board.  As if Alex didn't
have enough to cope with, he also must face AIDS in "The Visit."
Adapted from Kosmond Russell's stage play by director Jordan Walker-Pearlman,
"The Visit" is actually a series of visits, beginning with Alex's older
brother Tony (Obba Babatunde, "Life") whom he hasn't seen in ten months.
Alex demands that Tony get their parents to visit him and admonishes him
for not bringing his family (although later their Dad turns the tables on
Alex, when he's not able to name is niece and nephew).  Alex dreams of disco
dancing with Tony is his cell.  
Next, Henry and Lois Waters (Billy Dee Williams, "Lady Sings the Blues" and
Marla Gibbs of TV's "The Jeffersons") appear, both nervously twisting their
wedding rings as they await Alex.  Father and son clearly have serious
issues, the stern Henry disapproving of Alex's lifestyle even before he
was jailed.  Motherlove is strong though and Alex dreams of dancing with his
mother to "For All We Know."
Meetings with Dr. Cole are intriguing as the psychiatrist pushes Alex to
confront himself.  Rashad makes some interesting acting choices, putting
a real spin on the tough-as-nails, but ultimately supportive doctor.  Harper,
as Alex, frequently recalls Denzel Washington's demeanor and delivery.
The film's strongest scene, however, comes when Alex's childhood friend
Felicia (Rae Dawn Chong, "Commando") comes to visit, apologizing for not
having spoken to him in twenty years.  As a child, Alex witnessed the sexual 
abuse Felicia suffered at the hands of her father and her guilt made
her unable to face Alex anymore.  Now a born again Christian, Felicia begins 
to push many of Alex's buttons, challenging and angering him, before finally 
presenting her deep empathy with his past - she was a crack addict who sunk 
even lower than he, selling herself to support her habit and bearing a severely
handicapped child.  These three broken people form a family, inspiring
all around them.  Rae Dawn Chong delivers a powerhouse performance here
that should garner strong Best Supporting Actress consideration.
Alex's parole board (Talia Shire, David Clennon, Glynn Turman, Efrain Figueroa
and Amy Stiller) functions almost as a Greek chorus, asking Alex searching
questions and debating the merits of Dr. Cole's recommendation behind
closed doors.
"The Visit" features tight shots which frequently fade to black after
snippets of conversation and jump cuts which make the film feel
self-consciencely stylish.  Lighting is anything but natural (as is
evidenced when Alex refolds a positively glowing piece of tissue) and
sound editting is a bit ragged.  Some of the fantasy sequences play like
a Hallmark Hall of Fame production, as does the overly sentimental ending.  
Yet the story works strongly when it does, aided by the terrific performances 
from Rae Dawn Chong and Phylicia Rashad.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Eu, Tu, Eles (2000)
When Darlene (Regina Case) returns to her poor home in the Brazilian Northeast
after giving birth to her son, she finds her mother being waked and her
old neighbor Osias (Lima Duarte) in a matrimonial frame of mind.  She gives
a second son to Osias, the homeowner, but her third belongs to his cousin
Zezinho (Stenio Garcia), the kindly homemaker.  A fourth son is clearly 
on the horizon with the arrival of handsome field worker Ciro (Luiz
Vasconcelos) in the Brazilian entry for Best Foreign Language Film, "Me
You Them."
While "Me You Them" is described as a film about a woman with three husbands,
it's really about how earth mother Darlene takes a series of lovers and
manages to keep peace among them.  Osias is a marriage of convenience - he
offers a roof, but uses Darlene as a cook, accountant and slave laborer.
Zezinho, who clearly adores his cousin's wife, gives Darlene the frienship
her husband does not.  Osias is duped by the affectionate couple until the
arrival of his second son, who bears the blue eyes of Zezinho.  Unexpected
jealousy causes Osias to take more of an interest in Darlene, accompanying
her and Zezinho to the dances they used to attend alone.  It's during one of 
these outings that Darlene meets Ciro (who resembles a "The Fly" era Jeff
Goldblum).  Osias offers to take Ciro in as a border to thwart Darlene's
romance with Zezinho, but they both lose out to the handsome stranger.
When Darlene confides to Zezinho that she's pregnant with Ciro's child and 
that he wishes to leave with her, Zezinho convinces Osias to build Ciro
his own room in order to get Darlene to stay.
Where Andrucha Waddington's film excels is in its ability to immerse us
in the culture and environment of a remote land.  Unlike the fantastical
Brazilian comedies "Woman On Top" and "Donna Flor and Her Two Husbands,"
"Me You Them" is very rooted in reality.  Life and conditions are harsh,
people are sturdy and get dirty working in the fields.  The film has a
bright glow about it, however, with brilliantly crisp lensing by Breno
Silveira.  And while Regina Case is no Penelope Cruz, she embodies a magnetic
vitality, an earthy sexiness.  Gilberto Gil's original music reflects
the regional sound, with heavy emphasis on the accordian.
"Me You Them" tells the tale of an extraordinary woman in a male dominated
society.  It will also transport you to a place of harsh and uncommon beauty.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Planet of the Apes (2001)
In the year 2029, Captain Leo Davidson (Mark Wahlberg, "Boogie Nights")
is training 'his' chimp Pericles to pilot a pod from the USAF Oberon
space station.  When an electromagnetic storm is encountered and Pericles'
pod is lost, Davidson sets out unauthorized and lands thousands of years
in the future on the "Planet of the Apes."
Maybe if 20th Century Fox had set the proverbial 100 chimps in front of
typewriters they would have gotten a better results than this adaptation
of the Pierre Boulle novel by William Broyles Jr. ("Cast Away"), and 
Lawrence Konner & Mark D. Rosenthal ("Mighty Joe Young").  Director Tim 
Burton's unique look and style are nowhere to be found in this silly,
pointless remake.
Davidson no sooner lands than he finds himself being swarmed by savages
running in terror, whom he wisely joins.  However, he's rounded up with
the lot of them by the apes which rule this plant and handed over to
slave trader Limbo (Paul Giamatti, "Duets").  Ari (Helena Bonham Carter,
"Fight Club"), daughter of the illustrious Senator Sandar (David Warner,
"Titanic") and simian bleeding heart, believes humans should live with 
apes on equal standing, an unpopular notion.  She takes a liking to Leo,
who she deems 'unusual.'  General Thade (Tim Roth, "Lucky Numbers") is
of the opposite opinion, wishing for declaration of martial law that will
allow him to annihilate the race.  He's sweet on Ari.
It's relatively easy to see where this 'new' story is going from the onset,
yet its ultimate revelation has gaping logic holes.  The much ballyhooed
'surprise' ending is a nonsensical let down.  An attempt at a
love triangle, conveyed by Ari and the human Daena (Estella Warren, "Driven")
giving each other 'back off' looks over Leo, fails because he never develops
a relationship with either of them.  The lone sex scene is some hilarious
foreplay between elder Orangutan Senator Nado (Glenn Shadix) and his trophy
wife Nova (Burton's squeeze, Lisa Marie).  Guffaws will also likely greet
Charlton Heston's cameo as Thade's Father, the one ape harboring a firearm (!)
who sputters some very familiar lines before dying.
The only real success of the 2001 "Planet of the Apes" is Rick Baker's 
makeup, and even that's an iffy affair.  No attempt was made to change the
human whiteness of the actors' eyes, a real distraction amidst
some otherwise impressive work.  Roth, Warner and Michael Clarke Duncan
(as Thade's right hand man Attar) are given the most impressive makeovers.
Giamatti looks more like a skull than an ape and the female apes are too
humanized to be given sexual appeal.  Tim Roth delivers the most impressive
acting job by getting the body language right - his nasty chimpanzee
character leaps about, most spectacularly when mounting his steed, but
even's he's undone by some obvious wire work.  Bonham Carter delivers a
goodly range of emotion from behind a stiff prosthetic, but is undone in turn
by the silliness of the writing.
Most of the film has a set bound look which no amount of mist can cover.
The ape's city resembles a dank complex of tree houses.  The apes' military
costumes (Colleen Atwood, "Sleepy Hollow") as well as their field tents
are reminiscent of Eiko Ishioka's work on Coppola's "Dracula."  That
oriental flavor is also found in Danny Elfman's tribal, percussive score.
"Planet of the Apes" was the last blockbuster hope for the summer of 2001,
a dismal movie season that's going to the dogs.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Zamani barayé masti asbha (2000)
Five Kurdish children struggle to survive by picking up odd jobs in a distant
town while their widower father is away earning a living smuggling over
the Iran/Iraqi border.  Madi (Mehdi Ekhtiar-Dini) is the eldest son, but he's 
severely handicapped so twelve year old Ayoub (Ayoub Ahmadi) bears the brunt 
of this responsibility while Rojin (Rojin Younessi), the eldest sister, acts 
as mother to the brood.  Ameneh (Ameneh Ekhtiar-Dini), the middle child,
helps both elder siblings, but mostly takes care of Madi.  Then their father
is returned home, dead from the landmines which pepper the landscape in 
first time director Bahman Ghobadi's Cannes Camera d'Or winner, "A Time
for Drunken Horses."
The biggest, freshest surge in international cinema has been coming from
Iran in recent years via the works of Abbas Kiarostami ("A Taste of Cherry"),
Majid Majidi ("The Color of Paradise") and father/daughter directors Mohsen
and Samira Makhmalbaf ("Gabbeh," "Blackboards").  Many of these films
focus on children.  Ghobadi's "A Time for Drunken Horses" is like a more
harshly realistic counterpart to Majidi's lush and fable-like "The Color of 
Paradise."  They have in common children of a widowed father who care for a 
handicapped sibling who proves to be a hindrance to a marriage.  
Ghobadi's film is distinct in that his characters are Kurds, an ethnic 
minority of twenty million who live in Iran, Iraq, Turkey and Syria.  
When their father dies, their uncle declares Ayoub head of household because
he's already burdened with eight children of his own.  Madi's doctor
tells Ayoub he needs an operation within four weeks to keep him alive for
another 8 months.  Ayoub begins the risky smuggling work that killed their
father, where mules, laden with tires, are given alcohol so they won't feel the
blistering cold crossing the snowy mountains over the Iraqi border.  Ayoub's
struggles maintain his family, but he's unsuccessful earning enough money
for Madi's operation.  (He does bring Madi the present of a picture.  Ghobadi
captures a brilliant image of the dwarfish Madi gazing upon a photograph of
a body builder.)
Ayoub returns from one trip to find that Rajin has been betrothed by his
uncle.  Rajin explains to the distraught Ayoub, frustrated by his
uncle's convenient return to head-of-household, that she's agreed to this 
because her new family will pay for Madi's operation, but on the wedding day, 
her new mother-in-law refuses to take Madi and offers a mule as recompense.  
Ayoub strikes out in a blizzard with Madi to sell the mule in Iraq to get his 
brother medical care.
Ghobadi returned to his Kurdistani village home, utilizing non-actors (and 
many relatives) to make this striking film.  The four eldest children are all 
extremely natural in front of the camera, possessing strikingly expressive 
faces (Ameneh, in particular, has the face of an angel).  These people have 
bleak lives with hardships unimaginable to western audiences.  Something as
basic as the procurement of an 'exercise book' (blank school notebook) is a 
treat to be savorred (we see this innocent merchandise and the truck which 
carried it impounded at a border patrol early in the film).  However, the love
among the siblings, which Ghobadi makes palpable, may seem rare to jaded
western auds.
The film is shot in a realistic documentary style, yet contains images of
stunning beauty, particularly when showing the harsh, wintery landscape.
(When Ayoub and Madi are caught between two ambushes, they witness the
other smugglers and their mules run down a snow covered hill into a valley,
with the mules' former tire loads rolling willy-nilly alongside them.)
"A Time for Drunken Horses" projects love, spirit and hope. The ending, 
in particular, is simplicity itself in projecting triumph over extreme 
adversity.  
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for American Outlaws (2001)
When Jesse (Colin Farrell, "Tigerland") and Frank James (Gabriel Macht,
"The Adventures of Sebastian Cole") and Cole (Scott Caan, "Ready to Rumble")
and Bob Younger (Will McCormack, "Boiler Room") return home as renegade
soldiers from the wrong side of the Civil War, they immediately must face
losing their farms to railroad expansion.  Hot-tempered Cole kills two men
defending his family and is sentenced to be hung, but Jesse James saves
Cole while humiliating railroad baron Thaddeus Raines (Harris Yulin, "Rush
Hour II") and his hired detective agency head Alan Pinkerton (Timothy Dalton,
"License to Kill").  They retaliate by burning down peoples' homes, killing
Jesse and Frank's Ma (Kathy Bates, "Misery") in the process.  Jesse and his 
friends decide they need to go to war against the railroad and the James Gang 
is born in "American Outlaws."
"American Outlaws'" tagline of 'Bad is good again' couldn't be more apt -
this is one flick that's so atrociously ridiculous it's entertaining,
the classic bad good movie.  Thankfully it has the sense not to take itself
too seriously, although there are groaners a'plenty when it does.
Screenwriters Roderick Taylor (TV's "Wild Horses") and John Rogers (standup
comic!) throw history out the window, give Jesse a comely, modern love
interest in Zee (Ali Larter, "Legally Blonde") and turn their young guns
into Robin Hoods.  While some of the sparring is amusing, other dialogue
is unintentionally gutbusting ('Don't turn around.  If you don't see it, 
it's not real.')
Director Les Mayfield ("Blue Streak") maintains a fast pace and makes his
cast look (mostly) good while showing no aptitude for creating a realistic
Western (one central stunt is right out of "The Wild, Wild West").  Gabriel 
Macht has good screen presence as mediator Frank James, Scott Caan does the 
chipped shoulder well and Will McCormack provides some top notch comic relief. 
Colin Farrell, so highly praised for his work in the little seen "Tigerland," 
is the pretty, daring-do loverboy here, and proves himself capable of both 
a teen heartthrob turn and 'Matrix' era stunt work.  Gregory Smith ("The 
Patriot") also acquits himself well as the younger Younger brother, who 
insists on riding with the gang.  Kathy Bates plays Ma for yucks and gets 
them, even in her death scene (grossly mishandled by Mayfield).  Timothy Dalton
does a horrendous Sean Connery impersonation and Terry O'Quinn ("The 
Stepfather") mostly looks constipated.  Ronny Cox acts cutely clueless as 
Zee's dad.
"American Outlaws?"  More like Ludicrous Larcenists...
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Way of the Gun, The (2000)
Parker (Ryan Phillippe, "Cruel Intentions") and Longbaugh (Benicio del Toro,
"The Usual Suspects") have tired of petty crime and want to make one big
score for early retirement.  While picking up easy cash by donating sperm,
they overhear a story about a surrogate mother who's being paid a cool million
to carry a couple's child.  Bingo!  The two manage to kidnap Robin (Juliette
Lewis) away from her bodyguards only to discover she's carrying the child
of Hale Chidduck (Scott Wilson), a powerful bagman with an amoral team of
his own in "The Way of the Gun."
Writer/director Christopher McQuarrie was frustrated to learn that even
after winning an Oscar for writing "The Usual Suspects," he couldn't sell
a script outside the crime thriller genre.  "The Way of the Gun" is 
an exercise in proving himself to Hollywood.  While this new story isn't
as slick as the previous, it's still satisfyingly twisty, even if the 
ending gets a bit bogged down.  McQuarrie also proves himself as a director,
getting solid performances out of his cast and achieving a retro-Western
look for his film.
Parker and Longbaugh end up in a massive shootout when they attempt to
kidnap Robin in the lobby of her doctor's office, only getting away with
the hugely pregnant woman when she tries to make a break from her own
bodyguards.  Chiddick brings in his bagman Sarno (James Caan), who disparages
Robin's bodyguards Jeffers (Taye Digs, "How Stella Got Her Groove Back") and 
Obecks (Nicky Katts, "Boiler Room") and forms his own team beginning with
suicidal Abner (Geoffrey Lewis, father of Juliette).  They make contact
with Longbaugh at a Mexican motel where Longbaugh demands $15 million for
the child.  Sarno advises that things will end badly.  Meanwhile Parker
is philosophizing with Robin and Chiddick's trophy wife Francesca listens in 
to various underhanded conversations when she's not dallying with Jeffers
or watching prenatal videos.
Absolutely everyone outside of our two 'heroes' in this story has a different 
agenda than appears on the surface.  Even Dr. Painter (Dylan Kussman, "Dead
Poets' Society"), Robin's gynocologist, has more than one hook into the
proceedings.  Everyone but the Chiddicks themselves will end up across the
border for a drawn out and bloody finale.
The cast is excellent.  Ryan Phillippe discards his golden boy shallowness
to play a suddenly God-fearing tough guy with scrubby facial hair and a
low growl of a voice.  Del Toro personifies cool as the elder, more goal
oriented of the pair.  Juliette Lewis is a fighter who keeps punching through
every obstacle thrown in her way until an unwanted C-Section is forced upon
her in a remote brothel.  Caan is the most complex character as the experienced 
and rueful bagman.  Diggs is suave, all killer cool while his counterpart
Katts is darker, brawnier.  Geoffrey Lewis creates a surprisingly sympathetic
oddball with little screen time.
The script features some great dialogue ('$15 million is not money - it's a
motive with a universal adapter on it.') and even some hilarity (Parker and
Longbaugh's sperm donor interviews).  McQuarrie and his director of
photography Dick Pope ("Topsy Turvy") use visual irony and Western style
earthtones to good effect, recalling the films of Peckinpah.  "The Way of 
the Gun" also offers up the most unique car chase (idea creditted to Benicio 
del Toro in the press notes) in movies since "Bullitt" and "The French 
Connection."  Score by Joe Kraemer inventively employs castanets.
If you can take a heavy dose of violence, blood and a pregnant woman
in peril, "The Way of the Gun" is like a mystery tour where the journey
is more exciting than the destination.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Love's Labour's Lost (2000)
Kenneth Branagh brings his fourth Shakespearean adaptation to the screen
with a twist - the frothy play, "Love's Labour's Lost" is set just as
World War II is dawning and set to the music of the Gershwin brothers and
Irving Berling, as much an homage to old movies as to Shakespeare.
The King (Alessandro Nivola, "Face/Off") decides to devote himself to years
of study, banning wine, women and song from his palace grounds.  His three
best friends, Berowne (Branagh), Longaville (Matthew Lillard, "Scream") and
Dumaine (Adrian Lester, "Primary Colors") aren't thrilled, but respect their
king in a pact that will soon be broken when the French princess (Alicia
Silverstone, "Clueless") and her ladies Rosaline (Natascha McElhone, "Ronin"),
Maria (Carmen Ejogo, "The Avengers") and Katherine (Emily Mortimer, "Scream 3")
pays a political visit for her father.
Branagh's proven very adept at translating the bard to the screen as period
pieces, so it's invigorating to see him try something different and
unequivocally nail it.
His screenplay adaptation deftly jumps the action of Shakespeare's light 
tale forward with song and dance numbers set to standards such as
"I Get No Kick from Champagne," "The Way You Look Tonight," "I'm in Heaven,"
and "You Can't Take That Away From Me"  The story is simple:  when the 
ladies appear, the King allows them to set up camp outside the palace gates 
where one by one they pair off with the kings' men until the King himself 
succombs to the princess.  The men try to keep their affairs secret from one 
another (Branagh stages a truly brilliant scene in the King's library for
them all to discover each others' dishonesty) while letters get into the wrong 
hands and the ladies switch identities to give the men their comeuppance.  
Word is sent that the King of France has died and the princess is distraught, 
declares the love matches mere flirtations and announces she and her ladies 
will depart.  The king proposes a one year enforced separation to test their 
loves after which they all live happily ever after.
Casting is brilliantly insane (two veterans from the "Scream" franchise?!).  
Branagh and McElhone are actually the preeminent couple and he allows her to 
shine as perhaps the most mature and womanly of the four ladies.  Silverstone 
is engagingly kewpie-dollish, delivering her lines with a petulant, baby doll 
pout, but becoming serious when circumstance demands.  Her man, Nivola, is 
handsome and dashing and funny, acting as if he'd stepped right out of a 30's 
screwball comedy.  Lester is fantastic with the dance moves, suggesting no less 
than Donald O'Connor's work in "Singin' in the Rain.  Lillard is surprisingly 
agile,putting a touch of slapstick in his long limbs even as he retains control
of his moves.  Their loves, Mortimer and Ejogo respectively, keep pace,
but don't get as much opportunity to develop their characters (it's also
neat that Branagh chose to racially crisscross these two couples).
Other lovers are afoot as well, from the hilariously over the top Timothy
Spall (Leighs' recent films) as Don Armado who pines for the country wench
Jaquenetta (Stefania Rocca, "The Talented Mr. Ripley").  He trips about on
tiny feet before launching into one of the most fantastical set pieces where
he even gets to perform aerial stunts in a biplane!  The king's
professors, Holofernia (Geraldine McEwan, "The Love Letter") and
Nathaniel (Richard Briers, Branagh's "Hamlet") represent the senior set,
albeit capped and gowned ones.  Nathan Lane is The Great Costard, a vaudevilian 
who is the agent of crossed wires, while Richard Clifford (Branagh's "Much Ado 
About Nothing") is Boyet, the ladies' 'old lovemonger.'
Branagh's love of old films is shown in dance numbers which mimic
Astaire and Rogers, Esther Williams, the June Taylor dancers and
even Bob Fosse, while non-dancing scenes recall the likes of "Casblanca" and 
the Marx Brothers.  Production design (Tim Harvey) and art direction (Mark 
Raggett) are superb, using muted colors and obvious set bound fakery to both 
mimic old films and throw the players into the spotlight.  Costumes (Anna 
Buruma) are gorgeous, particularly the four ladies' color themed ensembles in 
red (Silverstone), blue (McElhone), orange (Ejogo) and green (Mortimer).
This thoroughly delightful entertainment is presented by Stanley Donen and
Martin Scorsese - high praise indeed.  This is one to remember for this year's 
award nominations, and should bring a smile to any film lover's face.
It's the Bard meets Busby Berkeley as director Kenneth Branagh adapts
Shakespeare, this time with "Love's Labour's Lost," for the big screen, but
with an unconventional twist. Branagh stages his version of the play as a lush,
lively musical that pays as much homage to the classic musical extravaganzas of
1930's as it does to Will S.
It's 1939 and the King of Navarre (Alessandro Nivola) swears an oath with his
three best friends to forsake the company of woman for three years so the
quartet may devote themselves to the lofty study of philosophy. This plan is
thrown into complete disarray with the arrival of the Princess of France
(Alicia Silverstone) and her three beautiful attendants.
The men are smitten by the beauty and charm of the women and each, secretly,
seeks to seduce his beloved. Eventually, all four men realize that each has
betrayed their sacred oath, but recover from the disappointment as they fall
for the magic of love.
Branagh takes one of Shakespeare's lesser-known plays and puts his own
imaginative spin on the subject. Besides setting the play in a fictional
European kingdom at the brink of World War II, he introduces the music of the
era as a key element of the story. Salted throughout the film's runtime are all
manner of dance numbers that honor the stylish choreography of Busby Berkeley's
colorful musicals (the original "42nd Street," "The Gold Diggers of 1933"). The
classic overhead shots of pretty, geometrically placed young women are reprised
in the new film, even including a nod to the Ester Williams waterlogged
musicals that carried Berkeley's signature style into the 40's.
Accompanying the flashy dance numbers that Branagh and choreographer Stuart
Hopps so lovingly create is a litany of songs that capture the spirit put forth
by the film's creators. Such musical maestros as George and Ira Gershwin, Cole
Porter, Irving Berlin and Jerome Kern were selected to supply the wonderful
tunes used for the numerous, flashy dance numbers. Branagh's choice of such
seminal song and dance numbers as "I Get A Kick Out of You," "Cheek to Cheek,"
"Let's Face the Music & Dance," and other great songs had me whistling for days
after seeing "Love's Labour's Lost." The songs are the best part of the film.
Where "Love's Labour's Lost" is problematic is in Branagh's attempt to mix
genres. The music is great. The dance numbers, utilizing actors rather than
singers/dancers, are done with great enthusiasm by the players, but with uneven
results. Everyone works very hard, but only a couple of the principles look the
look of hoofers. Adrian Lester (playing the King's friend Dumaine) has a
background that includes a variety of stage and screen musicals and it shows in
his graceful execution of his dance numbers. Nathan Lane ("The Birdcage") shows
his Broadway chops in his performance as Costard the Clown, recreating the
moves of a true vaudevillian. Of the rest of the amateur dancers, Branagh shows 
the most grace as the King's trusted friend, Berowne, working harder than 
anyone does in his effort at being Fred Astaire. The rest of the cast give 
their all, but come across as enthusiastic and plucky non-professionals.
The crossover between the musical interludes and the straight Shakespearean
dialogue doesn't flow well. The almost abrupt way the dance numbers, with their
30's lyrics, ends and the "But, hark" of Shakespeare's lingo kicks in is
distracting. Branagh has a firm enough grasp of the Bard's work that his
delivery is fine. The rest, though, fare lass well. Alicia Silverstone, in her
big speech near the end, is wooden and unconvincing. She delivers her lines
like she's reciting them, without passion. Natascha McElhone is pretty and 
charming as Berowne's love interest, Rosaline. Of the rest of the ensemble 
cast, only Timothy Spall ("Topsy-Turvy") fares well as the outrageously 
accented Spaniard who considers himself a loyal friend to the king.
Costume design, by Anna Buruma (who, coincidentally, once worked at the Chamber
of Horrors at Madame Tussaud's) has a sweet continuity as each of les dames has
her own color scheme with red, blue, green and peach as the primary color for
their costumes. The scheme is carried through not only with the many different
outfits of each, but with accessories, too, including the boutonni
hres of the suitor and even the ladies' cocktails. It helps you keep track of 
who loves whom, too. Production design, by Tim Harvey, a long time 
collaborator with Branagh, provides suitable period feel.
In the end, "Love's Labour's Lost" feels derivative of Woody Allen's "Everyone
Says I Love You," but with the Bard's work as the subject matter. Branagh's
oeuvre has more to it when it comes to song and dance and less in the overall
execution. The musical numbers, alone, are worth the price of admission and I
give it a B.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Angel's Ladies (2000)
Mack and Angel Moore, senior Christian cemetary/funeral parlor owners from
Eugene, Oregon, had a unique retirement idea.  They sold their death related
businesses in the dreary Northwest and moved to sunny Nevada, where they
purchased Fran's Star Ranch, a legal brothel which they renamed.  Director
Doug Lindeman's documents their new business in "Angel's Ladies."
"Angel's Ladies" sounds like a great idea for a documentary, especially
given the background of the business' new owners (Mack is seventy, Angel
fifty-five).  Lindeman even captures the prurient interest of the public
when he invites a tourist couple to go inside with him (funnily enough,
its the wife who thinks it 'sounds like fun,' while the husband is concerned
about their timetable).  However, "Angel's Ladies" quickly outwears its
welcome.
We're introduced to Mack and Angel as decent people who believe they're 
providing a needed service.  Angel, in particular, is showcased grieving
the loss of her two sons (one to illness, another to an accident) and first
husband while likening their three 'girls' to her new family.  Yet Lindeman
is holding many things about this couple back, information that is shockingly
abhorrent when revealed midway into the film.  This holding back of information
for dramatic effect later on seems dishonest.
The three prostitutes who we meet at "Angel's Ladies" are very different.
Kevin is an outdoorsy horsewoman who seems pretty down to earth.  Linda
is friendly with Kevin and seems like the ex-suburban wife she was, but
is given far less screen time than Kevin or Melody.  Melody is the harshest
of the three, seemingly more suited to the trade.  Her recollections of 
things she's done to satisfy men's fetishistic fantasies become more and
more offputting (as does the relish with which she relays them) as the
documentary trudges on.
And trudge on this does, with increasingly repetitious shots of the girls
cavorting in the desert in work costumes while addressing the camera
crosscut with Angel becoming more and more defensive about the way she
does business.  The only person who seems to be making out at "Angel's
Ladies" is the housekeeper, who professes to mostly sitting around drinking
coffee.
Technically "Angel's Ladies" resembles a pretty good cable access production.
Some editting choices are juvenile (repeat jump cuts to make someone
'dance' for example) while the music is cheesy and distracting.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for 3000 Miles to Graceland (2001)
Murphy (Kevin Costner) is a hard boiled criminal who believe's he's the
illegitimate son of Elvis.  His former cellmate Michael (Kurt Russell) has
agreed to meet him at the Last Chance motel outside of Las Vegas to pull
off a unique heist.  Murphy, Michael and Murphy's recruits Hanson (Christian 
Slater), Gus (David Arquette, "Ready to Rumble") and Franklin (Bokeem
Woodbine, "The Rock") will become color coded Elvis impersonators under
cover of the chaos of International Elvis week to rob the Riviera Hotel 
and Casino in "3000 Miles to Graceland."
Music video director/cowriter (with Richard Recco) Demian Lichtenstein begins
things snappily with his opening credit sequence of giant black (symbolizing
Murphy) and white (Michael's standin) computer generated scorpion-robots
battling in the desert to driving hard rock.  This clever bit of imagery
morphs into live action as Michael arrives at the Last Chance.  There he
meets 'Cybil with a C' (Courtney Cox Arquette, TV's 'Friends'), single mother
of young kleptomaniac son Jesse (David Kaye, "Legends of the Fall").  Jesse
steals Michael's custom lug nuts off his 59' cherry red Cadillac, Cybil
returns them then quickly maneuvers Michael into the sack.
Murphy and his gang arrive, pick up Michael, and perform their daring heist
to the tune of $3.2 million.  Unplanned is the massive body count left
behind before the arrival of their escape helicopter on the building's rooftop.
Unknown was Murphy's intent to murder his colleagues before heading north
to launder the loot.  A bulletproof vest worn by Michael and that stealing
habit of Jesse's change Murphy's plans while Michael finds himself on the
run with a woman he doesn't trust and her precocious son.
"3000 Miles to Graceland" is a pretty flashy ride, but suffers from shallow
characterizations and an over-the-top ending (think "Con Air").  Lichtenstein
mostly uses his music video background to good effect, only occasionally
overstepping the line between feature filmmaking and imagery that should have
been left on MTV.  Technically, the film is slick, particularly in the shooting
and editting of the early heist scene (cinematography by David Franco ("The 
Whole Nine Yards") who moves his camera up one side of a subject, over it and
downside the other; editing by Michael J. Duthie ("Stigmata") and Miklos
Wright).  
Lichtenstein is less successful with his writing.  It's hinted that Murphy
is conflicted in his feelings for 'the King,' his purported father, but
Lichtenstein doesn't go deep enough.  Similarly, Michael is too much of a
'good' bad guy - he knocks guards out and shoots glass partitions out to
slow down pursuers while his colleagues are massacring everyone in site -
yet we're given no back story as to why he spent over five years in jail 
and why he's aligned himself with Murphy in the first place.  Cybil is
written as more of a plot device than a character.
The principal actors try to flesh out their characters, though.  Costner
is effective as a real evil villain - clearly he's having some fun with this
role.  Courtney Cox Arquette takes a shallow role and really runs with it.
Russell is appealing, but the least successful at defining his character.
Thomas Haden Church (TV's 'Wings') puts a droll spin on Marshall Quigley,
the man on Murphy's tail.  Peterson, the Idaho money launderer, is given
the usual oily/whiny Jon Lovitz routine.
"3000 Miles to Graceland" is a fairly entertaining film that begins with
a bang and ends with too much contrivance.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Chicken Run (2000)
"No chicken escapes from Tweedy's farm!" is the challenge taken on by one
plucky chicken named Ginger (Julia Sawalha). Ginger wants a better world for 
herself and her friends, the other inmates at the Tweedy's Egg Farm, so she 
attempts one breakout after another, only to end up in solitary every time. 
But, the clock is running out for Ginger and her fowl friends as the evil Mrs. 
Tweedy (Miranda Richardson) finds a new way to feather her nest - instead of 
gathering their eggs, she plans to turn her chickens into pies! With the help 
of a new arrival, Rocky Rhodes (Mel Gibson), the self-acclaimed Lone Free 
Ranger, Ginger hatches a spectacular and daring escape plan, a plan that will 
free them all in "Chicken Run."
The makers of "Chicken Run," co-directors and co-producers Nick Park and Peter
Lord, have elevated the art of claymation to a pinnacle with such works as the
Oscar nominated animated short, "Wat's Pig" and Oscar winners, "Creature
Comforts," "The Wrong Trousers" and "A Close Shave." The latter two established
the characters, Wallace and Gromit, as figures of international popularity. So,
the anticipation among the fans of Aardman Entertainment for their first
feature has been long and expectant. And the word?
"Chicken Run" is a parody of and homage to all the great POW and prison break
movies we have seen over the decades. Most prominent is the best of them all,
the 1963 John Sturges classic "The Great Escape," which the Park/Lord film so
lovingly recreates. At the very opening, Ginger is in the midst of breaking out
of her prison, only to be thwarted by the "goons," Mr. Tweedy and his vicious
guard dogs. The following montage shows the indefatigable Ginger trying again
and again, only to fail and end up in the hole. Her spirit never flags, though,
so, when Rocky, quite literally, flies into her life, hope for escape to the
fabled Paradise Farm is rejuvenated.
I don't want to get into the meat of the story of "Chicken Run." That is best
left for the filmmakers to do when you see it yourself, which I hope everyone
does. Suffice it to say that this is the most fun I have had at the movies
since "Toy Story 2." Park/Lord have made an indelible mark in the annals of 
feature animation that rivals The Giant - Disney. The painstaking nature of the
claymation technique requires years to produce a full-length film and the folks
at Aardman took the time to learn their lessons. Their entry into the big time
is nothing less than spectacular.
Don't get me wrong. "Chicken Run" is not a perfect film. At about the 25-minute
mark, the story started to wind down and I thought I would see a good, not
great, animation. Things quickly take a turn for the better as the tale of
escape cranks up, Ginger makes her plans and Rocky provides the beefcake for
the ladies at Tweedy's farm. The story, basically, follows the same plot as 
"The Great Escape," but with the chickens facing a more onerous fate than just 
being prisoners. The imperative of escape reaches serious proportions as their 
true fate - to become the primary ingredient of Mrs. Tweedy's Homemade Chicken 
Pies - is realized. High drama, comedy and action prevail 'til the end.
Besides "The Great Escape" (the direct references to which had me in stitches)
there are allusions to such other terrific POW films as "Stalag 17." 
The amazing thing about "Chicken Run" is that it takes such subjects as
genocide (or, is that chicken-ocide?) and imprisonment and puts a humorous spin
on it without being silly. Don't get me wrong, there is enough silliness and
dumb, funny humor to appeal to the kids (and "Hogan's Heroes" fans) in the
audience. There is also a plethora of intelligence and wit, coupled with some
very dark humor, to keep the adult population attentive and entertained.
The vocal characterizations, with their onscreen images, are first rate. While
Mel Gibson is the name name, the rest of the cast, led by Sawalha (daughter
Sapphire of "Absolutely Fabulous) as Ginger, are equal to their characters.
Except for Miranda Richardson as the voice of Mrs. Tweedy, you won't recognize
many of the British cast members. Jane Horrocks ("Little Voice," and Bubble in
"Ab Fab") gives voice to the simple, but lovable, Babs, who is forever
knitting.  Stage actress Lynn Ferguson provides an enjoyable Scottish burr to 
Mac, a super-intelligent hen who is the engineering brains of the escape team.
Benjamin Whitrow as the aging rooster Fowler, Tony Haygarth as the dumb but 
observant Mr. Tweedy, Timothy Spall and Phil Daniels as the rat procurers Nick 
and Fetcher all contribute to the depth of character this 86-minute marvel of a 
movie deserves.
The production, especially to those who are familiar with the painstaking
nature of claymation, is a wonder to behold. Within minutes of the start of 
the film, the viewer is completely taken over by the world created by the 
Aardman folks.  The attention to details, such as every chicken being a unique 
character with her own look and personality, is astounding. The current hype, 
today, for computer generated imagery (CGI) is put to shame by the shear 
craftsmanship of this stellar example of such a traditional technique. Stop 
motion animation has been around since the early days of movies and "Chicken 
Run" is at the pinnacle of its art.
"Chicken Run" should be seen by the whole family. Actually, it should be seen
by everyone. It has intelligence, humor, drama and tragedy, dance numbers, 
amour and more, any of which will have appeal to someone out there. The 
sinister aspects of the story may be a bit too dark for younger, sensitive 
kids, but the overall lightness of "Chicken Run's" being should help get 
them by.
I don't say this often enough: I give "Chicken Run" an unbridled A.
Fans of triple-Oscar winner Nick Parks' delightful "Wallace and Grommit"
shorts are rewarded with his (and co-director/producer Peter Lord)
long-awaited claymation feature film debut "Chicken Run."
Ginger (Julia Sawalha, "Absolutely Fabulous") is a resourceful hen
among the downtrodden denizens of Tweedy's Chicken Farm, where Mr. Tweedy
(Tony Haygarth, "London Kills Me") suspiciously patrols the barbed wire
perimeters of his chicken huts with two vicious guard dogs.  Ginger
dreams of a life of freedom, beyond the grassy hills she can she from
the roof of her hut, but although she's capable of escaping herself, her
vision includes all her friends at the farm, who she refuses to abandon.
When one hen fails to produce eggs, she's removed to the chopping block
(reminiscent of Babe's almost-fate) by the unrelentingly mean Mrs. Tweedy 
(Miranda Richardson, "Sleepy Hollow").  To make matters worse, a chicken 
products van arrives delivering a mysterious contraption that's hidden in 
the barn.  Only Mr. Tweedy's problems getting it to work are buying Ginger 
time to plot their escape.
A savior arrives in the form of an arrogant Yank rooster, Rocky (Mel Gibson),
who arrives catapulted over the fence yelling 'Freedom!' at the top of his
lungs (the film's punched up with many movie in-jokes referencing the
likes of "Braveheart," "Stalag 17" and, most notably, "The Great Escape").
Ginger enlists his help to teach her girls how to fly.
The screenplay by Karey Kirkpatrick ("James and the Giant Peach") tells
a traditionally simple tale.  The pleasures of "Chicken Run" are to be
found in its marvelous details (a V of geese pass overhead as Ginger 
watches the sun set from behind a fence, two huckster rats pass off a
tub stopper on a chain as a necklace for sale), terrific characterizations
and vocal performances, a darkness reflected in the look of the film 
and the painstaking process of the claymation itself.
Hundreds of distinctly different chickens were created for this film,
several of whom lend terrific support to Ginger and Rocky.  Janes Horrocks
("Little Voice" and another "Absolutely Fabulous" vet) is Babs, a sweetly
dim bird with a serious knitting habit.  Lynn Ferguson (a Scottish stage
actress and standup comedienne) is Mac, the bespeckled engineering genius
who provides a marvelous foil for Rocky's "Braveheart" moments.  Benjamin
Whitrow ("A Man for All Seasons") is Fowler, the elderly RAF vet and house
rooster who resents Rocky's arrival and vents the British spleen at the
Americans late arrival into WWII.
Outside of the chickens, there are only two humans - the Tweedys.  Mrs.
Tweedy is a dried up crone who resents her husband's inability to provide
something better than their bleak farm.  Mr. Tweedy is henpencked indeed
and accused of losing his mind when he suggests their chickens are plotting.
Two rats, Nick (Timothy Spall, "Love's Labour's Lost") and Fetcher (Phil
Daniels, "Bad Behavior") provide comic relief and suggest the "King Rat"
aspect of the farm with their black market trading.
While "Chicken Run" is a delightful achievement, it doesn't quite attain
the constant brilliance of the "Wallace and Grommit" shorts.  Ironically, 
there's no "Feathers McGraw" moment - the startling hilarity of a penguin 
passing himself off as a chicken with a rubber glove on his head in "The 
Wrong Trousers."  Still, kudos to the huge group of filmmakers whose
patience with the stop-motion technique has brought this charmer for young
and old alike to the screen.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Last Resort (2000)
When Eastern European Tanya (Dina Korzun) leaves home with her 10-year-old 
son Artiom (Artoim Strelnikov) to meet her English fiance Mark, she instead 
finds herself a refugee with no money, no prospects and no passport in "Last 
Resort."
Artiom realizes that Mark is as neurotic as his mom and knows her hopes
will be dashed before she does.  Forced by circumstances to declare herself
and her son refugees, Tanya and Artiom are trucked off to Stonehaven, a former
honky tonk beachside amusement park, where refugees are housed in a cold,
dismal, forbidding apartment building behind barbed wire fences policed by
guard dogs.  Without money, there's no escape - 12 to 16 months before being
let out into English freedom, 4-6 months to be officially deported.  The
only money to be made is by selling goods, blood or yourself, if you happen
to be an attractive young woman.
Tanya meets Alfie (Paddy Considine, "A Room for Romeo Brass"), the manager
of the local arcade, in search for a phone card to attempt to reach Mark.
Shaggy, hangdog Alfie, initially a suspicious character who appears to 
leech his living off the unfortunates of Stonehaven, changes our opinion
of him in a nanosecond with the smile he flashes at Tanya.  Once
Tanya finally accepts the truth about Mark and sees the friendship that's
developed between Artiom and Alfie, a tentative romance begins.  However
the self realization the whole humiliating experience has brought to Tanya 
means she won't allow herself to slip back into her old dependencies.
Polish writer/director Pawel Pawlikowski has created a small gem of a movie.
His and cowriter Rowan Joffe's creative blending of an almost Kafkaesque 
political situation with both a gentle love story and a mother's journey to 
maturity is rivetting storytelling.  Visually, he and director of photography 
Ryszard Lenczewski combines jarringly close hand held camerawork with 
gorgeously framed, pastel character palletted landscapes.  Original music by 
Max de Wardener adds melancholy with the ghost-like refrains of the shuttered 
amusement park.
Pawlikowski is also blessed with an outstanding, natural cast.  Dina Korzun
allows a gamut of emotion to play across her open, innocent face.  She's
resigned when she goes to pornographer Les (Lindsey Honey, the real life
'most famous pornographer in Britain'), then girlishly amused by the skit he
pantomimes for her before ultimately breaking down with the shame of it when 
finally being broadcast over the internet.  She works marvelously well with 
Considine,whose shaggy charm and reigned in hope make the viewer root for him.
Considine makes the combination of a tough realist and a romantic work.
Strelnikov is astonishingly confident in his screen debut as the ten year
old street smart kid who adapts to a bad situation not of his making.
Thank goodness for the Shooting Gallery - while Hollywood continues
to churn out very little of interest, they rescue great little films like
"Last Resort" from obscurity.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Golden Bowl, The (2000)
American Charlotte Stant (Uma Thurman) is in love with Italian Prince
Amerigo (Jeremy Northam, "An Ideal Husband"), but she doesn't have the money
he needs to restore his beloved family Palazzo.  With the help of 
Fanny Assingham (Anjelica Huston) he becomes betrothed to Maggie Verver 
(Kate Beckinsale, "The Last Days of Disco"), daughter of America's first
billionaire Adam Verver (Nick Nolte), a school chum of Charlotte's.  Fanny
advises Charlotte that her acquaintance with Amerigo will be kept from the
Ververs.  In order to remain close to Amerigo, Charlotte nabs Maggie's
widowed 
father and begins a complex game of lies and deceit in the latest Merchant 
Ivory adaptation of a Henry James novel, "The Golden Blow."
The titular golden bowl is a gold encrusted piece of crystal presented
to Charlotte as a possible wedding gift by an antiques merchant.  Amerigo,
who has accompanied her, advises outside the shop that the crystal is
cracked.  While Amerigo appears to be content with his lovely, innocent
young wife, Charlotte will not let him go and Maggie's devotion to her 
father allow the foursome to pair up according to Charlotte's desires.
Charlotte's passion for Amerigo makes her deaf to gossip, but her husband
is not as blind as she might think.  His veiled warnings to her go unheeded,
but Amerigo is quick to pick up on his father-in-law's doublespeak.
This lusty, modern adaptation by Ruth Prawer Jhabvala gives the art house
crowd a period soap opera to relish.  James' story casts Charlotte the
villain of the piece on a surface level, but some consideration makes one 
begin to doubt - hasn't Amerigo betrayed everyone, and for money no less,
while Charlotte is motivated by love?
Uma Thurman forgoes her usual pallid, somnambular style and sinks her teeth 
into her meatiest role since "Pulp Fiction."  If she seems overtly modern 
and out of control, those are qualities that make Charlotte such a hair 
trigger, allowing the film to build up to a squirmy level of tension.  Nick
Nolte, who had the misfortune being cast in the lead of Merchant Ivory's least
successful film "Jefferson in Paris," rises to the occasion here.  Adam
seems the stereotypical, open, easy-going, buried-in-work American, but 
Nolte allows the shrewdness to wink out at us even as his costars accept
his oblivious good nature.  Beckinsdale is terrifically appealing as the
naive Maggie.  The sweetness she brings to the role emphasizes the
underhandedness she's dealt.  The English Northam is believable as an Italian
aristrocrat, but he's a bit too opaque, not enough an object of such desire.
Anjelica Huston can't quite decide on her accent (she seems distinctly
Southern
American in her initial scene), but does the hand-wringing thing well as her
cover-up breaks down.  James Fox ("The Remains of the Day") is a comic asset 
as her husband, Colonel Bob Assingham.
Director Ivory borrows from Jane Campion's "Portrait of a Lady" flourishes,
using period title cards, old stills and period-look news footage to move
his tale along.  A secret meeting between Charlotte and Amerigo at a wax
museum is heightened when the eyes from a tableau seem to follow the
duplicitous couple, yet a horrific tale from Amerigo's ancestry used to 
bookend the film is heavy handed.  Costume, art direction and locations are 
lush beyond measure and a treat for the eye.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Trumpet of the Swan, The (2000)
Louie is a trumpeter swan with no voice.  In order to woo his lady love
Serina,
Louie makes friends with a young boy, Sammy, who persuades teacher Mrs.
Hammerbottom (Carol Burnett) to allow Louie to attend class.  Louie learns to
read and write and returns to his flock, but is laughed at once again when
no other swans can understand his message of love for Serina.  To make matters
worse, Louie's father feels he's lost his honor because of the trumpet he
stole for his son in this animated version of E.B. White's "Trumpet of the
Swan."
As Jane Austen and Henry James have become popular sources for adult
filmmakers over the past decade or so, E.B. White is being returned to for
children's films.  The animated "Charlotte's Web" has become a minor classic
since its release in 1973 and 1999 brought us a live action version of "Stuart
Little." "Trumpet of the Swan," directed by Richard Rich (1999's animated "The
King and I," the "Swan Princess" series), is unlikely to be remembered along
with those two.
"Trumpet of the Swan" is receiving a regional theatrical release, but is sure
to quickly appear on home video.  Boston is one of the targetted cities
because our hero Louie becomes famous playing his trumpet in Beantown.  He
encounters a gypsy-like con man in the public gardens who pitches Louie and his
trumpet as an added attraction to Boston's swan boats.  Louie stays at the Ritz
Carlton before giving a concert at the Hatch Shell along the banks of the
Charles River.  At this point, Louie's earned enough money so that dad can pay
for the trumpet and become musically capable enough to win over Serina's
father.
"Trumpet of the Swan" features flat background art, some poor sound syncing
and insipid, sugary songs.  This effort would be better suited to Saturday
morning television than the big screen, but may be OK for the real small set.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Hit and Runway (1999)
Alex (Michael Parducci) works in his Italian American family's New 
York City cafe, but dreams of writing a script for his action adventure hero, 
Dirty Harry clone Jagger Stevens (Hoyt Richards).  Elliot (Peter Jacobson, 
"Cradle Will Rock") is a playwright attracted to Joey (Kerr Smith, "Final 
Destination"), an aspiring actor who works in Alex's family cafe.  When Alex 
finds the script Elliot gave to Joey, he dangles a date with Joey as bait to 
collaborate on his 'undercover cop breaks up fashion model smuggling ring' 
movie, "Hit and Runway."
Alex succeeds in hooking up Elliot, a self-described funny looking, Jewish
gay man, with good-looking Joey, who, it turns out, is attracted to Jewish
men.  While Elliot's flying high romantically, he's at wits end working with
Alex.  Alex has a dream, but his idea of a plausible plot line is having
models smuggle cocaine in breast implants.
The script, by real gay/straight writing team Christopher Livingston (who
also directed) and Jaffe Cohen (who also produced) won Best Screenplay at
the 1999 Los Angeles Independent Film Festival and US Comedy Arts Festival.
Yet despite Elliot's comic zingers and a general good heartedness, "Hit and 
Runway" is another cliched movie about first time filmmakers whose script 
ends up mirroring their life.
Alex is a gentle lunkhead who homophobically insists his relationship with 
Elliot is only business until he's left without Elliot.  His relationship with 
fellow writing class student Gwen (Judy Prescott, "Say Anything") doesn't take 
off until she removes her glasses (a cliche previously written into their joint 
script by Elliot as if it were inspired).  
Elliot is a brazen ripoff of Woody Allen made gay.  He whines, frets and
makes social blunders, accompanied by hilarious, self-deprecating observations
('I bought a dildo once and it lost its erection').  (To be fair, Woody is
cited more than once, particularly in a dream sequence where the real Allen
advises Alex to 'keep the title, drop the story.')
After dealing with cheating Rabbis, overbearing relatives, plot-dropped
deadlines and personal betrayal, Alex and Elliot end up achieving each other's 
dream.
The film's production is subpar, with most action taking place in murkily lit,
cramped apartment spaces.  A scene in an indoor basketball court is 
like a breath of fresh air when the characters are finally given some space
to exist in.  Alex and Elliot are provided the obvious ethnic musical queues.
The good nature on display in "Hit and Runway" makes it difficult to dislike,
but despite Jacobson's humorous efforts, it's not easy to recommend either.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Remember the Titans (2000)
"Remember the Titans" is a quality Hollywood production that handles its
tale of the forced racial integration of a Virginia high school's football team
in too black and white a manner.  Indie director Boaz Yakin ("Fresh," "A
Price Above Rubies") gets good performances from his ensemble cast, but
balances his material so evenly that no surprises are forthcoming.
When Herman Boone (Denzel Washington) is overlooked for a coaching job in his 
native North Carolina because of his race, he takes a job in Alexandria,
ironically displacing the popular, winning Coach Bill Yoast (Will Patton, 
"Armageddon").  Boone convinces Yoast to remain as his defensive coach and 
their clashing styles become complementary, allowing the men to gradually 
become friends.  During boot camp, Boone nails his main objective - to create 
a team in spite of hostile racial tensions.  Predictably, screenwriter Gregory 
Allen Howard frames this interlude with bus trips where the attempts of a few 
to engage the rest in song are squelshed on the way but harmonious upon return.
Indeed, there's a ying for every yang in this script.  Boone's daughter is 
prissy and feminine while Yoast's is a nine year old football prodigy/tomboy.  
The seemingly most racist black, Julius (Wood Harris, "Above the Rim") and 
white, Gerry (Ryan Hurst, "Rules of Engagement") become the closest friends.  
A long haired Californian, nicknamed Sunshine (Kip Pardue) by his teammates,
represents both the hippy and gay cultures to add additional complications to 
the racial issues.  Boone is applauded outside his home by the black population
upon his arrival, then later by his white neighbors when he leads his team to
the regional championship.  Everything's just a little too pat, including the 
musical selections which represent the era ("Spirit in the Sky," "Spill the
Win," "Call on Me").  As in "The Replacements," the team gets a song and
dance number with "Ain't No Mountain High Enough."
The ensemble cast does its best to flesh out their cliched, symbolic characters.
Washington is solid as the unrelentingly tough Boone, although it's unlikely
his Oscar hopes will be satisfied with this role.  (Was his three a.m. team
march to the Gettysburg battlefield intended to remind the Academy of his
last win?)  Patton does subtle work as the widowed single dad, although his
constant strength of character doesn't allow for much in the way of change or
development.  Wood Harris moves from sullen and self reliant to warm and 
giving dependably while Hurst goes from redneck to social reformer with as
much believability as time allows.  Ethan Suplee ("American History X") is
the good-natured John Candy element with his automatic, Louisianna army brat
acceptance of his black teammates while Kip Pardue's presence 
strengthen's the 'people are all just people' theme with humor.  Good in 
smaller roles are Craig Kirkwood as 'The Rev,' Earl C. Poitier as 'Blue,'
and Ryan Gosling as Alan, the decent son of a pushy jock dad.  Hayden Panettiere
("Message in a Bottle") has the 'almost-too-precocious' quality of Hallie 
Eisenberg as Yoast's daughter Sheryl.
Camerwork by the usually terrific Philippe Rousselot ("A River Runs Through
It") is frequently too closely inside the action, obscuring a larger, more
fully focussed point of view from the audience.  The footbal action finally
becomes exciting for the final, state championship game.  The score by Trevor
Rubin ("Armageddon") is tritely obvious.
"Remember the Titans" scores with its cast and its occasional lapses into
freshness.  The newly integrated teammates shock at the bussing riots which
occur on the first day of school mirror our own disbelief of the memory.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Driven (2001)
When former racing star Joe Tanto (Sylvester Stallone) gets a call from
team owner Carl Henry (Burt Reynolds), he's not being asked to win races.
Henry needs an old pro to act as a blocker for his rising star, rookie
Jimmy Blye (Kip Pardue, "Remember the Titans"), who's giving CART world 
champion Beau Brandenburg (Til Schweiger, "Judas Kiss") some serious
competition in "Driven."
"Driven" reunites the writer/star (Stallone) and director (Renny Harlin)
of Stallone's last hit "Cliffhanger," but the pairing is less successful
this time around the track.
Stallone once again casts himself as a sensitive, damaged pro although we're
never really clued into the trauma of Tanto's past (something about almost
getting killed in a race).  He's brought in to mentor Blye, but has his
access to the young racer blocked by Blye's ambitious brother/manager Demille 
(a one-dimensional Robert Sean Leonard).
Branderburg, needing to refocus after losing one too many races to a rookie,
dumps his fiance Sophia (Estella Warren).  Still part of Beau's crew, Sophia
starts up a friendship with Jimmy which Jimmy hopes will turn to romance.
When Beau approaches and rewins Sophia at a racing event, Jimmy sets off in
a pique, taking a racing car into the streets of Chicago.  Tanto follows
and cools the hotheaded Blye off so everyone can get down to driving cars.
Stallone, who won an Oscar for writing "Rocky" back in 1976, serves up some
real dreck with "Driven."  This is the kind of flick that finds two racers
seriously endangering the city streets only to have a Yoda/Luke moment and
walk away without so much as a police warning.  There's too much stupid
speechifying ('Faith is like a good disease - it's contagious.'), too little
character development, and too many reality-defying moments.  Director Harlin 
appears to be trying to cop Oliver Stone's "Any Given Sunday" style, but 
instead achieves a empty flash.  CGI effects are so overused that you'll feel 
like you're inside a video game.
Even so, Stallone works in a couple of good bits, such as Tanto's
talent for picking up quarters on the racetrack and the hilariously witchy
exchange between Tanto's ex-wife (Gina Gershon, "Showgirls") and new love 
interest (Stacy Edwards, "The Next Best Thing").  Harlin also does put
his audience inside a race car travelling at speeds of 240 mph, hurtles
crashed car parts at us with glee and turns his sound levels up to 11.
Newcomer Cristian de la Fuente is a find as good-natured driver Memo Moreno,
Joe's old buddy who just happens to have married his ex-wife.  Also promising
is model/synchronized swimmer Warren.
Overall, "Driven's" a pretty silly movie, but it does offer some emtpy-headed
thrills.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Deep End, The (2001)
When 17 year old Beau Hall (Jonathan Tucker, "The Virgin Suicides")
gets in a car accident after drinking with his 30 year old companion, 
club owner Darby Reese (Josh Lucas, "Session 9"), his mom, Margaret 
(Tilda Swinton, "The War Zone") pays Reese a visit to convince him to
leave her son alone.  Instead, Reese travels out to their Lake Tahoe
home and lures Beau out to the boat house where Beau learns that his 
mother was right about Reese.  The next morning Margaret discovers
Darby's dead body on their beach and, suspecting the worst, weights it
down in a distant part of the lake.  But her troubles are just beginning,
as she soon learns with the arrival of blackmailer Alek Spera (Goran
Visnjic, "Practical Magic") in "The Deep End."
The incredibly pale, red-headed Scottish actress Swinton immerses herself
into the role of the reserved American super-mom whose life revolves
around serving the needs of her three children and live-in father-in-law
Jack (Peter Donat, "The Game").  She shows great strength while allowing
other emotions to glimmer through - discomfort at challenging Reese in
his gay disco (named The Deep End), near panic at having to dive down to his
body to retrieve car keys, or even wry humor when an attempt to get help
from Jack becomes hopelessly miscommunicated.  Gradually her loneliness
becomes apparent (her husband's a naval officer, usually away at sea)
when her attempts to email him her concerns about Beau are deleted and
later, when a most unusual, yet chaste, romance turns tragic.  It's a 
terrific performance.
The Stendahl Syndrome-like script, adapted from Elisabeth Sanxay Holding's 
40's noir novel 'The Blank Wall' by directors Scott McGehee and David Siegel,
would be unbelievable if not for Swinton and her costar Visnjic.
Alek Spera is a wrong side of the tracks loser who arrives after Reese's
body has been discovered.  He shows Margaret a videotape of Beau having
sex with Reese and demands $50,000 or he'll turn the tape over to the Reno
police.  Subsequent visits will turn his mind set upside down and backwards,
though, as he comes to admire and even love the woman he set out to blackmail.
There's yet another problem, though - his partner Nagle (Raymond Barry, "Dead
Man Walking") is a harder cored criminal who won't let up until his share of
the money is delivered.
Visnjic's dark, brooding turn has an interior shading to it that makes us
believe he's a victim of circumstance and environment.  His turnaround is
palpable as he witnesses Margaret's inherent decency and her workaday
surroundings.  Also outstanding is Tucker as Beau, who has a terrific character
arc and pas de deux with his mother.  Initially Beau's the typical sullen
teen.  'You're blowing this out of proportion,' he says of her concerns 
about Reese, not comprehending that his mom has enough insight to have 
divined the true nature of the relationship.  As his mom gets in deeper and
deeper trying to cover up a crime he didn't commit, Beau becomes suspicious
of her actions and apparent new companion, turning tables.  His early black 
eye becomes her later split lip.  While the two can never be completely honest 
with each other, their love for each other comes through strongly.  
The directors ("Suture") have a firm grip on their material and cast.  The 
story builds perfectly with bold strokes amidst a myriad of subtler 
underpinnings.  Water imagery is constant (an early shot of weirdly rushing 
green is revealed to be a young boy cleaning out an aquarium).  Giles Nuttgens 
("Fire") cinematography, which won the 2001 Sundance Festival award, is crisp 
and startlingly clear.  The Tahoe locations and production design by Kelly
McGehee and Christopher Tandon provide a dual personality for the film,
contrasting the calm, well off existence of the lake against the gambling
city of Reno.
"The Deep End" is a complex story of domino deeds and shifting relationships.
Take the plunge.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Brother (2000)
In the world of the Japanese Yakuza, 'brother' signifies both a bond 
stronger than blood and the immediate underlings of a clan Yakuza's oyabun,
or father.  Writer/director/star Beat Takeshi is Yamamoto, saved from 
execution by the rival gang who've killed their boss by Harada (Ren Ohsugi, 
Hana-bi"), who's switched loyalties to save his skin.  Instead, Yamamoto
is banished and travels to L.A. in search of his younger, half brother Ken
(Claude Maki), a small time drug dealer.  Yamamoto quickly recreates the
Yakuza lifestyle in L.A., slaughtering Ken's suppliers and building his own
empire in "Brother."
Known as Aniki (brother), Yamamoto forms a particular attachment to Ken's
friend Denny (Omar Epps, "Love and Basketball"), ironic seeing as when
he first ran into him anonymously on the street, he shoved a broken bottle into
Denny's eye.  Aniki's ability to outfox Denny in the bets Denny constantly
proffers builds a humorous rivalry between the two.
Not much else is too funny in the violent world Yamamoto forms around himself.
Once the Latino drug connection's been wiped out, they form an alliance with 
young Japanese hotshot Shirase (Masaya Kato), respectful of Yamamoto after the
loyal Kato (Susumu Terajima, "Afterlife") stakes his life to prove Yamamoto's
worth.  Shirase proves too headstrong, though, eventually embroiling Yamamoto's
clan in a war with the Mafia which Yamamoto realizes will prove their undoing.
Fans of Takeshi's stylish violence will delight in the gunplay, Yubitsumes 
(the removal of a finger joint as apology), hari kiri and death-by-chopstick
scenes peppered throughout his film, although newcomers may be left scratching
their heads.  Takeshi's characters are always men of few words, but his Aniki
is too inscrutable, his motivation mystifying.  His script is like a mosaic -
it gives an impression, but leaves us to fill in the connective tissue.
Yet Takeshi's exploration of the meaning of family has a resonance which
helps us overlook his film's flaws.
Takeshi's Tokyo backstory is confusing to follow, only gradually making
sense as the film progresses.  The violence ingrained in Aniki's being
could explain why he allows his clan into an unwinnable war, yet it doesn't
explain Denny's loyalty, which costs him everything.  (It doesn't help that
Epps, after facing a shattering revelation, plays a revenge scene too
lightly.)  Kitano introduces a flighty mistress (Joy Nakagawa) for Aniki out 
of nowhere, then dispatches her just as abruptly.  Still Kitano's Aniki 
is a striking figure with his elaborate Yakuza back tattoo, black suits and
dark sunglasses and his final, prophetic gesture is that of a larger than
life iconic figure.
While Director of Photography Katsumi Yanagijima's ("Sonatine") Tokyo
scenes look like claustrophobic stage sets, he captures an outsider's
look at L.A. emphasizing horizontal lines in the architecture and landscapes.
Joe Hisaishi provides the typical, retro-orchestral Kitano score.
"Brother" is not likely to win new fans for Takeshi Kitano, but it's an
intriguing, if not wholly satisfying, addition to his oeuvre.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Anniversary Party, The (2001)
Novelist Joe Thierrian (Alan Cumming, "Josie and the Pussycats") has 
recently returned home to repair his marriage to actress Sally Nash (Jennifer 
Jason Leigh).  They've decided to use the occasion of their sixth wedding 
anniversary to open their home to friends to celebrate their reunion, their 
decision to start a family and Joe's triumphant bid to direct the movie 
adaptation of his latest novel.  But the addition of some outsiders, one 
bearing ecstasy, wrecks havoc on "The Anniversary Party."
We know we're getting an 'insider' look at Hollywood Industry players 
as the film begins with Joe and Sally taking instruction from a personal
trainer as their housekeeper and cook race around preparing for their
party.  They seem happy, but cracks begin to appear even before their
guest begin to arrive.  It seems Joe's insensitively invited stranger Skye 
Davidson (Gwyneth Paltrow), a twentyish superstar who will play the lead in his
new movie - a role everyone knows he based on Sally.
The first arrivals are their business managers Jerry and Judy Adams (John 
Benjamin Hickey, "The Bone Collector;" Parker Posey), who have insisted they 
also invite their potentially litigious neighbors.  Sally's current
director Mac (John C. Reilly, "The Perfect Storm") and his neurotic actress
wife Clair (Jane Adams, "Happiness") are followed in quick succession by
Sally's costar Cal (Kevin Kline), his wife Sophia (Kline's real life wife
Phoebe Cates) and their two kids, those neighbors Monica (Mina Badie,
"Georgia") and Ryan Rose (Denis O'Hare, "Sweet and Lowdown"), Sally's
best friend Panes (Michael Panes) and Joe's old girlfriend Gina (Jennifer
Beals).
The beginning of the film is a treat as we watch these actors stretch,
creating all kinds of odd dynamics.  Jane Adams throws caution to the
winds as a self-absorbed new mother.  'Having a baby changes everything - 
you can't be the center of your own world anymore,' she observes amidst
her non-stop chatter about having to lose weight (she's stick thin), 
her concern over a new baby sitter (promptly forgotten) and demands
for a change of clothes so as not to carry pet dander home to her allergic
child (she chooses her hostess's high priced couture evening wear).
Down-to-earth mother Sophia watches all this in amazement (Cates is the
only member of this gathering who seems to be normal - presumably she's
simply playing herself - a retired actress married to a star.  When Sophia
says she's glad she got out of the business, the lines between reality and
fantasy are blurred, but we're glad her old chum Leigh (they costarred in
"Fast Times at Ridgemont High") got her back in front of the camera for this
natural performance.)
Mina Badie is a delight as the unfamous neighbor invited to play with 
the Hollywood elite.  She wants to fit in with a group who've all been
predisposed to regard her as a joke.  Denis O'Hare is a bit strident as
her husband, who passes up no opportunity to harp on the barking of Joe's
dog.  Badie lets us in on his real problem, though - jealousy - when she
cracks that all he needs is a good review (he's another writer).
Skye Davidson's arrival is comical.  Presented with her golden locks gently
fanning about her, Paltrow is excellent goosing her own persona.  'I think
you're my first goddess' gushes Joe.
Leigh becomes warier as the evening progresses.  First she must deal with the
ego-blow of her friends discovering that an actress 10 years younger than she
has gotten her own husband's starring role.  Then she overhears Mac harshly
criticizing her current performance.  Joe's too comfortable with Gina, then
is caught kissing the neighbor.  Leigh, with her baby teeth and bruised eyes
adding to her vulnerability, has simply never been better.
The same can't be said for Alan Cumming who trots out the fey, androgynous
routine that's become his single acting note.  Cumming needs to lose the
camp and get back to acting.
As writers, Leigh and Cumming haven't covered any new ground here.  One
suspects that their friends have helped fashion some of the witty dialogue
that's tossed around.  The story resembles a larger ensemble of "Who's
Afraid of Virginia Woolf?," another tale of a substance soaked evening
bringing out the worst in a childless couple.  Their reliance on drugs
to pitch their party into higher gear just loosens the weave of their
fabric.  The writer/director/stars' own big confrontation scene, is, 
ironically, the least believable, most cliched of the entire film.  
Veteran cinematographer John Bailey's first shot at digital video results
in crisp images.  The glass Neutra house in the Hollywood Hills chosen
as a location is both visually interesting and gives a bit of "Rear
Window" flavor to the proceedings.
"The Anniversary Party" casts its audience between the Roses, average
folk peering in at the shenanigans of the rich and famous.  Leigh and
Cumming's actors' camp is an interesting exercise to watch, even though
ultimately the performers themselves seem to have gotten the lion's share
of the entertainment.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Stille nach dem Schuß, Die (1999)
THE LEGEND OF RITA (Die Stille Nach dem Schuss)
Rita Vogt (Bibiana Beglau) is an idealist in 1970's West Germany.  She's
also a terrorist, partially because of her love for Andreas Klein (Harald 
Schrott), the movement's leader.  Rita is caught during transit from
Beirut via East Berlin with a pistol and comes to an understanding with
Stasi officer Erwin Hull (Martin Wuttke) who will become the dominant force
in her life.
When a guard is shot during a prison break for Andreas, the group goes 
underground in Paris.  Rather than blow her cover over a traffic violation, 
Rita shoots a policeman, then turns to Hull for help in director Volker 
Schlondorff's "The Legend of Rita."
Screenwriter Wolfgang Kohlhaase researched West German terrorist groups,
in particular the Baader-Meinhof gang, to capture the characteritics of this 
part of an era for his fictional story, while director Schlondorff 
emphasized exploring pre-unification East Germany. 
'Legend' is a Stasi (East German secret police) term for a false identify,
something Hull offers all of Rita's colleagues if they remain in East
Germany.  When her colleagues decide to flee to Beirut, Rita, disillusioned
with Andreas' personal disloyalty, stays behind and becomes Suzanne Schmidt.
She attempts to fold into life as a fabric printer in a
factory, but her passionate, idealistic nature makes her coworkers take
notice.  She takes interest in the rebellious, alcoholic Tatiana 
(Nadja Uhl, cowinner of the Best Actress award at the Berlin Film Festival 
with Biglau) whom the other women shun and raises eyebrows when she 
donates ten Deutschmarks to a charity her coworkers recognize as fraud.
Suzanne and Tatiana's story is reminiscent of the French film "The Dreamlife
of Angels," but the friendship is cut short when Andreas' death, publicized
on international news, reminds viewers of the wanted Rita Vogt.  Hull creates
Rita's next legend as Sabine Walter, a child care worker at a summer camp.
Jochen Pettka (Alexander Beyer) takes interest and wishes her to marry him
and return to Russia - time for Hull to step in again and give Rita a new
life.
The Hull/Vogt relationship resembles that of Tcheky Karyo and Anne Parrilaud
in "La Femme Nikita," wary and somewhat disapproving at first, respectful and
romantically inclined after time.  Martin Wuttke, who resembles Denis Lavant
of "Beau Travail," gives a subtly shaded performance that keeps his presence
felt throughout the film.  He's as caught up in the turmoil of the times as
Rita, particularly when East Germany's duplicity in their dealings with West
German terrorists comes to light when the wall falls.  Biblau, in her feature
film debut, gives a star making performance as Rita.  Her idealism cuts
through
her bourgeois background giving her strength and confidence.  Biblau mows 
down authority figures in her path with sheer determination and approaches 
each new legend with clear-eyed curiousity.  She almost makes us forget that
her fearless character is still a cop killer and terrorist.
Support is solid with Uhl standing out as the bleery young Tatiana, so
determined to leave the East she'll go via vodka if no other transport is 
available.  Also notable is Jenny Shily as Fredericke, another young idealist
who turns away from a moneyed life of horse riding championships to commit
crimes for Andreas.  She's not as capable as Rita, offering a nice contrast.
Director Schlondorff takes a (mostly) debut cast and gets realistic, powerful
performances.  His work with screenwriter Kohlhaase makes "The Legend of Rita"
work on many levels - as a character study, a political and historical
document
and a contrast of East and West.  Cinematographer Andreas Hofer provides a
documentary look which works well for the story.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Training Day (2001)
Jake Hoyt (Ethan Hawke, "Snow Falling on Cedars") has one day to prove to
new senior partner Alonzo Harris (Denzel Washington) that he has what it
takes to be a NARC in his quest to advance to police detective.  In 24
hours, Jake will experience the ultimate corruption of a cop who's lost 
his soul to the environment he originally served and protected in "Training
Day."
Director Antoine Fuqua ("The Replacement Killers") takes to the streets of
South Central, Watts, Inglewood, and the Imperial Courts housing project
to give his film authenticity, but screenwriter David Ayer ("The Fast and the 
Furious") trots out too much evil to believably comprehend within his
dawn to dead-of-night structure.  Given that limitation, Denzel Washington
gives a performance that glints like steel while Ethan Hawke meets him
head-on.
Jake's day begins when Alonzo calls him at home, instructs him to skip 
roll call and meet him at an inner city breakfast joint.  Jake's attempts
at small talk are rebuffed as Alonzo immediately challenges the young man
to show his mettle.  College kids hitting the bad part of town to score
pot are shaken down at gun point, relieved of their weed and let go, then
Jake's told to smoke the stuff, as a true NARC needs to understand drugs
first hand.  Jake allows himself to be convinced before he's told that 
the pot was laced with PCP.
In a move that will prove fortuitous later, Jake single handedly saves 
a young Latina from rape at the hands of two junkies.  Once again, Alonzo
delivers street justice, beating the men senseless, but not arresting them.
When Alonzo's methods with a wheelchair bound pusher (Snoop Dog) prove 
effective, Jake begins to come around, but it's short lived.  Jake learns
that Alonzo's in trouble, having pushed the Russian mob too far by killing
one of their own in Las Vegas, and Alonzo's willing to go to any length
to pay his debt and remain the street czar of the inner city.
Washington proves here that he's as fine an actor playing compromised evil
as he is at the noble, heroic roles he usually takes on.  He initially seduces
the audience along with Jake, soothingly smoothing over his radical actions
with rhetoric like his signature line, 'to protect the sheep you gotta kill
the wolf and it takes a wolf to kill the wolf.'  But Washington always keeps
us unbalanced as well, punctuating his words with an underhanded snicker.
Hawke is the real surprise, going toe to toe with Washington while providing
our point of view.  Hawke makes Jake an idealized young man who toughens up
first for the wrong, then the right, reasons as he realizes he must trust
his own instinct and principles.
Support is terrific in many small roles too numerous to mention.  Macy Gray
is a standout as a dragon lady of a dealer's wife reacting to a falsified
warrant.  Cliff Curtis ("Blow") is the only creditted member of a Latino
threesome Alonzo leaves Jake with - ironically the four actors provide the
best scene in the film without Washington, although ultimately Ayer leaves
them to end the bit on a note that plays too much like a fairy tale.
Director of Photography Mauro Fiore ("Driven") smoothly captures the action,
from both within Alonzo's menacing black 1978 Monte Carlo low rider and
outside as it glides over the orange-hued, rain slicked streets of sunset.  
He maintains the tension in the interiors of South Central and the hidden
domains of the LAPD's underground.  Production designer Naomi Shohan 
("American Beauty") maintains a shadow world (even when brightly lit) rooted 
in reality, which Mark Mancina's ("Speed") score reflects by placing
shivery highlights over the ethnic music of the neighborhoods.  Fuqua's
direction is confident, delivering not just the style seen in his "The
Replacement Killers," but the substance of full characterizations as well.
"Training Day" is a good film held back from greatness by the excesses of
its script.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Roozi khe zan shodam (2000)
THE DAY I BECAME A WOMAN (Roozi khe zan shodam)
As a thesis project for her husband's Makhmalbaf Film House, Marzieh Meshkini
has chosen a triptych written by her husband Mohsen Makhmalbaf ("Gabbeh")
which presents the repression of women in Iranian society in "The Day I
Became a Woman."
In the first episode, Havva (Eve, played by non-actor Ftemeh Cheragh Akhtar)
learns that her ninth birthday means that she's become a woman who must
cover her head with the chador and no longer play with her male friend (Hassan
Nabehan).  Her mother relents and gives her one hour (until the time of her
birth) of freedom.  Havva finds Hassan and the two share a lollipop and
tamarind (an act which the Iranian censors found too erotic).   When Havva's 
stick no longer shows a shadow, it's noon and she returns to her home.
Ahoo (Gazelle, Shabnam Toloui) is in a bicycle race, yet is constantly
beseeched by the males of her town to come to her senses and return.   Her
husband and his lawyer chase after her on horseback and threaten on the spot 
divorce.  Her extended male family next attempts to convince her that her
husband still loves her and will take her back.  Finally the town elders
try evoking the punishment of God himself, yet Ahoo cycles on.
The final story features Houra (Black-eyed Beauty, Azizeh Seddighi), an old
woman in a wheelchair who arrives at the airport and hires a young boy (Badr 
Irouni Nejad) to assist her in buying all the things she's always needed 
(furniture, appliances) which she surrounds herself with on the beach.
It's clear that this is meant to be a representation of one woman's life,
with a raft powered by a sail made from Havva's chador featured in the first
and final episodes.  Each story features more modern ammenities than the 
previous.  The young girl succumbs to tradition after a last blast of freedom.
The young wife tries to flee but is finally caught up by men.  The old woman
attempts to find happiness by ironically embodying the Iranian male concept
of a woman as consumer rather than producer.
Meshkini's film, which features different technical credits for each of its
segments, uses three different styles quite cohesively.  The initial, most
simple segment, recalls all Iranian films which deal with children ("The White
Balloon," etc.)  The second begins to become more stylized, with the black
clad female bicyclers strikingly portrayed against the blue sea and blinding
sunlight of the Island of Kish.  The third is downright surreal, with small
boys vacuuming sand and bedrooms set up on the beach.  The film is visually
stunning although the sound mix is uneven.
"The Day I Became a Woman" is a trio of fables which simply yet evocatively
lay out the problems of being a woman in Iran and the filmmaking Makhmalbaf
clan have seemingly overcome these problems and produced a new voice in
director Meshkini.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Lengua de las mariposas, La (1999)
1936 Spain is on the brink of a civil war that will pit fascists against
communists and Loyalists against Republicans. Little Moncho (Manuel Lozano) is
just coming of age at this critical juncture in his country's history when he
enters school for the first time. Frightened by the stories told to him by his
older brother, Andre, of the mean old teacher, Don Gregorio (Fernando Fernan
Gomez), poor little Moncho wets himself at his first confrontation with the man
and runs away from school. But, Don Gregorio's patience, kindness and
understanding take hold as he opens up the wonderful world of nature to the boy
in "Butterfly."
Director Jose Luis Cuerda takes on a big effort as he tries to mix a sensitive
tale of a little boy and a kindly old man with one of political intrigue in
pre-Franco Spain. At first, Moncho's story takes the lead as he and Don
Gregorio form a relationship, with the old professor teaching the boy the 
wonders of nature and life. His teachings are exemplified with the don's 
description and eventual close-up look at a butterfly's tongue - the probiscus 
the delicate creature uses to collect the nectar of life.
Where the latter is a sometimes melancholy, often thoughtful, look at the
cross-generational relationship, the politics depicted take on a harsher, more
sinister tone. Right from the start of the film there is an undercurrent of the
conflict between those who seek the freedom of a Spanish republic and those who
want to retain the safe haven of the monarchy. The conflict builds steadily
through the film to its final culmination - civil war. In the end, Don Gregorio
and other liberal thinkers are rejected and the power of fascism takes hold of
the country. The innocent betrayal by Moncho of the old man is both sad and
abruptly handled, wrapping the story up in an unsatisfying manner.
Director Cuerda is virtually unknown in the US and "Butterfly" doesn't have the
appeal or coherence to change this status. The bond between Moncho and Don
Gregorio is sweet and holds an attraction for the viewer, but the politics of
the film are too simply drawn with its "liberal is good, conservative is bad"
message.
If you have a desire to see a foreign language film, I recommend, instead, the
wonderful Iranian film, "The Color of Paradise." I give "Butterfly" a C.
In the five years between the fall of the Spanish monarchy and
the Spanish Civil War, a small, shy boy, Moncho (Manuel Lozano) makes
a rocky transition to the local school which is eased when his elderly
teacher Don Gregorio (Fernando Fernan Gomez, "The Grandfather") comes to
his home to 'apologize.'  Moncho becomes fast friends with the nature
loving teacher as well as other children at school who expose him to the adult
world of love.  Unfortunately, Moncho will be more than exposed to the
adult world of politics, which divides even his Republican father and
devoutly religious mother in "Butterfly."
"Butterfly" is perhaps most successful in capturing the feel of life in
a rural Spanish town in the 1930's, where merchants are visitted not only
for their wares, but for advice (a young farmer purchases a bottle for the
mother of country girl Carmina while complaining about her ever present
mutt Tarzan) gossip (a group of schoolchildren listen to his tale) and
more (Carmina visits Moncho's father for funeral expenses when her mother
dies).  The town's band, which practices in an old chocolate factory,
recruits Moncho's older brother Andres (Alexis de los Santos) but unbeknownst
to him, he's wanted as bait for the young ladies rather than his musical
ability.  The town's wealthiest man has two fresh capons delivered to
Don Gregorio during class so that Don Gregorio will work his son harder 
in math (the capons are returned).  Don Gregorio leads his class outdoors
to inspire them with thoughts of the marvel of a butterfly's tongue
(Butterfly's Tongue was the film's original, and better, title) and is
found by Moncho picking apples from a neighbor's tree.
"Butterfly" is also a coming of age story, in which Moncho gets his
first kiss (after some guidance from Don Gregorio) and Andres finds his
heart broken after a band visit to another village.  Innocence is damaged
when Carmina's drunken lover takes harsh measures against Tarzan (foreshadowing
another act of human cruelty) while the children watch hidden in bushes.
Spanish acting institution Fernando Fernan Gomez is the teacher everyone
wishes they'd had as Don Gregorio.  He's a complex man - older, yet
promoting liberal politics.  His unorthodox methods for keeping control
of his class are a study in human psychology.  Manual Lozano is well
utilizied as Moncho, with his face reflecting the perplexing world around
him (some of his nonactorly facial expressions are a hoot!).  Alexis de
los Santos lends an air of naive romance to older brother Andres.  Uxio
Blanco is the strong mother Rosa, whose protective maternal influence is
stronger than her husband Ramon's (Gonzalo Uriarte) idealism.
The film is shot lovingly, nostalgically all aglow, yet editted oddly,
with scenes feeling cut off, too abruptly ended.  The film's climatic
ending, where politics harshly divide the Galician town's inhabitants
is also jarring, which would be fine if the filmmakers had laid the
groundwork for accepting Moncho's final action - they don't and the
effect is alienating.
"Butterfly" has been praised for its resistance to sentimentality, yet
even given its downer of an ending, this played like a favorite of older
Foreign Language Film Academy voters , a group criticized for their
sentimentality, to me.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Crew, The (2000)
Now that we've had our of fill of mob shrink comedies, it's time to movie
on to the senior set in "The Crew."  Narrator Bobby Bartellemeo (Richard
Dreyfuss, Casey Siemaszko in flashbacks) fills us in on his and his mob
buddies' pasts and present.  Joey "Bats" Pistella (Burt Reynolds) is the 
muscle of the group with a hair trigger temper that's just cost him his
job at Burger King.  Mike "The Brick" Donatelli (Dan Hedaya) is the sweet
but dim one who loves his new profession as a corpse cosmetician.  Tony
"Mouth" Donato (Seymour Cassel) is the ladies man who doesn't say much, but
still wows them on the dance floor where he makes his living as an instructor.
Bobby himself was the brains and leader of the group and is responsible for
leading them all to retirement in South Beach.  Bobby lost his wife and
small daughter Olivia over his mob ties and had heard that they had moved
here.  Now the foursome need to cook up a plan to save their homestead -
the ramshackle Raj Mahal retirement hotel is in danger of being converted
into pricey condos.
They fake a mob hit in the lobby with one of Brick's clients to drive away
potential business and it works!  The landlord even decreases their rent to
get them to stay.  But things quickly get messy.  The corpse turns out to
be the father of a notorious drug lord (Miguel Sandoval).  Mouth blabs all to
stripper Ferris (Jennifer Tilly) who blackmails them into putting a hit on
her mother-in-law Pepper Lowenstein (Lainie Kazan).  The detective on the
case turns out to be Bobby's long lost daughter (Carrie-Anne Moss, "The
Matrix").  Comedic capering ensues.
The screenplay by "Golden Girls" writer Barry Fanaro is just too loud,
messy, overly ambitious and overly reliant on coincidence.  This type of
senior crime caper was handled far better over twenty years ago in "Going 
in Style."  There's so much plot you begin to lose the sense of why
certain things are happening.  A subplot that has corrupt cop Steve
(Jeremy Piven) trying to win back Olivia is totally superfluous (as if
having Bobby's daughter turn out to be the law wasn't hackneyed enough).
The cast can't be faulted, however.  The four leads are all
endearing, particularly Hedaya's Brick who keeps in homey touch with mob
guys all over the country via Christmas cards ('What are you - the yearbook
editor?' barks Bobby after Brick updates them on former colleagues).
Lainie Kazan is amusing as a hostage who turns happy when her abductors
discover she's the owner of the deli they frequent.
The film tries to be a little different with a couple of slick editting
moves (a morgue drawer is closed and segued to a file cabinet being opened) 
and a comedy bit right out of "Mouse Hunt," but the techniques are used
a couple of times then dropped, making the film stylistically muddled.
"The Crew" is an OK piece of fluff to kill an hour and a half, but on the
whole, the film lets down its talent.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Angel Eyes (2001)
Chicago PD officer Sharon Pogue (Jennifer Lopez, "The Wedding Planner") fights 
to keep an accident victim conscious with earnest care emanating from her every
pore in one scene, then throws a hulking hood against a squad car in the next.
JLo means business as an all purpose supercop, but when she finds herself
at the mercy of a gun-wielding thug, it's the bravery of a passing stranger -
or is he? - that saves her life in "Angel Eyes."
Director Luis Mandoki and screenwriter Gerald DiPego tone down the saccharine 
syrup they applied liberally to their last effort, "Message in the Bottle," 
but can't resist overdoing the melodrama in the home stretch of their new one.
"Angel Eyes" is being marketted as some kind of supernatural outing, but it's
really a love story about two troubled people who find each other.  Sharon is
agonizing over a family that has a history of abuse, from her father's (Victor
Argo, "Coyote Ugly") former treatment of her mother (Sonia Braga, "Kiss of the 
Spider Woman") to her brother's current spousal abuse.  Her concerned partner
Robby (Terrence Howard, "The Best Man"), whom she hasn't confided in, even 
suggests she may be battling her own violent impulses after witnessing her 
rough treatment of apprehended suspects.  Her mother and sister-in-law's 
pleas for her to attend a ceremony celebrating the renewal of her parents' 
wedding vows are bringing the familial conflict to a head.
Sharon finds herself intrigued by the quiet young man (Jim Caviezel, "Pay It
Forward") who tackled her assailant.  Giving his name only as Catch, the
man with the intense blue eyes proves to have an even higher wall around him
that she does.  As the couple can't seem to resist the urge to be together,
Sharon begins to delve into Catch's past, finally discovering a shattering
confluence.
It's here that "Angel Eyes" plunges earthward.  Mandoki and editor Jerry
Greenberg crosscut Catch's coming to terms with his tragedy as Sharon 
attends her parent's party and attempts to make peace with her father.
The ludicrousness of such emotional trauma hitting a couple at the 
exact same time is cause for eye-rolling - surely not the intended audience 
response.  (I also have a pet peeve with filmmakers who prominently feature
a pet - in this case Catch's dog Bob - only to inexplicably forget the
animal's existence.)
A second problem with "Angel Eyes" is the imbalance of the leads' performances.
Jennifer Lopez has enough street cred to be entirely believable as a Chicago
cop and the femininity to appear soft and vulnerable.  Even while Mandoki
overmanipulates the climax of his film, Lopez pulls off a highly emotional
moment, recalling a good childhood scene with her dad for a camcorder when her 
real father can't bring himself to bridge the gap that's grown between them.
Caveziel, however, needs to stop playing Christlike characters.  He became
known with his sacrificial Private Witt in "The Thin Red Line" and
turned the heroin addict of "Pay It Forward" into a fallen saint.  Maybe
Mandoki directed him to play Catch in an otherworldly manner to keep audiences
guessing, but the routine is wearing thin for this actor, who coasts here
with his penetrating eyes and cautiously dazzling smile.  Making a stronger
impression is NAACP Image Award winner Terrence Howard as Sharon's hopeful
partner.  Oscar nominated actress Shirley Knight ("As Good as it Gets") appears
in a small role as a wheelchair bound woman whom Catch shops for.
The film alternates between a skewed, dreamy look and lushly colored reality
provided by Academy Award nominated cinematographer Piotr Sobocinski ("Red")
(who passed away earlier this year while working on Mandoki's next feature).
The musicical focal point comes when Catch surprises Sharon by picking up a 
trumpet to perform a blues piece in a nightclub.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Gift, The (2000)
Annie Wilson (Cate Blanchett, "Elizabeth") is a recently widowed mother of
three boys trying to make ends meet in Brixton, Georgia.  Having inheritted
the gift of second sight from her granny, Annie gives readings to townsfolk
like battered wife Valerie Barksdale (Hillary Swank, "Boys Don't Cry").
When Jessica King, (Katie Holmes, "Wonder Boys") the daughter of the town's
wealthiest man and fiance of school principal Wayne Collins (Greg Kinnear)
has been missing for four days, Annie's asked to help in "The Gift."
With the talent involved in this project, from director Sam Raimi ("A Simple
Plan") and cowriters Billy Bob Thornton and Tom Epperson (both of "One False 
Move") to the unusual ensemble cast (featuring one Oscar winner - Swank, and 
three nominees - Blanchett, Kinnear and Rosemary Harris), one would expect 
"The Gift" to be one humdinger of a film.  Alas, although Blanchett once again 
gives a flawless performance, "The Gift" is a mediocre thriller.  Think "What 
Lies Beneath" crossed with "To Kill a Mockingbird."
Through Annie, we're introduced to the cast of characters. Buddy (Giovanni
Ribisi, "Boiler Room") is the slow witted auto mechanic who's devoted to Annie, 
but clearly is disturbed by something repressed from his childhood.  Valerie's
Annie's battered client who's abusive, redneck husband Donnie (Keanu Reeves)
threatens not only Annie, but her children, because of her 'interference' in
his marriage.  He's also known as a bit of a ladies' man, which makes Valerie
jealous.  Wayne Collins (Greg Kinnear) is the mild mannered school principal 
engaged to wild child rich girl Jessica (not only does Annie have a nightmarish 
vision upon meeting Jessica, she finds her in a compromising position in the 
country club ladies room on only her second encounter with the woman).  Already
we have more red herrings than we can shake a stick at.
The screenplay makes obvious choices and overplays its Southern Gothic hand
(Ribisi's character may as well have been called Boo Radley).  Character
development is lacking, particularly with Annie's three sons.  We're given
hints that Annie isn't coping well with her husband's death and that her 
behavior is impacting that of her eldest son, but the screenplay allows these 
hints to suffice rather than delving more deeply.  Wayne and Jessica as a 
couple are a head-scratcher.  The film's climax is more than a bit shopworn.
The cast is mostly fine with Blanchett elevating the film above its pulp
trash roots.  Reeves is quite effective as the brutish husband, creating a 
real fear of violence whenever he appears.  Swank follows her tour de force 
Oscar winning performance by playing it safe in a small supporting role.  
Gary Cole ("A Simple Plan") makes a mark as an unethical prosecution attorney.
Technically, the film is rather conventional showing none of the distinctive 
stylishness of Raimi's earlier work.  Kudos, though to visual effects 
supervisors Syd Dutton and Bill Taylor, who create some eerie visions from
Annie's point of view.  Original music by Christopher Young ("The Wonder Boys")
features fiddles to create a sense of place while also underlining the suspense.
As a filmgoing experience, "The Gift" is like getting a Crackerjacks prize in a 
Tiffany box.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Waydowntown (2000)
In downtown Calgary, a complex of shopping malls, offices and
apartments are interconnected via glass walkways for block after city block.
Five wildly different office colleagues have wagered a month's salary that 
whoever can stay inside the longest wins the pot in cowriter (with James 
Martin)/director Gary Burns' "waydowntown."
Playing in relative real time over the course of a lunch hour on
the 24th day of the bet, we first meet Tom (Fab Filipo), the new guy in the 
office, a marijuana smoking Goth and the bet's chief architect.  Tom takes
pleasure in rattling go-getter Sandra (Marya Delver) with creepy facts about
recycled air, while growing somewhat concerned with the mental health
of 'Sadly I'm' Brad (Don McKellar, "Last Night"), a twenty year office
veteran.  Randy (Tobias Godson) informs Tom that Curt (Gordon Currie), the
engaged-to-be-married-for-two-years office lothario, won a bet like this 
before, so Tom nudges Curt towards easy prey - the also engaged, mousy clerk
Vicki (Jennifer Clement).
Tom's been tasked with picking up a gift for the firm's octogenarian owner, 
Mr. Mather (Harris Hart), but is consistently kept off course by one comic
incident after another.  He keeps crossing paths with Sandra, who's just been 
given the important job of following Mather during lunch hour because he's
a kleptomaniac.  Tom becomes troubled by his ethics when he won't go outside
to check on the possible suicide he may have caused while Sandra manically
steals perfumed magazine inserts which she uses like a gas mask.  Randy hangs 
out with a shopping mall security guard, commenting on the passers-by.  Back
in the office, while the receptionist eavesdrops on Curt and Vickie's bathroom
encounter, Brad escalates from stapling himself with motivational mottos
('Don't compromise - prioritize') to dancing ever closer to the glass windows
clutching a marble-filled bottle. By film's end, all five will have shifted
their priorities when they realize where their bet as led them.
Martin and Burns' script is amusing and often inventive, although some
choices,
such as making Mather's gift a $3,500 crystal vase, are nonsensically plot 
driven.  Visually, "waydowntown" is more like a music video than a theatrical
film, with Tom frequently flying around corridors like the super heroes he
sees
darting around corners.  We see his imaginings of an arch villain taking
hostage the enclosed inner city visualized like a floating snow globe.  The
office interiors look like temporary structures and are photographed with no
imagination.  Use of a French language cover of the Petulia Clark hit
"Downtown" is a witty acknowledgement of its Canadian location.
"waydowntown" joins the likes of "Office Space" and "Haiku Tunnel" in the
genre of cubie comedy.  It's a cute flick, but its small screen look
makes it better suited for video.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Wo hu cang long (2000)
When legendary Wudan warrior Li Mu Bai (Chow Yun-Fat, "Anna and the King")
entrusts his ancient green sword to Yu Shu Lien (Michelle Yeoh, "Tomorrow 
Never Dies") for transport to Sir Te (Sihung Lung, "Eat Drink Man Woman") 
in Peking, she wonders at his decision - is he finally ready to declare
long unspoken emotions and settle down with her?  The sword, however, is
covetted by a mysterious new warrior, apparently the protege of Li Mu Bai's
long time enemy Jade Fox (Pei-pei Cheng), and is stolen on its first night
in Sir Te's study.  Li Mu Bai and Yu Shu Lien are pulled back into the 
life of the swordfighter as their romance is reflected by that of a younger
couple in director Ang Lee's ("Sense and Sensibility") "Crouching Tiger, 
Hidden Dragon."
Ang Lee established himself in the filmmaking world with his Chinese trilogy 
of patriarchal films "Pushing Hands," "The Wedding Banquet," and "Eat Drink
Man Woman."  He then further proved himself with three wildly different 
English language speaking films, "Sense and Sensibility," "The Ice Storm"
and "Ride With the Devil."  Now he tries his hand at the Chinese martial arts 
genre he grew up with and delivers an epic entertainment that may very well 
cross over from the art house to American multiplexes.
The story (screenplay by Hui-Ling Wang ("Eat Drink Man Woman), James Schamus, 
Kuo Jung Tsai) contains all the elements of a genre romantic fantasy adventure.
There's a fantastic sword, not unlike a Jedi knight's light saber, whose
owner has developed mixed feelings for after years of bloodshed.  Li Mu Bai
and Yu Shu Lien's love is clear for all to see, yet long denied by themselves
(for noble reasons, of course, as she was once betrothed to his brother who
was killed in action).  A new fighter emerges in a most unexpected guise,
Jen Yu (newcomer Ziyi Zhang), the daughter of an aristrocat promised in an
unwanted arranged marriage.  Jen is caught between a natural inclination
towards good and the evil that is her governess/teacher - the infamous Jade
Fox.  Her lover is Lo (Chen Chang, "Happy Together"), a gypsy bandit who
once had the audacity to attempt to steal her hair comb.  The flashback
which fills in the history of Jen and Lo's romance is one of the highlights
of the film - sexy, funny, touching and of course, full of action.
The screenplay delivers with several story lines intermingled, all
evoking the full spectrum of human emotion.  Of course, the story is
studded with numerous action sequences, featuring the balletic fight
choreography of Yen Woo-Ping ("The Matrix").  While most of his work
is exemplary (particularly the fights between Jen and Yu Shu), I found the 
'flying' sequences a bit too fantastical.  Skipping over water and
fighting atop a bamboo forest work, but the rest of the action would
have been better served a bit more earthbound.  Cinematography by Peter
Pau ("The Bride with White Hair") captures the action while also broadening 
scope to capture breathtaking scenery in both green, misty mountain terrain 
and sun scorched deserts.  Tim Squyres' editting is top notch.  The film is 
gorgeously scored by Tan Dun, featuring the work of celloist Yo Yo Ma.
Michelle Yeoh should be receiving some serious attention for a Best Actress
nomination.  Her subtle work here is heart breaking and the most compelling
in the film.  On the opposite end of the scale, Chen Chang ("Happy Together")
gives a rousingly endearing performance as the sexy, good hearted bandit Lo,
while newcomer Ziyi Zhang demonstrates she's got the moves.  Chow Yun Fat
is a bit hampered by the legendary status of his character, to which he brings
enormous nobility.  Sihung Lung ("Eat Drink Man Woman") is humorously sage
as Sir Te.
"Crouching Tiger, Hidden Dragon" has something for everyone.  It's a huge
film by a director who must now be regarded as a world class auteur.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for 6th Day, The (2000)
The latest Schwarzenegger sci-fi actioner is a derivative middle-of-the-road
effort that's entertaining enough while you're watching it, but dissolves
from the memory as you exit the theater.
Arnie is Adam Gibson (a tribute to "Neuromancer" author William Gibson?), 
a family guy with a sexy marriage (Wendy Crewson, "Bicentennial Man" is
wife Natalie), preteen daughter and dog Oliver.  He owns a helicopter charter
business with his younger partner Hank (Michael Rapaport, thoroughly wasted
here).  After Hank poses as Adam to take the wealthy owner of Replacement
Technologies (Tony Goldwyn as Drucker), Adam returns home to find a clone
celebrating his birthday and two thugs (who seem right out of "The Matrix")
intent on killing him.
Adam is established as an old fashioned kind of guy when he refuses to go
to RePet, a pet cloning business, when Oliver dies.  (He also owns a
vintage Cadillac.)  The script, by husband and wife team Marianne and Cormac 
Wibberley, explains that in this futuristic society, there are laws against 
cloning humans because of the complexity of the human brain (and the one known 
experiment which went tragically wrong).  Replacement Technologies, which
owns RePet, is publically in the human part replacement business, but
privately of course they're cloning people, via the research of Dr. Weir
(Robert Duvall), who's trying to keep his dying wife alive.  The film's title
refers to the Genesis passage about the creation of man.  Unfortunately, the
script botches its main mystery when attempting to explain why Adam Gibson
was cloned.
Arnold is no great actor, but gets by here on his likeability.  Goldwyn's an
interesting bad guy, Australian actress Sarah Wynter ("Species 2") does a
good Linda Fiorentino standin and Crewson injects some personality into
the wife role.  The rest of the cast, which includes Duvall, Rapaport, and
Michael Rooker, is unexceptional.
Technically, the film provides a lot of razzle dazzle eye candy, like
remote controlled helicopter races, dolls that simulate children and the
'blanks' waiting to be cloned.  However, the film's visuals constantly
remind us of other films like "Blade Runner," "Demolition Man" and Arnie's
own "True Lies."  The film's script even borrows the main premise of "The
Sixth Sense."  Director Roger Spottiswoode ("Tomorrow Never Dies") allows
his film to run for an excessive 124 minutes.
"The 6th Day" may be better than Arnold's last effort ("End of Days"), 
but I doubt it will last many days during the crowded holiday movie season.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Dark Days (2000)
Twenty year old British filmmaker Marc Singer moved in with his subjects,
homeless people living underground in New York City's Amtrak tunnels, for
two years and utilized them as his crew to produce the documentary Audience
Award winner of this year's Sundance Film Festival, "Dark Days."
We follow the grainy black and white image of Greg, a black man, walking
down a street before he slips away from our view, entering the underground
tunnels of Amtrak where he's made his home.  It's an impressive home, with
four walls and a TV.  Greg explains, while using his electric shaver, that
he can tap into Amtrak's power and not pay any bills, although he regrets
the lack of running water.  Greg makes his living turning other peoples'
garbage into profits, claiming he can find just about anything a person
would want for free.  He doesn't have the nicest house, though, telling
us that we should see Tommy's.
Tommy's a young, strapping Irish kid who keeps a number of dogs fenced in
around his 'property.'  He makes his living gathering empties and says
he can make $60-70 dollars working all day on a Friday.  Julio also keeps
pets and, along with his friend Lee, takes us through a picture show of
his former cats, birds and assorted animal companions (Miss Peaches, a 
gerbil, apparently being a favorite) like a Cheech and Chong of the pet set.
The barely comprehensible Ralph, a reformed drug addict, is more practical
about his dog, who he's trained to keep the rats out of his abode.  Dee,
a crack smoker, moves in with Ralph after her home is torched and the two
bicker like an old married couple.  Henry, a distinguished older black man, 
whips up a batch of corn bread while wearing a Drakkar Noir jacket.
Singer paints a fascinating portrait of a resilient and inventive (burglar
alarms fashioned out of pot lids) group of people even as we're told that
80 percent of them are crackheads.  He slowly allows the characters to
build before showing a few of them recounting how they ended up in the
tunnels (Dee and Ralph both because of the horrific fates of their children).
Then Amtrak officials descend (filming not allowed) to clear everyone
out (for their safety) while others lobby to ensure they get housing.
The conclusion is too simple.  No mention is made of the fate of all those
pets who were given so much screen time.  We see the residents struggling
to break down their solid structures with sledge hammers - were these
scenes staged by the filmmaker or did officials demand the action?  They all 
seem surprisingly eager to leave their home and are happy to live in real 
apartments, but we're given no clue as to their proximity - is the community 
still intact within one building?  Singer doesn't tell us.  
Still, "Dark Days" is an engrossing account of a world most of us could
not have imagined inhabitted by people whose fates we care about.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Man Who Cried, The (2000)
In 1927, a doting father (Oleg Yankovsky, "Mute Witness") seemingly lives 
an idyllic life with his young daughter (Claudia Lander-Duke) in rural Russia.
Convinced by a visitting relative to try his luck in America, he ruefully
leaves the tiny girl with his mother (Hana Maria Pravda).  As their shtetl
is being burned to the ground, Grandmother gives her to escaping strangers, 
along with some gold coins and a photograph of her father.  After a horrific 
journey, she's named Suzie by an English port official (Clifford Barry), 
discovered to have a singing voice, and eventually lands in Paris (grown up,
played by Christina Ricci), but her goal remains America in "The Man Who
Cried."
Written and directed by Sally Potter ("Orlando, "The Tango Lesson), "The
Man Who Cried" is an odd amalgamation of filmmaking - good performances
admist luckluster and over the top, on location filming mixed with obviously
artificial set pieces, and a weirdly titled tale that, while nothing new, 
somehow remains engaging.  It's a survivor story set against a historical
background writ from the movie screen.
Suzie, presumed a Brit, gets a job in a cabaret and meets Lola (Cate 
Blanchett), a fellow Russian out to land a wealthy man.  He arrives in the
person of Dante (John Turturro), an egotistical Italian opera singer in
the stage company of Felix Perlman (Harry Dean Stanton).  Lola gets herself 
and Suzie jobs in its chorus and soon she's keeping company with Dante,
(who's most interested to learn Suzie's secret when he spies her father's
picture).  Suzie gravitates towards Cesar (Johnny Depp), a gypsy of few 
words who rides a white stallion onto the stage every night (much to Dante's 
chagrin).  The gypsy way of life reminds Suzie of her Jewish heritage and 
Cesar presents an alternative to the quest for her father.
But the lines are clearly drawn for these four characters with the onset
of WWII and the Nazi occupation of Paris.  (Their fate is economically summed
up with a crane shot of a vaguely Naziish prop looming over Dante 
and Suzie, faced off on the stage below.)
Potter opens her film with credits rolling over her heroine (Ricci), fighting
for life in a dark ocean (clearly a tank) surrounded by burning debris and
water.  Fire and mist continue as leitmotifs throughout the film, although what 
they symbolize is a mystery (the lack of solid ground afforded Suzie?).
The steam rising from a bowl of soup becomes the most predominant (and oddly
hypnotic) element of a shot.  Visually, "The Man Who Cried" is often stunning,
featuring slow-mo closeups of Suzie, costumed for an ornate outdoor tableau,
or Cesar performing stunts on horseback through the nighttime streets of Paris.
A shot of young Suzie stubbornly clutching the heavily framed portrait of
her father (it's almost as big as she is) while terror reigns around her is
haunting.  (Cinematography is by Sacha Vierny, "The Cook, the Thief, His Wife 
and Her Lover" and "Prospero's Books").
Ricci plays Suzie largely as an impassive observer.  This, combined
with Ricci's otherworldly appearance, makes for an empathetic portrayal of an 
intelligent survivor who's not what she appears to be.  A shy smile for 
Cesar is hard won and takes on more weight.  Blanchett continues to amaze with 
her ability to transform herself.  Peroxide blonde Lola targets Dante like a 
heat-seeking missile and Blanchett does the heavily-accented flirt well.  She 
also brings urgency and regret to her character when she must face 
the inevitable.  Depp recycles his role from "Chocolat" as a man of even lesser
words.  Potter objectifies him, but Depp gets across the simple points - anger
at oppression, love for his family.  Turturro, however, relies on theatrical
posing and grandstanding in a two dimensional performance.  Harry Dean Stanton
is quietly convincing, lending an air of melancholy to his democratic 
businessman.  Young Claudia Lander-Duke looks like Ricci and her stoicism 
meshes well into Ricci's portrayal of the character.
"The Man Who Cried" is an off kilter work from a visual, overtly 
romantic director.  
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Dish, The (2000)
While the U.S. moon landing was a worldwide event, most people are probably
unaware of Australia's role.  In a sheep field in Parkes sits the largest
radio telescope station in the Southern Hemisphere, a prime location to 
track communications with Apollo 11 and relay television pictures back to
Earth.  Three Australians and one American NASA technician will beat amazing
odds to fulfill their task in "The Dish."
Although names have been changed by screenwriters Rob Sitch (director, "The
Castle") and Tom Gleisner (also producer), "The Dish" is based on actual 
events of 1969.  Recent widower Cliff Buxton (Sam Neill), a professorial,
cardigan wearing, pipe-smoking type, leads the crew at Parkes' radio telescope.
Glenn (Tom Long) is a literal, nerdy mathmetician attempting to work up the
courage to ask local lass Janine out.  Mitch (Kevin Harrington) is Glenn's
tormentor and the most perturbed by the presence of American Al Burnett
(Patrick Warburton, TV's "Seinfeld").  Burnett's been sent in to coordinate
the effort and checks and rechecks everyone's work to ensure a smooth
operation.  There's also a new member of the team, Rudi (Tayler Kane), Janine's
rather simple brother who's been hired as a security guard.
Meanwhile Parkes' mayor, Bob McIntyre (Roy Billing) and his wife May
(Genevieve Mooy) are busy preparing for the arrival of such exotic visitors 
as the American Ambassador (John McMartin) and the Prime Minister (Billie 
Brown) while the exuberant teenage Army volunteer next door attempts to
court their disdainful daughter Marie.
Things don't go smoothly.  The local High School band plays the theme to
"Hawaii Five-O" in place of the U.S. national anthem at the Mayor's 
reception.  Then Parkes loses power and prideful Mitch must face up to the 
fact that his neglect to clear fuel pump lines has cost the telescope its 
backup generator.  Cliff lies to NASA to buy time while the team frantically 
recalculates the equations needed to relocate Apollo 11 - even Al breaks
character and lies to NASA.  After this challenge is overcome, the team find
that due to a problem in California, their station will be the primary
television broadcast dish for the moon landing itself, while winds gust to
levels more than twice what the dish has been engineered to sustain.
The ensemble cast breath humor and life into this story.  Neill's Buxton
makes us empathize with the bittersweet nature of his success in the shadow
of his wife's death.  His serenity has a calming effect on the other, more
tightly strung crew members.  Wharburton shows range with his serious
workaholic who allows the Australians to bring out a sense of fun ('I think
we ate a whole sheep,' he tells Glenn and Mitch after returning from Sunday
dinner at the mayor's).  Tayler Kane provides most of the laughs as the
self-important but imbecilic Rudi announces his presence in various 'sectors'
of the station and believes he's talking to Neil Armstrong over his walkie
talkie.  Roy Billing is a delight as the mayor who retains his hominess while
bidding for political recognition.  McMartin plays the Ambassador as a 
stereotypical good-natured American.
Sitch keeps every element of his film perfectly calibrated.  Cinematographer
Wood is able to capture a shot to relay the laughs, romance or majesty required
by the action.  Editor Jill Bilcock artfully arranges those images,
particularly in a fabulous montage which shows the mechanical workings of
the dish played out against the late 60's instrumental "Classical Gas."
"The Dish" finds a place where gentle charm and humor live side by side with
the awe and grandeur of man's accomplishment.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Nutty Professor II: The Klumps (2000)
THE NUTTY PROFESSOR II:  THE KLUMPS
-----------------------------------
Scientific genius Sherman Klump (Eddie Murphy) has discovered the fountain of
youth - a serum that reverses the aging process and makes you young again. He
has also discovered true love with his beautiful colleague, Denise Gains (Janet
Jackson), a brilliant DNA researcher at his college. But, things go from good
to bad when Sherman's dastardly alter ego, Buddy Love, again rears his handsome
head and tries to steal the valuable serum in "Nutty Professor 2: The Klumps."
There are six reasons to go see "Nutty 2" and they're all named Eddie Murphy.
The comedian has established himself as not only a major moneymaking star for
the Hollywood movie machine; he has proven himself time and again to be a fine
character actor, too. When he intro'd his many faces in "The Nutty Professor"
in 1996, the audience clamored for more of the portly Klump family. To satisfy
that craving, executive producers Murphy and Tom Shadyac ("Liar Liar") put 
director Peter Segal ("Tommy Boy") to the task of bringing the weight 
challenged Klumps to the big screen again.
Sherman is on the verge of greatness with his new formula that can turn back
the body clock. It's still in the early stages of development, but Sherman's 
boss, Dean Richardson (Larry Miller), sees dollar signs as he envisions 
selling the youth juice to a big pharmaceutical firm and making their school 
a ton of money.  At the same time, Sherman's amorous intentions for Denise are 
increasing and he wants to make an honest woman out of her, except for one 
thing. Buddy Love.
Remember, in the '96 film, that Buddy became a part of Sherman due to an
experiment that went amok. Well, Buddy still resides within and, every so
often, makes his presence known to Sherman and those around him. Without 
warning, Buddy's irreverent and rude personality can bubble to the surface, 
ruining any hopes that Sherman might have for marital bliss. The stout 
scientist attempts to exorcise the nasty Buddy, but things go terribly wrong. 
Buddy Love is unleashed upon the world and the experiment causes Sherman to 
begin losing brain cells.  It becomes a race as Buddy tries to steal and sell 
the secret formula for $149 million, take the money and run while Sherman, 
with his mental capacity quickly diminishing, is forced to stop Buddy's scheme.
That's the plot and it carries the film through with an overall even and
entertaining pace. The love interest between Sherman and Denise is sweet, while
the conflict betwixt Sherman and Buddy provides the angst for the film. It's
all a well-packaged shell that encloses the meat of the movie's entertainment 
- the Klumps. Murphy gives a tour-de-force performance with his six distinctly
different characters - Sherman, Mamma Klump, Papa Klump, Grandma, brother Ernie
and Buddy Love. Each is a unique individual and Murphy gets the opportunity to
flesh them all out (no pun intended) into funny characters with distinct
personalities.
Grandma Klump steals the show when she's on the scene. She's a randy
octogenarian who maintains her very active libido with both pride and energy.
Hers reps the most bawdy of the film's dialogue as she unabashedly declares her
amorous intentions for Buddy Love. A daydream sequence, where she fantasizes
about what she wants to do with/to Buddy, provides some of the biggest laughs
and groans of disgust (good-natured) for the film. Murphy is so convincing as
Grandma that you forget that it's the actor.
The rest of the Klump family gets their due, too. Papa Klump has the rudest of
dialogue as he rags on everyone (especially Grandma, who gives it right back).
Papa also gets the chance to get down and dirty as he experiments on his own
with Sherman's formula. Mama is, still, the most gentle of the family and it
shows where Sherman gets his kind heart. Brother Ernie maintains an underlying
resentment for his genius brother and is less than the apple of his parents'
eyes. Janet Jackson gets the tough role of being second banana to the
outrageous humor of the Klumps. The pretty singer/actor doesn't stand a chance 
in doing comedy against the Murphy juggernaut of characters, so she takes the 
straight road and does a decent job conveying the intelligence and caring of 
Denise.  Buddy Love is relegated to his bad boy role and his mainstay is to 
shower insults upon Sherman with names like "blubber butt" and "chunky cheeks" 
- and, of course, that gleeful Murphy laugh.
The combination of the makeup mastery of veteran artist Rick Baker (whose work
runs the gamut from "The Howling" and "Ratboy" to the upcoming "How the Grinch
Stole Christmas) and the fabulous, sometimes subtle, special F/X, led by John
Fahrat ("The Nutty Professor"), make "Nutty 2" special indeed. Obviously and as
expected, Baker does a magnificent job (with Eddie Murphy's input) of creating
each of the Klumps. Murphy is one of the few Hollywood talents who are both
willing and able to undertake the grueling task of bringing the great makeup
F/X to life. The special visual F/X cover a lot of ground, too, putting the art 
of morphing to good use.
The screenplay, by Barry Blaustein, David Sheffield and Paul & Chris Weitz,
showcases Eddie Murphy as the Klumps. The goings on around the dinner table of
the massive members of the Klump family make for some of the best, albeit
insult driven, humor of the film. The main story, with the fountain of youth 
formula at its center, is really a vehicle to drive the Klumps around and give 
them the opportunity to banter. It's a smart move by the moviemakers, giving 
the audience what it wants.
Helmer Segal has been moderately successful with his previous ventures, but
"Nutty 2" is going to raise his status in Hollywood, especially if the film
makes the big box office bucks that I expect it will. He moves the
sometimes-naughty material along briskly and doesn't bog down at all along the
way.
"Nutty Professor 2: The Klumps" aims at a more mature demographic (PG-13
rating) than the first film and counts on the sometimes lewd interchanges 
between the Klump family members to titillate the viewing audience. It's not 
as raunchy as, say, "Scary Movie," but when Grandma talks about "getting' 
some," you have to laugh.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Unbreakable (2000)
David Dunn (Bruce Willis) survives disasters unscathed while Elijah
Price (Samuel L. Jackson) has a disease that causes his bones to break at
the merest provocation.  These two men are opposites in more ways than
that in "The Sixth Sense" writer/director M. Night Shyamalan's "Unbreakable."
A little bit "The Sixth Sense," a dash of "Fearless," and some "Batman"
cooks up to M. Night Shyamalan's "The Sixth Sense" followup, "Unbreakable."
While this outing may not hit the populist nerve of his last, it's
more mythological and complex and should become more well regarded after
repeated viewings.
David Dunn is returning from a job interview in NY when
a pretty girl (Leslie Stefanson, "The General's Daughter") sits next to
him.  He twists off his wedding ring and begins his play, but ends up 
driving her away.  Then he notices the train is going way too fast.  Cut
to a young boy (Spencer Treat Clark, "Gladiator") watching TV from upside
down on a couch - a disastrous train wreck has just occurred outside of
Philadelphia.  
A doctor in ER questions David while in the foreground we see blood 
spread across the midsection of the only other (short-lived) survivor.
131 people have died and David Dunn has not a scratch.  He's at a low
point that's not just expicable by survivor's guilt, however.  His
marriage appears to be over - he was planning to move to New York alone
if he got that security job.  
Things take an odd turn after the memorial service for the victims, 
when he finds a note on his windshield embossed with 'Limited Edition' 
and a message inquiring if he's ever been sick.  He traces the note to 
Elijah Price, a comic book art gallery owner with 
osteogensis imperfecta, a condition that causes his bones to break easily 
(we've already seen him born with broken arms and legs in a flashback, as 
well as a child whose mother has to coax him to the playground with gifts 
of collectible comic books).
Elijah suggests that they're polar opposites and that David is the
real life embodiment of the superheroes written about from the time
of the Egyptians through modern comics, a real protector of men.  Elijah
shows up at the local football stadium where David works as a security
guard (a protector).  David begins an entry frisk to cull out a suspected
weapons carrier, who does indeed leave the line.  David 'sees bad people,'
and Elijah's words, even though David rejects them, are intensifying his
talent.  His son Joseph so wants to believe them that he pushes dad's
workout until he's lifting 350 lbs.  Audrey and David write off Elijah
as a lunatic, yet begin to heal their marriage.  But Elijah continues to
push.
Shyamalan has loaded his screenplay with myths (good vs. evil),
symbols (watch those color schemes (Mardi Gras colors - purple represents
justice, green faith, and gold power), his usual spirtuality and character 
perspectives (upside down and reflected).  There's also another
twist ending, that, like his  last film, make you want to go back and watch 
it again to fill in the blanks.  He has weightier implications here, 
particularly regarding Joseph, who is paralled with Elijah in many ways.  He 
even includes some in jokes ('They say this one has a surprise ending,' 
Elijah's mother tells him, 'They called me Mr. Glass," says the shatterable 
Elijah).
Bruce Willis again delivers a quiet, restrained performance as Dunn.  He's
good, if not as interesting as his "Sixth Sense" character, yet not
surprisingly, is at his best when playing against his young costar, Clark.
Samuel L. Jackson is more intriguing as the positively Dr. Strangelovian
Elijah (the hair, the gloves, the wheelchair!).  His intensity is mystifying
but compelling.  Again Shyamalan gets a solid performance out of a three-name
child actor, although Clark isn't in Osment's league.  Robin Wright Penn
is in reactive whisper mode.  Charlayne Woodard ("The Crucible") is
sympathetic, dynamic and strong as Elijah's mother, aging thirty years
through the course of the film.
The film is well shot and editted, deliverying terrific sound (you'll
cringe when Elijah falls down subway stairs, breaking bones along the
way, or when Shyamalan delivers one of his jolting sound shock moments)
by sound designer Richard King.  Cinematographer Eduardo Serra ("The
Hairdresser's Husband") uses interesting angles and long takes to bring
Shyamalan's vision to fruition.
While "Unbreakable" doesn't quite hit one out of the park the way "The
Sixth Sense" did, it's clearly the work of a young master that gives its
audience something to mull over long after they leave the theater.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Pane e tulipani (2000)
BREAD AND TULIPS (Pane e Tulipani)
----------------------------------
When Rosalba's (Licia Maglietta) husband and children allow their vacation 
tour bus to leave a rest area without her, she furiously decides to hitchhike 
home.  A stopover in Venice introduces her to Icelander Fernando (Bruno Ganz,
"Wings of Desire") and becomes more than a one night stay in "Bread and
Tulips (Pane e Tulipani)".
"Bread and Tulips" is blessed with a charming cast and glowing lead in
Licia Maglietta.  Unfortunately the film's uneven pacing drags it down,
making it a bit of a chore to sit through.
Rosalba finds a desolate pensione on its last night of operation and is
directed to the Marco Polo restaurant.  There she meets downtrodden waiter
Fernando who informs her that they're without a cook before presenting her
with an artfully arranged cold plate.  When Rosalba misses her train home the
next day, she returns to the Marco Polo and asks Fernando where she can find
a very cheap room.  He graciously offers to board her for the evening and
she awakens to find a luxurious breakfast spread left for her.  On a whim,
she takes a job with an anarchist florist, Fermo (Felice Andreasi) and ends
up taking residence down the hall from Fernando.  New age masseuse neighbor
Grazia (Marina Massironi) and Rosalba speculate on Fernando's marital
state when he's seen with a young woman and small boy.
Meanwhile Rosalba's husband Mimmo (Antonio Catania), a bathroom fixture
businessman, has had enough of Rosalba's disappearance when his mistress 
refuses to iron his shirts and sends newly hired plumber Costantino (Giuseppe
Massironi), a pudgy momma's boy who reads detective stories, to find his
wife.  Costantino finds love with Grazia instead.
As amusing as Costantino and his travails are, coscreenwriter (with Doriana
Leondeff)/director Silvio Soldini spends way too much time following the
hapless lug so that we almost forget about Rosalba.  Fernando's 'mystery'
family (his daughter-in-law and grandson) are revealed for what they are
so quickly one wonders why they were ever made mysterious.  Rosalba's 
fantastical dreams, where various characters appear in her bedroom, are too 
random and don't work their way into the film's texture.  Fernando's suicidal 
tendencies are treated as an aside, an important character distinction that 
could be missed by a trip to the concession stand.
Yet there are marvelous touches in Soldini's work, such as Rosalba's 
rediscovery of the accordion, Costantino's lodging in a broken down barge
and Fermo's dictatorial treatment of his customers (which sends many of
them fleeing).  Fernando's archaic way of speaking lends considerable charm
to Ganz' soulful waiter.  The Venice of "Bread and Tulips" is the Venice
known by its residents rather than its tourists.
"Bread and Tulips" is sweet but uneven.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Proof of Life (2000)
Inspired by the 1998 Vanity Fair article "Adventures in the Ransom Trade,"
by William Prochnau, director Taylor Hackford tells the tale of American
engineer Peter Bowman who, while trying to build a dam in the remote wilds
of South America, is kidnapped by guerrillas and held for a $3 million
ransom. He is abandoned by his company, but his wife Alice (Meg Ryan) won't
give up on him as she seeks the help of K&R (kidnap and ransom) expert
Terry Thorne (Russell Crowe). But, things turn out to be far trickier than
expected as negotiations drag on for months and a romance develops between
Alice and Terry in "Proof of Life."
Helmer Taylor Hackford has always provided interesting, star studded films
from his romantic, Oscar-nominated "An Officer and a Gentlemen" through to
the satanically satiric "Devil's Advocate." With "Proof of Life," the
director/producer takes us into the secret world of kidnap and ransom. The
end of the Cold War, over a decade ago, resulted in the end of financial
backing by the Communist countries of various rebel groups worldwide.
Without that monetary help, the revolutionaries turned to kidnapping,
demanding huge ransoms from their victims, to cover their operating costs
and expand their power base. Kidnapping became such a popular means of
making lots of money that companies operating in high risk areas began
securing "K&R" insurance for their executives.
In "Proof of Life," Peter Bowman is in the South American country of Tecala
trying to get his vision built - a dam that will benefit the people of that
country. But, the engineer works for an oil company that is taking
advantage of the small country and its people by forcing an oil pipeline to
be built. Bowman becomes a pawn in the conflict when rebels from the
revolutionary group, ELT, put up a roadblock and take all the innocents
they stop as hostages. Of course, Peter is, as the most visible
representative of the capitalist oil corporation, a prime candidate for
huge ransom demands.
Bowman, forced to trek across the Andes with his captors, leaves behind his
wife, Alice, who turns to his company for help. K&R expert Terry Thorne
(Crowe) arrives on the scene and assures Alice that all will be well and
begins the delicate mission of securing Peter's freedom. But, corporate
skullduggery and greed soon prove to be more important and Alice is told
that there is no insurance, no company and no high level help to free her
husband. With Terry suddenly taken out of the picture, she and Peter's
sister, Janis (Pamela Reed), contact a local security firm to get Peter
released, only to find out that they just want her money.
A crisis of conscience forces Terry to return to Tecala to help Alice get
her husband back. The arduous ransom negotiations start to drag on
interminably, week after week after week, as Terry and his rebel contact,
Marco, barter over the life of the captive engineer. As the months go by,
Terry finds himself attracted to the pretty, vulnerable Alice as he works
to secure Peter's release. When negotiations fall apart, Thorne seeks the
assistance of an American K&R man, Dino (David Caruso), who is trying to
locate a kidnapped client of his own. Action replaces talk as Terry, Dino
and his team head into the jungle to extract their clients from the hands
of the rebels.
"Proof of Life" covers territory that has, until recently, remained in the
misted shroud of secrecy. The world of kidnap and ransom is populated by
former members of the CIA, FBI, Interpol, SAS and the military - men who
are used to "negotiating" with an opponent holding an AK-47 assault rifle
rather than a law book. The entire K&R industry was created by the social
and economic changes in the world, necessitating its birth as a hedge
against the lucrative abduction business. The story, provided by longtime
Hackford collaborator Tony Gilroy, opens our eyes to this, until now,
secret world that has changed the revolutionaries into drug dealers and
worshippers of the almighty dollar.
Gilroy's screenplay, while steeped in the unknown world of K&R, has the
feel of a re-creation of that greatest of American films, "Casablanca." The
parallels between that classic and "Proof of Life" are more than passing,
though the perspective is from a unique angle. Peter Bowman replaces Victor
Laszlo (Paul Henreid) as the leader of the cause that draws Terry Thorne
(filling in for Rick Blaine (Humphrey Bogart)) into the fray as Peter's
potential savior. Meg Ryan takes Ingrid Bergman's place as the loyal wife
and love interest for Terry, while David Caruso's Dino takes over for
Captain Louis Renault (Claude Raines) as the good friend to the hero.
(Actually, at one point, I half expected Crowe to recite the "Of all the
gin joints in all the towns in all the world?" line from the older flick.)
"Proof of Life," even with the "Casablanca" comparison, is still a routine
thriller that walks through its paces well enough, but does nothing to try
to get beyond the routine. The most intriguing part of the film is the
story that follows Peter's plight while in the hands of his captors.
Bowman, before the abduction, is totally committed to his mission to help
the people of Tecala, putting the problems of getting his construction
underway ahead of the needs of Alice. Their last time together was fraught
with tension, but after the abduction, Alice becomes Peter's sole raison
d'etre, keeping the man from falling into utter despair as his
incarceration drags on. The romance that buds between Alice and Terry
simply adds a bit more controversy to the film.
The production of "Proof of Life" was reportedly plagued by disaster and
political intrigue throughout its making. The director made the decision to
shoot the film on location in Ecuador and Hackford and crew found
themselves flanked by two active volcanoes, mud slides and the same threat
of kidnapping that the story, itself, is about. There was also the
unfortunate death of a stand-in for David Morse that devastated the
production team. This list of woes has its impact on the film as there is
not a great deal of energy in the perfs by the principles, with the
exception of Morse who does a fine job in what amounts to a one man show.
Isolated from his wife and the life he knows, Morse's Peter must maintain
his will to survive with only a tattered photo of Alice as a reminder of
what he had. It's a close to the chest performance that says volumes with
little dialogue.
The stars of "Proof of Life," Ryan and Crowe, give performances that say
"star" rather than "actor." Both give credible perfs, but there is little
of the chemistry that we've heard so much of about the couple's off-screen
amour. Because there is little spark on screen between them, I found myself
more interested in the plight of Peter than the interplay between Alice and
Terry.
Supporting cast is a plus with a number of small, but effective, roles that
help to flesh out the background of the film. Pamela Reed is solid as Janis
Goodman, Peter's sister, who comes to Alice's aid. Reed gives strength to
the role as her character provides the moral support that Alice needs
during such trying times. David Caruso provides the sharp cynicism and
humor to his Dino that brought the actor to our attention years ago. I hope
this signals a comeback for the talented actor who has made some bad career
decisions. Anthony Heald, as oil company honcho Ted Fellner, brings the
same oily sleaziness to his character as he gave to his doomed doctor in
"The Silence of the Lambs." Gottfried John is terrific in the little role
of captive missionary, Eric Kessler, who is instrumental in Peter's
continued survival and rescue.
The behind the camera work, as one expects from a Taylor Hackford film, is
uniformly first class. Veteran Polish cinematographer Slawomir Idziak,
whose credits include such works as Krysztof Kieslowski's "The Double Life
of Veronique" and "Blue," gives a sharp lushness to the mountainous prison
of Peter, while bathing his and Alice's luxurious home in a warm light that
contrasts the harshness of the mountain locale. Bruno Rubeo, who wowed us
with his production design in "Devil's Advocate," gives the same level of
attention and detail to the varied sets in "Proof of Life."
In the end, "Proof of Life" is an exciting travelogue into a whole new
world of international intrigue that makes you think twice about travelling
in the hot zones. The generic adventure doesn't knock my socks off, but the
film does rep the craftsmanship and attention to detail that can accompany
a big Hollywood budget. I give it a B-.
Taylor Hackford's last two fiction features ("Devil's Advocate," "Dolores
Claiborne") both had striking visual styles, one of "Proof of Life's" 
strongest assets.  However, the story, inspired by the Vanity Fair
article "Adventures in the Ransom Trade" and adapted by Tony Gilroy (whose
credits include the Hackford films cited as well as stinkers "Bait" and
"Armageddon) and the articles author, William Prochnau, is far less exciting
than the gossip generated during the film's production.
Peter Bowman (David Morse, "Dancer in the Dark") is an idealist who's 
hooked up with an oil company to head their goodwill project - the building
of a dam for the people of Tecala (the fictional country stands in for
Ecuador, where the film was shot).  Bowman's in trouble though - the oil
company is on the verge of a takeover and he's being left in the lurch
with a full crew, no money and no equipment.  He's also going through 
difficult times with his hippie wife Alice (Meg Ryan), who's unhappy in
Tecala, while also blaming him for the miscarriage she suffered eight months
earlier in Africa.
As Peter drives back from his stalled construction site one day, the 
ELT, a former marxist group turned mercenary kidnappers and drug dealers,
storm a roadblock taking hostages.  Peter is led into the mountains and
Alice is left friendless in a foreign country to negotiate with kidnappers.
Enter Terry Thorne (Russell Crowe, "Gladiator"), a hostage negotiations
expert (the film begins with him making a daring rescue in Chechnya), who 
quickly reassures Alice and her sister-in-law Janis (Pamela
Reed, "Bean").  The next shoe drops when Alice is informed that the company
has left them uninsured and Thorne exits, leaving her to rely on exactly the
type of person he'd advised them to avoid - a local security man.  In an
inexplicable move, Thorne returns to save the day and begin the lengthy 
negotiations.
The film intercuts between two stories, one of which works far better than
the other.  Peter's ordeal with the ELT is a character study of a strong
and rebellious man fighting for survival.  Peter meets up with a 'mad
missionary,' Eric Kessler (fine support from Gottfried John), a former 
Foreign Legionnaire who's perfectly sane yet plays the fool with their 
captors.  The ELT are mostly interchangeable bad guys - filthy peasants 
with a predilection for partying, although their is a sympathetic woman as 
well as a strutting egoist whose demotion to pig herder sets up a grudge 
against Peter.
Meanwhile, things are fairly dull back with Alice and Terry.  He gets on
the radio and barters with a voice on the other end.  She uses cigarettes
as props and frets in the oversized sweaters costumed to make her look
vulnerable.  They're supposed to fall in love - we know this when Terry's
partner Dino (a terrific David Caruso) spies Alice casually drink out of 
Terry's glass.  While Dino gets suspicious, the audience is never given any
indication of the couple's passion when they're on screen alone.  Before
the big climatic ending, where Terry and Dino storm the ELT camp, there's
suddenly a kiss and some soulful staring.  An ending straight out of
"Casablanca" feels unearned (except for the beautiful relationship of
Terry and Dino).
Technically, the film's arduous location shoot mostly pays off.  The verdant
jungle scenes give the entire film a green theme, although some city
shots have a distractingly hyper-real quality.  Danny Elfman's score
complements the action without calling attention to itself.

Title
Review for Requiem for a Dream (2000)
Sara Goldfarb's (Ellen Burstyn) dream comes true when she's invited onto her
favorite game show.  Her son Harry's (Jared Leto, "American Psycho") dreams
are shared with his girlfriend Marion (Jennifer Connelly, "Dark City") and
best friend Tyrone (Marlon Wayans) when the perfect heroine score presents
itself.  But drug addiction will destroy the dreams of not only the obvious
younger generation, but the Jewish Brooklyn housewife as well in director
Darren Aronofsky's ("Pi") "Requiem for a Dream."
Writer/director Darren Aronofsky allows just the briefest glimpse of hope
before taking his audience on an unrelentingly dark descent into the ravages
of drug addiction (as adapted from the Hubert Selby Jr. novel).  Although he's 
graced by a tour de force performance from Ellen Burstyn and career high turns 
from Leto, Connelly and Wayans, the film is a stylistic achievement bearing a 
shopworn message.
We're introduced to Sara as she cowers in a locked room while her son
'borrows' her beloved television to fuel his drug habit.  Once he's flush
from a once-in-a-lifetime score, he buys her a fabulous new television,
but is alarmed to learn his mom's become an amphetamine junkie courtesy
of a local 'diet' doctor.  Her game show dreams will not be complete unless
she can fit into a special red dress worn on a family occasion twenty years
ago.
Of course, Harry also neglects his own advice and dips into his own stash,
losing his fortune and forcing Marion back into the arms of Arnold (Sean
Gullette, "Pi") to secure cash.  This is just the beginning of all three's
far worse fates.
Aronofsky's film seems a throwback to the 70's, a feeling he intensifies
with his use of split screens, retro costume and art direction, and the casting
of Louise Lasser as Sara's friend Ada.  Current flair is also apparent in
some MTV style editting (each needle set up is preceded by the same jangly, 
flash-paced montage ending with a dilated pupil) and the in your face bleakness
which is depicted (the film's climax, which features a two-woman anal sex
show, amputation, forced feeding and shock treatments earned the film its
NC-17 rating).
Burstyn is fabulous as the meek, naive housewife who loves her only son.
Her harrowing decent into madness is jolting, like you were watching a
kindly elderly relative enter hell.  Leto retains sympathy by letting the
true love he feels for his mother shine through.  A genuine family bond
can be felt between the two.  Jennifer Connelly simply has never been better
as Marion, an artist estranged from her bourgoise family who loses every
shred of human dignity by affixing her star to Harry.  She's never more
affecting than when she begs Harry to return home over the phone before 
going dead-eyed at the realization of what she'll need to do to get her
next fix.  Wayans is also good, if underutilized, as Ty, who also reflects
on the love of a single mother.
Technically, the film is well done with a unique style.  Particularly admirable
is the editting by Jay Rabinowitz, who keeps the dual stories moving forward
coherently, often spending only seconds with Sara before cutting to Harry.
Sara's Coney Island neighborhood lends real character to the film.  Kronos
Quartet provide strings (which actually get a bit overwrought, but I think
that was the point).                                           
As well done as this was, I found myself walking out thinking, hmm...drugs
are bad.  The film has none of the humor found in recent drug films such as
"Trainspotting" and "Sid and Nancy."  It will put you threw an emotional 
wringer even as you're wondering what the point is.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for When Brendan Met Trudy (2000)
Straight arrow Brendan (Peter McDonald, "The Opportunists") is a school
teacher who visits his local pub after choir practice where he meets
Trudy (Flora Montgomery).  She tells him she's a Montessori teacher and
gets him to sing a hymn.  But Brendan will do more than sing for his supper
once he discovers Trudy's true profession in "When Brendan Met Trudy."
We first meet Brendan lying in a rain filled gutter, recreating the drowning
scene that opens "Sunset Boulevard."  Brendan's a film buff and writer
Roddy Doyle ("The Snapper," "The Commitments") peppers his film with constant
movie references.  We flash back to the titular meeting before catching up
with that opener about two thirds into the film, when Brendan's life has
spun out of control due to the wild ways of Trudy, who's a professional
thief.  Brendan hates Trudy's friends.  Trudy hates Brendan's family, 
particularly his witchy sister.  In order to win Trudy back after the gutter
incident, he has to agree to accompany Trudy to rob his sister's house and
do unmentionable things to her living room carpet.
"When Brendan Met Trudy" is a terribly uneven film which doesn't roar into
life until its final thirty minutes.  Brendan and Trudy never seem like a
couple.  They'd probably hate each other in the real world.  While McDonald
gives an appealing performance, Flora Montgomery is a bit too forced, like 
the film itself.  Essentially, it's a boy-meets-girl, boy-loses-girl story by 
way of the 'is my significant other a psychopath?' films such as "So I Married 
an Axe Murderer."  Its charms are to be found in the flourishes.  Brendan's 
imaginative film fantasies find him exitting a frame a la John Wayne in "The 
Searchers."  Trudy's influence morphs his hymn singing into the most outrageous 
cover ever of Iggy Pop's "The Passenger."  His all boy class starts getting 
assignments like "Jane Austen loved a good laugh - discuss with reference to 
'Persuasion.'"  Brendan's headmaster, who we're fooled into thinking is about
to fire him, turns out to be a sympathetic eccentric who fully appreciates
making a fool of oneself for the love of a woman.
Director Kieron J. Walsh does well with the whimsy, yet allows his 95 minute
flim to drag in its first hour.  "When Brendan Met Trudy" never quite attains
the frothy heights it's aiming for.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Lara Croft: Tomb Raider (2001)
Lady Lara Croft (Angelina Jolie, "Gone in 60 Seconds") lives in a
mind-numbingly huge British estate with her butler Hilary (Chris Barrie of 
the British series "Red Dwarf"), who attempts to get her to dress more
femininely, and personal techno-geek Bryce (Noah Taylor, "Shine"), who
devises things like a huge killer robot (straight out of "Robocop") to
keep Lara at the top of her game.  That game is tomb raiding for antiquities,
a career taught her by her beloved, now deceased dad (Jon Voight, Jolie's
real father).  A once-every-5,000 years convergence of the planets combined
with the discovery of a ticking 'key' sets Lara off on her latest worldwide
adventure to stop the evil Illuminati from stealing the power of time itself in
"Lara Croft:  Tomb Raider."
Having never played the videogame, I have a question - is the name Lara Croft 
code for Large Cups?  Angelina Jolie, with the help of some bust boosting,
personifies the vidgame heroine - a tough, motorcycle riding chick with an
inhuman figure encased in tight clothing and a personal arsenal.  She can
apparently hear the ticking of a clock encased within a stairwell from 100
yards and a sound sleep, pull in favors from secret ops groups and beat the
living daylights out of a score of men firing a hail of bullets at her without
suffering a scratch, yet doesn't have the sense to employ Bryce to protect
the key to earth's destruction from being stolen.
Screenwriter Michael Colleary ("Face/Off") has provided an idiotic premise
that trots Lara to Cambodia (where huge stone temple creatures come to life
only to be shattered like clay pots by a bullet or two), Venice (for no reason
whatsoever other than to have a conversation with bland bad guy Manfred Powell 
(Iain Glen, "Beautiful Creatures")) and Iceland (to look cool dog-sledding
before an inane climax right out of "The Avengers").  His one good idea is
to surprise the audience when a second shower scene doesn't pan down to the
figure we expect.
Cinematographer Peter Menzies Jr., blessed with these exotic locations, 
serves up a muddy looking, visually bland film.  Simon West's ("Con Air," 
"The General's Daughter") direction is so flat-footed, that boredom sets
in just as Lara's adventure is beginning.  Not a single member of the cast
is given an opportunity to breath life into their characters, although
Daniel Craig ("I Dreamed of Africa") shows a glimmer that somehow got past
West as Lara's former boyfriend, mercenary tomb raider Alex Marrs.
Sitting through "Lara Croft:  Tomb Raider" had me wishing I'd brought a 
PlayStation to the theater because the entertainment sure wasn't on the 
screen.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Chutney Popcorn (1999)
Reena (Nisha Ganatra) arrives too late on her motorcycle with her lover 
Lisa (Jillian Hennessy, "I Shot Andy Warhol") perched behind her for her sister 
Sarita's (Sakina Jaffrey, "Cotton Mary") wedding reception.  Reena's mother 
(Madhur Jaffrey, "Cotton Mary") is angry, not only at her lateness, but also 
because she can't accept Lisa as anything other than Reena's roommate.  Sarita 
and her mother think Reena is irresponsible.  Then Lisa lets slip that she 
thinks Reena's a bit selfish.
Troubled, Reena sees an opportunity to redeem herself in everyone's eyes
when it becomes apparent that Sarita is unable to sustain a pregnancy and
offers herself as a surrogate mother.  Lisa's against the idea and Sarita 
dismisses it until her husband Mitch (Nick Chinlund, "Mr. Magoo") convinces 
her that it's not such a bad idea.  But Reena's attempts to bear her sister's 
child put a severe strain in all these relationships in star/cowriter/director
Nisha Ganatra's "Chutney Popcorn."
"Chutney Popcorn" is a 'gentle' comedy in that it offers few big laughs
(although the turkey baster scene would qualify) yet evokes smiles with 
its observations of human nature.
Veteran actress Madhur Jaffrey provides most of the comedy, constanty
calling upon her younger daughter to program her sprinklers ('Why doesn't
she call the perfect one?' mutters Reena) and dissolving into good humored
hysterics when Reena suggests that her mother's mother could have been a
lesbian.  She also performs traditional ceremonies for everything, beginning
with fertility.  Jillian Hennessy is a fresh-faced, down to earth Lisa, who
understandably panics when a pregnancy is thrust into her comfy lifestyle.
She reluctantly takes part in the project by wielding the aforementioned
turkey baster ('That stuff really smells - I don't know how
hets do it.').  Madhur's daughter Sakina is elegant and refined as Sarita,
which just that touch of entitlement that would get under Reena's skin.
Nick Chinlund's characterization of Mitch is a little odd.  At first he
seems like a nice, supportive husband, but he begins to get a little 
creepy when the mother of his child turns from being Sarita to being Reena.
Chubby-cheeked Nisha Ganatra displays a lot of talent juggling three major
roles in her film.  She's very convincing as the put upon rebel - the
'artistic' one whose lifestyle isn't understood by a demanding mother who
obviously adores her older, more traditional daughter.  Her screenplay
(coauthored with Susan Carnival) displays an ear for natural dialogue in
addition to its unique central concept.  However, the film as a whole 
has a few rough spots, with sound that is sometimes muffled, supporting
characters that are interchangeable and a couple of clumsily staged shots.
The cinematography by Erin King is nicely done, with the colorful accoutrements
of Indian culture providing some nice visual flair.
"Chutney Popcorn" is a sweet tale about familial and romantic love that
comes together well for a satisfying conclusion.

Title
Review for Too Much Sleep (1997)
Security guard Jack (Marc Palmieri) loses his gun as the victim of a scam 
one morning while admiring a pretty girl (Nicol Zanzarella) on the bus.
Distraught, Jack turns to his buddy Andrew (Philip Galinsky), who puts him
in touch with his Uncle Eddie (Pasquale Gaeta), a non-stop talker and
apparent authority on just about everything in "Too Much Sleep."
Writer/Director David Maquiling has created a terrific character in Eddie,
who gets Jack into some humorous situtions - for about the first thirty
minutes of "Too Much Sleep."  Once Jack's been given the tip to go to 145
Withers, a house party peopled with one forced wacky weirdo after another,
Maquiling's film derails and can barely sustain interest for it's remaining
hour.
Pasquale Gaeta is the film's saving grace.  A self important little man who
begins every ramble with 'But let me tell you something,' Uncle Eddie is
a unique screen character who's advice runs from the actually useful to
the seriously demented.  In the film's funniest scene, Eddie manages to
bring Jack right to the older woman half of the team who scammed him.  As 
Eddie chases the woman through her neighborhood, she apprehends him, spraying
him in the face.  'That's Jovan Musk at $15.99 a bottle, so you can see I
mean business!' she tells him, before directing him to that address.
Downhill from here, Jack meets assorted weirdos and spends an inconsequential
night with the younger con artist that leads to a meeting with a man carrying
a paper bag, presumably containing his gun, in a bus station.  After a 
chase that ends with Jack beating the man senseless with a pink plastic bat,
that bag's no where to be seen and the gun's not mentioned again.  A final
scene on Eddie's front lawn allows for one more bout of comedic philosophizing
from Gaeta.
Maquiling's writing, while offering some truly pleasurable bits of business,
can't sustain itself for a feature length film.  While his leads, especially
Gaeta, are good, much of his supporting cast are amateurish.  Overall,
"Too Much Sleep" tries too hard to be whimsical.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Knight's Tale, A (2001)
A young thatcher's son William aspires to the impossible dream of becoming a
knight, a title reserved for the noble born.  When the adult William (Heath
Ledger, "The Patriot") is faced with his liege Knight's death before the
final round of a joust, he seizes an opportunity, shielded from questioning
eyes by his benefactor's armor in writer/director Brian Helgeland's "A
Knight's Tale."
Who would have predicted the writer of "L.A. Confidential" and director
of Mel Gibson's "Payback" would make his hyphenate debut with such a risky
premise?  "A Knight's Tale" is a bold melding of a modern rock score and
culture with the medieval jousting tournament circuit of the 14th century.
We're thrown into the excitment as Queen's "We Will Rock You" blares,
peasants in the stands do a wave and a young wench boogies to the music.
William wins the third round merely by staying on his horse (his knight
was ahead in the first two rounds) and amusingly stays undercover by dint
of the dent delivered to his helmet by his opponent's lance.  William and his
starving cohorts Roland (Mark Addy, "The Full Monty") and Wat (Alan Tudyk, 
"28 Days") quickly convert the prize into fifteen silver florins.  After 
heated debate, William convinces them to invest the money into turning
him into a tournament competitor rather than immediately gratifying their
stomaches.
One amusing Rocky-like training montage later, the trio make their way
towards the next meet, picking up a very nude Geoffrey Chaucer (Paul Bettany,
"Bent") along the roadside when he offers to fake William's nobility papers 
and perform as his herald.  Once there, William espies his lady fair, Jocelyn 
(newcomer Shannyn Sossamon) and crosses the man who will be his arch rival in 
both love and war, Count Adhemar (Rufus Sewall, "Dark City").  A need for 
armor repair on account over currency adds female blacksmith Kate (Laura 
Fraser, "Titus") to William's entourage.
If "The Patriot" didn't catapult Heath Ledger into full fledged stardom,
"A Knight's Tale" surely will.  Ledger exudes down to earth charm 
as well as being up to the physical demands of medieval tournament
competition.  He can also cut a mean rug.  Ledger's more than ably supported.
Paul Bettany is comicly inspired as the scene-stealing, gambling addicted
future author of 'The Canterbury Tales.'   His hammy, hilarious deliveries of
'Sir Ulrich's' qualifications are one of the film's highlights and his
character's weakness provides an opportunity for William to show what he's made
of. Alan Tudyk also provides laughs as the fiery redhead whose approach to
almost any situation is like a pitbull's.  Addy is the more level-headed
voice of reason.  Laura Fraser quietly makes a strong stand for women's lib.
Sewell is a haughty, egotistical cheat, and therefore, a good villain.  
Newcomer Sossamon has an exotic beauty, but adds little else to the mix.
Helgeland's script has the right mix of humor, action, adventure and
sentiment, although a couple of jarring character changes (William accuses his
beloved of being a silly girl out of the blue, only to have to win her back; a
romance that seems to be percolating between the widowed Kate and Roland is
abandoned) may be attributable to editting for run time.  He blends pop culture
in with ancient history cleverly, usually managing to get a laugh.
Kate designs new, more lightweight armor and etches in her 'brand,' which
resembles a Nike logo.  A courtly medieval dance evolves into present day
moves to David Bowie's "Golden Years."
Cinematographer Richard Greatrex ("Shakespeare in Love") along with the film's
editor and sound designer make you feel every connection of the knights'
lances with their targets.  Costume design by Caroline Harris ("An Ideal
Husband") mostly works, although Jocelyn's outfits are sometimes too outlandish
(one costume featuring a straw bonnet would look more at home at "My Fair
Lady's" horse race).
"A Knight's Tale" is rousing fun - it rocks.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Sound and Fury (2000)
Cochlear implants are bionic devices which feed sound waves to the brain's
auditory nerve.  When surgically implanted in young deaf children, the 
results can be amazing - a child deaf since birth can be speaking completely
normally within a couple of years.  Sound like a no-brainer of a medical
solution?  Director Josh Aronson's "Sound and Fury" documents the incredibly
complex arguments both for and against the device by following just one
family on Long Island, New York.
First we meet Peter Artinian, the deaf father of three deaf children.  He
states 'I'm happy being deaf.  It's very peaceful.'  Upon the birth of
each of his children he was happy to find they were 'just like me' and
his wife (their mother) Nina.
His hearing sister Mary and her husband are horrified to find that her
family's deafness has been inheritted by their son and are told about
cochlear implants.  They witness a five year old girl hearing and speaking
like a non-handicapped child two and a half years after receiving a cochlear
implant and are convinced that this is the way to go.  Peter is not only
incensed, he's very 'vocal' about it.  Then his eldest, Heather, expresses
interest in becoming a hearing child as well.  Family battle lines are
drawn for three generations.
While the advantages may be obvious, the surprise is that there are compelling
arguments made against the procedure, not the least of which is the
invasiveness of the surgery and device itself (it must be implanted within
the skull and is connected to the ear via a rather large plastic piece
plugged in behind the ear).  The nature of deaf culture is explored
as is the relationship between deaf/hearing parents and their deaf/hearing 
children.  The deaf adults even have some good comebacks when pressed on
the educational advantages of hearing.
The filmmakers use some ingenuity to showcase the argument.  We witness
the silence of deaf communication and then see a signed conversation that
is dubbed rather than subtitled to illustrate the difference between the
two worlds.  'Talking head' interviews begin with Peter Artinian and
are intercut with various family members in various groupings out in the
real world - gradually, more 'talking head' one-on-ones are added as the
arguments and their offshoots begin to take shape.  Irony is allowed to
speak for itself, such as when Heather says 'I don't want to sign, I
want to speak' - in sign.  Peter and Mary's deaf father makes some rather
arresting observations.  Things get really interesting when Peter's
wife Nina, begins to sway to the pro-implant side, even considering the
procedure for herself.
"Sound and Fury" is a provocative documentary that is sure to make its
audience consider things about deafness and handicaps in general that 
it might not otherwise.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Glaneurs et la glaneuse, Les (2000)
THE GLEANERS AND I (Les Glaneurs et la Glaneuse)
Septuagenarian filmmaker Agnes Varda ("Vagabond"), frequently called the 
grandmother of the French New Wave, caught a bit on television about the 
amount of money lost by a wheat farmer if his combine wasn't adjusted
properly.
This made Varda, an art lover, recall the famous Millet painting 'Les
Glaneuses'
and the idea of taking to the road to investigate this rural activity and
its modern counterparts gave birth to her award winning documentary, "The 
Gleaners and I."
Varda's film is an unusual combination of a diary reflecting on her own
aging, a road trip, and the documentation of the economic, societal, cultural 
and artistic reasons that people have for gathering the refuse of others.
While sometimes Varda's digressions indulgently stray too far from her
main theme, for the most part she's found a rhythm that can tie rural,
post-harvest gleaning to a court case involving homeless youngesters who 
vandalized a market.  When she veers from a family who've discovered an 
abandoned vineyard to spend a minute on her own camcorder's dangling lens
cap, 
frustration felt by the viewer is quickly assuaged by her good natured spirit.
Of course, Varda makes a point that filmmakers themselves are gleaners,
and that dancing lens cap footage may just be proof that one man's wasted
videotape is another's art.  Varda uses famous paintings of gleaners to
segue to stories of artists who recycle trash to create new works.  Then,
in another aside, Varda ventures into a second store because she's charmed
by the sign (''curios' is common, but 'finds' is more inviting,' she says) and
fatefully discovers an oil painting of gleaners in the field!
Varda has conversations with the many types of gleaners she comes across.
There's a chef who charges $100 a plate for meals he prepares from his
gleanings and a financially secure man who only eats from the trash in
protest of the waste he sees all around him.  A funny sequence gets as
many interpretations of the law that governs the gleaning around oyster 
beds as people providing them.  Varda admires a 'Trash is Beautiful'
educational program that teaches kids about recycling, then notes that 
they're only exposed to pretty pieces of plastic and have probably never
shook the hand of a garbageman.
At 82 minutes, "The Gleaners and I" covers a lot of territory.  Not only
does it provoke thoughts about waste in general, it engages us with an impish 
senior still breaking new ground in the art of filmmaking.  As Varda cuts from
a shot of her own wrinkled hand to a Rembrandt, she reflects 'It's always
the same, a self portrait.'
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Legend of Bagger Vance, The (2000)
Rannulph Junuh (Matt Damon) has it all.  He's an amateur golf 
champion whose girlfriend, Adele Invergordon (Charlize Theron), is the
beautiful daughter of Savannah's wealthiest man.  However Junuh is so
traumatized by his experiences in WWI, he returns to Savannah a broken
man.  He makes no attempt to see Adele, preferring to play cards in a
shack on his estate and drink to forget.
Meanwhile, Adele has lost her father and is on the brink of losing his
last creation, the Krewe Island golf resort, because of the depression.  
She sells all she has to come up with a $10,000 golf exhibition prize and
charms the era's two (real life) greatest golfers, ladies man Walter Hagen 
(Bruce McGill, "The Insider") and Ivy League grand slammer Bobby Jones (Joel 
Gretsch, TV's "The Bold and the Beautiful") to compete, but Savannah 
demands one of their own play.  Young Hardy Greaves (J. Michael Moncrief,
Jack Lemmon in present day), the story's narrator, proposes Junuh and
bicycles off to deliver him.
Junuh declines Hardy, but goes out to swing a few anyway.  Out of the darkness
arrives a stranger, Bagger Vance (Will Smith), who offers to caddy for
Junuh for $5 guaranteed.  Bagger has a way of talking Junuh back into his
game and soon Savannah is gripped in a home town media frenzy.
"The Legend of Bagger Vance" is a signature Robert Redford film, evoking
his starring turn in "The Natural" and the nostalgic glow of his own
"A River Runs Through It."  Golf is used as a metaphor for life as Bagger
advises Junuh and his young protege Hardy 'you can't win the game, you can
only play the game,' and 'find your place in the field - you need to find
your swing - get out of its way and let it find you.'
The cast is generally fine.  Smith holds back, speaking softly, letting
his words form a whisper cloud around Junuh's head.  His non philosophical
comments lend the film most of its humor.  It's a confident performance.
Damon is OK, if unexceptional as the conflicted Junuh, although he does
have a real shining moment when he explains to Hardy why he drinks.  Theron's
mostly decorative, with a Southern accent that wavers in and out.  
Character actor Bruce McGill is fun as the lusty Walter Hagen.  His golfing
style, where severe missteps are countered with brilliant catchup maneuvers,
is fun to watch, particularly when he's sizing up his next move, barefoot
in water wielding his ever present smoke.  Even better is Joel Gretsch as
the amazingly talented Bobby Jones.  It's Gretsch, not Damon, who's the real
Redford Golden boy standin.  He creates an elegant, upstanding athlete.
Young Moncrief has a wide-eyed face and displays real enthusiasm for the
game of golf and hero worship of Junuh.
Redford really involves us in the two day 36 hole game, visualizing the act
of focus and creating suspense in the outcome.  Unfortunately his present
day bookending of the tale with Jack Lemmon recalls the similarly poor
use of the device in "Saving Private Ryan."  The central romance is
underbaked as well, mostly because we're not given enough background on
why Adele remained single for a decade.  The script rather lamely has
them declare their attraction as 'dancing well together.' 
Production and costume design are first rate.  Several scenes set at the 
resort recall the period flashbacks of "The Shining."
If you can invest in the mysticism of Will Smith's supernatural Caddy (the 
only black man apparently admitted into Krewe Island's locker room) and the 
old-fashioned storyteling/filmmaking on display here, you may be surprised 
at the rewards to be found.  Cynical filmgoers should avoid this one.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Sous le sable (2000)
Marie (Charlotte Rampling, "Aberdeen") and Jean (Bruno Cremet, "Sorcerer")
are a comfortable, sixty-ish married couple looking forward to a peaceful
vacation at their second home in Lit et Mix.  On their first, full day,
Marie sunbathes as Jean goes for a swim.  Hours later, Marie's initiated
a full scale search when Jean hasn't returned, but no trace of him is
found.  Marie returns to Paris and resumes her life, including chats
with Jean at the end of each day in Francois Ozon's "Under the Sand."
Marie's ex-pat British friend Amanda (Alexandra Stewart, "Frantic")
and her French husband Gerard (Pierre Vernier) try to snap Marie out of her 
denial with a dinner party, where they introduce her to the handsome Vincent 
(Jacques Nolot, "Nenette et Boni"), yet Marie suggests that Gerard accompany
her and Jean to their gym the next morning.  Eventually Marie does begin 
dating Vincent, but she discusses him with Jean and even smiles at Jean, 
hidden behind a bedroom curtain, when she makes love to Vincent.
Slowly, though, reality continues to chip away at Marie's fantasy life.
Her bank advises her that without access to Jean's account, she needs to
reduce her spending.  One of her university students (she's reading Virginia 
Woolf's "The Waves") turns out to be one of the young men who participated in 
the beach search.  Then police arrive asking her to identify the clothing of a 
body they've found washed up from the ocean.  That night, Jean's not at home 
when she returns to their apartment.  Her mother-in-law (Andree Tainsy) cruelly
insists that Jean simply abandoned her out of boredom.  Finally, Marie goes to 
the police, insisting on viewing the body.  Horrified (she's been warned it was
in an advanced state of putrefaction), she laughs when handed a bagged watch, 
insisting that this is not her husband.
"Under the Sand" is a character study and melancholy portrait of aging ('I've
lost my youth,' Marie declares) and loss.  Charlotte Rampling, given the
chance to portray an older, yet still sexual, woman runs with it, bringing
us into the mind of the character.  Her chemistry with Bruno Cremet is
startlingly natural.  As Marie returns from her first date with Vincent,
she sits on the couch with Jean.  'Did he kiss you?' he asks.  The mood the
two create is incredibly intimate and sad.
Ozon ("Water Drops on Burning Rocks," "See the Sea"), who cowrote the
script with Emmanuelle Bernheim, Marcia Romano, and Marina de Van, has
turned in a more mature work than his previous, creepy "See the Sea."
While he cleverly never lets us see Jean enter the water that fateful
day, leaving a number of possibilities - accident?, suicide?, escape? -
open, he definitely tips his hand towards a certain outcome.
Cinematography by Antoine Hiberli and Jeanne Lapoirie ("Water Drops on Burning
Rocks") glides around Marie (their 180 shot as she initially searches the
ocean's horizon for a sign of Jean conveys her panic) or captures Rampling's
exotic face in mood divining closeup.  In an inventive fantasy scene,
Marie imagines Jean's hands massaging her feet while in a state of
auto-arousal.  His two hands become four, then more combined with her own,
becoming almost a one person orgy and recalling Roman Polanski's "Repulsion."
Original music by Philippe Rombi quietly adds to the overall melancholy.
"Under the Sand" is a unique portrait of loss.  It would make an fascinating
double bill with Liv Ullmann's "Faithless" from earlier this year, another 
character study of a woman facing loss for different reasons.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Fille sur le pont, La (1999)
Just as Adele (French pop star Vanessa Paradis) prepares to jump off a
Parisian bridge, Gabor (Daniel Auteuil, "Un Coeur en Hiver") appears
from the shadows to test her resolve and offer her a job as his assistant.
He's a knife thrower and figures Adele has nothing to lose in "The Girl
on the Bridge."
It's been a long time since I experienced what I call 'cinema rush' - that
intoxicating feeling I get whenever I see a truly great film.  Director
Patrice Leconte ("Monsieur Hire") has confected a wildy romantic, stunning
film, which won a Golden Globe nomination for Best Picture and eight
Cesar (the French Oscar) nominations (Auteuil won for Best Actor).
Adele believes she has no luck at all - she's 'a bug strip,' 'a vacuum
cleaner that picks up the dirt that was left behind.'  In the film's
opening minutes, Adele tells an interrogator, in front of an audience,
about her past, where she hopped from man to man at her convenience
in a quest for survival.  Adele is clearly somewhat amoral and promiscuous.  
The only minor quibble I have with this film is that it's unclear at what 
point in time Adele is supposed to be giving this interview - it doesn't 
quite mesh with the film's ending.  
Gabor, on the other hand, has a theory about luck and believes he can 
concoct it with Adele.  He's telepathic and together they hum.  Over and
over again he proves this by betting on the flight of a fly, with a
raffle ticket, at the roulette wheel and during their act, which he
constantly pushes to greater and greater heights.  Gabor fusses and 
frets when the much younger Adele trysts with handsome young men, making
a nuisance of himself, yet never making a move on her himself.  His
knife throwing act is clearly a metaphor for sex, however, and gradually
Adele gives up other men, until coincidence, disguised as luck of a different 
sort, arises on a cruise ship with disastrous results.
The prolific Auteuil has found a signature role with Gabor.  With barely
a change of facial expression he can be scathingly funny or intensely
serious.  The way he smokes a cigarette conveys more than words.  He'll
make you feel his pain AND his joy.  Paradis would appear to be out of her 
league against such a great actor, yet her Adele is fully formed and beguiling.
Her flightiness and enjoyment of the moment eventually give way to deeper
emotions when it finally dawns on her just what she and Gabor really had
together.  
Serge Frydman's script has a basic romantic structure and utilizes
dualilty in the name of luck (betting on the roulette wheel precedes
the 'Wheel of Death' act, for example).  Gabor's circus-related profession 
makes this film a natural for Fellini comparisons and it does briefly focus 
on a midget performer memorizing endless facts in closeup.  "La Strada" also
comes to mind, but Frydman and Leconte's circus is definitively French,
not Italian (a contortionist making love to Adele on top of a piano 
before Gabor interrupts them is a great sight gag).
Every other aspect of this film is top notch as well.  Music ranges from
Arabic numbers to Benny Goodman to Marianne Faithful, with each and
every selection perfectly matched to its visuals.  What could have been
a cliched makeover montage when Gabor outfits Adele for showbiz pops
in the hands of Leconte and his musical choice of "Sing, Sing, Sing."
The black and white photography by Jean-Marie Dreujou is rich, lush
and full of texture.  Dutch angle closeups, fly-eye-views, film noir
lighting and sun-drenched locations like Monte Carlo and Istanbul are
sumptuously presented.  Costume design by Annie Perier is imaginative,
particularly Gabor's garish floral numbers, which, while really odd, 
perfectly suit him.
"The Girl on the Bridge" is an almost perfect film.  It's funny, a
hair's breadth away from tragic. and soulfully romantic.  It's art.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Blow (2001)
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Nurse Betty (2000)
Betty Sizemore's (Renie Zellweger, "Me, Myself & Irene") nursing dreams
were dashed by her boorish car-salesman husband Del (Aaron Eckhart, "Erin 
Brokovich").  She spends her days waitressing at the local Tip Top
diner and losing herself in 'A Reason to Love,' the hospital set soap
whose lead character, Dr. David Ravell (Greg Kinnear, "As Good As It Gets") 
gives Betty a reason to live.  When Betty witnesses two hitmen kill her
husband, she totally loses her grip with reality and travels to LA to
find her true love in "Nurse Betty."
We first meet Betty on her birthday, where she impresses out-of-towner
Charlie (Morgan Freeman, "Kiss the Girls") with her ability to pour coffee
without peeling her eyes off her soap.  Her coworkers present her with
a lifesize cardboard cutout of her hero along with a birthday cupcake (which
Del scoffs later).  Her celebratory plans with best friend Sue Ann (Kathleen 
Wilhoite, "Drowning Mona") are first challenged when Del refuses to lend her a 
Le Sabre, insisting she take a Corsica instead (Betty switches the key Del's 
secretary/mistress gives her anyway), then dashed when Sue Ann's unable to get 
a babysitter.
Betty returns home and holes herself up in the den to watch her soap on
video, ignoring Del when he returns to do business with the two men Betty
served earlier, Charlie and Wesley (Chris Rock, "Lethal Weapon IV").  They're
really out to retrieve stolen drugs that Del's gotten himself mixed up in
and Del ends up dead when Wesley overacts and attempts to scalp(!) him.
Betty waltzes out while town Sheriff Ballard (Pruitt Taylor Vince, "Heavy") 
and local reporter Roy (Crispin Glover, downplaying his usual weirdness 
quotient) stand aghast in the crime scene.  Her disappearance raises suspicion 
with Charlie and Wesley, who are ordered to take her out.
Betty journeys from Kansas to LA and secures a job as a nurse and a place to
stay with the thankful Rosa (Tia Texada, "Paulie") after acting quickly during 
a shootout/kidnapping in front of the hospital which had just turned her away.  
Then Rosa gets her into a charity event where actor George McCord is making an 
appearance and Betty's rapturous greeting to her beloved 'ex-fiance, David 
Ravell' impresses him and the show's producer/writer Lyla (Allison Janney, 
"Drop Dead Gorgeous") as improvisational acting.  Betty's in heaven, Rosa's 
perplexed, George and Lyla are revamping their show.  Back home Roy, Ballard 
and Sue Ann are putting the pieces together to track her down, but Charlie and 
Wesley are two steps ahead of them and already heading west.
Zellweger buries memories of her last two unsuccessful flicks to triumph
as a good-hearted, if delusional, small town girl.  Betty's sweetness
personified, but never cloying, and her ability to waft from one dream
to the next is utterly convincing.  Freeman and Rock are an inspired pairing
with the calm, philosophical elder keeping the young firebrand on a short
leash (until his own delusions take the story on yet another twist).
There's a little bit of "Fargo" in these two mismatched hitmen who end up
inside small town weirdness neither of them anticipated.  Kinnear is
well suited to the soap star looking for a new sensation to jack up his
ratings, and plays his soap scenes with satirically grave intensity.
Once again Eckhart amazes with his chameleonic abilities, impressing in
a small role as the loathsome, mullet-haired Del.
First time screenwriters John C. Richards (also 'story by') and James
Flamberg have created a memorably original world whose characters follow
surprising paths.  The compassion and humor in the script makes
it one of the year's best.  Director Neil LaBute has made a wise decision
stepping away from his own nihilistic writing, showcasing his talents
in this far sunnier (albeit still sometimes blackly humorous) space.
He and cinematographer Jean-Yves Escoffier ("Cradle Will Rock") amusingly
begin to block their shots in the 'real' world just like their heroine's
television fantasy.
"Nurse Betty" is a rich film that always has another surprise around the
corner.  If some climatic occurrences don't play quite as neatly as they
should, one can still take immense pleasure from the imaginative filmmaking
here that can bind Betty's character to Charlie's with the star on her
tee shirt.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for 15 Minutes (2001)
When arson investigator Jordy Warsaw (Edward Burns, "Saving Private Ryan")
arrives at a burned out NYC apartment, he finds celebrity cop
Eddie Flemming (Robert DeNiro) intruding on his crime scene.  The two end
up joining forces on the trail of fame seeking killers and the reluctant
witness to their crime in writer/director John Herzfeld's ("2 Days in the 
Valley") "15 Minutes."
Andy Warhol's long lived quote is hammered down from every angle in this
unsubtle but entertaining satire.  We're introduced to Flemming as the 
repeat subject of a Hard Copy-like news program hosted by Robert Hawkins
(Kelsey Grammer, TV's "Frasier"), currently battling his producer (Kim
Cattrall) to maintain his lurid content.  Hawkins is routinely tipped by his 
buddy Eddie to arrive on the scene just as Flemming is about to make arrests.
Meanwhile, new US arrivals Oleg Razgul, (Oleg Taktarov, "Air Force One")
a Russian and Emil Slovak, (Karel Roden) his slow witted Czech buddy, make 
their way to their former partner's home for their share of stolen cash.
When Oleg discovers he's spent time in a Russian prison for nothing, he
brutally murders his old friend and his wife.  Emil, who's stolen a digital
video camera on the way there, videotapes the event.  They discover too
late that their crime has been witnessed by illegal alien Daphne (Vera 
Farmiga, "The Opportunists"), but she leaves her purse, including
identification, behind.  Ensconsed in a seedy hotel, Oleg calls Worldwide
Escorts and asks for a Czech girl.  When he doesn't get Daphne, the duo
tape their third murder.  Television introduces them to Hawkins, Flemming
and his most famous case.   Stephen Geller is a killer who's made a fortune
from his crime because he got off on an insanity defense.  Voila - the
psychopath and aspiring film director now have a plan.  'I love America - no
one's responsible for what they do.' gurgles Oleg.
Herzeld's script is a bit psychotic itself, zigzagging from satire to
thriller, from comedy to excessively gruesome violence.  The whole thing
comes off as wildly over the top, but it's a fun ride, largely due to its 
heroic partners' bantering and its villainous partners' tomfoolery.  Dual 
romances are less successful, with Flemming about to propose to television 
reporter Nicolette (Melina Kanakaredes, TV's "Providence") while Jordy makes 
eyes at forbidden witness Daphne.  Thriller aspects are well done, with a top
notch street chase scene admist midtown traffic and a tense fire entrapment
which pushes Jordy's expertise to the limit.  Herzeld has one surprise up
his sleeve that makes one doubt its reality even after the fact, although
he uses cheap cinematic tricks to set it up.
The cast is terrific with DeNiro utterly believable as a detective who works
the fame game.  Burns is fine as the laid back everyman who first loses, then
wins, at the hands of the media.  Grammer is pitch perfect as the sleezy 
tabloid host while Kanakaredes puts a worthier face on the TV news profession.  
Utterly diabolical, Oleg Taktarov suggests a young Gary Oldman, joyfully 
brutal, completely immoral.  Roden plays  auteur Emil like a wide-eyed puppy 
dog lapping at Oleg's heels, funny yet chilling at the same time.
Cinematographer Jean-Yves Escoffier ("Nurse Betty") uses a full range of
visual mediums to capture the media and movie obsessed characters.  Original 
music by Anthony Marinelli and J. Peter Robinson stirringly underscores
the action.  Production design by Mayne Berke features very realistic looking
arson sets.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Billy Elliot (2000)
When Mrs. Wilkinson (Julie Walters, "Educating Rita") is forced to conduct
her ballet class in the local boxing gym, she attracts a most unusual pupil.
Billy Elliot (Jamie Bell), who's no good at boxing, takes to dance immediately.
Unfortunately, widowed Dad (Gary Lewis III) and older brother Tony (Jamie
Draven), tough striking coal miners, don't like the connotations associated
with the dance in "Billy Elliot."
"Billy Elliot" is a strange hybrid of a movie, part working-class-struggle
reminiscent of the British kitchen sink films, part surreal fantasy.  Well
acted and unusually photographed, it has some major flaws, most notably
that Billy's sudden attraction to ballet comes out of the blue.
Billy's world is a cramped male household in Northern England where he cares
for his apparently senile grandmother (Jean Heywood) when he's not hanging
out with his friend Michael (Stuart Wells).  Older brother Tony is an
aggressive striker, frequently bringing the law to their doorstep en masse.
Dad Jackie's not over the loss of his wife and is struggling to tone down
his older son's machismo while punching up his younger son's.  He can't
be convinced by Mrs. Wilkinson that Billy's Royal Ballet School material,
but a defiant dancing display put on by Billy changes everything.
Young Jamie Bell is a natural young actor, shading Billy with beautiful 
subtleties.  He's a good kid caring for his gran, but won't be pushed around.
The glow that comes from his face as he smiles away Michael's concerns
about outing him (Billy's ballet dancing enables Michael to come out - a
truly silly story idea) exudes mature compassion.  His dancing is energetic
and appropriately unpolished.  
Gary Lewis is dynamic and sympathetic as the tough dad who turns tender, 
supporting his son staunchly once his eyes have been opened (again the script 
betrays a character, as there's no evidence of dad's soft side in the film's 
first half, making his transition a bit startling).  Walters is good as the 
crusty teacher ('I feel like a pussy' complains Billy.  'Well don't act like 
one,' instructs Wilkinson), yet we're given no idea of her dance background 
and she unexpectedly drifts out of the film's second half.  I simply didn't get
enough of Nicola Blackwell as Wilkinson's outrageously precocious daughter 
Debbie.
This could have been such a good film if Lee Hall's script had been given
a major overhaul.  Besides the problems already noted, he has Billy punch
a boy inexplicably after his big audition - this from the kid who couldn't
throw a punch in the ring.  His characters learn to stop thinking of
ballet as an occupation for 'pooftahs,' yet Billy's best friend comes on to
him once he starts dancing.  Billy shows no particular grace until he
espies a tutu.
Visually, the film is often arresting.  Billy dances up the street and hits 
a wall - the camera pans around and the seasons have changed.  Debbie trails 
a stick along a phalanx of police shields as if they were a picket fence.
A coal miner becomes enthralled watching a ballet rehearsal as his son
paces the hall.  Mrs. Wilkinson explains Swan Lake to Billy as they wait
for a drawbridge to close.  These images are accompanied by a radical mixture
of music which ranges from The Clash to classical.
"Billy Elliot" makes a cliched story seem fresh, but one too many bad choices
yank it away from the truly inspiring.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Legally Blonde (2001)
Elle Wood (Reese Witherspoon, "Election") is blonde, beautiful and about to 
graduate from her junior fashion retailing college.  She's also preparing to 
receive an heirloom engagement ring from her East Coast boyfriend Warner 
(Matthew Davis, "Pearl Harbor").  She's shaken to her core when she discovers
that instead, he's breaking up with her, as she's just not 'serious' enough
for a future senator.  Elle's mettle is up, so she gets a Copolla to direct
a video essay and gets accepted to Warner's school.  Harvard Law has never
seen the likes of Elle Wood, but they turn out to be a surprisingly compatible
combination in "Legally Blonde."
"Legally Blonde" is essentially "Private Benjamin" goes to law school, with
liberal dashes of "Clueless" thrown in.  Although Reese Witherspoon has 
charm to spare, first time feature director Robert Luketic, armed with an
adapted screenplay by Karen McCullah Lutz and Kirsten Smith ("10 Things I
Hate About You"), serves up a film that lacks focus.
Elle, with her California couture, pink pumps and color-coordinated chihuahua
Bruiser, is out to dispel the dumb blonde stereotype without toning down
her wardrobe.  But she receives a double shock her first day at school,
which is a lot tougher than she had expected (surrounded by black lap tops,
Elle brings out a heart-shaped notepad and pink feather pen).  She's 
ejected from her class by preppie Vivian Kensington (Selma Blair, "Cruel
Intentions") and then discovers that Vivian's wearing Warner's family rock.
An emergency manicure at the Beauty Oasis, where she meets pathetic Paulette
(Jennifer Coolidge, "Best in Show"), gives her a boost, though, and she
decides to stick it out.
After some advice from third year student Emmet (Luke Wilson, "Charlie's
Angels"), Elle counters Warner's thoughts on the parental rights of sperm
donors by comparing masturbation to reckless abandonment and captures the
attention of Professor Callahan (Victor Garber, "Titanic").  Soon she, along
with Warner and Vivian, are interning on a murder case.  It's here that
"Legally Blonde" begins to go seriously astray.
The young fitness wife of a wealthy older man accused of murdering him turns
out to be an alumnus of Elle's California college.  The creaky plot mechanics
don't hold a lot of laughs and take the focus away from Elle's plan to win
back Warner.  The romantic possibilities of pairing Elle and Emmett aren't 
explored and Vivian's scheme to show up Elle at a party is a visual joke done
months ago in "Bridget Jones's Diary."
Still, Reese Witherspoon shines as the perky, pampered blonde, injecting
the film with so much good will it's hard to dislike it.  Moonie the chihuahua
is a great find as Bruiser, a natural extension of Elle Woods' persona.
No one else in the cast, with the exception of Brooke Taylor as tough as 
nails Professor Stromwell and Oz Perkins as Dorky David, really offers much.
Raquel Welch has a flamboyant cameo as the murder victim's first wife.
Production design by Melissa Stewart ("To Die For") and costume design by
Sophie de Rakoff Carbonell ("Crime + Punishment in Suburbia") mix elements
of "Clueless" with those of "The Paper Chase."
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for My First Mister (2001)
When Jennifer 'call me J' (Leelee Sobieski, "Joy Ride") loses her job
at a fringe goth/punk shop, the pierced and tattooed teen heads for the
local mall.  Amused by watching an older man decorate the window of a 
men's shop, J asks about his 'Help Wanted' sign.  Randall (Albert Brooks, 
"Out of Sight"), appalled by her appearance, suggests she return without
her face jewelry.  Both are surprised when she does. J and R fall into an
unusual relationship in debuting director Christine Lahti's "My First
Mister."
J is the typical, alienated, friendless teen.  Even Randall guesses she
has a copy of Sylvia Plath's "The Bell Jar" by her bedside (along with
plenty of Anne Rice).  As the credit's role, J's writing suicidal goth
poetry and decorating it with her own blood.  Her mom (Carol Kane, "Addams 
Family Values") is a chirpy, oblivious type remarried to a man J thinks
is named Bob (Michael McKean, "Best in Show").  She rebuffs any interest
shown to her in school and informs us 'I don't think of myself as a girl
or a woman, just the opposite of a boy.'  J frequently imagines exaggerated
features on the people around her as she zones out on their words, just
like 'Ally McBeal.'
Randall, whom J dubs R, is a fifty-ish guy sleepwalking through the routines
of life.  Yet Randall is a truth teller not afraid to confront J's subversive
nature.  Believably, they intrigue each other, with J drawn to R's dry 
sense of humor ('I'm usually home by 9.'  'What happens at 9?'  'I turn into
the same person.').  When J spies Randall speaking to a woman of his own
age (Mary Kay Place, "Girl, Interrupted") outside the store, she throws a 
jealous snit by creating an inappropriate window display.  After a 
confrontation over trust, J and R draw closer together, with J revealing her 
self-mutilation and R confessing his phobic fears.
Leelee Sobieski simply shines as J, coming to life once she's picked her
oddball partner.  This young girl can really make love beam from her eyes,
just as withdrawal and scorn flashed from them in earlier scenes.  As she
loses her outer goth trappings (she asks R to pick out work clothes for 
her then yells 'I look like a Republican!' in horror), her carriage becomes
more erect, her head held higher.  Brooks is almost as good as a man who
temporarily takes one foot out of the grave.
But both are let down by Lahti's direction and television writer Jill
Franklyn's script.  This pair, initially reminiscent of the Thora Birch/Steve
Buscemi pairing of "Ghost World," are never allowed to explore the sexual
nature of their relationship.  Instead, just as things reach that stage,
we're thrown into a Lifetime television movie full of every cliche imaginable.
The store, where the pecking order gave shape to the relationship,
is forgotten.  By film's end, family new and old is gathered around
a dinner table, presided over by Brooks on one end, and Sobieski, made
up by this time to look like, I swear, an Eastern European matriarch.
John Goodman, as J's real dad, looks like the Halloween version of a hippy.
The film's further undone by an execrable score that doesn't even have the
wit to skewer the elevator music it so resembles.
Usually, fine performances can elevate a film, but not this time.  Lahti
has undermined her stars and delivered dreck.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Center of the World, The (2001)
Dot com millionaire Richard (Peter Sarsgaard, "Boy's Don't Cry") thinks the
center of the world is his computer while stripper Flo (Molly Parker, "The Five
Senses") thinks it's between her legs.  These two both go on a journey of
self-discovery and self-delusion when Richard hires Flo to spend a weekend
in Las Vegas in director Wayne Wang's "The Center of the World."
Director Wang's ("Anywhere But Here") attempt to show man's inability
to make a personal connection as he ironically gets increasingly connected 
via the internet is a topical idea, yet Wang alienates his audience with
the shallow characterization Ellen Benjamin Wong's script provides his
two leads.
When Richard meets Flo, she gives her career as a rock band drummer
but admits that her income comes from stripping.  Richard chooses to see
her making money, and, beguiled by her professional come-on, soon begs her to
accompany him on a three day trip to Las Vegas, offering $10,000.  Against
her better judgement, but attracted by the cash, Flo insists on rules.
She'll be at his beck and call from 10 p.m. to 2 a.m. with no kissing on the 
mouth, no penetration and no talk about feelings.  Richard prepares to leave,
even as he promises his boss to be present for an important client meeting
prior to their IPO kickoff.
Perhaps the ultimate city of illusion, Las Vegas proves a perfect backdrop
for this artificial relationship, but things quickly get out of hand as
Richard is charmed by Flo's openness and Flo is forced to assess her own
part in the play when her friend Jerri (Carla Gugino, "Spy Kids") too 
aggressively inserts herself between the twosome.
While the sex may be hot (the film is unrated), the spark between Richard
and Flo is not.  We're given no idea why a rich, handsome nice guy like
Richard would need to pay a woman for company.  He initially tells Flo
that his father recently died and that they were very close, but quickly
insists 'It's okay.'  It's also inexplicable why he would
bring his laptop with him and continue to work on the game designing he's
made his fortune with, yet do everything in his power to scuttle an IPO
that would cement his career and wealth.  
Flo's character is even more problematic.  Whenever we glimpse her involved 
with her music, all she projects is boredom.  Her only other known human 
connection, Jerri, is admittedly the whore Flo resists being labelled as.  
Flo's arc goes from reminding Richard that 'It's all an act, you know' to 
telling Jerri 'I think I kinda like him' to playing dead as her ultimate 
rules are broken.  The only time these two characters seem to be enjoying
themselves together is when Flo plays Richard's video game.
Digital video cinematography by Mauro Fiore features color drained scenes
when outside of Vegas or Flo's strip club, and flat, dingy looking color
on the streets of Vegas.  Vegas itself is presented in an original way,
recalling the artificial world of "Babe:  Pig in the City" with its Statues
of Liberty and Venetian gondolas.  The connecting hotel rooms, where the
bulk of the action takes place, however, don't convince as accommodations
chosen by a millionaire.
Wang nicely ends his film with a bit of intriguing ambiguity, but it's too
little too late - "The Center of the World" can't sustain interest in its
own central characters.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Zoolander (2001)
Derek Zoolander (Ben Stiller, "Meet the Parents") has been the Male Model 
of the year for three year's running with his patented "Blue Steel" look.  
When the extreme sports, New Age Hansel (Owen Wilson, "Meet the Parents")
takes his title in year four, Zoolander decides that 'there's more to life
than
just being really, really good looking, and I plan on finding out what it
is.'  Meanwhile, an evil fashion conglomerate determined to keep their 
pocket-gouging profits intact needs an assassin to rub out the prime minister 
of Malaysia in order to keep its foreign child labor pool stitching away.
Hot designer Mugatu (Will Ferrell, "Jay and Silent Bob Strike Back") is tasked
with luring Derek back into the fashion world and programming him to kill in
"Zoolander."
Cross the colorful pop silliness of spy spoof "Austin Powers" with the
dimwitted, albeit good-hearted, vanity of "Clueless'" central character
and birth is given to cowriter/director Ben Stiller's "Zoolander."  While
not as witty as the latter, Jane Austen-inspired film, "Zoolander" has
enough inspired goofiness to maintain a consistent giggle fit.
After establishing the dominance of Zoolander in the fashion world, Stiller
batters his creation's self esteem.  His loss of Male Model of the Year 
(in a year when Fabio wins the 'slashie' for model/actor) is followed by an
unflattering Time Magazine cover feature by Matilda (Stiller's wife Christine 
Taylor, "The Brady Bunch Movie").  Then, when his three male model
roommates attempt to cheer him up with a mini-road trip, they perish in
a 'freak gasoline fight accident.'  The now-lone inhabitant of a four-way
bunk bed decides to head for home (in matching bone snakeskin suit and
wardrobe bag) to work with his father (Jon Voight) and brothers in the coal 
mines of New Jersey, but he's rebuffed for his former, unmanly profession.
Mugatu, who's never used Zoolander in one of his campaigns before, appeals
to his vanity by asking him to be the spokesmodel for his new 'Derelicte' line
(inspired by the homeless).  Whisked away to a hidden inner-city day spa by 
the Russian S&M clad Katinka (Milla Jovovich, "The Fifth Element"),
Zoolander's
brainwashed.  Luckily, regretful Time reporter Matilda, attempting to make
amends, begins to smell a rat.
Writers Stiller, John Hamburg ("Meet the Parents") and Drake Sather
("The MTV Movie Awards") hang juvenile humor (Derek's roomies communicate
with a string of 'Earth to's) and spot on parodies (the personality profiles
of Zoolander and Hansel at the awards ceremony) on a recycled plot they
wisely realize doesn't matter.  Director Stiller weaves the written silliness
with visual jokes and highlights the whole affair with celebrity cameos
that come at the audience every few minutes.  Zoolander's brainwashing scene
utilizes retro pop-art and music video imagery to its best effect while his
'walk-off' with Hansel, a split-screen, gun-slinging parody set to Michael
Jackson's 'Beat It' is the film's comic highlight.  Inventive production
design by Robin Standefer ("The Caveman's Valentine") climaxes with Hansel's 
'all things exotic and New Age' mishmash of a loft space including a 
'dirt room' where Matilda's treated to a menage a trois.  Costume design
by David C. Robinson ("Pollock") is a mixture of the made-up outrageous
(Mugatu's garbage-inspired 'Derelicte' line) with the already outrageous.
Stiller combines a 'sucking-in-cheeks' zoned-out look with exaggerated
poses, while Wilson's more natural as the scooter-riding High Times cover
boy.  Amazingly, Taylor makes her straight-woman role work while Jovovich
gets laughs from her femme fatale makeup design.  Stiller's dad Jerry
gets some Catskill-style yuks as Zoolander's manager Maury Ballstein.
The only disappointment is the usually reliable Will Ferrell who only
gets laughs from his Klaus Nomi hairstyle.  Hair also gets laughs when
we're introduced to Zoolander's dad, Jon Voight, and brothers (Vince
Vaughn is one) who sport the same, dark brushcut as their model relative.
The style shows up again on David Duchovny, an informant hand model.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Ŕ la verticale de l'été (2000)
In present day Hanoi, three sisters reflect on their parents' relationship 
while trying to define their own in writer/director Tran Anh Hung's
("The Scent of Green Papaya") "The Vertical Ray of the Sun."
Youngest sister Lien (Tran Nu Yen-Khe) greets the day with Hai (Ngo Quanq 
Hai), the only brother whom she rooms and relentlessly flirts with.  Their 
morning ritual of Tai Chi and Lou Reed precedes crossing the 
street to eldest sister Suong's (Nguyen Nhu Quynh) cafe, where Lien works, 
for breakfast.  The three sisters lovingly prepare their mother's memorial
banquet of traditional delicacies, prepared as much for look as taste,
while giggling over the differences between the sexes.
After the family breaks from the banquet, we learn that Suong's young son 
'little monkey' is doted upon, but there's a distance developing with her 
husband Quoc (Chu Ngoc Hung), who's leaving for one of his habitual botanical 
photography trips.  Middle sister Khanh (Tran Manh Cuong) tells her writer
husband she's pregnant before he leaves on a trip to Saigon to research Tuan,
a mysterious man in his mother-in-law's past.  Lien keeps crawling into Hai's
bed at night, causing him to fall out of it.  The initial serenity we witnessed
starts turning into a soap opera before coming to full circle one month
later, as the three women prepare their father's memorial banquet.
"The Vertical Ray of the Sun" is a contemplative piece where strong passions
exist underneath calm exteriors.  Sly humor, self deceit and harsh truths
all exist in the cyclic screenplay.  Tran Anh Hung and his cinematographer Mark
Lee Ping-Bin ("Flowers of Shanghai") linger over and repeat the small gestures
of everyday life - a wife washes her husbands hands, a woman makes water
dance in a bowl, a man pulls his lover to face him before they part.  Small
spaces such as rooms, alleys and courtyards create intimacy.  The color green,
symbolizing life and tranquility, is used heavily in the film's visual styling,
lapsing into yellowish hues and blues.
Writer/director Tran Anh Hung's film recalls Ang Lee's "Eat Drink Man Woman,"
another tale of three sisters of varying modernity coming together
traditionally for a parent.  But while Lee's more traditionally story-driven
film resulted in radical changes for all concerned, "The Vertical Ray of the 
Sun's" characters strive for peaceful harmony.  Watching it is like trailing
your fingertips in a stream on a cool spring day.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Tao of Steve, The (2000)
"Eliminate desire. Be excellent. Retreat."  This is the Zen formula developed 
by Dex (Donal Logue), an overweight Lothario, on how to get a woman into bed. 
Dex has lived by these words since high school and they have never failed him. 
That is, until now, in "The Tao of Steve."
In high school, Dex was the BMOC and had no problem scoring with the chicks. He
was slender and charming and could bed any woman he set his sights on. Now, ten
years later, our hero is 100 pounds heavier, but still has the charismatic
charm to sweep a woman off her feet and get her in the sack. While attending 
his school's 10th reunion, he meets a pretty young lady, Syd (Greer Goodman) 
and Dex uses his tried and true Tao of Steve (as in Steve McQueen, the ultimate 
icon of cool) to make time with her. But, he forgot one very important thing - 
Syd was one of his conquests a decade ago and he doesn't remember her at all.
"The Tao of Steve" is a clever little flick that starts off strong, but peters
out as it gets to its romantic locus. When we first meet the portly Dex, he's
in the middle of a sexual encounter with a friend's wife. Satisfied, but not
sated, Dex hits on the young bartender at the reunion, using his wit and 
knowledge of philosophy, metaphorically at least, to charm her pants off. 
That's when he notices Syd and tries his patented maneuvers on her, not 
realizing he *knows* her already. This begins a battle of the sexes that will 
pit Dex and his successful philosophy against the savvy, not easily impressed 
Syd.
The best of "The Tao of Steve" takes place in the film's first half. As Dex
spouts his combination of Zen Buddhism, Judeo-Christianity, Islam, Hindu, and
every other religion, faith and philosophy, he forms the basis of the Tao of
Steve. Basically, the Tao is built around getting laid. The trick is, for a
guy, to not make it seem like sex is the ultimate goal. The 'Steve' of the 
title refers not only to McQueen, but also Steve McGarrett ("Hawaii Five-O"), 
Steve Austin ("Six Million Dollar Man") and some notable non-Steves like James 
Bond, Michael Jordan and Spiderman. The name 'Steve' is not a requisite to get 
on the list, but being totally cool is. The ultimate description of the cool 
American male, according to Dex, is: he never tries to impress the women, but 
always gets the girl.
Dex's Zen-like philosophy is nicely coupled with the screen presence of Donal
Logue. Dex may be really fat, but he has so much inherent charm, people
overlook his obvious flaws. He delivers his line of blarney with the best of 
them and has no problem using his God-given talent for blather to bed any and 
all women he meets. Running in parallel with the romance that builds between 
Syd and Dex is the sidebar that has the portly Casanova acting as the sensei 
of sexual conquest for his goofy friend and roommate Dave (Kimo Willis). Dex 
gives his Yoda-like advice to his malleable novice with a patience that is 
never condescending and always funny.
Part two of the flick brings Dex's interest in Syd to the surface, as he uses
his sexual wiles and Tao to seduce the reluctant young woman. Syd counters his
moves like a Tai Chi master with her passive resistance to his ploys. His
failures only encourage Dex to cast aside his longtime philosophies and he does
all the things that the Tao warns against in matters of love. The
conventionality of the love story - boy meets girl, boy loses girl, boy gets
girl - is in direct conflict with the witty totally guy humor of Dex's
philosophical views on life and love. The guy stuff is funny, dead on accurate
and, with the Tao of Steve, an interesting twist on the mating ritual. The love
story is less satisfying.
First-time helmer Jenniphr, along with co-scripters Greer Goodman and Duncan
North (from his original material), craft an amusing story that showcases Logue
in what could be a star making turn. His likable presence, combined with the
pithy Tao of Steve (which provides the bulk of the fun for the film), makes the
film a pleasant little 90 minutes. It isn't enough to sustain the film, though,
as it ends in a routine love story.
The writing does contain a decent variety of original humor that helps a lot,
at least in the first half. One scene, during the reunion, has Dex meeting an 
old classmate, who has since gone into the priesthood, in the men's room. As 
the cleric settles down to do his business in one of the stalls, Dex starts
questioning the man, from the adjoining stall,  about moral philosophy and sex
like a penitent talking to his confessor. The rapid talking Dex doesn't even
realize that he's intruding on the guy's private moment.
Newcomer Greer Gordon is OK as the object of Dex's lust, but she is hard
pressed to equal the animated and rapid-chatter perf of Logue. Kimo Willis is 
quite likable as the wide-eyed innocent being educated in the rules of l'amour 
by Dex, his muse. The rest of the cast is only there to flesh out the 
background.
Tech credits are low-key, but get the job done.
I give "The Tao of Steve" a philosophical C+.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Trolösa (2000)
When Marianne (Lena Endre, "Kristin Lavransdotter") takes her and her husband's
best friend David (Krister Henriksson) as a lover, she never anticipates the
tragic events which will follow in writer Ingmar Bergman and director Liv 
Ullmann's "Faithless."
On a remote island, a writer named Bergman (Erland Josephson, "Scenes From
a Marriage") sifts through the contents of a desk drawer, trying to draw
inspiration from memories.  (Bergman purportedly wrote this script based on
an incident from earlier in his life that's continued to haunt him, although
he gave Ullmann complete control over the film.)  Marianne comes to him and 
begins to recount her painful story under his gentle prodding.
Marianne is a successful actress with a happy marriage to a world-reknowned
composer/conducter Markus (Thomas Hanzon, "Private Confessions").  They have
a 9 year old daughter Isabelle (Michelle Gylemo).  Their friend, David, 
a film director with a messy life, frequently joins them for dinner
and acts as an uncle to their daughter.  When Marianne encounters David drunk
and distraught one day, she brings him home.  He suggests they sleep together.  
She laughs it off, proclaiming their relationship like that of brother and 
sister, but the idea takes root.  Marianne, who's won a scholarship to study 
in Paris while Markus is away on a U.S. tour, talks David into a 'happenstance' 
meeting on the continent.
Trouble rears its head almost immediately, when Marianne discovers David's
childish behavior coupled with intense jealousy.  When an initial incident
is smoothed over, their emotional bond becomes stronger - what Marianne had
convinced herself she was doing for 'fun' has become hurtful.  When she leaves
their Parisian hotel room, David pulls a red bedspread over his head and 
Ullman cuts to Isabelle with a white and red bedspread over her head.  This
connects David to the child as well as pointing out Isabelle as the next
victim of Marianne's hurt.  
Marianne can't keep herself from David when they return.  As his actors in
'A Dream Play' rebel, a distraught David asks Marianne to 'come look at your
idiot,' appealing to her vanity.  Markus discovers the lovers and promises
Marianne he will make her hurt, demanding custody of Isabelle.  That's just
the beginning of the hellish descent Marianne continues to agonize over with
Bergman, accusing him of laziness while allowing her, an actress, to shape
his drama out of her real memories.
This bleak and talky Swedish drama is like watching a train wreck.  Lena
Endre's expressive face (beautifully lit by cinematographer Jorgen Persson,
"Smilla's Sense of Snow") keeps our attention whether she's telling her
story or admidst the action of flashback.  Ullmann's deliberate pacing allows
a sickening, gut-wrenching sense of dread to build.  Her staging of Bergman
and Marianne suggest a mentor/student relationship which flows in both 
directions.  Again she uses duality as she shows Marianne and her reflection 
in a mirror, suddenly separated by the ghostly appearance of Isabelle.
Ullmann's direction is strong although Bergman's presence is always evident.
Lena Endre's performance is devastating.
"Faithless" is an open wound of a film, yet its humanity brings a heartfelt  
message.  When Marianne tells Bergman that talking about love is painful, one 
can't help but think that this film will make it far more difficult to ever 
take love for granted.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Someone Like You... (2001)
Jane Goodale (Ashley Judd) is a talent booker for a hot new daytime talk show
who falls into a whirlwind romance for new executive producer Ray (Greg
Kinnear).  When he dumps her to return to the woman he was cheating on, Jane
bitterly develops her 'new cow' theory, utilizing the womanizing ways of her
new roommate Eddie (Hugh Jackman "X-Men") for research in "Someone Like You."
Trading the much better title of its book source "Animal Husbandry" for the
song title "Someone Like You" sums up the unoriginality at work in this film.
While the supporting cast provide some bright spots, Ashley Judd is bland
and unsympathetic in her first romantic comedy.
Jane moves in with Eddie (who also works with her and Ray), the kind of 
bachelor who has a stylish loft right above NYC's Hogs and Heifers the bar
featured in "Coyote Ugly", a source for new cows (apparently bulls will only 
mate with the same cow once).  Of course we learn that Eddie suffered a bad
breakup from a monogamous relationship, which can only mean that he's really
sensitive and eventually the one for Jane.  
Jane's buddy Liz (Marisa Tomei), who conveniently works for a men's magazine, 
convinces Jane to write up her theory, and Jane agrees, but only after 
creating a 65 year old PhD (shades of Dr. Ruth) as an authorial front.  The 
article's a sensation and everyone's clammering for the author as a guest, 
including Jane's boss Diane Roberts (Ellen Barkin).
Hugh Jackman, resembling a lanky, young Clint Eastwood out from under his
wolfen makeup, displays an easy likeable charm and warmth which elevates
the material when he's on screen.  Marisa Tomei is sharply creating a career
as the funny, witty best friend ('remember, time wounds all heels').  Kinnear
goes from eager puppy to whipped puppy as the subject of Jane's love/disdain.
Barkin is fabulously slinkly as Diane Roberts, always on the prowl for the
elusive interview.  Except for one scene where she allows herself to get silly 
showing Eddie her old cheerleading moves, Judd is simply stale.
The oh-so-trite material (adapted from Laura Zigman's novel by Elizabeth 
Chandler, "The Little Princess") goes so far as to rip off the missed
opportunity New Year's Eve party pairing of "When Harry Met Sally."  Director
Tony Goldwyn ("A Walk on the Moon") can't avoid cliches like title cards,
schoolgirls making pronouncements directly to the camera and video montages.
"Someone Like You" is largely inoffensive.  At least it has the convictions
to turn its male bashing on its ear.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Perfect Storm, The (2000)
In 1991, the swordfish boat Andrea Gail left Gloucester, Massachusetts in
October, late in the season, because its captain, Billy Tyne (George Clooney)
wanted to prove he could still find the fish.  He pushed his boat farther 
into the Atlantic than most boats normally ventured mid-season.  
Meanwhile, Hurricane Grace, which had been dying off the coast of Bermuda, met 
up with an old frontal system from New England and a new one coming out of the 
Great Lakes, rejuvenating itself into one perfect storm right in the Andrea 
Gail's pathway home.
Wolfgang Petersen, director of the below-water submarine classic "Das Boot,"
creates the surface maelstrom of Sebastian Junger's bestseller from a 
screenplay adaptation by William D. Wittliff.
The film begins on location in Gloucester, where the Andrea Gail's disappointed
crew receive less than their expected wages, even as they're thrilled to
be reunited with friends and family at The Crow's Nest, the local watering hole
presided over by Ethel Shatford (Janet Wright, TV's "More Tales of the City," 
"Ladies and Gentlemen, the Fabulous Stains" (with Diane Lane)).  Her son,
rookie fisherman Bobby Shatford (Mark Wahlberg, "Three Kings") only wants to 
stay in the game to make the quick cash needed to regain custody of his 
girlfriend Christina's (Diane Lane, "My Dog Skip") children, even though she 
begs him to take a safer, albeit less lucrative job.  When Tyne decides to
head out one more time, Shatford signs up as does old salt Murph (John C. 
Reilly, "Magnolia"), who's paying child support to a wife he still loves but 
lost over his seafaring absences.  Bugsy (John Hawkes (I), "Blue Streak) is
attempting to begin a new relationship with Irene (Rusty Schwimmer, "Amistad")
the night before they sail, while Alfred Pierre (Allen Payne, "A Price Above
Rubies") kisses goodbye the blonde he just kissed hello.  Tyne also
recruits new crew member Sully (William Fichtner, "Go") which doesn't go 
down well with Murph because the man once had an affair with his ex-wife.
The trip seems jinxed from the outset as the swordfish supply dries up and
Bobby has a run-in with a shark that's hauled aboard.  Murphy gets hauled
overboard and under when he's hooked by a line (ironically it's Sully who
dives in first to save him) and a rogue wave challenges the whole crew.
Then Tyne announces he's heading for the Finnish Cap, a distant point that 
causes grumbling among the men until they begin to haul in swordfish like
there's no tomorrow.  Meanwhile, the audience is clued in to the birth of the
devasting storm by witnessing the plight of three people (Bob Gunton,
Karen Allen and Cherry Jones) forced to issue Mayday from a yacht and
the weather reports being watched in fear back on the barstools of Gloucester.
"The Perfect Storm" bears some resemblance to another seafaring flick,
Stephen Spielberg's "Amistad," a film of quality that demanded admiration
without quite achieving a strong emotional response in the viewer.  
Petersen and his special effects/technical crew deliver an astoundingly
realistic storm and put the viewer into the thick of it, whether on
the Gail or inside a Coast Guard rescue copter.  The screenplay establishes
character background, yet once on the boat, the Andrea Gail's crew isn't
all that distinguishable in the face of the elements, unlike, say the three
disparate shark hunters of "Jaws."  They become symbols of 'man
against nature,' while the women at home too fleetingly (yet ably) provide
the emotional impact.
Better is the irony that those who suffered - both the luxury yacht 
vacationers and the blue collar fisherman, wouldn't have been in their 
ultimate predicaments if it weren't for the almighty dollar (the yacht's 
owner foolishing refuses to abandon his boat and the Gloucestermen decide to 
head back through the storm instead of losing their 60,000 lbs. of swordfish), 
although this doesn't extend to the heroic rescuers, one of whom was lost.
"The Perfect Storm" boasts a fine cast, yet the standout performances are
to be found in minor supporting players.  Janet Wright embodies the tough
and gruffly tender North Shore bartender Ethel, whom the fishermen's women
lean on.  Two beautifully real, funny and honest moments are
created between Hodge's hopeful Bugsy and Rusty Schwimmer's initially
distrustful Irene.  The bigger stars are solid, although a concensus of 
emphasis on the Boston area accent would have been nice, with native son
Wahlberg underplaying his, Diane Lane pushing hers north to Maine and
the rest waffling to varying degrees in the middle.
Technically the film is top notch with the aforementioned effects,
cinematography by John Seale ("The Talented Mr. Ripley"), editting
by Richard Francis-Bruce and sound by Keith A. Wester and Eric Gotthelf -
these are the credits that are most likely to be rewarded with Oscar
nominations.  James Horner's ("Titanic") score, however, is rather 
pedestrian.
The swordfish boat Andrea Gail, also called a long-liner for the miles of
fishing gear they play out for a night's fishing, has not had a good season.
Her captain, Billy Tyne (George Clooney), has always prided himself on "getting 
the fish," so he decides to take the risk of a late season run, unknowingly 
setting a course that will bring him and his crew in harm's way of director 
Wolfgang Petersen's "The Perfect Storm."
The lucrative North Atlantic fishing grounds is a hard place to make a living
in the best of weather. In 1991, late season hurricane Grace took an
uncharacteristic turn away from the East Coast of the United States and
barreled out into the Atlantic. Simultaneously, two other storms formed nearby 
with alarming intensity. These three massive weather systems collided directly 
in the path of the Andrea Gail and these events are brought to life on the big 
screen from Sebastian Junger's book, the true-life adventure, "The Perfect 
Storm."  The book covers far more than the fate of the missing Gloucester boat 
and deals with the destiny of other unfortunates who experience the real power 
of Mother Nature. As expected, the film has a very different focus than the 
Junger nonfiction novel.
The movie, directed by the talented Wolfgang Petersen ("Das Boot") and adapted
for the screen by William D. Wittliff and Bo Goldman, takes the essence of the
very technical details of Junger's book and gives it a human face. As you'd
expect in a major F/X event film such as "The Perfect Storm," the emphasis is
on the raw power of the gigantic storm. The characters are introduced quickly,
personalities and conflicts are established immediately, then the filmmakers
get down to the business of making an epic scale disaster flick. The actors 
aren't just along for the ride, but they do take a back seat to the stupendous 
storm of the title.
As such, "The Perfect Storm" does exactly what it sets out to do. Petersen and
his team pour their film crafting talents into the project and come out with a
first rate adventure that keeps you on the edge of your seat once the action
begins. The seamless nature of the awesome storm effects defies the viewer to
see the F/X sleight of hand that takes place on the screen. The immensity of
the perfect storm is depicted with an incredible realism that makes you almost 
feel the rain, wind and waves. And there are some big mutha waves!
The screenplay centers on the last trip of the doomed Andrea Gail, one of the
Gloucester fishing fleet that survives on its annual haul of swordfish. It's a
fickle business, though, and the key is not to catch the most fish, but to get
it back to port first, when the prices are best. Captain Tyne gambles that
being the only sworder out in the stormy Atlantic in November is worth the risk 
to get a successful haul. The captain and his crew, going much farther out than 
normal this trip, make a killing and fill the holds with swordfish. The giant 
storm is not a problem - until the ship's ice making machine irreparably breaks 
down, forcing the Andrea Gail to save the catch by taking the direct path home 
- into the heart of the storm of the century.
The production is first class on many levels. The working class, blue color
costuming, with loads of flannel, by Erica Phillips ("The General's Daughter)
practically reeks of fish. Set design by William Sandell ("Deep Blue Sea"),
especially the confines of the Andrea Gail, are convincing. John Seale's great
lensing captures the feel of Gloucester and provides fast and furious filming
during the action sequences. Kudos to the F/X team, with the help of Industrial
Light & Magic, that creates 100-foot waves, spectacular air-sea rescue action
and gut wrenching sequences that squelched any desire I had to become a
swordfisherman.
Although the cast of "The Perfect Storm" plays second fiddle to the special
F/X, they are, to a man and woman, professional and give as much depth to their
characters as allowed. Clooney plays Captain Tyne as a cool professional
sailor, but one whose facade is showing cracks in his self-confidence. Mark 
Wahlberg dusts off his Boston accent for the role of Bobby Shatford, the rookie 
crewman on the Andrea Gail who Tyne calls a natural seaman. John C. Reilly and 
William Fichtner play adversaries, Murph and Sully, who drop their animosity 
when danger arises. Those left back on land make the most out of their small 
roles, especially Janet Wright who plays Bobby's mother and friend to his 
girlfriend, Christina Cotter (Diane Lane).
More interesting and believable than "Mission: Impossible 2," but not nearly
the fun of "Shaft," "The Perfect Storm" is the perfect picture for the looming 
hot summer nights. I wouldn't recommend it to anyone planning a cruise anytime
soon.  I give it a B+.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Me, Myself & Irene (2000)
The Farrelly Brothers try to push the outer edge of outrageousness they 
established with "There's Something About Mary" in their newest flick "Me,
Myself & Irene."  While it has its moments, they should be thankful they
had the wisdom to reteam with their "Dumb and Dumber" star, Jim Carrey,
because without his talent, this could have been a dismal effort.
Carrey is Charlie, a nice, fastidious Rhode Island state trooper who we're
introduced to in a flashback chronicling his sticky sweet romance and
subsequent wedding.  While his wife (Traylor Howard, TV's "Two Guys and
a Girl") professes to be his soul mate, she falls for their Black midget
limo driver on her wedding day when they both discover they're
Mensa chapter heads after he tries to pin Charlie with a nonexistent 
racial slur.  Charlie never seems to notice when his three sons are all
born Black and loves them unreservedly.  Charlie also gets no respect from
the townsfolk he serves or his newspaper-stealing neighbor.  When Charlie's
wife finally decides to run away with her long-time lover (the kids are
entering college by this time), Charlie snaps and Hank emerges to deal with 
Charlies long supressed rage.
No sooner is Charlie put on medication to control Hank's manic outbursts
(like reciprocating his neighbor's dog's 'lawn presents' personally 
on his neighbor's lawn), then he's tasked with returning Irene (Rene
Zellwegger, "Jerry Maguire"), who's being framed by her ex-boyfriend,
to upstate New York to face trumped up charges.  Of course, the medication
is left behind, Charlie and Hank are both attracted to Irene, and everyone
in their path seems to want to kill them.
This last aspect is perhaps, one of the biggest problems with the screenplay of
"Me, Myself & Irene" (the Farrellys and Mike Cerone), as Irene's problems
with her ex are never clarified, nor is it made clear why so many corrupt
cops and mob guys seem to be involved or why Irene's knowledge deserves
her death warrant.  This run, stop for comedic Charlie/Hank/Irene interlude,
run, stop, run plot mechanic creaks along flatly.  The only saving grace is
that Charlie's three large, extremely smart sons (they argue over physics
homework) figure out he's in trouble and begin a rescue mission which is
returned to occasionally.
Carrey gives a great, manic yet controlled physical performance.  He's ramrod
earnestness as Charlie and leering maniac as Hank.  His transformation from
one to the other, especially initially, is a marvel to behold (and seemed to
foreshadow his transformation into the Grinch, coming later this year).  He
gets all the good lines, romancing Irene with 'your eyes are all squinty and
your mouth's puckered up like you've been sucking on a lemon, but it works.'
If that doesn't describe Zellwegger - perfect!  However, he's also given some
pretty unsavory stuff to work with (particularly with regards to an oversized
sex toy) that verges on just plain distasteful, rather than distastefully
funny (i.e., Mary's hair gel).
Other than Carrey, only the three young actors who play his sons really get
a chance to shine, as they get dad to switch the TV from Gomer Pyle to Richard
Pryor and continue to grow up in a healthily profane manner.  Zellwegger is 
mostly stuck in reactive mode.  Chris Cooper ("American Beauty") is utterly 
wasted as a corrupt cop and plays the role humorously.  Faring slightly better 
is Robert Forster ("Jackie Brown"), who at least emotes with an air of 
cluelessness suitable to the material.
"Me, Myself & Irene" is a disappointment from the Farrelly perspective, but
Carrey fans at least should appreciate his take on the split personality -
the performance is a lot more alive than the Andy Kaufman impersonation he
gave in his previous film.
Peter and Bobby Farrelly have made their own imprint on mainstream comedy these
past few years with their debut hit, "Dumb and Dumber," the underrated
"Kingpin," and the overrated "There's Something About Mary." Now, six years
after "D&D," the pair reunites with Jim Carrey in a story about a nice guy cop,
Charlie, who loves his job, but keeps his frustrations inside. He develops an
alter ego, the sexually compulsive Hank, and the two vie for the affection of a
pretty fugitive in "Me, Myself & Irene."
Charlie is a member of the "best law enforcement organization in the country,"
the Rhode Island State Police, but he has a problem. He's just too easy going.
So much so, in fact, that everyone takes advantage of his amiable nature. His
wife left him for a black-midget-genius-limo-driver. Charlie is left to raise
their three boys - triplets who are definitely not the fruit of Charlie's loins
- and has never gotten over the desertion. He's also such a nice-guy sucker
that people treat him without respect to his authority. Scofflaws act as if he's
their personal valet. Even kids treat him like dirt - "My daddy says I don't
have to listen to you!" one petulant little girl tells him
The hapless cop snaps one day and out pops Hank. Charlie's alter ego exacts the
retributions the nice-guy cop can't, but Hank's violent actions earn Charlie a
stay under psychiatric care. He is eventually allowed back on duty, but he has
to take his medication every six hours.
Enter Irene (Renee Zellweger), a pretty young woman passing through town who
gets arrested for an out-of-state warrant and Charlie is selected to drive her
back to upstate New York. The warrant is a fake, though, as Irene is really
being sought by her former boss, Dickey, who thinks she has the dirt on his
shady dealings. He brings in a corrupt cop (Chris Cooper) and EPA investigator
(Richard Jenkins) to go after Irene with deadly intent and it's up to
Charlie/Hank to save her.
The only real attraction to "Me, Myself & Irene" is the sometimes-brilliant
physical comedy of Jim Carrey. There is little in the way of a story, but lots
in the way of the visual comedy that centers on Carrey. The comic actor made
his mark with the goofy hi-jinx of "Ace Ventura: Pet Detective," and has shown
himself to have an amazing physical versatility. His Charlie/Hank has the
flexibility of Inspector Gadget. In one scene, Hank picks up the unconscious
Charlie and throws him in the back seat of a car. It is a terrific moment of
visual, physical comedy and rivals Steve Martin's great performance in "All of
Me."
The rest of the cast is left out in the cold. About the best that can be said
for the roles beyond Charlie/Hank is that none of the actors damaged their
careers, at least. Renee Zellweger acts well with Carrey, but is always the
second banana to the comedian. Robert Forster fades into the background as
Charlie's commanding officer. Chris Cooper looks like he's in pain as the
corrupt, bad guy cop. This, in particular, is a waste of a terrific character
actor. The only saving graces in the supporting roles are the three guys who
play Charlie's "sons." The genius trio combines discussion of metaphysics with
earthy jive talk that gives a funky edge to Charlie's family life and the only
other laughs in the flick.
The story, by the Farrelly brothers and Mark Cerrone, is, in a word, lame.
Actually, there are two stories - one, about Charlie/Hank and Irene; the other,
about Irene's plight. The latter story has no sense as Irene is ported back to
New York into the jaws of imminent death, but we never get a sense of why.
Nothing is done to explain why the bad guys - these are the blandest bad guys
I've seen in a long time - want to kill Irene. I realize that the film is a
vehicle for Carrey, but a sensible story is a necessity of film, too. The
Charlie/Hank yarn works about the way you'd expect with all the pratfalls and
slapstick you'd want.
"Me, Myself & Irene" is what I expected out of the Farrelly brothers, and less.
Their use of the comic talent of Jim Carrey assures them a solid stay at the
box office - especially since it is a performance that is worth the price of
admission. The rest of the film falls flat and lays, lifeless, as the antics of
Carrey prevail. The laughs are there and they all belong to Jim Carrey (and his
sons). I give it a C+.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Others, The (2001)
Grace (Nicole Kidman) lives alone in a rambling mansion on the Isle of Jersey 
with her two light-allergic children Anne (Alakina Mann) and Nicholas (James
Bentley) after her servants mysteriously disappeared one night.  The year is 
1945 and her soldier husband Charles (Christopher Eccleston, "Elizabeth") 
hasn't been heard from in over a year.  After three servants arrive looking
for work, strange things begin to happen in writer/director Alejandro
Amenabar's "The Others."
Grace is very religious and becomes angered when her daughter Anne upsets
Nicholas with tales of a young boy whom she says comes into their
room at night.  Grace doesn't believe in the supernatural and brands Anne
a liar, making her read the bible aloud in the hallway until the girl admits
her sin.  The new housekeeper Mrs. Mills (Fionnula Flanagan, "Waking
Ned Devine"), is more receptive to Anne's stories, though, and questions
the harshness of Grace's punishment, especially when Anne hasn't relented after
three days.  After all, Anne has hinted to Mrs. Mills that her mother
may have once gone mad.
Grace accuses Mrs. Mills and the mute Lydia (Elaine Cassidy, "Felicia's 
Journey") of leaving doors open (they must be locked so as not to allow 
potentially life-threatening light to enter the room) and says Lydia makes a 
racket upstairs.  But when Grace hears thuds that set the chandelier to 
swinging while she can see the two women outside, she's forced to investigate. 
Anne tells her that 'the others' are in an attic room, and Grace discovers 
shrouded furniture, whispering voices and even a 'book of the dead' that panic 
her.
Things take stranger turns and it's unclear what agenda the three servants,
who showed up unbidden claiming to know the house, have, if any.  Grace asks
the gardener, Mr. Tuttle (Eric Sykes, "Those Magnificent Men in Their
Flying Machines") to search for a graveyard on the grounds and sets 
out to fetch the parish priest.  But she becomes enveloped in blanketing 
fog and instead finds her shell shocked husband dazedly coming up the road.
Alejandro Amenabar ("Open Your Eyes") has taken a page from "The Innocents"
and created a spooky, psychological, gothic ghost story of a time gone by.
The children's odd ailment gives him the opportunity to create an eerie
mood with dark, shadowy rooms and corridors lit only by the candles and 
lanterns carried by his characters.  Religious symbols, from a covered
status of Jesus to Anne's communion dress, become sinister.  Creaking doors, 
whooshing drapes and unexpected footfalls make one shiver.  Amenabar's score 
is also effectively old-fashioned.
Kidman walks a line between being overly strict and warmly maternal.
Mounting fear shines from her ever-widening eyes.  The performance tends 
toward brittleness, however.  Young newcomers Alakina Mann and James
Bentley are both superb, childlike and innocent on the one hand, almost
eerily pale and borderline creepy on the other.  Anne is willful and
rebellious while Nicholas is terrified and trusting.  Fionnula Flanagan
keeps us off balance with her caring housekeeper who just might know more
about the strange goings on that she's letting on.
While anyone who's seen a lot of movies should have no trouble at least
partially figuring out the 'surprise' twist ending, "The Others" is still an 
enjoyable, well made thriller for those who like things that go bump in
the night.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for State and Main (2000)
After getting unceremoniously thrown out of the state of New Hampshire,
the Hollywood cast and crew of "The Old Mill" descend upon Waterford, Vermont,
largely on the merits of its authentic old mill and firehouse.  Screenwriter
Joseph Turner White (Philip Seymour Hoffman) will face a crisis of conscience
when he's asked to lie about witnessing the presence of an underage local in 
star Bob Barrenger's (Alec Baldwin) car at an accident at "State and
Main."
Writer/director David Mamet takes a pot shot at Hollywood corruption with
his latest, "State and Main."  While his screenplay features many pithy
lines (usually coming from the director/producer due of William H. Macy
and David Paymer), "State and Main" plays pretty flat.
Director Walt Price (Mamet vet Macy) arrives with his signature cross stitched
pillow ('Shoot first, ask questions later') and sets up camp.  His 
and producer Marty Rossen's attitude is obviously condescending to the 
locals, who themselves are soon retaliating by filling Evian bottles with
tap water.  Soon they discover that the local, hoped for titular, old mill
burned down years ago, their ever randy star is fooling around with the
local deli guy's underage daughter (Julia Stiles, "Hamlet"), their female star,
Claire Wellesley (Sarah Jessica Parker) is balking at nudity even though it's
covered by her contract and the locals are all tied up in a local stage 
production and unavailable as extras.
The central focus of the story, though, is Mamet standin, screenwriter
Joseph Turner White (Philip Seymour Hoffman), adapting his own play for the
big screen for the first time.  He meets local bookshop owner Ann Black
(Rebecca Pidgeon, "The Winslow Boy" and Mamet's wife) who tries to keep him
on a true course as he navigates the ways of Tinseltown while an innocent
romance blooms.
Even as Mamet provides clever dialogue ('Everybody makes their own fun.  If
you don't make it, it's entertainment.'  'You believed that?  It's so biased!
So's our electoral process, but we still vote.') and situations (placing
a computer product placement in a film set in 1895), his film never takes
wing and flies.  His oddly assembled cast runs the gamut from Macy, delivering
his lines as if he were on stage instead of in a film, Seymour Hoffman,
miscast as a naive romantic lead, and Alec Baldwin, convincing as a pampered
star with a fixation on nubile young girls.  Macy and Paymer enjoy repartee,
but Hoffman and Pidgeon never really connect.  A subplot where Mayor George
Bailey (Charles Durning as the "It's a Wonderful Life" namesake) cowtows
to the Hollywood celebrities in order to score a society dinner for his wife
Sherry (Patti LuPone), so rife with comic possiblities, is just about
abandoned.  No effort is made to make the film-within-a-film appear the least
bit interesting.
Technically the film is adequate.  Overall, "State and Main" has the appearance
of a film that was a lot more fun to make than it is to sit through.

Title
Review for Beau travail (1999)
In current day Marseilles, Galoup (Denis Lavant, "Lovers on the Bridge")
goes through the regimen of daily life while contemplating his recent
past as a Chief Master Sargeant of the French Foreign Legion ('From a 
certain point of view, I screwed up, and points of view are important.')
Cowritten (with Jean-Paul Fargeau) and directed by Claire Denis ("Chocolat"),
"Beau Travail" is based on Melville's "Billy Budd," but shifts the focus from
the innocent victim to his tormentor.
"Beau Travail" is a mood piece with limitted dialogue and a relatively
langorous pace.  However, if you can accept the irrational hatred of Galoup
for one of his soldiers, Sentain (Grigoire Colin, "The Dreamlife of Angels"),
and give yourself over to this film, you may find yourself experiencing 
cinematic splendor.
Galoup clearly loves his Legionnaire life, as well as the attention of his 
superior, Commander Bruno Forestier (Michel Subor).  The Commander is
content to use the Djibouti equivalent of marijuana even as he still keeps his
experienced gaze upon Galoup and his praiseworthy group of displaced young men, 
He's also wise enough to warn Galoup about his overreactions to Sentain, a 
young man liked by all.  All is well as Galoup guides his men through their 
daily training, followed by the inevitable laundry and outdoor ironing, 
rewarded by weekends spent at a disco, where the men dance around their
undulating local girlfriends. 
Then a helicopter crashes into the sea during a training exercise and 
Sentain emerges a hero, decorated by their Commander.  Galoup's jealousy
continues to build and he brings his men to camp in a desolate area,
ostensibly to perform road repairs.  Instead Galoup engineers his group's
dynamics until he has a valid complaint against Sentain.  Galoup chooses
to punish Sentain (who ironically was standing up for another soldier
Galoup was punishing too severely and inhumanely) by abandoning him in 
the desert with a compass he knows to be faulty - a death sentence in this
harsh environment.  Forestier is forced to court martial Galoup and we're
brought full circle to where the tale began.
Denis' film features striking imagery (cinematography by Agnes Godard,
film Editing by Nelly Quettier), juxtaposing waves in sand and in sea,
salt encrusted on land (and a found compass).  She glorifies the male 
body like a color film version of Leni Reifenstahl's "Olympiad" with 
bare-chested men crab-crawlinging under obstacles, wire-walking, thrusting
and parrying.  Her images have a gorgeous, crystal clarity which are
superbly set to the music of Benjamin Britten's Billy Budd opera and
original music by Charles Henri de Pierrefeu.
Of her cast, only three men really matter.  Colin is mostly an object of
desire, either stoicly performing his duties or letting a open smile overtake
his features when relaxing with his peers.  Although Lavant narrates the
story, Subor almost acts as the audience's point of view, even when he's not
present.  Bleery from local drugs yet cognizant of everything, he remains
distanced from the action.  In Lavant, Denis has found the lifeforce of her
film.  This actor demands your attention with his pockmarked face and
urgent body language.  Lavant gives a compelling performance, evoking 
audience sympathy even as he acts badly.  When the film ends, we believe
we're about to witness Galoup's suicide, then Denis cuts to him alone in
the disco, where the tightly wound coil of his body literally explodes
in dance as the lyrics "This is the rhythm of the night, this is the rhythm 
of my life" pound out over the dance floor, a powerful release from all
that's been witnessed.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Ghost World (2001)
Enid (Thora Birch, "American Beauty") and Rebecca (Scarlett Johansson, "The
Horse Whisperer") are best friends and determined outsiders graduating from
High School.  While Rebecca's set on getting a job and finding an apartment
that she and Enid can share, Enid's having trouble finding a direction and
becomes fascinated by an older, nerdy record collector, Seymour (Steve
Buscemi).  Daniel Clowes and director Terry Zwigoff ("Crumb") adapt Clowe's
graphic novel, "Ghost World."
In the film adaptation, Enid's clearly the more caustic, artistic one
('That's really gonna happen,' she states to an over eager classmate who
suggest they get together during the summer), while quieter Becky is more
focused.  Ironically, Enid must make up art class during summer school in
order to complete her diploma, where she drolly endures the antics of
clueless teacher Roberta (Illeana Douglas, "Stir of Echoes").  She barely
puts up with her meek, single dad (Bob Balaban, "Best in Show") and is
horrified when he begins to see old flame Maxine (an almost mummified looking
Teri Garr), whom she really loathes.  
For entertainment, Enid and Rebecca lure a lonely-hearts loser out on a 
bogus date.  When they run into the man again at a yard sale, Enid, to Becky's 
complete mystification, is intrigued and begins an odd relationship with 
Seymour.  At this point Becky pretty much falls out of the picture.
What makes "Ghost World" worthwhile are the terrific performances from 
Thora Birch as the ultimate counter culture wiseass and Steve Buscemi, who
finds exactly the right note for a difficult character.  Seymour's pathetic,
but acknowledges it (he refers to himself as a cranky eccentric specimen).
Enid's fascinated because Seymour knows who he is and has housed himself 
in his own weird world of old 78s and vintage artifacts.  Birch, sporting
an overripe body and cats eye glasses, puts up a hip front to hide the fear
of growing up and eventually drags Seymour into her confused state of being.
Clowes and Zwigoff throw in plenty of amusing sidelines, too. Enid and Rebecca 
share a crush on Josh (Brad Renfro, "Apt Pupil") and constantly torture him
at the convenience store where he works and where the Greek owner is in a
constant battle with a hilarious mullet-head.  Enid's art
teacher Roberta is hilariously out of touch, preferring a jumble of coat
hangers with a pandering description to Enid's own Crumb-like artwork.  Enid's
stab at a job selling concessions at a movie theater is an amusing example
of knowing self defeatism.
But Zwigoff allows the central story to drift away, arriving at an
unsatisfying conclusion for both Enid and Seymour.  Becky steps over the line
into grownup land by becoming concerned with material household goods, her
rebellious move of skipping college landing her in a job at a coffee shop.
Production Design by Edward T. McAvoy, Art Direction by Alan E. Muraoka,
Set Decoration by Lisa Fischer and Costume Design by Mary Zophres provide
the film with a desolate, retro look in well chosen L.A. locations.  The
film's final scene is reminiscent of Edward Hopper's "Nighthawks."
"Ghost World's" ectoplasmic protagonists are haunting, but it's ethereal
conclusions leave us wanting.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Invisible Circus, The (2001)
Phoebe O'Connor (Jordana Brewster, "The Faculty") remembers the magic her 
late father (Patrick Bergin, "Sleeping With the Enemy") and her sister Faith
(Cameron Diaz) brought into her life as a little girl.  Now eighteen and
living alone with her mother (Blythe Danner), Phoebe needs to understand
her sister's death, a purported suicide which took place halfway around the 
world.  After provoking her mother to tears, Phoebe runs away to Europe to 
retrace the steps of Faith and her boyfriend Wolf (Christopher Eccleston, 
"Elizabeth"), the pair who once brought her "The Invisible Circus."
"The Invisible Circus" is one of those movies that you can enjoy in a numb
way on a rainy day when you're sick in bed.  Watching it is like having a
book read to you by someone who can't enliven his voice above a monotone.
Writer/director Adam Brooks ("Almost You") clearly exposes a source novel
(by Jennifer Egan) by his use of extensive voiceover narration and
flashbacks.  Phoebe tells us how wonderful things were when she was a 
child, even as she lets slip that both she and her mother were kept at
a distance from dad and Faith's close relationship.  Rebellious Phoebe
dares to suggest Mom didn't understand her own husband as much as she,
his daughter, did as a child.  Once in Europe, the narration is given over
to Wolf, who fills in the parts of her sister's story that Faith's postcards
glossed over, in an ever tightening circle.  An affair of proximity/comfort
is fallen into.
Some liveliness is added to the proceedings by the flashbacks taking place in 
the tumultuous 60's and the present action taking place on location in Paris, 
Berlin and Portugal.  Yet even these aspects aren't fully realized, as
much discussed drugs are nowhere to be seen in the flashbacks and a present
day acid trip in Paris is handled embarrassingly.
Brewster isn't bad as the central character whose search for truth ends
with some image shattering reality.  The camera certainly loves her dark,
exotic looks.  Diaz is also OK as the idealistic Faith whose desire to
change the world leads her down an ironic path.  (The two's contrasting
dark and light looks can be explained away by the casting of their parents.)
Unfortunately, Diaz and Eccleston, a usually fine actor, never really seem
to connect except on a superficial level.  Eccleston seems like a nice
guy in a long haired hippie wig with Faith and simply uncomfortable in his
later scenes with Brewster.  Still, he adds a bit of class to the proceedings.
At least Brooks keeps things moving along at a fairly steady pace, although
things begin to drag a bit as the climax approaches.  Cinematography by Henry 
Braham ("Waking Ned Devine") presents a bright San Francisco but rather
dank looking Europe.  Landscape is kept to a minimum in favor of close
character shots.
"The Invisible Circus" is both overwraught and undercooked.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Heartbreakers (2001)
Max (Sigourney Weaver) lures wealthy men into marriage so daughter Page 
(Jennifer Love Hewitt) can seduce them and the duo can cash in on a quick 
settlement.  Page is itching to con solo, so mom sets up a bankruptcy ruse
to ensure her cooperation for one, last big Palm Beach score in
"Heartbreakers."
This female rendition of "Dirty Rotten Scoundrels" doesn't break any new
ground, but is more entertaining than it has any right to be due to its
talented cast who are clearly enjoying their own shenanigans.
The film opens at Max's marriage to Dean Cummano (Ray Liotta), a formerly
womanizing chop shop owner who clearly adores her.  Max plays Dean hilariously,
dancing til dawn before slipping off into champagne-induced snoring on
their wedding night.  The next morning a contrite Max makes a nauseous dash
to the bathroom, so Dean decides to drop in at the office before embarking on
their honeymoon.  There, planted as his new secretary is Page, with lethal
cleavage, a skirt barely covering her butt, and a propensity for dropping
things.  Max discovers the two in a compromising position and makes off with
her new Mercedes and 300 grand.
After getting busted by the IRS (which turns out to be a mother to daughter
scam played by old buddy Anne Bancroft), the two head to Palm Springs and
pick William B. Tensy (Gene Hackman), a billionarie tobacco man, as their
next sting.  While Max reinvents herself as Russian Olga at an auction, Page
tries to set up her own mark, but instead gets entangled with local bartender
Jack (Jason Lee, "Almost Famous"), who, she's informed, owns the bar and
the two million dollar parcel of land its situated on.  Meanwhile, Dean
decides he can't live without his ex-wife and makes his way to Florida.
As written by Robert Dunn, Paul Guay and Stephen Mazur, "Heartbreakers" is
a fairly typical slapstick caper comedy which would have been pretty limp
in lesser hands (and indeed, Love Hewitt's on again, off again seduction of
Jack paints her as a psychotic harpy and becomes annoying).  Director David
Mirkin ("Romy and Michele's High School Reunion") lets his cast of pros
run with it, though, to surprisingly entertaining results.
Sigourney Weaver, looking smashing at 50, revels as the femme fatale
whose early abandonment when pregnant makes her overprotective of her
daughter's potential romantic entanglements.  An early bet between Max
and Page to get an unsuspecting dupe (Kevin Nealon) to buy one of them a
drink has Max hilariously trump Page with smarts over youthful sex appeal.
Put on the spot at a Russian eatery, 'Olga' pays off a wised up waiter
(Yakov Smirnoff) and ditches a Russian folk song to deliver a campy
version of 'Back in the U.S.S.R.'  
Liotta puts a comic spin on past wiseguy performances and turns up the
notch on physical comedy.  He's terrific, even bringing warmth to his
character.  Gene Hackman is riotously repulsive as the constantly smoking 
billionaire.  The always likeable Jason Lee's laid back lover is such a
nice guy it's a bit of a head scratcher why he'd fall for Page, although
he presumably can see the softness beneath the brittle surface.  Love
Hewitt proves herself as a pratfaller and mostly keeps her own among this
cast of seasoned pros.  Nora Dunn adds some sharpness as Tensey's maid.
Luxurious locations and inventive costuming give the film nice eye appeal.
Original music by John Debney and the theme by Danny Elfman provide jaunty
accents.
"Heartbreakers" doesn't take us anywhere new, but provides a surprisingly
enjoyable 123 minutes.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for What Women Want (2000)
Hot shot advertising exec Nick Marshall (Mel Gibson) thinks he's God's gift
to women, but after one big jolt gives him the power to hear womens' 
thoughts he's about to get another jolt as he discovers "What Women Want."
Nick Marshall has been fawned over by women since he was the only child
of a single Las Vegas showgirl mom.  His housekeeper babies him, his
doorwoman (Loretta Devine) ogles him, and the girl at his coffee shop
(Marisa Tomei) flirts with him.  He's a guy's guy ad exec, adept at
luring men to cars, booze and smokes with gorgeous babes.  But it's no
longer the 80's and women are a huge part of the consumer demographic,
so Nick's boss Dan Wanamaker (Alan Alda) pulls the rug out from under
him by bypassing him and hiring Cleo winner Darcy Maguire (Helen Hunt)
as Sloane Carter's creative director.
Darcy immediate challenges her new team to come in the next day and
pitch one or more of the female products she's distributed to them all
in pink boxes.  Nick goes home, gets drunk, dances to Sinatra, and then
attacks his assignment by polishing his nails, waxing his legs and
donning pantyhose.  Then he has an accident involving a bathtub and a
hair dryer.  The electrocution doesn't kill him, but he awakens the next
day to discover he can hear women's thoughts.  Now he can get Lola (Tomei)
into bed and use Darcy's own thoughts to steal her job.
Screenwriters Josh Goldsmith and Cathy Yuspa (TV's "The King of Queens")
take a potentially amusing concept and bury it.  Nick is a jerk who's
given jaw dropping advice by a female psychiatrist (Bette Midler) to
use his newfound gift to empower himself over women.  Very few of the 
thoughts emanating from women in the streets' heads ring true, although
more effort has been made with Darcy and Lola.  No effort is made for Nick
to put any spin on what he hears - often he just repeats what he's heard
back to the woman who's just thought it.  After pursuing Lola for
what appears to have been an extended period of time, Nick wins her over
by playing to her fears.  After he beds and forgets her, having become
entangled with Darcy, Lola appears and demands an explanation.  The one that's
give - he's gay.  This is some seriously bad writing.
Mel Gibson has some fun with the role and proves that he can move into
the romantic comedy genre.  His Fred Astaire turn to Sinatra's "I Won't
Dance" is admirable, although the work that went into it shows.  He's
undercut by the writing which muddles his motivation with Darcy, but gains
sympathy in a 'learning to be a dad' subplot with his teenage daughter
Alex (Ashley Johnson, "Anywhere But Here") and another subplot involving
an unnoticed, mousy file clerk.
Hunt is believable as a vulnerable woman finding herself in a position of
power.  Tomei is appealing, if badly treated by the script.  The highly 
billed Mark Feuerstein ("Woman on Top") makes little impression as Nick's 
buddy Morgan.  The film also features Lauren Holly as Nick's ex and Delta 
Burke and Valerie Perrine as Nick's adoring office assistants.
What women may want is better romantic material for Mel Gibson.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Snatch. (2000)
Turkish (Jason Statham, "Lock, Stock and Two Smoking Barrels") and his 
partner Tommy (Stephen Graham) are boxing promoters whose desire
for a new caravan plummets them into the nefarious dealings of fight fixing,
hit men, gun dealers, Piker gypsys, pawnbrokers, gamblers, 
body guards and dishonest diamond dealers from both sides of the Atlantic in 
writer/director Guy Ritchie's ("Lock, Stock and Two Smoking Barrels")
"Snatch."
Ritchie's kinetic first film was a smash in his homeland, but only a cult
success in the U.S.  With "Snatch" he follows much the same formula but
brings in recognizable stars, most notably Brad Pitt as Mickey, an almost
incomprehensible Irish bare knuckle fighter who loves his mum (Sorcha Cusack).
The film begins with four Hassidic Jews gaining entry into an Antwerp jewelry
exchange - moments later Frankie Four Fingers (Benicio del Toro, "Traffic")
and his gang have absconded with the 86 caret stone that will change hands
repeatedly.  Frankie works for Cousin Avi (Dennis Farina, "Reindeer
Games") in NY, who contacts Doug the Head (Mike Reid) in London to
help bring Frankie in.  Frankie, it seems, has a weakness for girls and
gambling.  Frankie's London weapons contact, Boris the Blade
(Rade Serbedzija, "Eyes Wide Shut") is planning on robbing Frankie for
Brick Top (Alan Ford, "Lock, Stock and Two Smoking Barrels"), a ruthless
fight fixer.  
Meanwhile, Turkish and Tommy's fighter Gorgeous George (Adam Fogerty)
is pummelled when pitted against the wily Mickey (Brad Pitt), so they
anger and become indebted to Brick Top by changing their fighter - to Mickey.
Pawnbroker Sol (Lennie James, "Among Giants"), his buddy Vinny (Robbie Gee,
"The Firm") and oversize, unskilled driver Tyrone (Ade) are like three Black 
Stooges who try to pull the Blade's job and run afoul of Brick Top.  Former 
soccer pro Vinny Jones ("Lock, Stock and Two Smoking Barrels") appears as
Bullet Tooth Tony, bodyguard to Brick Top and legendary hit man.
The pace is fast and furious, featuring editting montages (Jon Harris and
Les Healey) comprised of stills (Frankie's pleasure exploits) and near-stills 
(Cousin Avi's trip to London shown in two seconds flat) that are hilariously 
economical.  Ritchie even gets a "Run Lola Run" moment when he shows a
fateful dual car crash from opposite perspectives back to back.  Urgent
cinematography by Tim Maurice-Jones ("Lock, Stock and Two Smoking Barrels")
humorously captures the action, and, occasionally, sublime moments, like
when Mickey apparently floats horizontally through the air after a viscious
ring punch.
Ritchie's assembled a terrific ensemble here, from unknowns like Ford, who's
magnificently malicious and wickedly witty, to big stars like Pitt, who
shines here in a humorous offshoot of his "Fight Club" persona.  Ritchie's 
script may follow a formula, but his lines are deliciously inventive. 
(My favorite - when Brick Top asks 'In the quiet words of the Virgin Mary, 
come again?').  Baby faced Tommy continues to wonder at the irony that 
has him and Turkish buying an ever more splendid and expensive caravan for 
Mickey when they originally went to him to purchase a used one.  Kudos, too,
to the unnamed Pikey pit bull whose loyalty brings luck.
Be warned - for all its humor, the film features extreme violence and some
gore, but simply put, "Snatch" is a blast.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Krámpack (2000)
Sixteen year old Dani's (Fernando Ramallo) riding high.  He lives in an
arresting modern home with a pool on a cliff overlooking the ocean.  It's
the onset of summer vacation, his trusting parents are leaving him to
take a trip to Egypt and his best friend is coming out from the city to 
join him in the Cannes 2000 Critics Week award winner, "Nico and Dani
(Krampack)."
Adapted from Jordi Sanchez's play by director Cesc Gay and Tomas Aragay,
the Spanish "Nico and Dani" is an honest, warm and funny coming of age
tale in which two best friends come to a crossroads together only to take
different paths.
Dark and scrawny Nico (Jordi Vilches) begins strutting his macho stuff,
from dreams of becoming a motorcycle racing mechanic to boasting about the
size of his Adam's apple.  Nico and Dani share nightly masturbation rituals
(the titular Krampack), where Nico teaches Dani that numbing one's hand first 
by sitting on it allows one to believe the hand belongs to another.  What
Dani shares with Nico is of a far more personal nature and Nico goes along
under cloud of sexual experimentation.
When the duo meet the brazen Elena (Marieta Orozco) and shy, virginal Berta 
(Esther Nubiola), Nico sets to pairing the foursome off and making dates
while Dani gets increasingly annoyed that the two don't spend more time 
alone together.  Dani has an unsatisfying encounter with a drunken Berta,
then begins to spend time with an older, homosexual writer who's a client of
his father's (in a neat parallel, Dani's treated much the same as he
treated Berta).  
"Nico and Dani" is refreshing after the lowbrow sniggering found in 
American teen sex comedies.  These kids act like real teenagers - young 
enough to still romp and play, old enough to want to appear sophisticated
and sexually desirable (amusingly enough, not too far afield from how the
film's adults are portrayed).
Blond, blue-eyed Fernando Ramallo plays Dani with an air of seriousness,
appropriate considering his character is facing a more difficult lifestyle
choice than his buddy.  Newcomer Jordi Vilches (a circus performer!) is
hilarious as the confidently goofy Nico.  He walks a line between
oblivousness and acceptance.  The film is given a bright, sunny look by
cinematographer Andreu Rebes and a lively, unusual score by Riqui Sabates.
"Nico and Dani" succeeds in portraying a difficult and confusing time in
human development with humor, compassion and truth.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Tailor of Panama, The (2001)
Andy Osnard (Pierce Brosnan, "The World Is Not Enough") has just about used up 
the good will of MI6 when he's assigned to Panama to keep an eye on British
interests in the Canal.  In order to gain contacts and information, Andy
ferrets out Harry Pendel (Geoffrey Rush, "Quills"), an ex-convict with a
Saville Row front in "The Tailor of Panama."
Adapted from the John le Carre novel by the author, director John Boorman
("The General") and Andrew Davies, "The Tailor of Panama is a cheeky lark
about an immoral agent playing colleagues, superiors and countries against
each other to his own benefit while spinning an 'innocent' tailor into a
duplicitous stew.  While family man Harry Pendel doesn't deserve Andy's 
blackmailing, he's susceptible to it because he's duped his wife along 
with his customers and is facing financial difficulties.  Harry's a decent 
fellow who remains loyal to  anti-Noriega freedom fighters Marta (Leonor 
Varela, TV's "Cleopatra"), who was brutally disfigured, and Mickie Abraxas 
(Brendan Gleeson, "The General") now a brokendown alcoholic.  Yet he uses 
these two to concoct a story about "The Silent Opposition," a group 
purportedly arming up to defend the Panamian President's selling of the Canal 
to a) Japan, b) France or c) China/Taiwan. 
Andy's bs detector is on, but he figures Pendel's story will be bought.  
It is, and soon offers in the millions rain down from the U.S. via 
Osnard's boss Cavendish (Johathan Hyde).  That hasn't stopped Osnard 
from attempting to also get at Harry via his wife Louisa (Jamie Lee Curtis),
an American who just happens to work for U.S. Government interests in
the Canal with unshakeable loyalty.  She's already sensed something amiss
with Harry, though, and goes on the offensive.  Meanwhile, Harry's 
make-believe has caused events to take such a dramatic turn that he's 
shaken to his core.
"The Tailor of Panama" works wonderfully in its playful setup right up
through the beginning of an American invasion of Panama City (played
for yucks and getting them!).  Deceit is everywhere, from Harry's seemingly
sympathetic banker (Jon Polito, "Stuart Little") calling in a loan to 
naive Cavendish's handling of the U.S.  Osnard plays hard and fast to bed 
British diplomat attache Francesca (Catherine McCormack, "Braveheart").  
Harry amusingly gets advice from Uncle Benny (Harold Pintner), the 
deceased Jewish Uncle who set him up in Panama.
The film goes into a nose dive, however, as the two leads get into serious 
business trying to outmaneuver one another.  There's no satisfaction in 
the wrapup, in which the (marginally) 'good' guy barely squeezes out of 
harm's way as corruption still reigns.
Rush gives another delightful performance as the put upon Pendel, whether
he's chalking up a suit pattern, making breakfast for his kids or trying
to keep one step ahead of Osnard.  He gains audience empathy as a man 
deserving the second chance Uncle Benny provided.  Brosnan has a ball 
turning his suave Bond agent sideways with malicious glee and his is a 
fun performance to watch.  Gleeson is odd casting as a Panamian rebel, 
but he takes ownership of the character and makes us believe he's a 
Central American hero destroyed by his own fighting spirit.  Jamie Lee
Curtis brings little to her role as the bewildered wife in a lackluster
performance.  Get your first screen glimpse of the boy cast as Harry Potter, 
Daniel Radcliffe, as Harry and Louisa's son Mark.
The film, shot on location in Panama by cinematographer by Philippe
Rousselot ("Remember the Titans"), looks sweatily slick.  Editting is
comical while the film remains in hijinx mode.  Bush family supporters
will have their noses tweaked.  
"The Tailor of Panama" is best when it's shaken, not stirred.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Tape (2001)
When Jon (Robert Sean Leonard, "Much Ado About Nothing") returns to his
hometown of Lansing, Michigan as a rookie director represented in the town's
film festival, he meets up with his old high school buddy Vince (Ethan Hawke,
"Snow Falling on Cedars") who's also flown in for the event.  Once Jon's
arrived at Vince's motel room, pleasantries quickly devolve into character
judgements.  Mounting tension is escalated when Vince accuses Jon of not
only stealing his old girlfriend Amy (Uma Thurman, "The Golden Bowl"), but
of raping her.  When Vince finally gets Jon to admit the truth, he 
announce's Amy's imminent arrival, then tells Jon he's captured their
entire conversation on "Tape."
Adapted from his one act play by Stephen Belber, director Richard Linklater
("Before Sunrise") uses digital video technology to capture an intense
character study in real time.  This is an actors' piece and the cast of
three thrive in its environment.
We first meet Vince, a small time drug dealer/volunteer fireman, burning off
his manic energy with inter-bed pushups.  Jon, a seemingly more well-adjusted
young man, is dismayed to learn that Vince has broken up with Lynn, his
long time girlfriend, but agrees with her assessment that Vince 'has issues
that manifest themselves in violence.'  This begins a debate that clearly
shows Jon believes Vince is beneath him, an unambitious, immature slacker,
even as Jon back-pedals his words.  Vince, denying said charges while shooting
beers and rolling joints, slowly turns the tables on Jon, making us
reevaluate the other character as perhaps having a weaker moral fiber.  
But "Tape," never letting us rest, soon has us questioning Vince's objectives.
When Amy, a local assistant district D.A., arrives on the scene, things become
awkward until she's assessed the situation and gains the upper hand.  Amy
has yet a third take on their high school days before she makes a telephone
call that will once again spur character defining actions.
Ethan Hawke, an actor who recently has delivered moribund performances, is
charged as Vince, at once an overactive adolescent and pothead philosopher.
Linklater should remain Hawke's director of choice as he hasn't been this
good since "Before Sunrise."  Robert Sean Leonard deftly digs a hole of
Jon's own making, constantly trying to spin himself as a nice guy while his
true nature seeps out between his words.  Uma Thurman has less time to 
flesh out her character, but makes her Amy's flip flop, from vulnerable to
victorious, believable although she never attains her costars level of
empathy.
Belber's clever writing shifts our perceptions constantly throughout the film,
while cinematographer Maryse Alberti ("Joe Gould's Secret"), limited to the 
space of one motel room, keeps the visuals interesting and diverse, only 
stumbling with the choice of some whiplash pans late in the action.  
Linklater's direction is tight and he gives us a laugh on our way out with the
witty selection of Brenda Lee's "I'm Sorry" playing over the end credits.
"Tape" may be an actors' exercise, but Linklater and his cast make it a
workout worth watching.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Wo de fu qin mu qin (1999)
THE ROAD HOME (Wo de fu qin mu qin)
-----------------------------------
Luo Yusheng (Honglie Sun) is called home from the city by the mayor of his
hometown when his father dies.  The mayor (Guifa Chang, present day)
has a problem honoring his mother's wish to have her husband's casket carried 
back to their rural village, as all the able bodied men have moved into the 
city.  His grief stricken mother (Yuelin Zhao, present day) makes
Yusheng recall her and his father's locally legendary courtship and he
becomes determined to enact the old custom designed to keep his deceased
father from forgetting "The Road Home."
Director Zhang Yimou ("Ju Dou," "Raise the Red Lantern") ends a trilogy of
sorts with "The Road Home," his third based-on-fact tale revolving around a
determined young woman after "The Story of Qui Ju" and "Not One Less."
While the first two films were shot in a grittier style than his previous
work, "The Road Home" is a lush, widescreen film with images recalling
his earlier work "Ju Dou."
Zhao Di (Ziyi Zhang, "Crouching Tiger, Hidden Dragon," past) is a non-educated
country girl who lives alone with her blind mother (Bin Li).  When a new
schoolteacher arrives, the entire town turns out to see him and Di is
immediately smitten with the young man.  Luo Changyu (Hao Zheng) makes
eye contact with the pigtailed girl in the bright red jacket.
Di goes out of her way to cross Changyu's path, even travelling to the 
farther well behind the schoolhouse for her water (a comical scene shows a 
local foil Changyu's attempt to also get water while Di is at the well).  
Eventually, it's the Zhaos' turn to host dinner for Changyu and he presents 
Di with a barrette to match her jacket.  A dramatic separation is followed
by a
harsher one as Changyu is called back to the city (Mao's reversal on his
educational program), and then again after he defies city officials and
sneaks 
back to see Di.
This moving tale is adapted from his novel "Remembrance" by Bao San.
Very little dialogue is used in the central flashback, where images speak
and non-obtrusive narration fills in the story.  The themes of everlasting
love and home are referred to often in simple, almost offhand ways.  Memory
keeps love alive with the imagined sound of a loved one's voice.
Zhang Ziyi, who went on to international acclaim after "Crouching Tiger," is 
luminous as the young Di - after a look from the handsome Changyu, her face 
brightens even more - this is star wattage.  Zhang Yimou, who first discovered
Gong Li, has an eye for talented and photogenic actresses.
Present day scenes are filmed in a bluish black and white and set in
a snowy winter, while the central flashback is in glorious color.  The
past is dreamlike perfection, somewhat like "The Wizard of
Oz," where home was also the desired end.  The film will also recall
"Witness" as men build a new school while women prepare their lunch
or Majid Majidi's "Children of Heaven," where the beauty of a craftman
at work is celebrated.  Zhang's current heroine chases after the mayor's
vehicle down a dirt road just as his last did in "Not One Less."
Cinematographer Yong Hou ("Not One Less") frames Di in a doorway surrounded 
by bright orange pumpkins as the son recalls his father saying that sight 
of his mother was like a portrait.  His black and white images are also
artful,
as when a funeral procession trudges through the snow on foot, backlit by
the headlights of the cars snaking behind.  Editor Ru Zhai ("Not One Less") 
dissolves shots of Di both coming and going on her daily trek to find a 
lost hairpiece. (That barrette makes one wonder if Zhang will be typecast 
receiving and losing hair ornaments to men!)  The one unfortunate note in
this symphony of filmmaking is Bao San's score, which borders on plagarizing
the theme from "Braveheart."
Yusheng honors his parents at film's end by teaching one class in his father's
old school.  'Know the past, know the present' chant the students.  "The
Road Home" poignantly shows us both through the eyes of a son just coming
to understand his father's lesson.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Osmosis Jones (2001)
Frank Detorri's (Bill Murray) a single dad who lives on beer and junk food 
with no apparent understanding of sanitation or hygiene, much to the dismay of
his preteen daughter Shane (Elena Franklin).  When he uses the '10 second
rule' to retrieve a hard boiled egg from a chimp's cage at the zoo and downs
it, he introduces a lethal bacteria into his system.  Inside his skin, the 
City of Frank is in turmoil thanks to the vote-pandering of Mayor Phlegmming
(voice of William Shatner), so it's up to one Frank PD white blood cell (voice
of Chris Rock) to save the day in Peter and Bobby Farrelly's  "Osmosis Jones."
The City of Frank is a brightly animated (animation directed by Piet Kroon and
Tom Sito) cellular municipality where Osmosis Jones is a typical rogue cop
looking for another chance.  He's inadvertently teamed up with Drix (voice
of David Hyde Pierce, TV's "Frasier"), a cold capsule with 12 hours worth of
painkillers to dispense.  This quarrelling duo are about to go on a "Fantastic
Voyage" in order to hunt down Thrax (voice of Laurence Fishburne), the virus
intent on shutting down Frank.
While the animation is certainly colorful to look at, Osmosis Jones' story
is a hackneyed one.  The story cries out for puny puns, but we only get 
occasional sprinklings of wit or bodily humor (Drix graduated phi beta capsule,
he departs on a bus headed for bladder).  Neither the hero or villain is
particularly interesting (Thrax looks like an animated "Predator"), although
Hyde Pierce is a delightful sidekick.  Adults can desperately keep their eyes
peeled for small amusements the animators dot along the landscape.
Meanwhile, back in live action land, Bill Murray is reduced to nothing more
than a walking gross-out joke.  There's no particular enjoyment to be found
watching him vomit on Molly Shannon (she plays Shane's teacher, Mrs. Boyd)
or hoisting his ingrown toenail onto a restaurant table.  One must wonder
how the climatic flatlining of a child's father will play to the family
audience as well.  Rest assured, the whole enchilada is wrapped up with a
fart joke.  
While far less offensive than the Farrelly's last effort "Me, Myself and
Irene," that film at least spiked some comic highs with Jim Carrey's 
hijinx.  "Osmosis Jones" will probably be OK for the kids, but the Farrellys
playing for the family audience is like watching Marilyn Manson croon a
Phil Collins tune.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Innocence (2000)
Five decades ago, Andreas (Charles Tingwell) and Claire (Julia Blake)
shared a passionate romance in Belgium, following World War II, then went
their separate ways. Now, a half-century later, they discover that they
live in the same Australian city and it soon becomes evident that their
love of so long ago has not faded. Although Andreas is a widower, Claire is
still married and is torn between her loyalty to husband John (Terry
Norris) and the passion she feels for her former lover in "Innocence."
When widower Andreas (Charles 'Bud' Tingwell, "The Castle") discovers his 
first love resides in the same Australian city, he writes Claire (Julia
Blake, "Hotel de Love") a sentimental letter, begging for a meeting.  Claire,
married for forty-five years to John (Terry Norris, husband of costar Julia 
Blake), guiltily meets Andreas for dinner, but states that while it was nice 
seeing him, there's no reason to stir up old feelings.  But Andreas persists 
in pitching woo and Claire finds herself falling in love again in "Innocence."
Writer/director Paul Cox, who explored middle-aged romance in "Lonely Hearts"
and dying with dignity in "A Woman's Tale," combines those themes in this
septuagenarian love story.  Claire, whose marriage has been sexless for
twenty years, initially opts for keeping the current peace.  When Andreas
is asked to be present at the disinterment of his wife's grave, he asks
Claire to come for moral support.  She's so moved by his distress and his
appeal to stay the night with him, that she decides to celebrate life.
Claire also decides that she's too old to lie.
John, a man who hasn't voiced his true feelings in decades, is dumbstruck
by his wife's confession of infidelity.  He calls in their son David 
(Robert Menzies), a doctor, hoping for a physical or mental analysis that 
will explain things.  He tries to physically restrain Claire from going out, 
then tries to woo her back.  His delighted surprise at hearing her tell an 
off-color joke is both touching in the depth of feeling Norris brings to the 
scene and telling in how little he really knows the woman he's spent most of 
his life with.  Norris gives a powerful and layered performance.
The film belongs to Julia Blake, however, a truly beautiful woman who
glows in her rediscovered love.  Blake conveys the heartbreak of breaking
another's heart while simultaneously expressing the joy of living to the
fullest.  Tingwell makes Andreas the more Bohemian, worldly choice next
to the staid John, but his performance has just a touch of self congratulation
about it.  Claire tells Andreas, whose strict father came between them all
those years ago, that she doesn't think he fought hard enough for her then
and Tingwell's portray of Andreas keeps him slightly suspect the second
time around.  
Cox has written some beautiful dialogue, from reflections on the definition
of a memory to Andreas' humorous baiting of a hospital chaplain, although he
occasionally meanders into overt melodrama.  Reflections are featured visually
throughout the film as well, from flashbacks of the young lovers seen in the 
windows of a passing train to Claire's peering into a mirror (where her
younger self dissolves into her present).  Overall, however, the film has the 
look of a British TV production.
"Innocence" stumbles occasionally, but it's refreshing to see senior citizens
treated as sexual beings with needs and desires and the ability to light
up a room with their presence.  You may never see your grandparents in quite
the same light again.

Title
Review for Kid, The (2000)
Russ Duritz (Bruce Willis) is fast approaching his 40th birthday. He's a
successful image consultant, makes a lot of money, and has an expensive home
and a fancy car. But, he's a loser when it comes to the things that count in 
life - a family, friends, and people who care. Russ is at an emotional 
crossroads and, though he doesn't realize it, needs help. A pudgy 8-year old 
boy named Rusty (Spencer Breslin) arrives on his doorstep. When Russ realizes 
that Rusty is himself, 32-years ago, he makes a start on the road to personal 
redemption in "Disney's The Kid."
It gives me a chill when I see a movie title include the name of the company
that made it. When I saw the title of "Disney's The Kid," I knew that the
family entertainment giant was trying a little misdirection, as if to say, 
"Pay no attention to this movie. Just look who made it! That's the important 
thing." It isn't. The story is the important thing and "The Kid" lacks a good 
one.
"If only I knew what I know now when I was growing up...." Everyone has said
this to himself or herself at least once and probably many times over the
years.  It's an interesting premise, like time travel, and one that is ripe 
with possibilities. Unfortunately, the screenplay by Audrey Wells ("Guinevere")
doesn't capitalize on the idea. Basically, the story for "The Kid" is about a
pretty unlikable character, Russ, who happens to be very good at what he does.
His consultation business is lucrative and his clients are happy with his
efforts, but nobody likes the man. Even his loyal assistant, Janet (Lily
Tomlin), seems to tolerate the taciturn, often rude, style that defines Russ.
When Russ's alter ego, Rusty, arrives on the scene, there is no explanation,
aside from some vague magical incidents that don't explain anything. The boy
just appears out of the blue with a toy airplane, which Russ believes is his
from 32 years ago. Matching birthmarks and scars, the pair realizes that they
are the same person, but separated by decades. From here on in, it's a matter
of who helps whom. Rusty sees his future life as, "I'm 40, I don't fly jets 
and I don't have a dog. I'm a loser!" Russ sees his past life as something to 
be forgotten. This odd little couple must come to grips with their life crises 
and turn to each other for help. Russ shows Rusty how to defend himself against
bullies, while Rusty teaches Russ the importance of nurturing the kid within.
Bruce Willis seems to have made a career choice to star in film with kids.
"Mercury Rising" and "The Sixth Sense" come to mind with the former a thriller,
the later a horror flick, and both starring a little boy, too. "The Kid" is a
comedy, but no one apparently told Willis that his latest is supposed to be
funny as he gives a humorless performance as Russ. Compounding Willis's wooden
perf is the unendearing one by little Spencer Breslin as Rusty. The kid schleps
around and endlessly complains of not having a dog (and you know where that's
going to go. As you do with just about everything in the movie.) Young Breslin
doesn't have the personality or charm to make you like him. In the end, you
don't care about either Russ or Rusty.
The supporting cast is lightweight in number and the players are allowed to be
symbols only. Emily Mortimer, as Russ's assistant Amy, is the obvious love
interest in the film, though why she would deign to be seen in the company of
her rude boss is a question I asked more than once. The script covers this by
having Amy declare to Russ, "I [sometimes] see the kid in you." I'm glad she
does, because I never did. Nonetheless, Mortimer is pretty and perky in the
role. Jean Smart gets some mileage as a middle-aged southern belle who
relocates to LA as a news anchor. Her Deirdre becomes Russ's muse and advisor, 
basically telling him the obvious - let the inner kid out.
The production, led by helmer John Turteltaub, is straightforward. There is
little to take note of as the team behind the camera goes through the motions
of capturing the action. There's not a lot of passion in front of or behind the
camera.
When I first saw the trailers for "Disney's The Kid," I was less than
enthusiastic about seeing it. Now, having been there, I find my instincts were
correct. Save your money (or, go see "Chicken Run" instead). I give it a D+.
Bruce Willis once again braves sharing the screen with a child (and TWO
dogs, including a handicapped one!) in "Disney's the Kid."  He's Russ Duritz, 
an image consultant with a long-suffering assistant (Lily Tomlin) who buffers 
him from his father and an employee, Amy (Emily Mortimer, "Love's Labour's 
Lost") who keeps having her hopes of finding his good side dashed.
We witness a day in the life of Russ, where he treats people rudely (although
the script, by Audrey Wells ("Guinevere"), needed some real toughening up
in this regard) and engineers a media moment with a bunch of kids recruited
at a baseball game to save a dishonorable client.  Amy protests (script
problems again - why would she work for this guy if she constantly rejects his 
methods?) and Russ redeems himself by tossing the video.  Of course, he then 
has to spoil the good will he's generated by shoving her childlike enthusiasm 
for a perfect moon back in her face.
Then things get really weird when it appears a little kid is breaking into
his highly secure LA home.  (And, oh yeah, he's been buzzed by a bright red
biplane, too.)  A toy plane is left on Russ' doorstep and then he catches
the kid, who claims the plane because his name, Rusty, is painted on the
bottom.  Turns out - surprise - that this is Russ' plane and he's just been
introduced to himself as a child.
"Disney's the Kid" is an odd hybrid of a movie - the Disney inserted in the
title implies a kids' film, but it's really a midlife crisis flick mixed
with some fantastical time travel elements (the pilot plus multi-generational
male bonding aspect recalls Mel Gibson's "Forever Young").  Unfortunately the
story never seems to get out of the concept phase and Turteltaub's
("Phenomenon," "Instinct") direction is bland, but the cast can't be faulted.
Willis generously lets his costars shine, even as his character is undone
by writing that can't live up to its convictions (Russ doesn't seem unhappy
with his lot until he's made aware that he should be).  Young Spencer Breslin
(TV commercials) is a solid foil, never playing for the sap factor and 
able to pull off his disdain for 'a dogless, chickless guy' as being a loser
(he also does a pretty good job with the 'Holy smokes' signature line he
must say repeatedly).
Support really shines in this centerless film with Lily Tomlin's Janet 
leading the pack in a naturally comic performance as the power behind the
throne.  Jean Smart (a vet of screenwriter Wells' "Guinevere") exudes warmth 
in a small but pivotal role of a new LA news anchor who gets free advice from 
the early, begrudging Russ in order to pop up later and return the favor more 
generously.  Emily Mortimer finally establishes herself with a character that
actually has a personality (her performances in "Scream 3" and "Love's Labour's
Lost" hardly being memorable).  She holds her own against both Willis and
Breslin with adroit charm.
"Disney's the Kid" continues to waste its potential with an overly
sappy, overly 'happily ever after' ending that would actually make life almost 
not worth living for the two different-aged Russes if any of these pedestrian 
filmmakers stopped to think about it.  

Title
Review for What Lies Beneath (2000)
One year after a near-fatal car accident, Claire Spencer (Michelle Pfeiffer)
must face the trauma of empty nest syndrome as her daughter goes off to
college.  But Claire's nest is the newly renovated lakeside home of her
deceased father-in-law, a spectacular house that she shares with husband
Norman (Harrison Ford).  Their marriage appears to be as solid as their
neighbors across the way is troubled until Claire comes to believe they're
being haunted by the ghost of the neighbor's wife in "What Lies Beneath."
What lies beneath this technically superior production are ripoffs of
many, far better, horror films ("Rear Window," "Vertigo," "Psycho,"
"Stir of Echoes," and "Ghost" to name a few).  It's too bad that
screenwriter Clark Gregg and producer/director Robert Zemeckis ("Forrest
Gump") didn't know when to quit while they were ahead because their
film features some genuinely creepy thrills and a fine performance
by Michelle Pfeiffer before it implodes under the weight of genre
cliches, a truly awful and stupid ending and a wooden performance from
the miscast Harrison Ford.
The film begins just like "Stir of Echoes" - in the tub.  Claire has
a vision that displays a watery death.  When she spies their neighbor
Warren Feur (James Remar) carrying a body-shaped bundle out to his car
one rainy night (this film is soggier than "The Perfect Storm"), Claire
is convinced he's killed his wife Mary (Miranda Otto, "The Thin Red Line")
with whom he constantly fought (we know this couple is bad news because
their house looks as shabby as the Spencers' looks spiffy).  Claire's
front door keeps opening mysteriously, a picture keeps falling to the floor
and the bathtub fills with steamy water in which the reflection of a 
dead blonde woman can be seen.  Claire even attempts a bathroom seance
with a Ouija board and her best friend Jody (Diana Scarwid, "Mommie Dearest")
before Norman insists she see a shrink (Joe Morton, "The Astronaut's Wife").
Up until this point, the film is edgy and suspenseful even if the 
filmmakers resort to cheap jolts too often.  But at the 70 minute mark
of this 130 minute film, the Macguffin is revealed for what it is and
'the truth,' which has been readily apparent all along, sidetracks the
film into "Sleeping With the Enemy" territory.  Zemeckis and company
even manage to somewhat turn the impending disaster around with a really
good bathtub climax only to derail themselves once again with an 
unnecessary, overextended groaner of an additional ending.
Michelle Pfeiffer gives her all as Claire and helps maintain interest in
the film even as it begins its downward spiral.  Also good is Diana
Scarwid as Claire's goofy, psychic-friendly chum and Micole Mercurio as
the dead girl's mother.  Joe Morton is wasted in the superfluous role of 
Dr. Drayton (the psychiatrist scenes should have been cut from the film).  
Harrison Ford has simply never been as bad in a film as he is here, giving 
absolutely no depth to Norman Spencer.
Technically, the film is a jewel with superlative cinematography by
Don Burgess ("Forrest Gump") and sharp sound work by William B. Kaplan,
who makes ambient noise spooky.  Production design by Rick Carter and Jim 
Teegarden may be a little obvious, but it's effective and the team even manage 
to insert a little joke late in the film with the name of an inn.  Visual 
Effects by Rob Legato ("Titanic") are top notch.
"What Lies Beneath" is all the more disappointing for its early promise.
Robert Zemeckis charmed the viewing public with "Who Shot Roger Rabbit" and
"Forest Gump," showing a flair for both the funny stuff and the sentimental.
Now, he departs from his usual lighter fare and delves into a supernatural
murder mystery starring Harrison Ford and Michelle Pfeiffer in "What Lies
Beneath."
Zemeckis, who also co-produced the film, drives his big star vehicle in what
turns out to be a cliched effort that lacks originality. It's a cross between
"Ghost Story" and "Stir of Echoes" as the story begins with Claire Spencer
(Pfeiffer) preparing to see her only daughter (from a previous marriage) off to
college. Their tearful separation is kindly watched by Claire's second husband,
a respected genetics professor, Norman (Ford), who has taken a prestigious
research post in Vermont.
The couple returns to their newly renovated house, the home that Norman grew up
in with his brilliant geneticist father. Norman, even now, lives in the shadows
of his father's great accomplishments, even as he himself is on the verge of a
scientific breakthrough. His work forces him to leave his wife alone in their
beautiful, but isolated home. Claire putters in her garden and suffers from
empty nest syndrome. Things begin to happen that she can't explain - the front
door keeps opening by itself, even when firmly latched; a photo of her with
Norman as he accepts an award mysteriously breaks; the bathtub fills up on its
own; and, the stereo turns itself on. When she catches fleeting glimpses of a
dead girl, she rushes to her husband for help.
Norman believes that his wife needs psychiatric help and ships her off to a
shrink, Dr. Drayton (Joe Morton), but the visitations increase and are more
powerful. Claire comes to realize, with the help of her best friend Jody (Diane
Scarwid), that the ghost is seeking her help. Using a book on witchcraft that
Jody gave her, Claire conjures up the spirit of the girl, becoming possessed by
the spirit. She learns that the girl died in her home and the story turns into
a ghostly murder mystery. I won't say any more about the plot so as not to give
anything away. But, I will talk about the pros and cons.
On the pro side are Michelle Pfeiffer's perf and the terrific tech work behind
the camera. Pfeiffer is the central character and the focus of the story
despite Harrison's name being billed first. (As a matter of fact, his is really 
a supporting role, but I'll get to that later.) Claire is a sensitive and
talented lady who opens herself to the tortured spirit in her home. Pfeiffer is 
called upon to not just be Claire, but also takes on a completely different 
character when she is possessed. The actress is as beautiful as ever and she 
shows some fine acting chops to boot.
The behind-the-scenes artistry is populated by a bevy of Academy Award nominees
and winners. The film's beautiful, haunting images are captured nicely by
lenser Don Burgess, a longtime Zemeckis collaborator. The lush production 
design, by Rick Carter, is simple in locale but quite stunning visually. The 
Spencer house, itself, takes on a character as the story progresses. Special 
F/X work, led by Rob Legato ("Titanic"), when used (though not enough, in my 
opinion) are spooky and startling. Less is more when it comes to the ghostly 
effects and subtly rules here.
Now, let's get to the cons. A mediocre story that virtually telegraphs every
plot twist well before they happen is the biggest problem. Cheap shot scary
bits that consume the story's first hour are frequent and totally manipulative: 
the dog jumps out of nowhere unexpectedly; a startling eye-looking-back-at-you
shot; someone behind the door ( a harmless someone); and, there are many more. 
I will say on other thing about the plot. As the story nears its never-ending 
ending, it twists away from the supernatural murder mystery and turns into a 
monster movie a la "Friday the 13th."  This is not a good thing as the mystery 
dissolves and the unstoppable monster bit kicks in. There is an obvious end 
point that the makers should have used to terminate the film, but they ignore 
the sensible and go for the scary. They could have had a decent ghost 
movie/murder mystery, but they blew it.
Another problem, mainly due to the writing, is there are no other real
characters in the film besides Pfeiffer. Harrison Ford, playing against his
usual stalwart hero type, is wooden as husband/villain and lacks any of his
usual charisma. Scarwid's Jody is little more than a plot device to intro
Claire to the supernatural. She apparently has no problem trekking out to the 
isolated Spencer home for visits that are, literally, five minutes long. James 
Remar and Miranda Otto, as the mysterious, troubled next door neighbors, the 
Feurs, are little more than a McGuffin to distract you for a while. Joe Morton 
is given little to do in his couple of emotionless scenes. Supporting cast is 
sparse in numbers and development.
"What Lies Beneath" is like a poor suit made with good material. It looks nice
but doesn't wear too well. Besides the unintentional send up to Jason movies,
Hitchcock's "Psycho" gets a major nod, too. The problems are: there just aren't
enough scary moments, way too many cheap shots and a hack script. You will find
Pfeiffer's a compelling performance. Because of that and the top techs, I give
it a C.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Pearl Harbor (2001)
The son of a Tennessee crop duster, Rafe McCawley (Ben Affleck) taught
his best friend Danny Walker (Josh Hartnett, "The Virgin Suicides") how
to fly and even protected Danny from his abusive, WWI vet dad (William
Fichtner).  Years later, Rafe is tapped to fly with the British Eagle Squadron 
while Danny is shipped off to Hawaii as is Rafe's girlfriend, Evelyn (Kate 
Beckinsale, "The Last Days of Disco"), an Army nurse.  The threesome's paths 
will all cross again, though, on the date that will live in infamy, the 
Japanese attack on "Pearl Harbor."
Director Michael Bay, known for the pyrotechnics of "The Rock" and
"Armageddon," attempts to take the James Cameron route of mixing a love
story with disaster.  While he delivers a magnificent, thirty-five minute
special effects knockout, Randall Wallace's ("Braveheart") script
only gives us one minor character worth caring about.
The film's first half gives us the Spielbergian Tennessee boyhood that segues
to New York to establish the adult love story.  In a pitiful 'meet
cute' moment, Rafe appeals to Evelyn to pass him on the eye exam (he's
dyslexic before there was a word for it) and she does, but also keeps him in
his place with a couple of hard, nasty needle jabs (all the nurses are 
presented as pinup sadists).  True love inexplicably ensues, but when Rafe 
volunteers for combat duty in England, he nobly decides not to consummate the 
relationship and hands over care of Evelyn to Danny.
Rafe's shot down (and we never for a minute believe he's dead) and shy Danny
delivers the news to distraught Evelyn.  Gradually, they connect as a couple
and do consummate their relationship in a parachute hanger scene that 
looks like a fashion shoot.  When does Rafe return?  Why, on December 6th, of
course!  The attack on Pearl Harbor is reduced to a means for Rafe and Danny
to repair their relationship.
Wallace's script offers a few true moments.  When Rafe strides onto the
English air field and asks for an immediate assignment, he's given a shot
up plane with a blood spattered cockpit, fresh from battle.  Red (Ewen
Bremner, "Trainspotting"), a pilot with a severe stutter, becomes bait for
the ladies of WWII and attached to Betty (James King, "Blow"), a sweet,
seventeen year old runaway-turned-nurse.  The Japanese are portrayed 
sympathetically with Admiral Yamamoto (Mako) making his famous anti-war 
statement and Zero pilots surrounded by family photos.  (Disney's decision to 
edit the film for Japan and Germany is a politically correct front
for corporate greed.)
Yet, Wallace's attempt to include the story of Dorie Miller (Cuba Gooding Jr.),
the cook who became the first African American to be awarded the Silver Star, 
feels tacked on.  Worse yet, the idea that one man (Rafe) would be in the Eagle
Squadron, be one of two pilots that get airborne during the Pearl Harbor 
attack to shoot down six Japanese Zeroes, and then survive Doolittle's (Alec 
Baldwin) raid, is suspension of intelligence, not belief.  The resolution of 
the romantic triangle is never in doubt (you can practically see the death's 
head looming over one of the three stars).  
During the attack sequence, one of Bay's initial shots is straight out of 
Spielberg's "Emperor of the Sun," as young boys playing on a cliff are startled
by Japanese planes flying by.  We see men in the water being strafed "Saving 
Private Ryan" style (Bay throws in an American flag for good measure) and men 
sliding down the deck of the U.S.S. Arizona just like their unfortunate
counterparts in "Titanic."  Rafe and Danny even execute the canyon flying 
stunts of "Star Wars."  Throw in some John Williams' music from "Midway" and 
we've got Bay as Spielucasron.  The overall effect can't be denied, yet only 
one death has emotional resonance.
Ben Affleck looks the part of the WWII hero, all square-jawed determination,
but there's no depth to the character.  His is an artificial nobility.  He's
at his most believable responding to the pain of shooting himself in the eye
with a champagne cork.  His 'I'm not anxious to die, I'm anxious to matter'
line rings hollow.  Kate Beckinsale, in the film's most underwritten role, 
is, not surprisingly, the most shallow of the three leads, a pretty face who 
seemingly responds to whichever pretty face is placed in front of her. 
Hartnett is the most believable of the three leads as a shy, quiet guy dealing
with extraordinary circumstances.  
Cuba Gooding Jr. is as good as his largely symbolic role allows and Alec
Baldwin makes for a loyalty-inspiring Doolittle.  The best acting comes in
some of the smaller roles.  Colm Feore as Admiral Kimmel looks commanding
and projects frustration at the lack of intelligence he has to work with.  
Jon Voight makes for a dogged and empathetic F.D.R.  James King is touching 
as naive nurse Betty.
In the end, "Pearl Harbor" is a bloated epic that features a U.S. wartime 
disaster as a special effects extravaganza.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Endurance: Shackleton's Legendary Antarctic Expedition (2000)
THE ENDURANCE:  SHACKLETON'S LEGENDARY ANTARCTIC EXPEDITION
In 1914, Sir Ernest Shackleton, having lost his bid to be the first explorer
to reach the South Pole, set sail with a crew of 28 men to be the first to
cross the Antarctic continent.  His three-masted sailing vessel, built to
withstand ice, was named after his family motto, 'By endurance we conquer.'
In 1999, producer/director George Butler mounted an expedition to retrace 
Shackleton's two year struggle of extraordinary courageousness in "The 
Endurance:  Shackleton's Legendary Antarctic Expedition."
Among Shackleton's many wise decisions was to bring along Australian
photographer Frank Hurley, who documented their journey in both still
photographs and moving film, which he editted into the 1919 documentary
"South."  While Hurley's original film features amazing footage and striking
imagery, it suffers from injudicious editing and pacing, with almost a 
half hour of the film's end turned over to nature photography to fill in
the gap Hurley experienced when Shackleton journeyed on, leaving Hurley
and twenty-one others behind awaiting rescue.
What Butler has done is to recreate the entire amazing story, beginning with
descendents of Shackleton's crew recalling the tales they were told (or
not as the case may be) and filling out personalities of the men who responded
to Shackleton's newspaper ad (which began 'Men wanted for hazardous journey,
small wages, bitter cold...').  Butler has actors provide the voices of the
crew as excerpts from their diaries are read, revealing the incredible
leadership Shackleton provided under threat of mutiny and overwhelming odds.
While he uses Hurley's footage and photos, Butler's documentary is a far 
richer, more emotional work.  New footage and unobtrusive recreations 
continue Shackleton's determination to save his men after ten months trapped
in the ice pack which crushed their ship.
After getting his men to Elephant Island in three lifeboats, Shackleton and
five others travelled 800 miles through wild seas to South Georgia, a whaling
station and their last point of departure.  This journey alone is often called
the most daring ocean voyage in modern maritime history.  Starved, frostbitten
and exhausted, Shackleton still faced a 36 hour trek, including scaling a 
glacier, when they made land on the opposite side of their destination.  It
took him four voyages before he finally arrived back at Elephant Island and
succeeded in bringing his entire crew back to civilization alive.  Ironically,
they returned to a world at war which paid scant attention to their return.
Shackleton himself began another Antarctic expedition some years later with
many of his former crew, but died of a heart attack at the age of 48 upon
their arrival at South Georgia's whaling station.
Butler's first rate documentary is only hurt by Liam Neeson's narration.
His soft, lilting voice often lacks the drama the events he's recounting
demand.  Music by Michael Small ranges from a deep, foreboding orchestral
piece which recalls whale sounds to Irish jigs and Tibetan vocals.
Transitions from old footage to new are seamless.
"The Endurance:  Shackleton's Legendary Antarctic Expedition" is an
awe-inspiring, uplifting tale of human fortitude and one man's incredible
capacity to lead men through unthinkable obstacles.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Eureka (2000)
Brother and sister Naoki (Masaru Miyazaki) and Kozue (Aoi Miyazaki, "One 
Summer's Day") leave their rural Japanese home for school as their mother
waves
in the distance.  They board a bus which snakes along country roads.  One
quick edit later and that bus' windows are covered in newspaper, all other
passengers save the bus driver Makoto (Koji Yakusho, "Shall We Dance?")
are dead and a crazed hijacker (Go Riju) talks to police on his
cell phone while ruminating on Naoki and Kozue's fate in writer/director
Shinji Aoyama's Cannes 2000 Ecumenical Jury prize winner "Eureka."
Makoto bravely saves the day and he and the children survive the horrific
event only to watch their lives unravel.  Naoki and Kozue's mother leaves
their home for another man after being beaten by their father, who kills
himself in a drunken car wreck.  The two children withdraw from society,
cease speaking, and live alone in their odd, chalet-like home.  When Naoki
receives a phone call from an aunt (clearly more interested in insurance
money than the childrens' welfare), he simply hangs up on her.
Makoto arrives home after an undetermined, but obviously lengthy, absence.
He obtains a job as a day laborer with his old friend Shigeo (Ken Mitsuishi,
"The Pillow Book"), who tells him about the children living alone in the
strange, isolated house.  Misunderstood by his family, Makoto arrives at
Naoki and Kozue's home and quietly becomes the patriarch protector of 
the silent duo.  Twentyish city cousin Akihiko (Yoichiro Saito, "Wild Life")  
arrives to spend his summer holiday (clearly also acting as a scout
for that noisy aunt) and livens things up, but a pall is cast over the town
when it becomes apparent that a serial killer is targetting its young women.
After Mikiko (Machiko Ono), a young woman who'd taken a shine to the distant
yet polite Makoto, is found dead, Makoto is arrested as a suspect by the
same cop who witnessed his heroism, but he's released for lack of evidence.
Makoto buys an old bus, converts it for travelling and takes his two charges
and an initially reluctant Akihiko on a journey to find themselves and begin
again.
The heavily spiritual feel and theme of "Eureka" are similar to Peter
Weir's "Fearless," yet Shinji Aoyama ("Wild Life") takes a completely 
different approach.  "Eureka" is shot in black and white (sepia and white, 
actually) and unfolds at a languid pace over 217 minutes.  Aoyama's ambitious 
story also covers more ground, addressing not only survivor's guilt, but
loss, 
unspoken communication and family.  Unfortunately, his serial killing subplot 
rings false, severely damaging the impact of this otherwise unique and 
fascinating film.
Koji Yakusho grounds the film with his emotional truth while Ken Mitsuishi
and Yoichiro Saito provide some much needed levity, particularly in their
country man/city boy verbal sparring scenes together.  Masaru Miyazaki plays
Naoki as a sullen cipher except when we see him alone, thinking, while 
Aoi Miyazaki portrays Kozue as a more normal, albeit silent, child with 
a trusting, loving nature.  Machiko Ono is touching as Makiko.
The film is an artistic stunner.  Cinematographer Masaki Tamura can make
heat shimmer almost yellow in a black and white world, a light which often
threatens to obscure the film's images.  The three central
characters are frequently framed in center, like a still photograph which
accentuates their alienation.  The slow moving images are punctuated with
squeaky cricket chirping and the sound of waves which symbolically open and 
close the film (sound by Nobuyuki Kikuchi).  Original music by Shinji Aoyama 
and Isao Yamada features guitar, flute and piano lends a dreamlike quality.
"Eureka" demands that the viewer accompany its characters on a long, sometimes
arduous journey.  While one of its major roads leads to an unsatisfying
destination, the trip on the whole is one worth taking.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Quills (2000)
An aristocrat during the French Revolution who spent over half his life in 
prison, the Marquis de Sade, whose actions and literary works resulted in
the coining of the word 'sadism,' has been praised by some as a genius and
vilified by others as a pornographer.  Oscar winner Geoffrey Rush
("Shine") stars as the Marquis during his later years spent in the Charenton
insane asylum supported by his wife, befriended by the Abbe Coulmier (Joaquin
Phoenix, "Gladiator"), bedevilled by Napoleon's emissary Dr. Royer-Collard
(Michael Caine) and in love with a teenage laundress (Kate Winslett).
Doug Wright has adapted his own off-Broadway play and together with director 
Philip Kaufman, ("The Right Stuff," "Henry and June") explores the nature of 
the artist and the effects of repression in "Quills."
The art of writing isn't the most visual one, yet Kaufman, who tackled
writers before in "Henry and June," succeeds with his provoking film "Quills."
Maybe its because he's chosen authors of controversial works laden with
sex, but here, at least, his film works because it gets his audience thinking 
- does the reading of De Sade's books cause humans to behave badly or does the 
censorship of his work create the evil atmosphere?
Kaufman startles us right at the onset of his film.  As the Marquis tells the
tale of a noblewoman with a taste for pain, we see that woman responding to
the hands and kiss of her lover.  Slowly, we realize that that man is an
executioner and that we are seeing a woman at the guillotine just as De Sade
is, gazing out of his prison window.  (The guillotine really was moved behind
a jail when the Parisians began complaining about the smell.)
De Sade, who was arrested for sodomy and kidnapping before his writing
landed him in trouble, spent his last years in an insane asylum because his 
wife's family preferred that to prison.  He had a well furnished room, dined 
well, put on theatrical productions and was visitted by the Abbe Coulmier.
However, when his most notorious novel, 'Justine,' (smuggled out by laundress
Madeleine (Kate Winslet) in this film) made its way into the hands of Napoleon,
Antoine Royer-Collard (Michael Caine), an alienist, was sent to observe
the asylum and its most notorious inmate.  When De Sade's quills and ink
were taken away, he resorts to chicken bones and red wine and later to his
own body.
Wright plays with historical fact in that Coulmier was really a four foot tall
hunchback and little is known of the real Magdeleine except that she visitted
the Marquis.  Here a love triangle is created and it's an effective device
because it shows that good (Madeleine) can be exposed to evil and remain
untouched yet evil (De Sade's writings) is inherent in all men (Coulmier).
The film's climatic tragedy, where De Sade tells a new story to Madeleine
like a game of telephone, illustrates that Royer-Collard's repressive actions
have set the stage for disaster.
Rush revels in naughtily tweaking the saintly Abbe and exposing the 
self-righteous Royer-Collard but he can become scary, allowing darkness to
wash over his face, even as we're laughing at his latest quip.  It's a
charged performance.  Winslet is delicious as the curious laundry girl.
She does devilishly juicy readings of De Sade's work (invented for the film)
yet has an apple cheeked purity about her.  Phoenix, who's shaping into 
a really good actor, gradually changes from a good and innocent Abbe
to a tormented man wrestling with lust.  Caine, beautifully introduced
by Kaufman from behind the head of a man being tortured in a dunking
machine, turns in a bland performance as the brutal doctor.
Support includes Amelia Warner ("Mansfield Park") as Royer-Collards'
child bride, whose sexuality is unleashed by reading the forbidden De Sade,
but with another man.  She's a pretty girl, but this subplot does little
for the film other than to gratify by seeing Royer-Collard cuckholded.
Rush' wife, stage actress Jane Menelaus, plays De Sade's wife and
makes us feel her character's frustration.  Michael Jenn ("The Messenger"),
Danny Babington, George Yiasoumi "Elizabeth," and Stephen Marcus ("Lock,
Stock and Two Smoking Barrels") all create unique inmates.  The great
Billie Whitelaw has been given little to work with as the blind mother
of Madeleine.
The film feels claustrophobic, as the imprisonment of a theatrical
writer should, although the monochromatic palette is somewhat dull.
Costume (Jacqueline West, "Pulp Fiction") is notable from the sexy draping 
of the Abbe's robes to the buxom milkmaid look given to Madeleine.
While "Quills" is provocative, relatively little sex and nudity are shown.  
"Quills" is a movie about words and ideas that will make you think.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Broken Hearts Club: A Romantic Comedy, The (2000)
Writer/director Greg Berlanti brings his experience as a gay man living
in West Hollywood to the screen in "The Broken Hearts Club."  That club
is where the ensemble cast gather to discuss their love lives or work
as waiters for the owner, mother hen Jack (John Mahoney, TV's "Frasier").
The film begins with the 28th birthday party of Dennis (Timothy Olyphant,
"Go"), a photographer who's trying to swear off casual sex and find a
meaningful relationship.  His roommate Cole (Dean Cain, TV's "Superman")
is Dennis' opposite, a shallow pretty boy aspiring actor who flits from one man
to the next carelessly breaking hearts.  He swoops in on Kevin (Andrew
Keegan, "10 Things I Hate About You"), a 'newbie' who's not yet out of
the closet.  This upsets Benji (Zach Braff, "Getting To Know You"), a
spiky haired blond who works with Kevin and had had his eye on him.
Marshall (Justin Theroux) is getting tired of being taken for granted by
Howie (Matt McGrath, "Boys Don't Cry"), who's too impressed with outward
beauty ('I want to be Cole!' he proclaims).  Taylor (Billy Porter), always
bragging about his long term relationship, is quickly upended when he
gets dumped long distance from Hawaii.  Patrick (Ben Weber, resembling
Tom Hanks) believes no one wants him because he's too ugly.  He's
also got a sister (Mary McCormack, "The Big Tease") who wants his sperm to 
impregnant her hostile girlfriend Leslie (Nia Long, "Boiler Room").
When they're not kibbitzing about their love lives, they're scoping out
potential partners, which they alert the others to check out using the
code word 'meanwhile.'  They all unsuccessfully avoid playing on Jack's
Broken Hearts softball team, where they're so spectacularly bad they
can barely tie a seniors group.  The central conflict is that of Dennis
in contrast to Cole.  When Cole dumps Kevin, Dennis steps in to comfort him,
denying his attraction to the younger man.  Cole, meanwhile, gets a 
shot at a Hollywood film and its long-rumorred-to-be-gay-but-married star
and a proverbial dose of his own medicine.
Berlani, who both rejects (no mention of Aids) and embraces (Taylor
demands Judy Garland to ease his upset) gay stereotypes has created
a pleasant ensemble comedy that plays like a gay 'Friends' crossed
with "Four Weddings and a Funeral."  Some of his writing is clever,
such as having Cole use a breakup to practice an audition script he's
written on his hand or when the group compare themselves to Somalian
monkeys who wait until mating season, then attack each other.
Berlani also captures naturally enjoyable performances from his cast, 
particularly Olyphant, Keegan, Cain and Mahoney.  Technically the film 
looks good, wisely keeping locations economical.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Session 9 (2001)
'Well, you know Doc, when something happens it can leave a trace of itself
behind.  Say, like if someone burns toast...'  
New dad Gordon Fleming (Peter Mullan, "My Name Is Joe") desperately needs to
win a contract to keep his Hazmat Elimination Co., an asbestos removal firm,
afloat.  He startles his crew chief Phil (David Caruso, "Proof of Life") by
promising town engineer Bill Griggs (Paul Guilfoyle, "In Dreams") they can
complete a massive job at the abandoned Danvers State Mental Hospital in one
week.  The pressure is on when they and three additional workers enter the
foreboding place in cowriter/director Brad Anderson's "Session 9."
Brad Anderson, whose last film, "Next Stop Wonderland" was also shot in the
Boston area, has found a magnificent location in Massachusetts' Danvers
State Mental Hospital.  He and cowriter/star Stephen Gevedon have fashioned
an homage to Stanley Kubrick's "The Shining," with the modern feel of "The 
Blair Witch Project."  The film loses its tense grip at its climax, when
the titular Session 9 is revealed, but it provides an intensely nerve racking
ride getting there.
We know Gordon is under a lot of pressure, not only because of his shaky
business and some hinted-at problems at home with his beloved wife and new
baby, but because he hears an eerie voice on his first visit to the site.  
Phil begins to doubt his boss's judgement, particularly concerning Gordon's 
loyalty to crew member Hank (Josh Lucas, "You Can Count On Me"), who stole 
Phil's girlfriend and continues to needle him about it.  Hank also rides Jeff 
(Brendan Sexton III, "Welcome to the Dollhouse"), Gordon's neophyte nephew 
who's afraid of the dark.  Mike (Gevedon) is a failed law student who 
immediately gets drawn into the records and patient histories he finds in the 
basement, especially the taped nine sessions of split personality Mary Hobbes. 
Mike, whose uncle was a DA during a satanic ritual abuse case with one of the 
hospital's patients, knows the history of the place and delights in regaling 
his coworkers with tales of horrific abuse and botched lobotomies (based on 
actual stories from Danvers State).
As Mike listens to tapes, Hank discovers a load of silver coins and other
treasures hidden behind a brick wall in a basement corridor (we're made privy
to the other side of that wall where an unsavory looking medical lab still
stands).  Hank returns at night to recoup the treasure and doesn't return to
the
job the next day.  Gordon visits the hospital cemetery to make private phone
calls to his wife.  Phil begins to speak to Mike about Gordon's state of mind.
Mike listens as Mary Hobbes takes on one persona after another.  Jeff's forced 
to face his fears replacing a fuse in a darkened room.
"Session 9" strongly resembles "The Shining" as each passing day is announced
by title card that precedes aerial shots of a forbidding and abandoned old
building with a dark history.  A central figure is a father with job
pressures who can hear the voices of the past.  The film's look is more akin
to "The Blair Witch Project" as shot by a professional (cinematographer Uta
Briesewitz uses the 24P HD camera - widescreen digital video that apes the
frames per second of film and captures every dust mote, paint peel and ray 
of light).  Characters meet their fates in much the same style as Blair Witch 
(camera blackouts) and one is even found facing the corner.  While the name 
Hazmat surely refers to hazardous materials, it sounds mighty similar to
"Blair Witch's" production company, Haxan Entertainment.  "The Texas
Chainsaw" gets a nod via the prominence of a loud, belching generator and
a bloody hand print on a van's exterior.  
The cast all turn in good performances, with Caruso being the standout as
a serious crew chief trying to keeping things pulled together.  Mullan projects
just the right amount of confusion to make us wonder if Phil's concerns
are valid and an air of sadness that matches the gloom of his surroundings.
Sexton III injects a freshness and innocence into the tough, experienced group.
Anderson knows how to build tension.  As his characters go off on their
individual side tracks, he cuts to the other team members innocently going
about their jobs.  Each will be impacted by the actions of the others in
some way.  But above all, Anderson knew a location in need of a horror 
film when he spotted one.
The grounds of Danvers State Mental Hospital are off limits to visitors.
If Burkittesville, Maryland is any indication, they better get more guards.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Thirteen Days (2000)
I was four years old when the Cuban Missile Crisis was going down.  After
seeing director Roger Donaldson's "Thirteen Days," I'm glad I was oblivious
to the saber rattling.
In a year when "The Contender" represents the current state of politics
and the media's obsession with sexual shenanigans, "Thirteen Days" harkens
back to the days of true world leaders.  In October, 1962, President John
F. Kennedy (Bruce Greenwood, "Double Jeopardy") is presented with photographs
identifying Russian missile installations being built in Cuba.  With his
Chiefs of Staff, including extreme Hawk General Curtis LeMay (Kevin Conway,
"Two Family House"), bristling for a fight, Kennedy and his brother Robert
(Steven Culp, "Nurse Betty") are forced to play an intricate game with the
highest of stakes.
David Self's script (1999's "The Haunting") uses Kennedy advisor
Kenny O'Donnell (Kevin Costner) as the audience's eyes and ears into the
escalating tension at the White House as well as a bridge to family life
outside the political arena.  As O'Donnell's name isn't widely recognized,
we're able to observe the likes of the Kennedy brothers, Robert McNamara,
Adlai Stevenson and other notable figures of the era from more common ground.
With the exception of the overly broad Boston accent, Costner delivers fine,
restrained work here.  (Historians may quibble about the extent of O'Donnell's
role, but it works for the film).  While most may be familiar with the
broadstrokes of this event, the script is still rivetting storytelling
as the world's future all comes down to human intuition and second guessing.
O'Donnell's closeness to the Kennedy family is immediately established as
he jokingly spars with Jackie (an unconvincing Stephanie Romanov) over a
White House party guest list.  Soon the major players - Robert McNamara 
(Dylan Baker, "Happiness"), General Maxwell Taylor (Bill Smitrovich),
General Curtis LeMay, Dean Rusk (Henry Strozier), General Marshall Carter 
(Ed Lauter), Lyndon Johnson (Walter Adrian), Dean Acheson (Len Cariou) and 
Ted Sorensen (Tim Kelleher) are assembled in various configurations debating
the course of action.  Kennedy clearly doesn't trust his military advisors
after the Bay of Pigs, so favors a blockade (to be called a quarantine as
a blockade is an act of war).  Many of his advisors find this weak.
O'Donnell takes it upon himself to contact the men in the trenches flying
spying missions over Cuba, to beg them 'not to be shot at' - in other 
words, not to provide any information about Russian aggression to their
commanders.  McNamara squares off against the Naval Chief of Staff in the war 
room, demanding that only the President give orders to fire upon Russian 
naval vessels.
The uneasiness is also represented for the Russian side, as Kruschev's
handwriting is analyzed as 'being under great stress' and O'Donnell
reassures a nervous secretary in the Russian Embassy that he's a friend.
Pacifist Adlai Stevenson (a terrific turn by Michael Fairman) recreates
the famous, televized UN hearing where he accuses the brash then flustered
Soviet Ambassador Valerian Zorin of lying about their missile installations.
Meanwhile Helen O'Donnell (Lucinda Jenney, "Remember the Titans") copes 
with the large O'Donnel brood as her husband intermittently makes his way home 
for brief time periods at odd hours.  The media is held at bay until
JFK addresses the nation, then the American public empties stores of
supplies and holds its collective breath.
Bruce Greenwood beautifully evokes JFK.  Without really looking or sounding
like him, Greenwood gets the body language, the mannerisms, the fiery
intelligence and the uncertainty of the man.  Steven Culp, looking and
sounding quite a bit like RFK, absolutely works off of Greenwood to create
a portrait of the two brothers.
Director of photography Andrzej Bartkowiak ("Dante's Peak") keeps his
camera intimate, occasionally punching up the visuals with shots of 
US pilots darting through dangerous Cuban skies.  Color is gradually
bled from the film, letting some scenes play in a bluish black and white
that recalls the time setting.  Production designer Dennis Washington
("Dante's Peak") did extensive research to recreate JFK's White House.
The film is tautly editted by Academy Award winner Conrad Buff ("Titanic").
The film ends on a grace note.  As the Kennedys and O'Donnell walk outside
the White House walls, we hear the real voice of JFK.  The actors pass, each
leaving a shadow, the last of which is our 35th President.

Title
Review for Memento (2000)
Imagine you can't form new memories, although you can retain all your old
ones to a specific point in time.  Imagine that your last memory is the rape 
and murder of your wife.  Leonard Shelby (Guy Pearce, "L.A. Confidential")
is living that life, trying to find a murderer based on extensive notes, 
body tattoos and Polaroids from which he must reestablish his reality every
10-15 minutes in writer director Christopher Nolan's "Memento."
"Memento" begins with a Polaroid of a grisly murder scene undeveloping and
reentering the camera, establishing the backwards motion of the plot.  We
begin at the end, where Leonard has found his man, John G. aka Teddy (Joe
Pantoliano, "The Matrix").   His own handwriting on the photo identifying
Teddy advises 'don't believe his lies; he is the one - kill him.'  We're in
the same boat as Leonard at this point, basing reality on Leonard's notes,
but Nolan will let us see what Leonard can't know - how he got there.
The film progresses (regresses, actually) with a brief black and white segue
of Leonard alone going through his reestablishing investigative process before
rewinding to show the action which preceded what we have just seen, always
ending where the previous segment began.  This technique is easier to follow
than it sounds, also pulling the audience into mystery-solving mode.
Leonard's been delivered his man by Natalie (Carrie-Anne Moss, "Chocolat")
who he's noted to himself has also lost someone, so will help him out of pity.
The problem is, however, that Natalie seems to be tied to drug dealers and
Fact #5 tattooed on his thigh is that his man is a drug dealer.  Is Natalie
playing him to kill the wrong man?  Leonard (don't call him Lenny - his wife 
used to and he hated it - an odd sentiment to be reminded of by a man whose 
sole reason for existence is her murder's vengeance) bases trust on someone's 
knowledge of his Sammy Jankis story.  Remember Sammy Jankis is tattooed on 
his hand, recalling a heartbreaking tale of a client who also suffered from 
anterograde memory loss whom Leonard encountered in his prior life as an 
insurance investigator.  Natalie knows about Sammy, but then, so does Teddy.
"Memento" is an assured sophomore film from writer/director Christopher
Nolan ("Following"), who fleshed out an idea proposed by his writer brother
Jonathan.  While this unique spin on the troubled private detective may play a 
little fast and loose with its facts, Nolan has a magician's flair for
distracting his audience's attention while he accomplishes his trickery.
Other films have told their stories backwards (the 1983 adaptation of Harold
Pintner's "Betrayal" comes to mind) and many have used amnesia, but short
term memory loss, as presented here, is a more frightening concept.
Nolan chose Burbank, California to project nowhere-ville and director of
photography Wally Pfister ("Scotland, PA") effectively captures the grunge.
The cast work well together with Pearce's withdrawn approach fitting his
mental handicap, Moss' ability to flip from tough to tender keeping us off
balance and Pantoliano's snake oil salesman sleeze making us buy into 
Leonard's world view at the onset.  Mark Boone Junior ("The General's
Daughter") helps provide most of the film's humor as the sympathetic motel
clerk who can't resist an occasional urge to mess with Leonard's head.
Stephen Tobolowsky ("Bossa Nova") and Harriet Sansom Harris ("Nurse Betty")
effectively flesh out Leonard's guilty recollections of the tragic Jankis 
couple.
"Memento" is an intriguing reflection on the relationship between memory
and identify cloaked in a mind puzzler of a mystery.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Pay It Forward (2000)
Mr. Simonet (Kevin Spacey) makes a big impression on his social studies
class because of his badly burned face.  His assignment, which
will cover the entire school year, quickly takes their minds, and particularly
the mind of Trevor (Haley Joel Osment, "The Sixth Sense"), the sensitive
son of a single alcoholic mom (Helen Hunt), off his appearance.  Mr.
Simonet challenges his seventh grade students to change the world.
Director Mimi Leder ("Deep Impact") needed to walk a fine line to keep
"Pay It Forward" from playing like schmaltz.  She mostly succeeds, except
for an unfortunate and cliched choice made in the film's final minutes.
Trevor take his assignment gravely and comes up with the 'pay it forward'
concept - do something really big that will help one person and that person
should repay the favor by doing something for three people.  Trevor begins
by bringing a homeless drug addict (Jim Caviezel, "The Thin Red Line") home
for food, a place to stay and a shower.  Mom's not thrilled when she awakens
from a drunken stupor to find a stranger in her garage, but eventually comes
around to Trevor's way of thinking when Jerry turns out to be a worthy cause.
Trevor's next project is his mom, who he attempts to hook up romantically with
his teacher.  Mr. Simonet doesn't drink and Trevor reasons that a
new man will make mom strong when his shiftless alcoholic dad (Jon Bon Jovi)
next comes a'calling.  His final project, keeping schoolmate Adam from
being beaten up by bullies, plays like a bit of an afterthought.
While these peoples' lives are unfolding in Las Vegas, a second story proceeds 
in reverse order, beginning in LA.  Jay Mohr ("Jerry Maguire") is a reporter 
who is given a new Jaguar by a lawyer when his own car is totalled at a crime 
scene.  The cynical journalist wrests the 'pay it forward' story out of his 
benefactor and begins to trace it back, determined to find the root.
Osment once again proves his acting ability as the seriously determined Trevor.
He seems wise beyond his eleven years, yet can still cut loose and act his
age.  Spacey stretches as the somewhat square teacher who finds himself 
attracted to a woman of a far different economical and educational background.  
He carries himself stiffly, befitting both his emotional wariness and his 
physical condition.  Hunt, looking leathery and overly made up, is his opposite.
She's all breathy and sloppily emotional.  This is a far different single-mom-
of-troubled-son-with-unusual-male-suitor than she played in "As Good As It
Gets," although I'm willing to bet she gets criticized for replaying that role.
Caviezel is a convincing addict, trying and failing to get straight.  
Mohr applies that slightly slimy quality that served him well in "Maguire."  
Angie Dickinson is surprisingly effective as a homeless drunk who lives in her 
car.  Bon Jovi doesn't get a lot of screen time and is merely the stock 
'wrong guy.'
I haven't read the book by Catherine Ryan Hyde so am unsure if screenwriter
Leslie Dixon ("The Thomas Crown Affair") deserves the blame for the three
hanky ending which doesn't serve the film well.  She does work the two reverse 
timelines deftly and the dialogue mostly sounds natural.  Hunt and Spacey have 
an extraordinary exchange when Arlene finally admits why Trevor's troubled - 
'My friends are all drunks and so am I.'  'I believe some people refer to that 
as being in recovery,' responds Simonet.  The two also have an awkward, actory 
dialogue when Simonet reveals how he was burned.  These two scenes exhibit the 
good writing (and ideas) versus the cliched, and the actors can't quite 
overcome the latter.
Cinematographer Oliver Stapelton, who did beautiful work in "The Cider House 
Rules," is a bit more pedestrian here, although he does capture multiple faces 
of Las Vegas, from the glitzy strip to the unfashionable homes of its working 
class to the majestic mountains seen outside Simonet's classroom windows.  The 
chiming bells score is strongly reminiscent of "American Beauty," perhaps to 
recall Spacey's most recent Oscar win with Academy members.  The use of Jane 
Siberry's "Calling All Angels" at the film's finale drives home with soppy 
symbolism the sentimentality so deftly avoided through most of the film's 
running time.
Mimi Leder is heading in the right direction with her third film, although
more emotional restraint (and another ending!) would have served her better.  
"Pay It Forward," though, is sure to be a crowd pleaser.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Bounce (2000)
Hot shot ad exec Buddy Amaral (Ben Affleck) gives up his seat on a plane to 
another man desperate to get home in order to take advantage of the weather
related layover with the pretty young woman he's just met in the airport bar.
He doesn't realize he's just saved his life and doomed that of another.  
One bad year later, encouraged by his assistant (Johnny Galecki, "I Know What
You Did Last Summer") to follow the teachings of AAA, Buddy arranges to meet 
the man's widow, Abby Janello (Gwyneth Paltrow), although he doesn't tell her 
about their connection.  They fall in love, but what will Abby do when she 
finds out that fate had a helping hand?  The complexities of lies and love are 
explored in writer/director Don Roos' ("The Opposite of Sex") "Bounce."
"Bounce" is a well-written, solidly acted love story with a great marketting
hook built in due to the curiosity factor about the casting of former(?) 
lovers Ben Affleck and Gwyneth Paltrow.  Reportedly, this was a project which
Gwyneth proposed to Ben as a vehicle for him to stretch his acting muscles.
Affleck has plenty of opportunity to do so, as his character, Buddy Amaral,
changes dramatically during the course of the film's one year time frame.
Initially a callous, arrogant, womanizing jerk, Buddy sinks into alcoholic
depression, guilt and self pity before being shaken back into becoming a
more mature, self-exploring member of society.  Affleck acquits himself
well in this adult role, but is helped immeasurably by his costar.
Paltrow really gets into the skin of Abby Janello, the widowed mom of
two small boys who tells Buddy her husband divorced her because it feels
more like a choice than the fateful truth.  She's blustering through a 
new job in real estate while dealing with her childrens' abandonment anger
and her own guilt and bereavement.  She makes us feel the strength of
character that enables Abby to carry the staggering weight she's had to
assume.
Roos' script (he was the screenwriter for such diverse films as "Love
Field," "Single White Female," and "Boys on the Side" before writing and
directing "The Opposite of Sex") is smart because his characters are
believable and he presents life in all its multi-layered complexities.
Not only does Buddy have to live with the knowledge that he unwittingly
sent another man to his death, but Infinity Airlines happens to be his
big account.  He must deal with the 'We Remember' ad campaign which
he wins an award for even as he cries hypocrisy.  (His drunken 'acceptance'
speech/breakdown recalls James Mason's Oscar embarrassment in "A Star
Is Born.")  Roos also explores the nature of relationship lies.  While 
Buddy's may be bigger, Abby is also guilty.
Roos' and his actors make small moments count too - you can
feel the moment Buddy falls in love with Abby (he's been resisting getting 
romantically involved) when she jumps up from their diner table to trod
upon the toilet paper trailing from a young prom girl's shoe.
This small selfless gesture speaks volumes about Abby's character and
Affleck's gaze upon her softens and deepens.  Things get dicier as
Buddy shores himself up to tell Abby the truth, which she finds out
before he's able.  His collusion with an Infinity stewardess (Jennifer
Grey) to turn a blind eye to security rules on the night of the crash 
is another character defining moment.
Support is good with Johnny Galecki giving a tart turn as the fearless
office assistant who makes Buddy face his real self.  I liked this young
actor in TV's 'Roseanne' and its encouraging to see him nail a role in
a non-teen-slasher film.  Tony Goldwyn (who also appears in "The 6th Day,"
opening the same day as "Bounce") establishes his character of Abby's husband 
so well with such short screen time that we feel his presence throughout
the film.  The film also costars Joe Morton as Buddy's boss/partner, Natasha
Henstridge as Mimi, Buddy's airport pickup and Caroline Aaron as Abby's
friend and neighbor.
Technically the film is first rate with intimate lensing by Robert Elswit 
(all three Paul Thomas Anderson films).  Smart editting (David Codron, "The
Opposite of Sex") choices are made in that the films two major crashes (the
second allegorical) are not shown, making the aftermaths more earth
shattering.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Mulholland Drive (2001)
A dark haired woman (Laura Elena Harring, "Little Nicky") is ordered out of 
a car at gunpoint just before it's hit head on by a bunch of joyriding teens. 
Dazed, she climbs from the wreck and makes her way to a Hollywood apartment 
being vacated by an older woman.  
A perky blond (Naomi Watts, "Dangerous Beauty") arrives to stay at her Aunt 
Ruth's vacant place with dreams of movie stardom dancing in her head.  Betty 
finds the dark haired woman in Aunt Ruth's shower, but 'Rita' doesn't remember
who she is or why her purse is stuffed with hundred dollar bills and a blue 
key.  The two set out to discover what led to her accident on "Mulholland 
Drive."
After the linear "The Straight Story," writer/director David Lynch is back
in the weird world of nightmares with this cautionary tale of dashed
dreams and lost love.  Lynch fans should rejoice as "Mulholland Drive" is
his best film since "Blue Velvet."
That film is immediately recalled with the light/dark parallels of Betty
and Rita to Laura Dern and Isabella Rossellini's characters.  The twist here
is that we're in 'Betty's' dream, getting events filtered through her own 
idea of her good, talented self.  'I just came from Deep River, Ontario 
and now I'm in this dream place,' Betty chirps at LAX.  The real woman we 
finally meet has a far darker soul, besmirched by her experiences in
tinseltown.
One person having a torturous day in her REM state is Adam (Justin
Theroux, "American Psycho"), a director with a penchant for Fellini-esque 
eyewear.  He's being pressured by the mysterious Castigliane brothers (Dan 
Hedaya and composer Angelo Badalementi) to cast an unknown woman, Camille 
Rhodes, in his movie.  After bashing their limo with a golf club, he heads 
home to discover his wife in bed with the pool man.  He takes residence in a 
fleabag hotel and gets word that his bank has notified the manager that his 
credit's no good.  Then his assistant tells him he's to meet 'The Cowboy' 
later that night.  This Robert-Blake like character's message?  When Camille 
auditions, he's to say 'That's the girl.'
Meanwhile, Betty's audition is so successful a visiting casting agent 
tries to steel her away and steer her towards Adam, but Betty, having promised
to meet Rita, with whom she's fallen in love, nervously flees.  Rita thinks 
she might be Diane Selwyn and the two trace Diane's apartment only to find 
that Rita is not Diane and the dead body inside the apartment very well 
could be.
Trademark Lynch touches abound, from the opening car driving along a median
strip on a dark road and subsequent car accident, to kitschy diners (Winkie's 
here, complete with ghoul in its back alley) and red draped rooms inhabited 
by Mr. Roque (Michael J. Anderson, "Twin Peaks'" Man From Another Place).  The
Club Silencio, where all is illusion and everything's on tape (shades of "Lost
Highway"), features a singer belting out a Spanish rendition of Roy Orbison's 
"Crying" acappella.  The industrial soundscapes and Badalementi score provide
the signature Lynch sound while cinematographer Peter Deming's ("Lost Highway)
camera creeps around corners towards sinister doorways and swoops into the
black hole of a blue box.  
Naomi Watts ably plays both the light and dark sides of a woman in love
trying to survive in L.A. (her audition scene's a doozy).
Harring does well playing the sympathetic mystery woman of the dream and
the harder beauty of reality.  Theroux adds sardonic humor.  The legendary
Ann Miller is Coco in both worlds.  Watch for an uncreditted cameo by Lee 
Grant as Lorraine.
In June of 1999, Jack Nicholson was in a car accident with an initially
unidentified 29 year old woman on Mulholland Drive.  She turned out to
be Lara Flynn Boyle, the 'good' friend of "Twin Peaks'" doomed Laura
Palmer.  (Jack also had a road rage incident with a golf club.)  Is this
what David Lynch's dreams are made of?  Whatever the inspiration, 
"Mulholland Drive" is Lynch at the top of his game.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Iedereen beroemd! (2000)
EVERYBODY'S FAMOUS! (Iedereen beroemd!)
Jean Vereechen (Josse De Pauw) is a blue collar man who spends his
weekends cheering on his daughter Marva (Eva Van Der Gucht) in talent
competitions which she never comes close to winning.  Blind to her lack of
talent, Jean pathetically tries to create the hit song that will make her
a star.  When Jean runs into real star singer, Debbie (Thekla Reuten), 
he concocts a wild kidnapping scheme which will change their lives in 
Dominique Deruddere's Belgian Foreign Language Oscar nominee, "Everybody's 
Famous!"
"Everybody's Famous!" is a good-hearted crowd-pleaser along the lines of
films like "The Full Monty."  While it won't be mistaken for art, it's an
assured piece of entertainment that goes down easy.
Josse De Pauw's Jean has a cinematic twin in Michael Caton's Darryl Kerrigan 
of the 1997 Australian film, "The Castle."  Similar in appearance,
they're both devoted family men who remain optimistic in the face of 
relentless obstacles and possess either the courage (or madness) to buck
the system.
Jean's daughter Marva does have a singing voice - she's just trapped in an
overweight body (which may be the result of those Belgian waffle with
whipped cream breakfasts dad lovingly prepares).  Marva knows people judge
by appearances, so she puts up an emotional wall which in turn makes her
singing delivery flat and atonal.  We know Jean's faith in her isn't 
completely misguided when we're privy to a children's puppet show - hidden
from an audience which accepts her anyway, Marva's voice rings out
clear as a bell.  Yet, Marva's a teenager and her dad's cheerleading annoys 
her.  She sulks while long suffering mom Chantal (Gert Portael) rolls her
eyes.
Jean gets his encouragement from his buddy and coworker Willy (Werner de
Smedt), a young naive guy who admires Jean's songwriting (Jean la-la-las
into a tape recorder, then verbally describes the trumpet flourishes and
guitar strums which will embellish his latest masterpiece).  The two
are laid off from their factory jobs and Jean desperately tries to keep up
a charade for his family.  When the popular singer known simply as Debbie 
(Thekla Reuten) crosses paths with Jean, he impulsively knocks her out
and persuades Willy to join him in a kidnapping scheme.
Jean arranges to meet with Debbie's manager Michael (Victor Low, a Terry 
Gilliam lookalike), hilariously outfitted in a Michael Jackson mask.
Michael manages to keep a straight face as Jean asks him to produce his
'song' and interview the perfect singer to make it a number one hit.
Michael, who's elated at Debbie's skyrocketing record sales since the
kidnapping, has his own agenda.  Meanwhile, Debbie, who hasn't had sex in
two years, is finding Willy to be a pretty nice guy.
Deruddere juggles his plot threads dexterously, keeping his film moving
along at a jaunty pace that's punctuated with various celebrity impersonator
performances (Marva's seen having a go at Madonna while an Otis Redding
imitator (Hein Sienkiewicz) is truly impressive).  The bright production
and costume design are fun while also being realistic (Jean's series of
pink and teal shirts are particularly amusing).  Jean's song for Marva,
"Lucky Manuelo," is a plausible quick production while also sounding like
a potentially radio-friendly piece of Euro-pop and van der Gucht's performance
of it at the film's climax is a delight.
While Deruddere's professed intent to make a statement regarding current
society's overwhelming aspirations to fame and fortune is only superficially
hinted at (most notably in the film's closing joke as end credits roll), 
"Everybody's Famous!" succeeds as a sunny and sentimental family comedy.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Pledge, The (2001)
When Reno homicide detective Jerry Black (Jack Nicholson) leaves his own
retirement party to assist at the remote mountain murder site of an
eight-year-old girl, he doesn't know he's taking a life-altering step in
"The Pledge."
"The Pledge" may begin with a couple of hoary movie cliches (a detective on 
the verge of retirement coupled with a potential serial killer on the loose),
but from this jumping off point, the film takes few expected turns.
Jerry proves his worth and experience at the crime scene by advising his
partner Stan (Aaron Eckhart, "Nurse Betty") to get the child's buttons bagged
for fingerprinting purposes.  The inept local cops have not only compromised
the crime scene, but have dragged their feet on notifying the victim's parents.
Jerry takes this duty on only to find himself making a solemn oath to 
Mrs. Larsen (Patricia Clarkson, "High Art") that he will find her daughter's
killer.
When a suspect is quickly brought into custody, Stan gets the feeble minded
native American (Benicio Del Toro, "Traffic") to confess, but Jerry isn't
convinced.  Under the guise of his retirement fishing trip, Black continues
to investigate the crime, even purchasing a gas station at crossroads he's
convinced the killer will visit.  Jerry also forms an attachment to single
mother Lori (Robin Wright Penn, "Message in a Bottle") and her eight year
old daughter Chrissy.
Adapted from the Friedrich Durrenmatt novel by Jerzy Kromolowski and Mary
Olson-Kromolowski, "The Pledge" is a character study of a man so obssessed
with his mission that he loses the chance to make a life for himself.
Director Sean Penn ("The Crossing Guard") has assembled an incredible cast
to flesh out the story as he focusses on Black/Nicholson's journey.
Penn gets the closest thing to a real performance out of the superstar 
that Nicholson's given in years.  Unfortunately, Nicholson has become such a
larger than life caricature of himself that when he attempts to shed his
own persona you sometimes see the gears turning.  
Support is almost an embarrassment of riches with some of the best in the
business appearing in little more than one scene cameos.  Firstly, Benicio
Del Toro goes out on a limb with a strange interpretation of the feeble
minded initial suspect and not only pulls it off but makes an indelible
impression while doing so.  Vanessa Redgrave is perfect as the Scandanavian
grandmother of the victim who professes to be 'all business' when giving her
granddaughter her piano lesson.  (Great resemblance casting as well - Redgrave
looks like the mother of Patricia Clarkson.)  Helen Mirren is a psychologist
Jerry goes to for help to interpret a drawing of the victim's.  Mirren
creates tension (ably assisted by Penn's multiple POV editting choices) by
turning the tables on Jerry's motivations (which in turn present him as
a possible suspect).  Lois Smith ("Twister") is good as a disabled, elderly
mother who may not see her son for what he is while Tom Noonan ("What Happened
Was...") is creepily effective as the religious man with an interest in
Chrissy.  Mickey Rourke is the broken father of a missing girl.  Harry Dean
Stanton is the bored gas station owner who gets an unexpected windfall.  Sam
Shepard is Jerry's former boss.
In the larger supporting roles, Wright Penn captures a broken woman happy
to just be just getting along, amazed when she gets something better.  Aaron
Eckhart makes Jerry's partner Stan a young Turk who can't wait to brush
aside the older guy to step prematurely into the limelight.
Technically, Penn is supported by cinematographer Chris Menges ("A World 
Apart") and editor Jay Cassidy ("The Crossing Guard") who capture the 
gorgeous terrain (British Columbia, Canada, stands in for Nevada) and
intimate interiors in unconventional ways (overhead shots, dissolves,
overlapping time sequence edits).  An early scene, where Jerry approaches
the Larsens to deliver bad news, is staged amidst thousands of turkeys
who drown out the (unneeded) dialogue - a unique and brilliant choice.
The score by Hans Zimmer and Klaus Badelt ("Gladiator") enhances the story 
by using musical themes to denote character (native American drum percussion 
worked with piano, for instance).
"The Pledge" has a unique, albeit open ended conclusion which may leave
some viewers feeling unsatisfied.  Penn has clearly taken the artistic
high road here, and while he doesn't always succeed, he's created a 
haunting piece of work.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Cast Away (2000)
Chuck Noland (Tom Hanks) emphasizes the digital clock just installed in
Fed Ex's newest office in Russia to his new hires in training.  He calls
his girlfriend Kelly (Helen Hunt) to rhapsodize over the fact that he's 
sorting packages within the shadows of Red Square, and that he'll be
home for Christmas in Memphis in eighteen hours.  At the extensive family 
dinner table, the troubleshooter is beeped for another emergency halfway
around the world, forcing him to exchange gifts with Kelly in their car at 
the airport.  She gives him a pocket watch containing her picture that had 
belonged to her grandfather.  He gives her a package the size of a ring box, 
waves and declares 'I'll be right back!' in director Robert Zemeckis' "Cast 
Away."
Of course, Chuck isn't right back.  The private FedEx plane he's on begins
to encounter mechanical difficulties in a storm over the Pacific.  Chuck
risks hurtling objects to secure his new pocketwatch, then watches the
sea approaching through the cockpit windshield.  Miraculously, he finds his
way out of the plane and inflates a life raft, which pulls him to the stormy
surface.  Luck is again on his side when he washes up on an abandoned beach.
However, he quickly discovers the island is uninhabitted, so constructs
a large help sign on the beach and begins to gather wreckage, packages
and the one dead body which wash ashore in the aftermath of his crash.
Survival means learning how to open coconuts, catch fish, and make fire.
As it begins to dawn on Chuck that his chances of rescue are slight (he
figures out that the search area must be twice the area of Texas), he
starts to open the FedEx packages he's neatly stacked and protected (ever
the company man).  A punk rock dress is turned into a fishing net; figure
skates are used as cutting tools, and eventually, for dental surgery; video
cassettes provide binding material.  A volleyball, marked with Chuck's own
handprint in blood, looks like a face and becomes Chuck's confident, Wilson.
All the while, though, that precious picture of Kelly beckons and Chuck
knows survival isn't enough - he has to attempt to save himself or die
trying.
"Cast Away's" already gathered reams of press during its production
due to the unusual nature of its shooting schedule.  First, Hanks gained
weight, ballooning over 200 lbs.  The first half of the film was shot,
then went on hiatus as Zemeckis went off and made "What Lies Beneath,"
while Hanks dieted almost fifty pounds off his frame and let his hair
and beard grow wild.  (The transition is handled unimaginatively in
the film with a 'four years later' title card.)
Hanks deserves a lot of credit for tackling this role, not only for the
physical hardships he endured.  Yes, it's Best Actor nomination (and
possibly a third win) time for America's favorite thespian again.  For
almost two hours of the film's 140 minute running time, Hanks is alone.
His Chuck Nolan begins the film as a company guy who's always too on the
move to stop and smell the roses.  While he truly loves Kelly, he has
trouble expressing emotion.  On the island, he goes through hope, despair,
frustration, industriousness, creativity, cowardice and courage.  The
man brings tears to your eyes over a *volleyball*.  
Of the barely-there support, Hunt is fine.  Better is Nick Searcy as Chuck's 
buddy Stan, who's losing his beloved wife of many years to cancer.  Searcy is 
true support to Hanks, playing a man more in touch with life, ironically 
through approaching death, than pre-accident Chuck.  And let's not forget
Wilson, probably one of the best supporting inanimate object in film history.
Zemeckis' production is top notch, with ace lensing by Don Burgess ("What Lies
Beneath") and tight editting by Arthur Schmidt.  Alan Silvestri's score is 
simple, yet effective.  Screenplay by Willian Broyles Jr. shows provides nice 
grace notes, such as the (Guardian) angels' wings which embellish the 
one package Chuck doesn't open, providing a connection from film's opening to
closing.  Time is measured in seconds, then in months.
"Cast Away" is a reflection upon what's really important in life and 
a showcase for Hanks' acting abilities.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Diamond Men (2000)
Eddie Miller (Robert Forster, "Jackie Brown"), a man in his fifties, suddenly
finds his livelihood threatened when a mild heart attack renders
him uninsurable.  He's a fine jewelry salesman who travels throughout
Pennsylvania with a million dollars worth of inventory.  Clinging to the only
job he knows, Eddie agrees to train his replacement, the young, brash
Bobby Walker (Donnie Wahlberg, "The Sixth Sense") in writer/director 
Dan Cohen's "Diamond Men."
Bobby arrives in a flashy sports car ('I can't sit in that seat - my prostrate
will be up in my throat,' harrumphs Eddie) full of bravado.  When Eddie
worries
about 'protecting the line' by remaining inconspicuous, Bobby retorts that
it's insured and begins to score chicks in each remote hamlet.  He's late
in the morning, uses profanity in front of customers and can't handle
jeweler's equipment.  Eddie is beside himself, but one day they have a
breakthrough when Bobby appreciates Eddie explaining the difference between 
two diamonds to a shopper.  'What's the magic word?' he asks Eddie afterwards,
referring to Eddie's ability to make sale after sale while he strikes out.  
'They're not saying no, they're saying give me a reason to say yes,' replies 
Eddie.  
Now that the young man has asked for his help, Eddie softens and they open
up to each other.  Bobby scored well on a test, but he admits a friend 
actually filled it out and his only experience on the road has been filling
vending machines.  Eddie, meanwhile, has recently lost his beloved wife to
cancer and the long illness just about wiped him out financially.  Eddie 
becomes more encouraging and patient training Bobby while Bobby becomes
committed to finding a female companion for Eddie.  When none of his small
town conquests are interested in the older man, Bobby brings him to his
friend Tina (Jasmine Guy, TV's "A Different World"), who runs The Altoona
Riding Club, a backwoods brothel.  It's here that Eddie's nightmares and
unimagined dreams will both come true.
Cohen has not one, but two triumphs with his small, independent feature.
Firstly, he captures completely the world of a salesman's small town route
where routine and out of the way motels and restaurants are comfortingly
familiar and customers are treated like old friends.  Secondly, he's elicited
strong and natural performances from his two costars, with Forster's 
being one of the best male leads of the year.
Forster's Eddie is an exceedingly decent and competent man, trying to roll 
with the extremely bad hand he's been dealt.  While he's initially (and
justifiably) exasperated with Bobby's behavior, he always keeps his cool, 
like the mellow jazz he likes to listen to.  Wahlberg is hilariously obnoxious
at first, hoping his flashy loudness will be misinterpreted as confidence.
Bess Armstrong is good, if a bit too clinical as Katie, the woman Eddie
meets at Tina's and George Coe is fine as Tip, one of Eddie's oldest
customers.
The film begins to lose its momentum in its final act, but finds its
way back again by delivering a satisfying and unexpected punchline.
"Diamond Men" sparkles most, however, when examining the moments so many
would find dull.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Woman on Top (1999)
Beautiful Isabella (Penelope Cruz, "All About My Mother") is gifted with
the art of cooking but cursed with severe motion sickness.  Things would
seem perfect when she marries handsome restaurant owner Toninho (Murilo
Benicio), but she ends up holed away in his kitchen while he charms his
patrons outside.  When Toninho's macho need to be on top causes him to
stray, Isabella flees Brazil for San Francisco and her childhood friend
Monica (Harold Perrineau, Jr., "The Best Man").  There she becomes the
star of her own television show, 'Passion Food,' while Toninho tries to
win her back in "Woman On Top."
"Woman On Top" is a "Like Water for Chocolate" wannabe that isn't.  While
it features cooking as a metaphor for love and has plenty of Latin fantasy
elements it just doesn't have the richness of Arau's film.  And the motion
sickness plot element is just plain weird.
Cruz is gorgeous (in one scene, every man that crosses her path ends up
following her right into her cooking school class) and it's enjoyable 
watching her whip up Brazilian dishes heavy on the chilies, but Isabella
isn't really that interesting of a character.  It's actually more involving
seeing Toninho develop from a careless charmer to a devoted husband
(and Brazilian actor Benicio is quite easy on the eyes, resembling a
Latin version of Russell Crowe).  Harold Perrineau is delightful as
drag queen Monica who revels in dressing up in traditional Brazilian 
costume to serve as Isabella's cooking sidekick, yet he doesn't provide
his character with the appropriate accent.  Mark Feuerstein ("Rules of
Engagement") mostly mugs for the camera as Isabella's producer and new
love interest.  Anne Ramsay ("A League of Their Own") stands out in a tiny 
role as the TV show's director with her witty quips.
The script is the first produced work of Brazilian Vera Blasi, who suffers 
from motion sickness herself (which at least explains, if not excuses, that
element).  The story is told like a fairy tale, yet relies far too heavily
on voiceover narration.  The film was directed by Venezuelan Fina Torres 
("Celestial Clockwork"), so two Latin women have given Spanish star Cruz her 
first English language lead.  
The film pops with color as shot by award winning cinematographer Thierry 
Arbogast ("The Fifth Element"), yet for a film about Brazilian soul, we're 
shown little of the country.  San Francisco is somewhat better represented.  
Lots of traditional Brazilian music is provided, as performed by Murilo 
Benicio while rewooing his wife.  
While this lightweight Penelope Cruz vehicle has its charms it seems to take
forever to reach a forgone conclusion.  "Woman on Top" wafts away like
the aromas seen coming from Isabella's cooking pots.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Sexy Beast (2000)
Gary 'Gal' Dove (Ray Winstone, "The War Zone") is living a hedonistic life
on the southern coast of Spain with his beloved wife Deedee (Amanda Redman).
They tan in the blazing sun, swim in their custom pool, and eat and drink
with their best friends Aitch (Cavan Kendall) and Jackie (Julianne White).
One day, Gal's almost killed by an errant boulder which crashes into their
pool, cracking the tiles.  His day will be even more shook up when he learns
that the fearsome Don Logan (Ben Kingsley, "Rules of Engagement") is flying
in to get Gal back to London for a major heist in "Sexy Beast."
Working from a feature debut script by Louis Mellis and David Scinto,
commercial and music video director Jonathan Glazer, together with long-time
collaborator, director of photography Ivan Bird, makes a startlingly stylish
entry into the British gangster genre.  From the opening shot of the oiled
and tanning Ray Winstone highlighted by a background of sheer white, Glazer
lets us know we're in the hands of an accomplished image maker.
Glazer's no slouch with character development either.  We immediately can
feel that Gal's money comes from a shady background.  We also know that Gal
adores his wife Deedee.  Winstone and Redmond share a comfortable intimacy
on screen, which Glazer highlights with the fantastical as Deedee emerges from 
their pool framed in a smoky heart Gal's just blown from his cigar.
The tension becomes palpable when Jackie informs them that Don Logan's called
and is arriving the next day.  We're first introduced to Logan by the back
of Ben Kingsley's shaved dome, and damn if he doesn't project menace from even
that angle.  Kingsley, in a performance best described as psychotic pitbull,
won't take no for an answer from Gal, who keeps insisting that he's retired.
Logan lets Gal into a secret regarding Jackie, immediately regretting 
tipping his hand to his real agenda.  The four friends, together with Gal's
devoted Spanish pool boy, put up a protective front, but in the end, Gal
must return to London.
Glazer's sunbleached whites, blues and yellows abruptly turn to watery
grays and greens as Gal's greeted by rain and learns of the plot to rob a
vault by drilling underwater through the Turkish bath next door.  Teddy
Bass (Ian McShane), the operation's mastermind, is far more sinister than
Don Logan and Gal keeps Deedee in his mind like a beacon as he attempts to
circumvent the landmines of his former underworld.
"Sexy Beast" falls somewhere between the best of the genre - "The Long Good
Friday," for example, and the stylish hijinks of Guy Ritchie's "Snatch."
While Kingsley's barking madman is the attention getter, it's Winstone's
paunchy loverboy that has staying power.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Dr. T & the Women (2000)
Robert Altman is one of the great American film directors.  He's developed
a unique style, creating slices of life with large ensemble casts whose
stories interweave and bustling scenes where one can follow several strands
of overlapping dialogue.
With "Dr. T and the Women," Altman, again collaberating with screenwriter
Anne Rapp ("Cookie's Forturn") gives us one of his more middling creations.
The film opens in Dr. T's office, which is in a state of chaos.  Office
manager Carolyn (Shelley Long) is almost winning a losing battle, keeping
Houston society's elite ladies moving through three wittily named
examining rooms.  Dr. T's home life is also coming undone as his beloved
but mentally unbalanced wife Kate (Farrah Fawcett) jumps nude into shopping
mall fountains while his eldest daughter Dee Dee (Kate Hudson, "Almost
Famous") plans her wedding.  His alcoholic sister-in-law Peggy (Laura
Dern) has also moved into his manse with her three young daughters.
Dr. T relaxes on hunting and golfing trips with three male buddies, but
even the country club is invaded when a new golf pro, Bree (Helen Hunt), 
arrives and sets her cap for him.
Anne Rapp's fantastical script drips with female symbolism, from Kate's
diagnosed Hestia complex to the constant water references which culminate
in a fateful storm.  However, only a few of the characters manage to 
make themselves stand out admist the throng.
Gere is fine as the sympathetic gynecologist being trampled by life and
hordes of females.  He's softer than usual here and it befits his character
nicely.  Fawcett is quite good reverting to a childlike state.  Laura
Dern is a real standout as the champagne guzzling whirlwind who plays
at motherhood (Dr. T's maid Maria (Irene Cortez) is the one who really
keeps Peggy's girls in control).  Shelley Long gives a wonderful comic
performance as Dr. T's right hand woman who's maybe too happy to hear about
his marital woes.  Janine Turner (TV's "Northern Exposure," "Cliffhanger")
makes a welcome return to the screen as Dorothy, a serial patient who makes 
appointments only to get the reassurance she doesn't get from her husband 
(one of Dr. T's hunting pals).
Neither Kate Hudson nor Tara Reid make much of an impression as Dr. T's
daughters, although Altman vet Liv Tyler fares a bit better as a suspect
maid of honor.  Helen Hunt makes a convincing golf pro and down to earth
romantic foil for Gere.
However, why would the faithful Dr. T allow himself to be so quickly seduced 
after we learn that Kate's Hestia complex is suffered by 'women who are loved 
too much?'  An amusing sideline is developed between Dorothy and an elderly
woman in Dr. T's waiting room, but when the woman trips Dorothy with her
cane, Dorothy blames the incident on Dr. T - nonsensical.  The finale,
which could be viewed as either a return to the womb or homage to "The
Wizard of Oz," is pretty bizarre.  The film could even be seen as misogynistic.
The women are constantly presented as babbling hens (none of Altman's 
overlapping dialog here - instead we get a maelstrom of cackle!) whether
in the waiting room, getting dress fittings or at a wedding shower.
Altman also makes a couple of visual puns using store signs (he pans up
to the Godiva sign as Kate frolicks nude), but they seem out of place
when the device isn't carried through.  Big kudos to costume designer
Dona Granata ("Cookie's Fortune"), however, whose work really helps define 
the characters and adds comic touches.  Altman's son Stephen's production
design nails the lifestyle of a wealthy Houston doctor and his pampered
clients.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Panic (2000)
'Ever get the feeling that you're dead?' asks Alex (William H. Macy,
"State and Main") at his first appointment with psychologist Dr. Parks
(John Ritter, "Sling Blade").  Alex is severely depressed, probably due
to the family business he's looking to get out of - contract killing.
While he has an amazing relationship with his young son Sammy, 
(David Dorfman, "Bounce") his marriage to Martha (Tracey Ullman) is at
a crossroads when he meets Sarah (Neve Campbell) in Dr. Parks' office in
first time writer/director Henry Bromell's "Panic."
"Panic" is one of those heralded little films which played festivals but
is having a difficult time getting theatrical release.  This could be due
to its 'hitman goes to shrink' theme, already covered in "The Sopranos"
and "Analyze This," or it could be due to a niche quirkiness that would appeal
to an audience willing to overlook its flaws.
"Panic" makes mistteps, but also takes some intriguing side roads, 
particularly in its unique familial relationships.  Alex lies in Sammy's
bed every evening and has real conversations with the boy (portrayed as
maybe just a bit too precocious).  Alex' relationship with his own dad
is another matter entirely and is summed up by a flashback of Michael
showing the young Alex how to shoot a squirrel with a Walther PPK - 
something the boy clearly does not wish to do.  Mom Diedre (Barbara Bain, 
TV's "Mission Impossible") acts as a sounding board to Alex' face ('Don't 
tell Martha - I want this kept private' she's informed by a son who confides
in his mother over his wife), yet immediately informs husband Michael of 
Alex's shrink visits because 'I thought you ought to know.'
The romantic angle, which appears to be a focal point of the story, is left 
hung out to dry, however.  Alex is too much the family man to leave Martha
for Sarah and Sarah refuses to be his mistress.  A flashback which shows
how Alex met Martha is far more interesting than anything that happens with
the present day flirtation.
Macy is good as a man torn between his duty to his father and to his son
and really makes you feel the chlostrophobic panic of his situation.  Donald 
Sutherland, in the pivotal role of the ruthless Michael, is simply miscast.  
He's an actor that embodies characters which are patrician, intellectual or
bohemian, but just doesn't work as a crass, ruthless breeder of hitmen.
He does succeed in one scene, where he accompanies Alex's young brother on
his first hit, sending the man off like a kid on a bicycle with training
wheels.  Barbara Bain shows steely nerve as the mom who's more loyal to her
husband's interests than one would expect.  Ullman is totally believable
as Sammy's mom, the woman who intrigued Alex enough to court and wed her,
but is now confused by their marital state.  Neve Campbell isn't given much
to work with to make Sarah anything but symbolic of a midlife crisis.
Dorfman, directed with just a notch more restraint, could have made
Sammy one of the best child portrayals of the year.
Once "Panic" lays its groundwork, it's fairly easy to predict where it's
going, yet it has enough unique grace notes to make it a worthwhile curiousity.
Keep an eye on filmmaker Bromwell.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Cleopatra's Second Husband (1998)
When Robert (Paul Hipp, "Midnight in the Garden of Good and Evil") and
his overbearing wife Hallie (Bitty Schram, "Kissing a Fool") plan a 
babymaking trip to the country, friends of friends Zack (Boyd Kestner,
G.I. Jane") and Sophie (Radha Mitchell, "Pitch Black") move in to take
care of their dog and exotic tropical fish.  When they get home, they
encounter disarray, dead fish, seduction and psychological game playing
in feature debut writer/director Jon Reiss' "Cleopatra's Second Husband."
Reiss claims to have based his tale on a true life housesitting incident
combined with Marc Anthony's decline in the wake of his passion for
Cleopatra.  He makes no mention of the Dutch film (and its American remake)
"The Vanishing," although clearly it inspired his third act.
After Zack and Sophie declare they're unable to find their own place in LA,
Robert quickly becomes enthralled by sexy Sophie and Hallie departs after 
catching the two together.  Zack seems perfectly willing to share Sophie,
but when he forces himself on Robert, Sophie leaves in disgust.  Zack
continues to dominate Robert, even buying him an apron, while clouding
his true intentions with a show of friendship and camaraderie.  Eventually
Robert wises up and plots an elaborate revenge.
While the script contains some good (albeit unoriginal) ideas, the story
is so oddly executed that it frequently seems weird for weirdness' sake.
Robert, a photographer existing on inheritted money, stops to photograph
maggots on roadkill during his country idyll.  'Maggots and dead things -
I like it.' says Sophie later as she watches him develop the picture.
This is strange and offputting, but leads absolutely nowhere, nor does
it provide any character illumination.
The only character who's the least bit likeable is the promiscuous Sophie,
yet we wonder how she ended up with evil Zack and what their history was.
Robert is a henpecked schlmemiel who's introduced hosting a dinner party
of annoying yuppies impressed with pretense.  Hallie is unbearable and 
joyless, demanding sex once a month only in order to get pregnant, because
that's the way it's done.  Zack is a slovenly satyr and a leech.  The cast
can't be faulted as they all do a good job playing their characters.
"Cleopatra's Second Husband" would make an OK diversion for late night cable,
but as a theatrical feature it's appeal will be extremely limitted.  The
film completely loses its stream in its final act which is unsatisfying
and unappealing.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Book of Shadows: Blair Witch 2 (2000)
It's 1999 and fans of a movie called "The Blair Witch Project" are flocking
to the annoyed town of Burkittsville, Maryland.  Local resident (and former
mental patient) Jeffrey Patterson is cashing in with Blair Witch merchandise
and is taking four tourists on his inaugural 'Blair Witch Hunt' armed with
multiple video cameras.  Once at the ruins of Rustin Parr's house, however, 
the group blacks out (after a fair share of partying) to discover ruined 
equipment, shredded book drafts, and several hours unaccounted for on their 
video in "Book of Shadows:  Blair Witch 2."
Daniel Myrick and Eduardo Sanchez, the original Blair Witch creators, step
back to executive producer credits for the sequel (they are supposedly writing
Blair Witch 3, which will be a prequel) to their smash hit "The Blair Witch
Project" and let documentarian Joe Berlinger ("Paradise Lost," "Brother's 
Keeper") pick up the reins as director and cowriter (with Dick Beebe, 1999's 
"House on Haunted Hill").
Firstly, this film bears no resemblance to its predecessor except for its 
adherence to the Blair Witch lore, so artfully created and expanded upon on 
the www.blairwitch.com website.  While I've heard preview audiences complain
that this film is incomprehensible, given thought, it very neatly 
ties into the legend, while also acknowledging the film as a media event
with a wink and an intriguing look at the cause and effect of violence in
popular artforms.  It helps to have kept up with all the Sci-Fi channel
specials (this one recalls the video/DVD special airing of "The Burkittsville 
Seven").
The film's establishing act humorously begins with MTV's Kurt Loder speaking
about the phenomenom followed by Roger Ebert's television review before
showing hordes of teenagers raiding Burkittsville's cemetary and Black Hills
('Get out of the woods!  There's no damn Blair Witch! screams the town
sheriff over a megaphone.)  One woman recounts how she so successfully sold
Blair Witch twig figures on her front lawn that she eventually was persuaded
to sell the stones from her rock garden for $10.  This is as funny and hip and
the original film's premise, although we begin to see MTV style edits of
disturbing images of torture and mutilation around the time the opening credits 
begin to roll over Marilyn Manson's "Disposable Teens."
Second act rounds up the new group.  Tellingly, young couple Tristen Skyler 
and Stephen Turner are working on a book about "The Blair Witch Project"
that asks 'hysteria or history?'  (As in "The Blair Witch Project," the
characters' names are the same as the actors who play them.)  Erica Leerhsen
is a Wiccan who wants to commune with the Blair Witch, who she believes
was a child of nature, like herself, treated in her time like some unfortunate
women of Salem.  Goth chick Kim Director professes to be psychic, immediately
sensing Tristen's unwanted pregnancy.
The group set up camp at the ruins of the house where the movie trio met
their demise and are immediately overrun by a walking tour group comprised of
two young entrepeneurs and their customers, a Chinese couple and a German
woman.  After a brief spat, Stephen's group coyly suggest they saw something
sinister at Coffin Rock, which sends the second group scurrying.
Alcohol and pot are consumed in abundance before the five awaken to find
the 'Hysteria or History' text fluttering down upon them like snow.  With
Kim's help, they find their videotapes in the same place Heather's were 
discovered.  Then Tristen has a miscarriage.  Do they flee sensibly after
all this (and a visit to the ER)?  No, they retreat to Jeff's home - an
abandoned nineteenth century warehouse in the Black Hills.  (Disturbingly,
the sheriff tries to contact Jeff when the other tour group is found
massacred on Coffin Rock.)
Joe Berlinger has fashioned a nice puzzle box where his film can be viewed
from two different perspectives.  The film, as we see it, is really the
recollection of the Hunt's survivors, as we see them interrogated by the
police - flashback in two layers.  However, as in the first film, there is
video document, which can be construed as either reality or as something
to condemn the survivors as 'enhanced' by the Blair Witch.  The film 
acknowledges "Project" as a movie, while allowing that where so many people,
including this film's protagonists, believed it to be true, that perception 
can become reality.
There are no shaky camera effects here - in fact we get special effects in
ghostly images seen by the quintet.  Once again, sound is used to jarring
effect.  Unfortunately, the midsection of this film sags a bit.  Where the 
first film was so believable because of its amateur quality, this one suffers 
when a line is delivered too dramatically in front of a steady camera.  A
reference back to the first film's 'standing in a corner' doesn't make sense.
Horror movie conventions, such as having the group split up when they should
be huddled together, call attention to themselves in this otherwise clever
script.
"Book of Shadows:  the Blair Witch 2" couldn't hope to equal its predecessor,
yet it's a surprisingly intelligent and welcome addition to a genre that's
usually a dumping ground for low budget efforts.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Crazy/Beautiful (2001)
Nicole Oakley (Kirsten Dunst, "Bring It On") is the troubled, substance 
abusing daughter of a Congressman who attends high school in upscale 
Pacific Palisades.  While performing community service cleaning the beach 
as payback for a D.W.I. conviction, Nicole's harassed by a group of Latino 
teens from a poorer part of town, but one of them, Carlos Nunez (Jay
Hernandez), catches her eye.  The good looking, polite young man also 
attends her high school - by travelling on public transportation for two
hours each way, each day - because he wants a good education in order to
attend Annapolis.  These two are "Crazy/Beautiful."
Will the wild, rebellious girl drag down the fine, upstanding young man or
will he snap her out of her self-destructive streak?  "Crazy/Beautiful's" 
conflict resolution is too pat in Phil Hay and Matt Manfredi's ("Bug")
script, but the two leads make the film somewhat engaging.
Of course, first you'll need accept that straight arrow Carlos would give
a second glance to a girl who's usually drunk, gets him into detention at
their second meeting, dances provocatively through the streets of his 
neighborhood, tries to bed him within view of her own father (who mistakes
him for their housekeeper's nephew) and is disapproved of by his entire 
extended family.  Once we're over this little hump, the filmmakers back
off to show more of Nicole's free spirited, artistic side as well as the
root of her problems.
Congressman Oakley takes an interest in the boy who wants to go to Annapolis
and offers to sponsor him.  Carlos unbelievably misses his scheduled meeting
with the man, distracted by a beach outing with Nicole.  When the two finally
get together, he's warned to stay away from the troublemaking Nicole for his
own good.  For some odd reason, Carlos pays more heed to Nicole's father than
his own family.
Director John Stockwell ("Under Cover") may be dealing with an implausible
story, but he does get some fine performances from his cast.  The talented
Kirsten Dunst propels herself through the film in bleary, angry, defiance
gradually letting her natural radiance peak through after time spent with
Carlos.  She's never looked rawer, sporting the bruised, vulnerable look 
of Jennifer Jason Leigh.  Hernandez does his best to appear initially wary,
but we never get a sense of the stress he's been under that would make his
character jeopardize all he's worked for.  Bruce Davison does a good job
as the caring parent who's at wits end.  Lucinda Jenney ("Thirteen Days")
is simply shrewish as Nicole's new stepmom.  Taryn Manning creates a fully
fleshed character as Nicole's best friend Maddy, but the script just leaves
her by the wayside.
"Crazy/Beautiful" is reminiscent of Antonia Bird's 1995 film
"Mad Love" which starred Drew Barrymore as a manic depressive in love with
the upstanding Chris O'Donnell.  While this film is a cut above that abysmal
effort, it's conflict is forced and the resolution is pat.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Five Senses, The (1999)
A massage therapist entrusts her teenage daughter to entertain a
client's young child, but the little girl wanders off while Rachel spies
on a lovemaking couple.  Down the hall, music-loving optometrist Richard yearns 
for his own little girl while facing declining hearing.  Upstairs, Rona makes 
speciality cakes that are tasteless while her Italian holiday fling, who 
arrives unexpectedly, cooks up a storm as he pitches woo.  Rona's ex, 
Robert is meeting with all his (mostly male) ex-lovers, looking for the scent 
of love that may still linger in "The Five Senses."
"The Five Senses" begins as Anna Miller (Molly Parker, "Kissed") emerges
from a depravation chamber.  She's under the sensitive care of Ruth (Gabrielle
Rose, "The Sweet Hereafter"), who's trying to make sense of her alien
daughter Rachel (Nadia Litz), a high school dropout.  Rona (Mary-Louise Parker)
is trying to learn Italian from cassettes even before she knows Roberto
(Marco Leonardi) is on his way.  Robert (Daniel MacIvor), who makes his
living cleaning, warns Rona about Roberto's motives while wishing himself
into the lives of a married client couple (she produces perfumes, natch).
This bleak Canadian film seems influenced by both Egoyan (star Rose and
the theme of a missing child) and Kieslowski (people interconnecting by 
chance), yet its own theme remains muddled.  Just what is writer/director
Jeremy Podeswa trying to say here?
The somber score and shadowy, mauve urban look (cinematography by Greg
Middleton) help maintain an even tone, yet the film's characters mostly
achieve no enlightenment.  Rachel meets oddball Rupert (Brendan Fletcher),
a young man who's as much an outsider as she.  Their blossoming friendship
aids Rachel's relationship with her mother and seemingly benefits
little Amy Lee Miller (Elise Francis Stolk) as well.  Yet while Rona is
inspired to attempt to make a good cake by Roberto, the distrust embedded
by Robert keeps her from seeing the truly lovely things he attempts to do
for her.  Robert finally finds the scent of love in a place he didn't even
know he wanted to find it, only to be left bereft and maybe lonelier than
he was before his quest.  Richard (Philippe Volter) plays lots of classical
music while reinitiating an old affair, but the script pretty much leaves
his character stranded, less connected than the rest.
The actors fare about as well as their characters' fates, with Rose
and Litz bringing nice emotional depth to their work.  In a subplot,
we learn via Rupert, (an interesting turn from Fletcher),  that Rachel believes 
herself a death curse ever since the death of her father when he was killed 
driving to pick her up from a school mishap.  (This is strengthened when a fly 
on a windowpane falls dead as she approaches.)  Also strong is MacIvor as 
Robert, sympathetic in his attempt to connect while remaining pragmatic about 
his less-than-movie-star looks.  No one else in the cast makes much of an 
impression.
"The Five Senses" is an interesting, moody little film, yet it doesn't linger.
In the realm of these senses, all becomes muffled.
The five senses - sight, smell, touch, taste and hearing - are the grist for
the independent filmmaking mill of director/wrter Jeremy Podeswa. His story 
takes place in the city where the lives of the film's characters will cross 
because of a single, fateful event. Massage therapist Ruth (Gabrielle Rose) is 
treating Anna Miller (Molly Parker) when Ruth's daughter Rachel (Nadia Litz) 
loses Anna's pre-school daughter Amy Lee (Elise Francis Stolk) in the park. 
Rachel meets Rupert (Brendan Fletcher), a young voyeur (sight). Robert (Daniel 
MacIvor) is a professional housecleaner who claims he can detect the scent of 
love (smell). A custom cake maker, Rona (Mary-Louise Parker) has lost her 
ability to taste.  Finally, Richard (Philippe Volter), an older man, is 
suffering from deteriorating hearing. The paths of all of these, and other, 
people, will cross in Podeswa's ensemble film, "The Five Senses."
This symbolic assigning of each of the senses to a story character is held
together with the binding dilemma of the missing little Amy Lee Miller. The
little girl's disappearance impacts all of the principles to varying degrees as
they, each, cope with the daily problems of life. For some, like Anna and Ruth,
the crisis is nearly devastating as the time drags by and the search for the
little girl spreads and hope for her recovery dims. For Rachel, who blames
herself not only for the disappearance, but also for her father's death years
before, it is another reason for her teen angst. Others, too, are impacted by
the crisis hitting so close to home.
Helmer Podeswa uses his large ensemble cast to provide a slice of
life-in-crisis look at some average Joes in New York. He mostly succeeds in 
telling each person's tale and letting us, the viewer, have a glimpse into their 
lives. We don't, though, build up any empathy for the individuals as the story 
moves, briskly, from one player to the next. There is some interesting stuff 
going on, but I never could embrace any of the characters.
"The Five Senses" is an interesting exercise in ensemble filmmaking and
storytelling, but does not involve the audience in the emotions of the events.
Though the crisis involves a missing little girl, there is no sense of danger
for the child. Some effort is given to building a minor plot line that
introduces witnesses who say she left the park with "a man," but there is
little time given to the discouragement and frustration of the searchers.
Writer/director Podeswa tells us his story in a lean, concise manner. There
isn't a lot of fat to the plot and the scripter efficiently ties up all the
story threads in a neat ending. There is talent in the work, but a more fully
realized story and fewer characters would make for a better movie. I give "The
Five Senses" a C.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Harry, un ami qui vous veut du bien (2000)
WITH A FRIEND LIKE HARRY (HARRY, UN AMI QUI VOUS VEUT DU BIEN)
Michel (Laurent Lucas, "Pola X") doesn't realize that he's slowly sinking 
under the weight of his responsibilities.  On the road to a vacation home,
which itself is a major renovation burden, with his stressed wife and three
small girls, Michel pulls into a rest stop for some relief from the heat.
In the washroom, Michel is approached by Harry, (Sergi Lopez, "An Affair of
Love") an old schoolmate he hasn't seen in twenty years and barely
remembers.  The next thing Michel knows, Harry and his girlfriend Plum
(Sophie Guillemin, "L'Ennui") are joining his vacation in Writer/Director
Dominik Moll's "With a Friend Like Harry."
While Michel is struggling, Harry lives the enviable good life of a man
of inheritted wealth, yet Harry immediately exhibits an almost
obsessive regard for Michel.  Harry shocks Michel by reciting a long poem,
"The Dagger in the Skin of Night," which Michel had published in the 
school paper two decades earlier.  Plum even pipes in that Harry has often
recited it to her.  Michel's wife Claire (Mathilde Seigner, 
"Venus Beauty Institute") is both wary of Harry and intrigued by this 
unknown aspect of her mate while we, the audience, begin to wonder just
how random Harry's appearance in that rest stop really was.
As if Harry's invasion weren't enough, Michel is annoyed to discover that his
meddling parents have taken it upon themselves to remodel the old farmhouse's
bathroom in a garish, womblike pink.  Harry observes this, then the breakdown
of the old family car, and begins to help.  His first gesture is shocking
enough - he buys a new 4 wheel drive SUV for Michel.  Then his actions begin
to get a lot more personal.
Moll seems to be going for claustrophobic Hitchcockian suspense, even choosing
the only male name ever to appear in a Hitchcock film for his own, yet "With
a Friend Like Harry" feels a lot like George Sluizer's 1988 Spoorloos ("The 
Vanishing), another film that features a fateful rest stop, an old farmhouse 
and earthy excavations.  Moll knows how to build tension, apparent at the onset
with that nightmarish family car trip, yet ultimately is unable to sustain it.
The ambiguity surrounding Harry's persona and motivations lets the air out of
the film's climax.
Still, the film has more going for it than not.  Art Director Michel Barthelemy
gets just the right level of fixer-upperness for the beautifully set vacation
home to see the fanciful possibilities before reality sets in.  Director of 
Photography Matthieu Poirot-Delpech is able to capture that house, the roads
to it, and even Michel himself in lights both flattering and sinister.
Sound Engineer Francois Maurel has done an expert job capturing ominous
rumblings, nightmarish whirrings and staccato shrieks while original music by
David Sinclair Whittaker provides effective (if a bit obvious) flourishes to
the visuals.
"With a Friend Like Harry" (the original English title was "Harry, He's Here
to Help") was nominated for 9 Cesars (the French Oscar), winning Best Director
and Best Actor.  While I appreciate Lopez' performance, I found Lucas to have
the more difficult job - one which he navigates adroitly.  Seigner fleshes
out complexities for Claire while Guillemin makes a simple character positively
endearing.  Moll has proved he can create mood and work with actors, yet his
storytelling, while psychologically detailed on many levels, doesn't fully
satisfy yet, with this, his second film.  I for one am looking forward to his
third.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Head Over Heels (2001)
When naive art restorer Amanda (Monica Potter, "Patch Adams") finds her
new boyfriend in bed with a model, she starts looking for a new apartment
in the Big Apple and, after a brief stay with friend Lisa (China Chow,
"The Big Hit"), finds a fabulous one.  The hitch?  She must share it with four 
models.  Amanda, still smarting from her bad relationship, also falls "Head 
Over Heels" for Jim (Freddie Prinze Jr.), a guy she 'meets cute' in her
new building's lobby (she's sexually attacked by his Great Dane, Hamlet).
Amanda's four new roomies claim to have banded together because they're the
only four non-smoking models in NYC, but they're really a cliched United 
Nations of hair color.  Holly (Tomiko Fraser) represents the African American, 
Candi (Sarah O'Hare) is a ditzy blond Aussie, Jade (Shalom Harlow, "In 
and Out") is the brunette and Roxanna (Ivana Milicevic, "Enemy of the State"), 
a flame haired Russian.  They immediately make it their cause to make over the
already stunning Amanda and get her connected with Jim, the fashion executive 
whose apartment can be spied on from their living room.  Meanwhile, Amanda's
coworkers (the flip side of her roomies comprised of three batty old women and
her lesbian friend Lisa) also push her towards romance.
As soon as attraction between the two stars is established, the film takes an
absurd twist into "Rear Window" territory when Amanda (and none of her
roommates) believes she sees Jim murder a model.  The police (wisely) blow
off the girls as bubbleheads, so they begin to tail Jim.  Disgustingly unfunny
bathroom humor, in a desperate attempt to connect with the successful gross
out humor of "There's Something About Mary" and "Meet the Parents," ensues.
This script - (Screenplay and Story By Ron Burch & David Kidd; Story By
Ed Decter and John Strauss, "There's Something About Mary") is the sorriest 
piece of work that's been greenlit in over a year of weak Hollywood product.
The smallest details are ripped off from Amanda's profession to an aquarium 
scene that recalls "Manhattan" to a climatic Amanda utterance that originated 
in "Sid and Nancy!"  Director Mark Waters ("The House of Yes") keeps focus on 
his relatively small cast in what must be the deadest Fashion Week in NYC 
history.
I have a rule that no film receives an F rating if it has anything at all going
for it.  While the cast is bland with a capital 'B,' O'Hare and Milicevic bring
some personality to the lame proceedings.  Technically the film is adequate.
"Head Over Heels" has its head firmly planted someplace other than over its 
heels.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Cecil B. DeMented (2000)
Honey Whitlock (Melanie Griffith) is in Baltimore for the world premiere
benefit of her latest flick, an event chosen by Cecil B. Demented (Stephen 
Dorff, "Blade") for her kidnapping.  Demented and his band of Sprockets
are cinema guerillas who promote anarchic filmmaking and the death of the
multiplex mainstream in director John Waters' "Cecil B. Demented."
John Waters has just about attained respectability in recent years with
his sweet natured "Pecker," satiric "Serial Mom" and nostalgic "Hairspray."
"Cecil B. Demented" begins with the audacious mania and low budget looks
of his earlier cult flicks.  Unfortunately, it can't sustain its cool
concept and devolves into a drive-in dumpster denouement.
The film begins promisingly, with movie marquees touting either "Star Wars"
or "Star Trek" in all of a six screen multiplex, "Scream 4," a Pauly
Shore marathon and (gasp) "Patch Adams, the Director's Cut."
The gloriously spoiled Honey Whitlock, so pampered she demands her 
assistant find out whether Pat Nixon had sex in her 'presidential' suite,
puts on her fake face for the dignitaries she's just dissed while 
turning her ugly face to everyone else.  Meanwhile, back at the Senator
Theater, Cecil and his Sprockets, all employed by the theater, are
setting their trap.  When Whitlock wiggles her way onto the stage, Cecil
and his gang grab her.  Weapons are drawn and a bomb goes
off.  'Power to the People!' and 'Punish bad cinema!' they cry before
loading Honey into their van and absconding to their closed movie theater
lair.
Here we get introduced to the gang, who have been sworn to a vow of celibacy 
for Demented until their film is completed.  Cherish (Alicia Witt, TV's "Cybil")
is a former porn star and Cecil's horny girlfriend.  Lyle (Adrian Grenier,
"The Adventures of Sebastian Cole") an actor zonked out on drugs of every
sort ('Before I was a drug addict, I had so many problems.  Now I only have
one.').  Aggressive cinematographer Pam (Erika Lynn Rupli, sound person and
aspiring rap star Chardonnay (Zenzele Uzoma), art director by way of staple
gun Lewis (Larry Gilliard, Jr., "The Waterboy") and satanic makeup girl Ravel 
(Maggie Gyllenhaal) comprise most of the crew.  Hairdresser Rodney (Jack
Noseworthy, "U571"), who hates himself for being straight, terrorizes
Honey with his harsh dye jobs ('I hate roots!').  The weakest link to
Cecil's cause is Fidget, the costumer, whose parents (Patricia Hearst
plays his mom) still have too much control over him.
After threatening Honey to star in his movie, Cecil and the sprockets
hit the streets for guerilla filmmaking, terrorizing film audiences
everywhere.  Soon Honey becomes bound to the cause, especially as she
realizes her new outlaw notoriety is the best thing to happen to her
career in ages (Eric Roberts makes a cameo as her ex-husband on Roseanne
Barr's talk show).  They fight parents of small children ('Family's just
another word for censorship!' Honey screams), crash local film events
(where Cecil convinces Honey to jump off a roof) and invade the filmming
of "Forrest Gump II" starring Kevin Nealon (as himself).  Lives are
lost, but the cause is strong, and local kung fu fans and a porn house
help protect them (the porn house is showing one of Cherish's old films
in which she has an adventure with a gerbil).
While all this may sound like inspired lunacy, it's only fitfully funny.
Water's best and sliest joke is his parody of former SLA terrorist
and heiress Patty Hearst within Honey Whitlock's transformation.  His
screenplay has several fizzy ideas, but on the screen they play flat,
particularly the film's climax which is simply filmed anarchy.  To his
credit, Waters' film looks like the guerilla filmmaking he's portraying.
Melanie Griffith is more than a good sport here - she was meant to play this 
role and gives it her all.  Stephen Dorff is over the top as the maniacal 
Demented, with his punk hair style, rolling eyes and tattoos (all the 
Sprockets boast tattoos of cult directors such as Herschel Gordon Lewis and 
Werner Rainer Fassbinder).  None of the Sprockets particularly stand out, 
although Witt goes to town in her porn piece.  Former Waters' stars Mink Stole 
and Ricki Lake have cameos.
While it was initially exciting to see the 'old' John Waters style 
back on the screen, it looks like he should stick to what works for him
now.  "Cecil B. Demented" is the personification of the adage 'You can't
go home again.'
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Freddy Got Fingered (2001)
Gord Brody (Tom Green) is an aspiring animator approaching thirty who still
lives in parents Jim (Rip Torn) and Julie's (Julie Hagerty, "Airplane")
basement.  As dad declares all out war, Gord secures a job in a cheese
sandwich factory in far off LA and sets off to make his dreams come true.
Gord doesn't make much of a go on his first attempt and lands back home with
fawning mom and outraged dad in "Freddy Got Fingered."
Tom Green cowrites (with "Tom Green Show" scribe Derek Harvie), directs and
stars in what is essentially Tom Green's primal scream.  So, if Tom Green 
screams in an empty theater, does he make a sound?
It's clear that "Freddy Got Fingered" is at least partially autobiographical
and Green sure has one hell of a complex about his dad (mom gets off easier
when sonny boy advises her to go out and have sex with basketball players and
Greeks).  While this may be of interest to his hard core fans, there's little
about Green's mania on display here to recommend this movie to anyone else.
The film starts promisingly enough, with a well executed skateboarding
scene through a shopping mall set to the Sex Pistols' 'Problem' (Green's put
together a first rate soundtrack) and yes, I laughed a few times. Green's 
flummoxing of a security guard with psychotic ramblings and his attempt to 
draw, make music and eat at the same time (the 'daddy would you like some 
sausages' scene repeatedly shown in the film's trailer) are inspired comedy.
But what's funny about a paraplegic girlfriend who gets turned on by having 
her legs caned or a skateboarding injury that results in an exposed kneecap?  
A baby delivery bit shows some groan-inducing promise until enough blood
is splattered to coagulate the laughs.  Younger (by three years) brother
Freddy's internment at The Institute for Sexually Abused Children does
nothing but confirm one's worst fears regarding the film's title and
Green's infamous 'handling' of a real horse, while not nearly as shocking as 
it would seem, doesn't make sense.  By the time he repeats the gag with
an elephant at film's end, the overall effect is numbness.
While "Freddy Got Fingered" has the admirable end result of depicting the
harm in demeaning a child's self esteem, it's essentially a whole lot of
Tom Green running around being noisy.  Rip Torn, what were you thinking?
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Finding Forrester (2000)
Jamal Wallace (newcomer Rob Brown) loves to read and write in his journals,
but hides this fact from his family and buddies in the Bronx.  In public, he
spends his time playing basketball at a local court watched over by a 
mysterious stranger from a window in an old building.  On a dare, Jamal
enters the stranger's apartment, but is frightened by the old man who lives
there and runs, leaving his backpack.  This fortuitous event will be the 
beginning of an unusual mentorship and great friendship in "Finding Forrester."
"Finding Forrester" skates in upon a slate of comparisons to director Gus
van Sant's own "Good Will Hunting."  While there are similarities, the new
film has quite a different feel than the Boston blue collar drama.
Jamal sees his backpack hanging in that mysterious window - is it a taunt?
an invitation?  He resists, and wins, when the pack suddenly lands at his
feet in the street one day.  Reunited with his beloved journals, Jamal is
first shocked, then intrigued to find that his writings have been marked up
like school assignments by an obviously intelligent and interested reader.
A few false starts later, and Jamal meets the stranger, a gruff, Scotch
swilling Scotsman (Sean Connery) who gradually opens up, pleased to share
a love of the written word.  Then Jamal's secret is blown with his mother
and brother Terrell (Busta Rhymes, "Shaft") when test scores reveal his 
intelligence and result in a scholarship to Mailer Callow, a Manhattan prep 
school that needs a winning basketball team.
At Mailer Callow, Jamal, a black teen from the Bronx,  must navigate the world 
of the white and wealthy.  Claire (Anna Paquin, "X-Men") steps in to lead
the way, beginning another odd relationship for Jamal.  When his story's
conflict arrives it's twofold.  Jamal discovers that his Scottish friend is
William Forrester, a J. D. Salinger-like reclusive legend, who obviously
wishes Jamal to keep his identity secret.  Professor Crawford (F. Murray
Abraham), a failed author and Forrester devotee, doesn't believe a boy from
the Bronx is capable of writing Jamal's words and sets out to discredit him.
While Mike Rich's screenplay doesn't offer any real surprises, sometimes
dipping into cliche, rebounding with good dialogue, the amazing chemistry 
between veteran actor Connery and the untrained Brown is palpable.  Brown, 
who answered a casting call in hopes of getting wages as an extra to
pay off a cell phone bill, is one of the year 2000's great acting discoveries.
Brown gives Jamal grace, confidence and smarts, holding his own against the 
Scottish Oscar winner.  Rob Brown is the main reason to see this film.
Connery also gives a fine performance, but isn't given as much to work with.
Support is OK, but only Busta Rhymes as Jamal's brother and the (uncreditted?)
actress who plays his mom really distinguish themselves.  Abraham is a bit too
patently villainish.
Van Sant's tech crew does a fine job, with fluid camerwork by Harris Savides
("The Yards") and nuanced art direction by Jane Musky ("At First Sight").
Unfortunately, he allows his film to play for over two hours and the
material doesn't warrant it.  A cutesy cameo at film's end may have seemed
a good idea at the time, but calls too much attention to itself, working
against the cinematic experience.  Still, "Finding Forrester" is a solid
entry into the 'teacher/student' genre and the first film of a potential new
star.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Dayereh (2000)
As credits roll over a black screen, we hear the sounds of childbirth.
A white room appears where a white window is slid open on a white door by
a white garbed nurse.  A black clad grandmother inquires about her daughter's
baby.  'It's a girl,' she's told.  Hoping for better news, the grandmother
tells another member of the hospital staff she hasn't been told the sex of
her grandchild.  When she receives the news a second time, she despairs that
the in-laws will be furious.  Director Jafar Panahi ("The White Balloon")
continues to make his point about the lives of Iranian women by crossing
over multiple storylines in "The Circle."
As another female family member rushes down the hospital's spiral staircase
to 
the street, she crosses paths with Nargess (Nargess Mamizadeh), Arezou
(Maryiam Palvin Almani) and a third woman attempting to make a public phone 
call.  When a man asks 'You two alone?' as he passes, the third friend demands
an apology, creating a street incident which results in her arrest.  Arezou
and Nargess watch from a hiding place as they are already on the run.  We
learn that they've been released from prison, although never their crime.
Arezou is afraid that her son couldn't handle seeing her after two years,
while
Nargess, only eighteen, just dreams of reaching Sarab, an edenic part of Iran
where she'll reunite with her brother.  They're also trying to reach a
friend, 
Pari, for help.
Arezou insists Nargess take their money for the journey and vanishes.  After
dealing with all sorts of problems obtaining a ticket as a woman alone,
Nargess
takes five minutes to buy her brother a gift, but must flee when she sees
police checking passengers getting on the bus.  She finally finds Pari's
house,
but is told off by a male family member.  As Nargess runs down the alley and
out of the film, Pari (Fereshteh Sadr Orfani) sneaks out of her front door 
while her brother and father argue over her fate.
Pari visits a female friend (Monir Arab) selling tickets at a movie theater
and we soon discover that these two also have been imprisoned.  Pari's
friend's
husband obtained a second wife while she was jailed, yet she's comfortable
with the idea and the second wife arrives and drives Pari to meet with 
another friend, an emergency room nurse (Elham Saboktakin).  Pari is in
dire straits as she's pregnant, but her friend, married to a doctor at the
hospital, is too fearful of his reaction to help.
Pari walks the streets and sees a mother with a well dressed little girl as
she enters a hotel lobby.  When she exits, the little girl is crying,
abandoned.  Pari finds the mother (Fatemeh Naghavi) distraught, watching
the scene from behind a car (reminding us of Arezou and Nargess earlier).  
She's trying to make a better life for her daughter, but always fails to 
really leave.  This time she succeeds and cinematographer Bahram Badakshani's 
camera follows her as she says farewell to Pari and accepts a ride from a
male 
stranger, a move that causes her to be pulled over at a roadblock where
another 
woman (Mojgan Faramarzi), clearly a prostitute, is already being held.  As
this 
last woman is processed into prison, Panahi ironically suggests she may be
the 
only free woman in his story.
Director/editor Jafar Panahi's Venice 2000 Golden Lion winner is a powerful 
statement about the oppression of women in Iran (banned within its own
country), yet also celebrates their sisterhood.  Panahi and writer Kambuzia 
Partovi suggest strong themes with such simple devices as unlit cigarettes.
Their failure to tell us what these women have been jailed for strengthens
the story because as we witness the difficulty being a woman in Iran brings
to 
such simple tasks as buying a bus ticket, we realize that whatever their 
transgressions are, they would be viewed as trivial in Western society.
Cinematographer Bahram Badakshani employs a very fluid camera style as he
tails his subjects through city streets.  He and director Panahi visually
reinforce the circular nature of the film with spiral staircases and 
round balconies.  Badakshani captures many striking images, such as Nargess
running through a terminal, billowing black and clutching a shirt box or
an old balloon seller holding the hand of a tearful little girl as a wedding
party streams by.
The women of "The Circle" will break your heart while opening your eyes
to their plight.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Une affaire de goűt (1999)
A MATTER OF TASTE (Une affaire de gout)
---------------------------------------
Nicholas Riviere (Jean-Pierre Lorit, "Red," "Alice and Martin") is an 
unambitious young man working temporarily as a waiter when he runs into 
Delamont (Bernard Giraudeau, "Water Drops on Burning Rocks," "Ridicule")
a wealthy entrepreneur.  Delamont challenges Nicholas to identify the
ingredients of an amuse bouche, decides he has intelligence in his eyes,
and makes him an overgenerous offer for a strange job - to be his personal
taster in "A Matter of Taste."
Cowriter (with Gilles Taurand, "Time Regained")/director Bernard Rapp
tells his tale in flashbacks from a present day investigation into an
unknown crime.  While there have been many films which investigate the
transference of personality, there have been fewer on the subjugation of it.
Rapp's psychological thriller plays like an inverted version of Joseph 
Losey's "The Servant" as seen through the gorgeous rot of Peter Greenaway's
films.
Although Delamont has an aversion to cheese and fish, it soon becomes
clear that he wants more from Nicholas than to taste his food.  As he
seduces Nicholas with access to his monied lifestyle, his demands on
the man slowly increase.  His offering stipulation that Nicholas quit smoking
segues into Nicholas not eating any foods he dislikes, then more, as 
he tries to recreate Nicholas in his own image.  Delamont's displeasure
is shown harshly, parentally, building an interdependence between the two 
that's like, but not actually, a love affair.
Nicholas' girlfriend Beatrice (Florence Thomassin) provides the audience's
point of view, watching in horror as Nicholas becomes consumed by the
industrialist, trying to figuratively shake some sense into him until
she realizes she literally no longer knows this man.
Giraudeau smoothly creates a cinematic monster, a polished devil of
refinement but no feeling.  Lorit has a more difficult arc to follow, as
the film's one failure is its inability to make Nicholas' seduction
totally believable, but he makes a fine mirror for Giraudeau.
The film's fine production design by Francois Comtet features many
extraordinary gustatory tableaux and the contrasts between Alpine skiing
and desert hermitage.  Cinematography by Gerard de Battista
("Venus Beauty Institute") is strikingly crisp.  Rapp's direction builds
a sickly, sinister suspense.
"A Matter of Taste" is a deliciously insidious thriller.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Suzhou he (2000)
Lao B. (Zhongkai Hua) is a videographer who falls in love with the somewhat
elusive Meimei (Xun Zhou, "The Emperor and the Assassin").  'If I disappeared,
would you search for me like Mardar did?' she asks and Lao B. recounts for
us this second tale of love which also takes place along "Suzhou River."
Writer/director Ye Lou's film of intertwining tales of love has been 
described as a Chinese "Vertigo."  It also recalls David Lynch's
"Lost Highway" with its prominent use of a videocamera and videocamera
point of view ('Don't complain if you don't like what you see - cameras
don't lie.').
Lao B. gives us a tour of the Suzhou River area with his videocamera as
our eyes (in a rather cool shot, he plays a hand slapping game with Meimei
and we see four flashing hands in the forefront with her laughing face
in the background).  We never really see Lao B.  He meets Meimei when her
boss, the owner of a shady tavern, asks him to tape his mermaid show to
use as promotion.  Meimei is the mermaid.
The bulk of the film, however, tells the tale of Mardar (Hongshen Jia)
and Moudan (Xun Zhou again, looking more childlike with her hair in pigtails).
Mardar is a good looking motorcycle courier who's paid by Moudan's father
to take her to her aunt's when he entertains his mistress.  (Moudan's father
runs an illegal vodka factory.)  Moudan, who carries a blond mermaid doll,
becomes attached to Mardar and a chaste romance develops between the two.
But wait, interrupts Lao B., before throwing some what-ifs at us which 
change Mardar's backstory.  Suddenly Mardar is tasked with holding Moudan
in a kidnap plot.  She tells him she'll find him again as a mermaid before
plunging off a bridge into the Suzhou.  After a prison sentence, Mardar
returns to find Meimei, the mermaid who looks exactly like Moudan.
Ye's video film envelops us in a dream state as we witness two men obssess
over the same(?) woman before all three/four cross paths.  Meimei/Moudan
appears to be identical (same face, same dress, same press-on tatoo),
although one is an worldly adult and the other an innocent.  
"Suzhou River" questions identity and reality within the confines of a
harsh environment.  It's tough, edgy, jaded and romantic.  Lou Ye's
accomplished a lot with very little.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Caveman's Valentine, The (2001)
Romulus Ledbetter (Samuel L. Jackson) is a homeless man who lives in a cave
in Central Park.  The former Julliard-trained pianist/composer's descent into 
madness cost him his home, wife and (now adult) child.  Now he spends his
days trying to thwart his nemesis, Cornelius Gould Stuyvesant, whom he 
believes tracks him from atop the Chrysler Building.  When Romulus finds a
frozen body in the tree outside his cave, he summons his police officer 
daughter and tries to convince her superior that the victim was murdered by
Stuyvesant in "The Caveman's Valentine."
Adapted from his own Edgar winning novel by George Dawes Green, "The Caveman's
Valentine" is a most unusual murder mystery.  Because the audience receives 
its point of view from Romulus, the perspective is always off kilter.  We
see Romulus' delusions, such as his estranged wife (Tamara Tunie) acting as a 
sounding board, which other characters in the film do not see.
Romulus has seen a message for help on a large ad for the work of David
Leppenraub (Colm Feore, "Titus"), a Mapplethorpe-like photographer who has some 
nasty rumors circulating involving torture, drugs and death.  As the victim 
was Leppenraub's last model, Rommulus switches his suspicions from Stuyvesant 
to Leppenraub, arranging to reenter society to get close to the man.
Director Kasi Lemmons ("Eve's Bayou") was smart to choose to work once again
with Jackson, as his acting is the most compelling aspect of the film.  He
lumbers about like a Rastafarian bear in Central Park.  Ledbetter is fearless
except when he perceives Stuyvesant's rays eminating from the Chrysler,
confident in his convictions except when he attempts to pass himself off as
the man he used to be.
Anthony Michael Hall ("Sixteen Candles") is the New York financier who supplies
Romulus with the trappings of his former life in exchange for party tricks.
Ann Magnuson ("Love and Sex") is Moira, Leppenraub's spiritted but dependent
sister who takes Romulus as a lover while he's investigating her brother.
Feore gives his character an appropriately enigmatic threatening quality.
While the actors, music, locations and art direction all feel right, the story 
is too muddled to make the film a total success.  We're never given enough 
backstory on Romulus' family to understand his wife and daughter's extremely
negative reactions.  The film's conclusion wraps everything up too hurriedly,
with the protagonist suddenly dispensing numerous facts which the audience
hasn't been privy to.  The whole Stuyvesant concept never really goes anywhere.
While Lemmon's film is uneven, it's still a unique piece of work by an
inventive filmmaker willing to take risks.  That coupled with Jackson's 
masterful lead performance make "The Caveman's Valentine" more worthwhile
than most of the Hollywood mainstream product in theaters now.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Liam (2000)
In 1930s Liverpool, seven year old Liam (Anthony Burrows) stutters under
stress, a state he's in frequently at his Catholic school.  His Dad's
(Ian Hart, "The End of the Affair") proud to hold a job, but times are still
tough Mam (Claire Hackett) is fiercely protective of her family and the potent
love between her and her husband provides an aura of joy in dismal
surroundings.  The fragility of happiness is dealt a harsh blow, however, when
Dad loses his job while maintaining his pride in director Stephen Frears' 
"Liam."
"Liam" is sure to suffer from its overwhelming likeness to "Angela's Ashes,"
the unsuccessful film adaption of the wildly successful Frank McCourt novel.
While the Dad in this tale is not an alcoholic, his inability to swallow his
pride in order to provide for his family has tragic consequences.
Dad would rather buy his former boss a beer he can ill afford, then hold out
his hand for a work ticket with the others in his predicament.  When his
gesture is returned the next morning with a patronizing sneer and no work,
Dad spits in the man's face.  Mam sends daughter Teresa out to work for a
wealthy Jewish family, admonishing her to refuse to clean the toilets (the
first chore we witness her performing).  Older brother Con (David Hart)
works at the shipyards while Dad picks up cigarette butts and grows
increasingly furious at the Catholic Church and the Jews whom he sees as
bringing in cheap Irish labor to deny him of his rightful wage.
Liam faces a crisis of faith after accidentally seeing his mother naked
and being too afraid to 'confess' his sin before his First Communion.
His teacher Mrs. Abernathy (Anne Reid) brings in Father Ryan  (Russell Dixon) 
to impress upon Liam and his classmates the ease with which they could damn 
themselves to hell, complete with graphic descriptions of hellfire and
frightful
metaphors for eternity.  Teresa must face the guilt of preferring her kind 
employer, Mrs. Samuels (Jane Gurnett), to the mother who's growing 
increasingly pinched with the burdens placed upon her.  To make matters worse,
Teresa finds herself shielding the affair Mrs. Samuels is having, and, driven
to the confessional, is told she can no longer work there.
Screenwriter Jimmy McGovern ("Priest") depicts a family being battered by
the circumstances of its time and place, but even as he provides motivation
for Dad's misplaced resentments, his transformation of the loving family
man into a black-shirted Fascist is alarmingly abrupt.  The fire bombing
of the local Jewish pawnbroker's transports us out of Liverpool into Nazi
Germany.  For all its bleakness, "Angela's Ashes" often became quite
funny during schoolroom catechism scenes while McGovern merely manages to
elicit a smile or two.  McGovern's horrifically ironic climax is too symbolic
and coincidental, draining the scene of its intended emotional impact.
The cast is uniformly strong.  Claire Hackett makes Mam more than just the 
strong survivor - she's a woman, too.  Ian Hart shows how resentment can make
a good man capable of horrible actions.  Young Megan Burns conveys the
conflict of liking a person but not their actions, while on the flip side,
Jane Gurnett creates a privileged woman of kindness and understanding with
an inexplicable weakness.  The cherubic looking young Burrows is an
adorable Liam, even if his stutter isn't entirely convincing.  However,
if it was the filmmakers' intent to have Liam act as our point of view, they
don't succeed, as Liam's comprehension of events would be quite different
than what's presented here.
"Liam" certainly isn't a chore to sit through, and it does have its moments,
but its flaws and release behind a similar, higher profile work place 
it in the minor leagues.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Bad ma ra khahad bord (1999)
An engineer (Behzad Dourani) and his two unseen colleagues make their way to a 
small village with a secret mission (they discuss a cover story about looking 
for treasure).  They're met by a young boy who shows the engineer into the 
village.  The engineer asks about the house of an old woman, who is ill.  
Eventually we learn that it is her death that the engineer awaits, but he 
learns a lot about life during that time in Writer/director Abbas Kiarostami's 
("The Taste of Cherry") "The Wind Will Carry Us."
At the start of "The Wind Will Carry Us," we watch a utility vehicle wend 
its way through winding roads shimmering in a landscape of red earth and
golden fields dotted with bright green trees.  We hear the travellers
discuss the ambiguity of their directions which indicate looking for a 
single tree.  When they finally stop and ask a field worker, they're succinctly
told to go 200 yards past the next junction.  This woman in the field is 
the first face we see and she's already delivering one of Kiarostami's 
subtle jokes.
The engineer (his colleagues are never seen, only heard) becomes fast
friends with young Fahzad, who supplies the men with their morning bread
and supplies the engineer with updates on the old woman's health (she
didn't eat her soup today).  Otherwise he's always running off to school
where it seems he has a daily exam.  The engineer takes his tea at a 
local spot where the old woman who serves argues with
her husband about her work versus his ('every woman serves except your 
mother').  Across from the engineer's room, a young, very pregnant woman 
hangs the laundry of her nine children and tells him where to procure milk.  
When a nonpregnant woman returns the next, he believes it's her sister, but no, 
the newborn is simply swaddled across her back.
So the engineer essentially does nothing but wait, while everyone around
him labors.  His days are filled by the call of his cell phone, but he
can't get reception unless he drives up a hill to the cemetary.  There 
he meets a man digging a ditch (unseen again) for 'telecommunications.'
He has other encounters as well.  He picks up the local teacher along the road
who uncovers his true mission (apparently the young boy's spilled the beans).
Here's someone we do see, but learn we haven't seen at all - when the teacher
leaves the engineer's vehicle, we discover he's crippled.  The engineer's sent 
into a dark earth cellar where a young girl milks a cow for him while he
recites poetry for her (and the film gets its title), yet she refuses to
shine her lamp on her face.  A doctor tells him that he's called infrequently, 
giving him time to observe nature (to see).  The doctor prefers the present 
because 'even a drum sounds melodious from afar.'
Kiarostami lets his tale unfold slowly (and somewhat repetitiously) and
leaves many blanks for the viewer to fill in (just why is the engineer
trying to document a mourning ceremony?).  His contemplations on life and
death (perhaps most strongly contrasted by the engineer's mission versus
the doctor's philosophy) are presented with a low key use of humor.  (The
engineers unseen colleagues fill their days with pursuit of strawberries
and eventually appear to desert him.)
Kiarostami's location is stunningly well chosen, a white village (called 
the Black Valley, another enigma) built into the landscape so that it almost
disappears.  Nature is a strong motif, especially when the engineer's
capacity for cruelty is portrayed by his overturning of a turtle.  Later,
in the same spot, he watches a dung beetle working and smiles.
Cinematography by Mahmoud Kalari makes exceptional use of a bright and
simple color palette.  Long shots establish the surrounding areas of
the village and the intricacy of the village itself.
"The Wind Will Carry Us" is a thought provoking, beautiful film, but may
antagonize viewers who prefer a linear, mainstream story treatment.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Bandits (2001)
Impulsive man of action Joe Blake (Bruce Willis) and brainy hypochondriac
buddy Terry Collins (Billy Bob Thornton) are escaped convicts who cook up
a unique bank robbing scheme in their pursuit of a Mexican retirement -
they take bank managers hostage in their homes, stay the night, and rob the
bank first thing in the a.m., before the bank opens for business.  After
Terry is hit by bored, somewhat crazed housewife Kate (Cate Blanchett), he
has her drive him to their hideout, and refusing to go home, she
stays making the duo a trio of "Bandits."
Directing from a script by Harley Peyton ("Keys to Tulsa," TV's "Twin Peaks"),
veteran director Barry Levinson ("Diner") delivers a road movie that's
part "Robin Hood" and part "Jules et Jim."  This gentle comedy slowly builds
to a pleasing payoff.
Bookended by narration from Darren Head (Bobby Slayton, "Get Shorty"), the
host of the fictitious 'Criminals at Large' TV show, we see the late Terry and
Joe in their final bank standoff arguing about which one of them allowed
Kate to get them into this predicament.  Flashback to their humorous prison
breakout, where Terry and Joe's opposite qualities are immediately
established.
Joe recruits his cousin Harvey (Troy Garity, "Steal This Movie"), a none too
bright wannabe Hollywood stuntman, as their getaway driver and 'The Sleepover
Bandits' are born, quickly becoming folk heroes and a media sensation.  The
guys are able to avoid capture by donning hilarious disguises for their 
overnight heists.  When Kate enters the picture, coming from a deadend 
marriage, she sees the romance of their escapades.  She also falls first for
Joe, then Terry, deciding that together, they make the perfect man.
The threesome are also the perfect costars.  Willis spins an affectionate
sendup of the action roles that made him a megastar, and looks cool while
doing so with his becomingly scruffy ponytail.  Thornton is all ticks and
twitches and physical comedy, as neurotic as Woody Allen, but quieter and
more laid back.  His performance is the most mannered of the three. 
Blanchett,
stunningly flame haired here, is all wide eyed enthusiasm with a flair for
the dramatic displayed as she lip synchs to Bonnie Tyler and Tanita Tikaram.
She joins Cameron Diaz ("My Best Friend's Wedding") and Candice Bergen 
("Starting Over") in the hilariously awful screen singing club with her 
rendition of "Walk on By."
Also strong are Garity as the dopey but true blue driver.  His practicing
of special effects and stunt work provide some of the film's best visual
jokes.
In a small role as the gang's last sleepover victim, Peggy Miley ("A Little 
Princess") is a small, stout, senior firecracker of a bank manager.  Willis'
daughters Scout and Tallulah Belle are featured as the children of the
first hostage.
Peyton's script is full of amusing dialogue and situations.  When Terry and
Kate are forced to take the last room at a hotel called the Pink Flamingo,
which is overrun with a Mary Kay-like cosmetics convention, it at first seems
like a one-off Elvis impersonator joke, but Peyton inventively takes it one 
step further.  Production design (Victor Kempster, "Natural Born Killers")
and cinematography (Dante Spinotti, "L.A. Confidential") take full advantage
of the charming small towns of the Northwest coastal region.  Levinson's
direction keeps everything just right at left of center, although the film
could have flown higher with some tightening, particularly in its early
meanderings.  The film features a terrific soundtrack ranging from U2's
"Beautiful Day" to "Wildfire."
"Bandits" takes a while to find its groove, but once it does it'll steal
its way into your heart.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Mexican, The (2001)
Samantha Barzel (Julia Roberts) throws a fit when she discovers that long-time
boyfriend Jerry Welbach (Brad Pitt) is delaying their plans for a Las Vegas
weekend in order to do a job for big boss Margolese (an uncreditted Gene
Hackman).  Sam makes good on her threat to head for Vegas on her own as Jerry 
heads south in search of a prized but cursed pistol known as "The Mexican."
Jerry begins a cycle of dumb luck followed by freakish fate by immediately
locating Beck (David Krumholtz, "Slums of Beverly Hills"), holder of the
infamous antique, in a Mexican dive, then losing him to a reveller's stray
bullet.  When Jerry checks in with Nayman (Bob Balaban), he finds out that
he's holding the dead body of Margolese' grandson.
Meanwhile Sam heads for Vegas and ends up in the crossfire between an elegant
Black stranger (Sherman Augustus, "Virus") who takes her hostage in a ladies'
room and Leroy (James Gandolfini, "The Sopranos"), a psychotic hit man sent
by Margolese to use Sam as Jerry's completion bond.  Leroy plugs the stranger
and begins a road trip with the feisty Sam - 'I'm just here to regulate 
funkiness' he tells her.
Director Gore Verbinski ("Mouse Hunt") seesaws back and forth between the
Mexican and US action as Jerry's travails resemble a human Wile E. Coyote's
while Sam and Leroy bond.  Verbinski struck pay dirt with his superstar
threesome, all better than the script warrants.  Roberts continues her
appealing, movie star, streak here and has loads of chemistry with her
costar Gandolfini.  Quite unlike the hit man he played in "True Romance," 
Leroy is a gay man (which Sam discovers fairly early on) dejected
by the lack of love in his life until Sam encourages a roadside flirtation.
Brad Pitt once again proves a real flair for comedy, able to elicit howls
of laughter with a simple 'Oh no!'  He has loads of chemistry with the
Mexican mutt who becomes his sidekick.  Roberts and Pitt have one of those 
'can't live with them, can't live without them' relationships which flare up 
into screaming matches every 5 minutes.  Roberts is the screamer, hurling such 
self helpisms as 'now you're blame shifting!' at laid back screamee Jerry.
(Too) much has been made of their lack of screentime together.
Technically the film looks (cinematography by Dariusz Wolski of "Dark City" and 
"The Crow") and sounds (original score by Alan Silvestri, "Cast Away") good.
The script, by J.H. Wyman, is problematic however.  While individual bits
play well enough, the film begins to drag.  Wyman gives his MacGuffin its own 
superfluous subplot (several different takes on the history of the pistol are 
shown in bleached out home-movie segments), which could have been jettisoned
entirely. The film comes to a natural conclusion point about thirty minutes 
before it has the good graces to end.  Then Verbinski and screenwriter Wyman 
positively betray the audience with their third act treatment of Gandolfini's 
character.  Any buoyancy and good will are lost at that point as "The Mexican" 
stumbles towards its finish.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Princess Diaries, The (2001)
15-year old Mia Thermopolis (Anne Hathaway, TV's "Get Real") is 'invisible.'
Her hair is a frizzy nightmare, she's lousy at sports, public speaking makes
her physically ill and her own Vice Principal (Sandra Oh, "Last Night")
greats her as 'Lilly's friend.'  When the mother of the father she never
met arrives in San Francisco and invites her to tea, Mia reluctantly attends
and learns she'll be invisible no longer - her father was the crown prince
of Genovia, her grandmother is its Queen and she's about to write "The
Princess Diaries."
Adapted from Meg Cabot's novel by Gina Wendkos ("Coyote Ugly"), "The Princess
Diaries" blends bits of  "My Fair Lady," "Anastasia," and "Pocketful of 
Miracles" for its tale of a commoner whose royal grandmother grooms her for
a global stage.  Remove the glasses, straighten the hair and voila! - we
have a beautiful princess.
Mia pines for the popular guy at school (Eric on Detten, "Leave It To Beaver")
who's dating cheerleader Lana (singer Mandy Moore), the girl who loves to
put down Mia.  Meanwhile, Mia's best friend Lilly's (Heather Matarazzo,
"Welcome to the Dollhouse") older brother Michael (Robert Schwartzman, brother
of Jason) likes her for who she is and is obviously the better choice.  Once
Mia's lineage is leaked, she forgets plans with Michael and a promise
to appear on Lilly's cable show in order to accompany the suddenly interested
Josh to a school beach party.  Compromising photos appear in the paper,
causing conflict with Queen Clarisse (Julie Andrews) as well.  Will Mia
ascend to the throne of Genovia?  The resolution of this cliched package is
never in doubt.
While "The Princess Diaries'" main story may only entertain preteen girls,
it does have a couple of things going for it.  Director Garry Marshall
("Runaway Bride") shows the oft-filmed city of San Francisco in refreshingly
new ways, using locations like the Musee Mecanique at Cliff House and
an abandoned SOMA firehouse.  The best thing in "The Princess Diaries" is
Hector Elizondo, star of every film Garry Marshall has made, as the chief
of Genovian security who has a "Mrs. Brown"-like relationship with his Queen.
The second best thing is Fat Louie, Mia's totally real pet cat.
Anne Hathaway gives a game try in her feature film debut as Mia, but she
tries so hard her performance verges on mugging for the camera.  If Marshall
had reined her in a bit, the film may have had more charm.  Heather
Matarazzo is a lot more successful as Lilly, Mia's equally outcast buddy
who's both pleased and horrified to discover her friend is a royal.
Robert Schwartzman displays some of the geeky sexiness that made his older
bro Jason such a natural in "Rushmore."  Mandy Moore and von Detten are
appropriately pretty and hissable as the popular kids, but the usually 
reliable Sandra Oh is embarrassingly bad as their school's Vice Principal.
Julie Andrews glides through the film like the grand dame she is and has
wonderful chemistry with Elizondo.
On the whole, though, "The Princess Diaries" just gives a high gloss sheen to
a perfectly average piece of Disney live action entertainment.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Serendipity (2001)
When Jonathan Trager (John Cusack) and Sara Thomas (Kate Beckinsale, "Pearl
Harbor") both reach for the same pair of gloves in the midst of Bloomingdale's
Christmas shopping madness, sparks fly.  While both were grabbing those 
gloves as a gift for a significant other, John wants to pursue possibilities,
but Sara's a fatalist who believes that if they're meant to be, they'll
be blessed with "Serendipity."
Unfortunately, John Cusack, the romantic comedy lead of a generation, comes
up 0 for 2 in 2001 (as has its director Peter Chelsom following up "Town and
Country").  While "America's Sweethearts" had its moments, few
went his way, and the film, overall, didn't live up to its potential.
Cusack is in his element here as a sincere, thoroughly charming,
hopeless romantic, but "Serendipity" is a labored, joyless film.
Although it's obvious Jon and Sara have made a connection, Sara proceeds to
throw up painfully obvious screenwriting 101 obstacles designed to keep them
apart until the end of the film.  She has Jon write his name and telephone
number on a five dollar bill which is put into circulation to see if she
ever comes across it again.  To be fair, she writes her name (which she 
hasn't given to Jon) and number inside a hardcover copy of "Love in the Time 
of Cholera," telling Jon she'll sell it to one of the hundreds of used book 
stores in New York City.  To give Jon one last chance, she has him board
a different elevator in the lobby of the Waldorf Astoria, spinning the
roulette wheel on them both hitting the same floor's button - of course they
do, but Jon is sidelined by an obnoxious tyke who hits the button of every
floor in between and so he misses Sara by a hair's breadth.
Years later, Jon is engaged to Hally (Bridget Moynahan, "Coyote Ugly") but
still pining for the mysterious Englishwoman, much to his best buddy,
New York Times' obit writer Dean's (Jeremy Piven, "Rush Hour 2")
consternation.
Now in San Francisco, Sara's fiance is New Age Nordic flutist Lars (John
Corbett, HBO's "Sex and the City"), yet she also has misgivings met with
disgust by her best friend Eve (Molly Shannon, "Superstar").  As Lars'
career threatens to overshadow their upcoming nuptials, Sara flees to NYC,
dragging Eve along under false pretenses.
It's generally not a good sign when a film's stars' sidekicks generate greater
empathy with the audience than the stars themselves.  Cusack mainly suffers
from having to be attracted to a ridiculous character, but Beckinsale is
forced to make one unbelievable move after another by Marc Klein's script.
John Corbett does a bravura filmic turn as Lars, generating some of the film's
best laughs as the self-important, yet likeable, cult/trendy musician.
Cusack buddy Jeremy Piven also gets mileage out of being the sounding board
to, yet admiring of nonetheless, his dementedly romantic friend.  Molly
Shannon, so fearless in the underrated "Superstar," makes Eve the type of
feet-on-the-ground friend every woman should have.  Eugene Levy, as a 
Bloomingdale's salesman, is funny initially, although his presence in the
film becomes more and more forced, particularly in the thud-echoing coda.
Director Chelsom, who created the whimsical "Hear My Song," vastly underrated 
"Funny Bones" and sweetly fantastical "The Mighty," can't obscure the rigging 
which holds up a plot that should be lighter than air.  Cinematographer
John de Borman's work can't be faulted, showcasing NYC in all its romantic
holiday finery and making the 'if it's meant to be-ness' ironic with
timelapse overhead shots of New York City's everyday chaos.  Kudos to whoever
created Lars' wonderfully wacky music and accompanying insane video.
"Serendipity" per Webster's dictionary is 'the faculty of finding valuable
or agreeable things not sought for,' while "Serendipity" the film strenuously
searches for things that should just be, but aren't.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for 102 Dalmatians (2000)
As the 2nd Chance animal shelter struggles to stay afloat and the now
grown up Dipstick is about to become a father of three, Cruella De Vil
(Glenn Close), cured of her fur loving ways by behaviorist Dr. Pavlov, is 
released from prison.  Dipstick's owner Chloe (Alice Evans, "Le Dernier
Secret") is dismayed to learn that she's Cruella's parole officer, but
De Vil, begging to be called 'Ella,' becomes an animal rights crusader,
injecting time and cash into 2nd Chance.  But Dr. Pavlov discovers that
his therapy is easily undone and soon De Vil is secretly teaming up with
designer Le Pelt (Gerard Depardieu) to create her dreamed of spotted coat
in Walt Disney Pictures' "102 Dalmatians."
De Vil is picked up at the prison gates by her faithful servant Alonso
(Tim McInnerny, "101 Dalmatians"), who presents her with a gift - Fluffy,
a Chinese crested dog.  She then orders him to rid her manse of her
furs, which get boarded up in a dungeon like room, along with her drawn
design of her spotted coat.  The tolling of Big Ben snaps her out of
her charitable ways, however, and soon she's revised her design to include
a hood, requiring one more puppy than the original pattern.  (Her
transformation puts her into a delusional state where the entire city
of London bears Dalmatian spots, a fun effect.)
She begins secretly stealing puppies to be shipped to France and manages
to frame Kevin (Ioan Gruffudd, "Titanic"), 2nd Chance's owner and Chloe's
budding love interest, for the crimes.
Once again Close proves herself a trooper as the outrageous De Vil.  She's
a hoot.  Evans is a bit too squeaky clean as Chloe, but Gruffudd is 
charming as the boyish Kevin.  McInnerny is sympathetic as Alonso, De Vil's
unwitting accomplice.  However, Depardieu is utterly wrong for this film
and his character and wardrobe should have been either completely revamped
or banished.  His French pronunciation of puppies as 'poopies' is supposed
to pass for high humor.
The animals are terrific and given an injection of new blood by Fluffy
and the inhabitants of 2nd Chance, which includes Waddlesworth, a Macaw
who thinks he's a dog.  Chloe's three puppies include Oddball, a pure
white pup traumatized by its lack of spots, who's always getting into
trouble.
The screenplay by Kristen Buckley, Brian Regan, Bob Tzudiker and Noni White
echoes Disney trademarks, such as reinventing the twilight bark in a puppy
version and contrasting the spaghetti and meatball scene from "Lady and the
Tramp" with Chloe and Kevin's first date.  "The Wizard of Oz" even comes
to mind as Cruella locks Chloe up in her dungeon match as the witch cages
Dorothy (and her little dog, too).  They've also cooked up a nice parallel 
with Oddball's spot issue and Waddlesworth's inability to fly.  Dialogue 
includes some pithy lines for Cruella ('The last time I underestimated a 
puppy, I ended up in the pokie.')  However, besides the Le Pelt problem, the 
climatic ending is far too reminiscent of this past summer's "Chicken Run."
Oscar winning costumer designer Anthony Powell returns (as does most of the
behind the scenes crew) and does some brilliant work for Cruella.  Her
black and white prison garb is hilarious and he cleverly presents her in
a Chanel suit - in a houndstooth pattern!  Powell even makes her resemble
a nun.  The black and white mane is smoothly coifed until the evil in De Vil
returns.  His work for Le Pelt, however, is another story.  Depardieu
is presented in what looks like a strong man's outfit made of fur sporting
a truly ridiculous hairstyle.
Animation director Kevin Lima (Disney's "Tarzan") confidently handles his
first live action film.  While it has problems, it's paced well enough that
we don't dwell on them.  "102 Dalmatians" will be fun for the kids while 
keeping the adults entertained as well.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Hannibal (2001)
Ten years ago, director Jonathan Demme gave us a serial killer movie that
was a masterpiece of its genre in "The Silence of the Lambs."  Taking over
the reins, director Ridley Scott ("Gladiator") brings Thomas Harris' third
novel to feature Hannibal Lecter to the screen.  Julianne Moore ("The End of
the Affair") takes over the role of Clarice Starling, Gary Oldman joins
the cast as the series' ever-present, yet changing, second villain Mason 
Verger, and Oscar winner Anthony Hopkins returns as the titular "Hannibal."
In the thirty odd minutes of screen time it takes for Hannibal to make an
appearance, we discover that prison orderly Barney (Frankie R. Faijon, "The
Silence of the Lambs") has been making a buck or two selling Hannibal Lecter
items to a lucrative underground market.  The unfathomably wealthy (home is
the Biltmore Estate, which served as Melvyn Douglas and Shirley Maclaine's
mansion in "Being There") and hideously disfigured Verger is a client of 
Barney's, being the only surviving victim of Lecter's.  Verger is obsessed 
with exacting revenge and is offering a private, three million dollar reward 
for Lecter.
Meanwhile, Clarice Starling has become the whipping girl of the FBI after
her high profile drug ring bust results in five deaths, raining bad publicity
upon the Bureau.  Starling's woes have practically been engineered by Justice 
Department official Paul Krendler (Ray Liotta, "Goodfellas"), a corrupt man
in 
cahoots with Verger who puts Starling back on the Lecter case to lure him out 
of the shadows.
Across the Atlantic, Inspector Rinaldo Pazzi (Giancarlo Giannini, "Swept
Away") meets Dr. Fell, a new library curator, while investigating the
disappearance of his predecessor.  Clarice's work in DC causes a request
to go through Pazzi's offices and he comes to realize the charming Fell is 
the notorious Lecter.  Rather than cooperate with the FBI in his official
capacity, Pazzi, the husband of a much younger, beautiful wife, makes a fatal 
mistake by attempting to reap the monetary reward.
Screenwriters David Mamet ("State and Main") and Steven Zaillian
("Schindler's 
List") have pretty faithfully adapted the Thomas Harris novel for the screen.
Yes, the notorious ending of the novel has been modified somewhat, but the
spirit is essentially the same and Starling's actions are better justified.
Unlike the first film, this Hannibal is presented as a thinner of the herd,
a killer of the rude and greedy.
Hopkins, an actor who can serve up ham (see Coppola's "Dracula"), is once
again note perfect as Dr. Lecter.  The performance accounts for ten years
of laying low while enjoying life's beauty and pleasures.  There's humor in 
this performance (listen to his delivery of 'Okee dokey') as well as menace
(watch him approach Inspector Pazzi, barefoot).
Moore is in a difficult spot reprising Foster's role.  "Silence" was about
Clarice and "Hannibal" is not.  Moore is OK, playing career disillusionment
by seeming tired and washed out, although she does show spark with the 
backbone she presents to male colleagues looking to mow her down.
The uncreditted Oldman is unrecogniable beneath the work of a special effects
makeup team which presents him with a reconstructed face resembling
a Leatherface mask from "The Texas Chainsaw Massacre."  Oldman does his
job well, making Verger a more despicable character than Lecter, yet his
diction is too clear for a man with no lips.
The best support comes from Italian mainstay Giannini, who gains sympathy
for his actions and fear for his character as he treads too close, too often 
to a danger he does not comprehend.  Liotta does his best work when he 
gets brainy.
The production is first rate across the board, if not at the masterpiece
level of "Silence."  Where that film used Hannibal's cells as descents into
hell, this film uses motifs of pigeons, boars, and yes, even a lamb.
Location work in Florence is notable, including an original outdoor opera of 
Dante's death.
As a sequel, "Hannibal" may not be up to "The Godfather: Part II" level,
but director Ridley Scott and lead Hopkins have presented us with a buffet
worth lingering over.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Family Man, The (2000)
Jack Campbell (Nicolas Cage) is the president of his own Wall St. investment
firm and is on the verge of cementing a multi-billion dollar merger on
Christmas Eve.  When his intrigued secretary (Mary Beth Hurt, "Bringing Out 
the Dead") gives him a message from his college fiance of twenty years ago, 
he takes a 'guy poll' and decides to ignore it as 'water under the bridge.'  
One encounter with a convenience store robber (Don Cheadle, "Mission to Mars") 
and a night's sleep later, Jack awakens on Christmas morning to find his wife 
Kate (Tea Leoni, "Deep Impact") next to him and a young daughter and large dog 
piling onto his bed in "The Family Man."
Screenwriters David Diamond and David Weissman take a little bit of "Me
Myself I," a dash of "It's a Wonderful Life" (in reverse) and a helping 
of their own original twists for the holiday-set "The Family Man."  While
the film sounds like warmed over offerings, its sparkling cast and a few
inventive riffs on an old outline make this a welcome holiday entertainment.
We already know Kate is Jack's old girlfriend, because the film begins with
a flashback (which we know is a flashback by the PanAm backdrop) of Jack
leaving a tearful Kate at the airport.  They have a plan to get solid footing
before marriage - him by interning at Barclay's Bank in London, her by going
to law school back home - which she begs him to abandon because of her
intuition.  One scene later, we know her intuition proved correct.
Jack has disposable women, $2,500 suits, a Ferrari and confidence to spare.
His first move after awakening in surburbia is to dash out in horror and
take the family minivan back into the city.  No one recognizes him, however,
and that mysterious 'robber' returns in his Ferrari to tell him that his 
actions during the tension of the night before allowed for him to get a second 
look at life.
Jack returns to his new home to be met by his best friend and next door 
neighbor (Jeremy Piven, "Very Bad Things") telling him how lucky he is.  Jack's 
aghast at the messy surburban life he now has complete with diapers, dog
slobber, chores, a blue class wardrobe and job as a tire salesman for his
father-in-law.  Even though Jack knows no history of this life, only his 
daughter Annie notices his oddness, asking where her dad has gone.  Kate 
accepts his cluelessness as part oddball humor, which they clearly have a 
history of, part midlife crisis.
The screenplay is interesting in that some things have progressed similarly
(Jack is hit on by a sexy friend), others are changed (his nebbishy underling
(Saul Rubinek, "The Contender") is now the more authoritative president of
his old company).  Things that seem radically different (Jack's new career)
are given interesting explanations as the story progresses.  Jack attempts
to blend his new persona with his old one.  The film's conclusion is not 
exactly what the audience might expect and presents new concepts to ponder.
The best thing about "The Family Man," however, is seeing Nicolas Cage finally
give an engaging performance again.  His return from the increasingly zombified 
performances he's been giving in one actioner after another is most welcome.  
Cage nails the complexities of a somewhat arrogant, assured man who also is, 
at heart, decent.  His comic bafflement, sweetness with children and sexiness
with woman showcase his romantic comedy chops better than anything he's done
since "Moonstruck."  Equally engaging is Tea Leoni, who simply has never been
better.  She's funny, strong, quick-witted and sexy and a dynamic foil for
Cage.  Support is solid all around.
The film was directed by Brett Ratner (whose 'a film by' credit is a bit
pretentious for the young director of "Rush Hour"), showing an ability to
cross genres after his hit actioner of two years back.  The film's well-paced
and gives a nice contrast between the different lifestyles (even if
Jack is able to park directly in front of anywhere he wants to go in
downtown Manhattan in both incarnations).
"The Family Man" is not only a sure-footed romance, but may become a minor
holiday classic as well.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Almost Famous (2000)
When he was just fifteen in the early 70's, writer/director Cameron Crowe
("Jerry Maguire") became a rock journalist , graduating to the staff of
'Rolling Stone' at sixteen.  In his new film, "Almost Famous," fictional
William Miller (newcomer Patrick Fugit) is a fifteen year old rock writer
whose meeting with his hero, legendary Creem editor Lester Bangs (Philip
Seymour Hoffman) results in an assigment that turns into a Rolling Stone
story on the road with his favorite band, Stillwater.
Clearly a labor of love, "Almost Famous" charts the maturation of a young
rock journalist amidst a world of conflicts.  William's single mother Elaine,
(Oscar winner Frances McDormand, "Fargo") an educator with unusual ideas,
has watched her eldest, Anita (Zooey Deschanel, "Mumford"), fly the coop in a 
fit of rebelliousness.  Now she overcompensates, fearfully allowing William 
to follow his dream, even though that will lead him into the clutches of rock 
and roll, which she knows is all about drugs and sex.
When William's met with resistance getting into the backstage area, he's
befriended by the BandAids ('we're not groupies, we're into the music'),
particularly the mysterious and worldly Penny Lane (Kate Hudson, "200 
Cigarettes").  Meeting Stillwater, particularly the charismatic Russell
Hammond (Billy Crudup, "Jesus' Son"), immediately catches William between
his true fan incliniations and Lester's advice to never become friends
with those you write about.  This intensifies when the group board the 'Almost
Famous 1973' tour bus and hit the road.  William will watch as his beloved
Penny disregards her own advice and falls deeply for the married Russell
while lead singer Jeff (Jason Lee, "Chasing Amy") fumes as Russell captures
the lion's share of their publicity.  Russell evades William's interview
attempts from one state to the next as Rolling Stone dogs him for material
and mom insists he return home for his high school graduation, constantly
reminding him 'Don't do drugs!'
Two shattering events finally force William to play his hand, report his
story and return home wiser and experienced, if disillusioned.  Crowe
neatly manages to heal both of William's families, the one he was born to
and the one he adopted, at the crossroads of Penny Lane.
"Almost Famous" is a well acted ensemble piece without a single lackluster
note.  Fugit anchors the film as the intelligent innocent abroad who faces
ethical challenges beyond his years.  Kate Hudson gives a starmaking
performance as the naively experienced Penny Lane, a sixteen year old earth
mother, a worldly babe-in-the-woods.  Crudup is startling good as the
gorgeous rocker who tries to do right in the face of too much temptation.
Crudup's really coming into his own with this performance following "Jesus'
Son" and "Without Limits" and should cease to be mistaken for Johnny Depp.
Frances McDormand provides most of the film's humor as the relentlessly
protective mom who terrifies hotel managers and quotes Goethe to a cowed
Russell long distance.  Jason Lee adopts the proper rock star slouch and
swagger as Stillwater's lead singer and the ever brilliant Philip Seymour
Hoffman embodies the 'uncool' Bangs.  Fairuza Balk makes an impression as
stylishly hip yet caring BandAid Sapphire while Anna Paquin only makes
any impression at all when her character is utilized to impart early, important
information to William.
Crowe and his team, cinematographer John Toll ("Braveheart"), art directors
Clay A. Griffith and Clayton R. Hartley ("Jerry Maguire"), and costume
designer Betsy Heimann ("Jerry Maguire") capture the look and feel of 
the early 1970's.  Crowe's wife Nancy Wilson (formerly of the band Heart)
provides the score which is complemented by rock standards of the time.
Peter Frampton acted as technical consultant, teaching the members of
the fictional Stillwater how to play like a real rock band on stage.
"Almost Famous" is a warm, human and true rite of passage that will bring
baby boomers back to times of incense and peppermints while introducing
younger generations to a golden era on the fringe of corporatization.
Following the tremendous success of his last film, "Jerry Maguire,"
writer/director Cameron Crowe digs back into his own past to tell the
quasi-autobiographical story of 15-year old William Miller (Patrick Fugit).
It's 1973 and rock music is in transition. William, a passionate fan of music 
and damn fine writer for a kid, gets a gig with Rolling Stone magazine to 
interview an up-and-coming band - Stillwater. Much to his mom's (Frances 
McDormand) consternation, he takes the assignment and hits the rock tour 
circuit in "Almost Famous."
Helmer Crowe has had an eclectic career in the entertainment industry from his
early days as a teen reporter for such underground and mainstream publications
as Creem, Rolling Stone, Playboy, and The LA Times. He was only 16-years old
when he made editor at Rolling Stone and published his best-selling novel, 
'Fast Times at Ridgemont High', at the tender age of 22. Crowe was tapped to 
write the screenplay of his book and, in 1982, the highly popular film 
adaptation was released. Since then, he has busily worked in the film industry, 
receiving major kudos for "Jerry Maguire" in 1996. The writer/director utilizes 
his own past experience as a rock and roll journalist to create the story for 
"Almost Famous."
Crowe's alter ego, William, is a remarkably bright kid who loves the music of
his day. His writing talent really impresses legendary rock 'n' roll journalist
Lester Bangs (Phillip Seymour Hoffman) who helps publish the youngster's
articles. This friendship, with Bangs acting as William's muse and mentor,
results in a golden opportunity for the young writer and the chance to write a
feature article for Rolling Stone magazine - at the tender age of 15! William
chooses a favorite band, Stillwater, as his subject and, with expense account
in hand, joins the band while on tour.
The tale begins slowly as baby-faced William tries to use his credentials as a
journalist for Rolling Stone and is denied access backstage for an interview. A
pretty, young "Band-Aid" - devoted followers of Stillwater - named Penny
Lane (Kate Hudson, "200 Cigarettes"), only 16 herself, takes the bewildered
William under her wing and introduces him to the band. Stillwater's leader,
Russell Hammond (Billy Crudup, "Jesus' Son"), takes a liking to William and an
uncertain bond is formed between journalist and band.
For William, the experience is a coming of age that impacts him both personally
and professional. His mentor, Bangs, had advised him from the start not to make
friends with the rock stars. Doing so would only cause the budding journalist
to compromise his work. William also has to contend with a loving, protective
mother who doesn't want to let her boy go out into the cold, cruel world. And,
along with the inevitable friendship that does grow between William and the
members of Stillwater, he falls for Penny. All of these crises and
considerations are tough for a teen, but, in the end, William overcomes every
obstacle.
Even though it's based on Crowe's real-life experiences, "Almost Famous" is a
true fantasy tale with William entering a dream world populated by the
music-makers he has idolized all of his young life. But, there is more to the
story as we watch the rise and fall and resurrection of an American rock band.
And, because of the wonderful Frances McDormand, we see the impact on the
family as she unwillingly sends her babies go off into the world. Plus, there 
is romance, rivalry, rowdiness and recklessness, too.
Newcomer Patrick Fugit is the picture's anchor from the start. The fresh-faced
youngster is not deterred by the presence of the veteran actors around him and
has an incorruptible sweetness about him that makes his William a likable kid.
Of those supporting William, McDormand shines out. Her Elaine Miller is a
single parent, intelligent and educated, who suddenly hits that crossroad of 
life where her chicks leave the nest and there is nothing she can do to stop 
it. She tries to keep hold of William, from long distance, and advise him, 
repeatedly - and, to very funny effect - "DON'T DO DRUGS!" There is a warmth 
and richness to McDormand's performance that really fleshes Elaine into a real, 
loving, caring and intelligent parent and person.
Kate Hudson gives a star-making turn as the irrepressibly buoyant, yet
pragmatic leader of the Band-Aids. Penny treats her devotion to the band of the 
hour with an almost reverence. Her particular closeness to Stillwater's leader, 
Russell, causes a friction between William and the band as the writer falls 
deeper and deeper for the vivacious Penny. Billy Crudup carries himself well as 
the handsome rock star in the making. The actor is not just a pretty face and
provides depth to his performance of the near-hedonistic guitarist.
Jason Lee ("Chasing Amy") plays the band's lead singer, Jeff Bebe, and, while
not given a great deal to do off stage, he cuts a convincing swath as a rock
musician when on stage.  Fairuza Balk ("The Waterboy") and Anna Paquin 
("X-Men") play two of the Band-Aids and Noah Taylor ("Shine") is unrecognizable 
as the band's manager, Dick Roswell.) Philip Seymour Hoffman is, once again, 
terrific in his pivotal role as William's muse, Lester Bangs. The more I watch 
this actor, the more I think that he is developing into one of the greats in 
his field.
Two-time Academy Award winner John Toll ("Legends of the Fall" and
"Braveheart") gives a crisp look to the photography, especially the concert 
footage. Art director Clay A. Griffith ("Jerry Maguire") provides the right 
look to the 70's period design without ostentation. Nancy Wilson (from the rock 
band Heart) provides a score that fits in with the 70's mood of the film. Rock 
classics from the 60's and 70's - Simon and Garfunkel, Elton John, Joni 
Mitchell, the Allman Brothers, Stevie Wonder and others - give just the right 
and familiar note for the time.
The quasi-documentary feel of "Almost Famous" gives the film an edginess as we
watch the slow disintegration of the band while, simultaneously, their fame
begins to build. We see things through the same rose colored glasses as William
and we, too, become disillusioned with the star machine and what it does to its
members. By film's end, William is a wiser young man, but one whose innocence
is now a thing of the past.
"Almost Famous" may be looked upon as an indulgence by auteur Crowe, but there
is an honesty and reality to the film that make it a worthwhile flick to catch.
I give it a B.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Coyote Ugly (2000)
"Coyote Ugly" is an enigma. With its bevy of babe bartenders one might be led
to believe that this is a T&A "Cocktail." The pretty, principally femme cast is
sure nice to look at and there is the promise of some skin. But it's a promise
unfulfilled. That's because "Coyote Ugly" is, in reality, a chick flick
masquerading as a guy movie. So, gentlemen, be warned.
>From the press material, "Coyote Ugly" is "a sexy, romantic comedy [that] is
one girl's wild adventure in the big city." If that doesn't sound like a blurb 
for a girly movie, I don't know what is. I wasn't even fooled when we enter the 
club, Coyote Ugly, and see Zoe (super model Tyra Banks), Rachel (Bridget 
Moynahan) and Cammie (Izabella Miko) shake their stuff atop the bar to blaring 
rock music. My practiced cinematic eye noticed that, while bare mid-drifts and 
shoulders abound, there is no actual skin (the aforementioned T&A) to be seen.
What the film gives us is a routine, but sweet, rags-to-riches tale of a young
woman from the wilds of New Jersey who heads to the Big Apple to find a career
as a songsmith. But, for Violet Sanford (Piper Perabo) (and nearly everyone
else in the world) the industry is an unpenetrable monolith that will only 
allow you to break in to the biz if you have an agent - and you can only get 
an agent if you already broke into the business. She is totally discouraged 
that she can't get her songs sung, making her quest seem a failure. Then, her 
apartment is broken into and what little she has is stolen. It's a tough life 
for the babe-in-the-woods and it looks like she'll have to head back home to 
the security of her father, Bill (John Goodman). First, though, she meets a
handsome young man, Kevin (Adam Garcia), and, at the same time, gets a tip to 
check out bar named Coyote Ugly for a job.
Coyote Ugly is owned and operated under the iron hand of Lil (Maria Bello), a
good-looking, tough-as-nails lady who oversees the goings on in the bar and
with her popular barmaids, babes all. The girls shag drinks for thirsty patrons 
at an astonishing rate, line dance on the bar and, generally, have a good time 
making money. Violet, nicknamed "Jersey" by Lil, is reluctant, at best, while 
working the busy bar. She is almost fired by Lil, more than once, but the owner 
sees something in Violet and keeps her on. Meanwhile, Violet and Kevin get 
kissy face and he helps her overcome the stage fright that keeps her from 
becoming a star.
You can guess where this adolescent "A Star Is Born" is heading right from the
start. First time scripter Gina Wendkos uses her first-hand experience in the
real Coyote Ugly to get the mood and raucous commotion of the bar and the
sequences there are slickly done and exciting - we do have gorgeous women in
slinky outfits dancing for us, after all. The rest of the story is pretty well
traveled stuff and offers nothing original. "Flash Dance," "Fame" and other
music-based inspirational flicks came to mind while watching "Coyote Ugly."
Piper Perabo has a sweet, almost virginal, girl-next-door presence with her
ever present smile and plucky, if a bit too tentative for someone trying to 
make it in the NYC music biz, demeanor. A more aggressive character would have 
been more appropriate, I think, but that would detract from the fairy tale feel 
the filmmakers are going for. Newcomer Adam Garcia, another transplanted
Australian, is good looking and provides the right note to his Kevin, a really, 
really nice, hard working kid. Of the Coyotes, Maria Bello comes off as the 
most three-dimensional character in the bar, making Lil a tough-but-fair sort. 
John Goodman is solid as the caring Dad and isn't given enough screen time, but 
the actor makes the most of it. The girls in Coyote Ugly are all gorgeous. I'm 
not sure they can act, but who cares?
First-time helmer David McNally does a decent job moving things along,
maintaining a brisk pace that keeps things from dragging. It helps that he has
the support of director of photography Amir Mokri ("Slamdance"), who gives the
film a good look, throughout, and lends some excitement to the lensing within
the bar. Production designer Jon Hutman ("The Horse Whisperer") gives Coyote
Ugly and New York a look that more idealistic an better looking than the real
thing. Costume designer Marlene Stewart ("Enemy of the State") does a terrific
job of giving the impression, for the guys in the audience, of scanty clothes,
but actually pulls off a certain unexpected modesty.
"Coyote Ugly" is decent, chick-oriented fun that has enough eye candy for the
guys to keep them from complaining too much afterwards. I give it a B-.
I thought this was going to be the cinematic equivalent of a visit to Hooters,
but it's really just a more PC 90's version of the 1980's "Flashdance" by way 
of "Cocktail" - "Flashdance" for the artiste with a dream combined with
female empowerment motif and "Cocktail" for the flashy bar moves combined with 
profession endangers romance plot.
Violet Sanford (Piper Perabo, "The Adventures of Rocky and Bullwinkle") takes
care of her dad (John Goodman) in New Jersey but is ready to take a stab
at her dream of moving to New York City to become a songwriter.  Best buddy
Gloria (Melanie Lynskey, "Heavenly Creatures") helps her make the move, lends
her some cash and returns to their hometown.  Soon Violet finds out that the
only way she can get anyone to listen to her songs is to sing them herself,
but she suffers from the same stagefright that nipped her deceased mom's
songwriting career in the bud.
Violet gets hoodwinked by a club bouncer into thinking the grill guy is
the music promoter and pushes a cassette on Kevin O'Donnell (Adam Garcia, 
"Wilde").  The slick Australian tries to use the situation as a pickup,
but soon he's smitten by both the girl and her talent.
Violet hits bottom when her crummy walkup is ransacked and Gloria's monetary
gift is stolen.  Desperate for a job, she finds herself getting an 'audition'
from Lil (Maria Bello, "Permanent Midnight"), the tough cookie owner of
Coyote Ugly, a bar where the vampy barmaids rule the roost, dance on the
bar and swing from exposed ceiling pipes.  This provides the means for 
Violet (nicknamed Jersey by Lil) to come out of her shell and find her voice,
but also sets up conflict with her protective dad and new boyfriend Kevin.
Written by Gina Wendkos (TV's "Wiseguy"), "Coyote Ugly" capitilzes on a 
real New York hot spot while going through familar, predictable paces.  Some
of the dialogue, especially in early scenes, is stiff and unnatural ('Bless
me father, for I have sinned' says Violet as she dons a crop top for her
second night as a Coyote - I think this was supposed to be deep.)  However,
as the film progresses it does manage to engage on a sheer entertainment
level for a number of reasons.
This could be a starmaking vehicle for Piper Perabo, whose fresh faced beauty
and wide smile resemble Alanis Morissette crossed with Julia Roberts.  That 
said, producer Jerry Bruckheimer's "Flashdance" only took then newcomer 
Jennifer Beals so far.  Perabo is certainly likeable, however, once she gets 
past some awkward scripting.  (Country star Leann Rimes provides Violet's 
appropriately Lillith Fairish vocals and gets a cameo at the film's end.)  
Adam Garcia is a find as her romantic foil - he's streetwise against her 
naivety, yet sexy, sensitive and supportive.  Maria Bello is a standout as 
tough bar owner Lil - she can handle just about anything and looks good doing 
it.
The film is well choreographed (Travis Payne) and tightly editted (William
Boldenberg, "The Insider").  The bar scenes snap, crackle and pop, whether
customers are being hosed down for ordering water or just gaping in awe at
the help gyrating above them (the ladies get their due, too, when Coyotes
decide to auction off available men at their whim).  Rest assured, all this
is presented as good, clean fun.
The other Coyotes - Cammie (Polish actress Izabella Miko in her U.S. film 
debut), Rachel (Bridget Moynahan, Natasha of TV's "Sex and the City") and
Zoe (Tyra Banks of Victoria Secrets' catalogue) are merely types, with
Zoe departing the action when Jersey comes aboard.  Goodman is sweet as
Violet's dad even if their relationship plays a bit too good to be true for 
real life.  New Zealander Lynskey is solid and sports a mean Jersey accent
as Violet's ultra supportive friend.
"Coyote Ugly" isn't great cinema by a long shot, but it's a summer flick
with a hip soundtrack that achieves its modest goals.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Apocalypse Now (1979)
In 1979, Francis Ford Coppola's "Apocalypse Now" was the hit of the Cannes
Film Festival, winning the Palm D'Or.  (It lost the Oscar, however, to
"Kramer vs. Kramer" for that year.)  In 2001, with 49 minutes of footage
restored (including the much talked about French plantation sequence) and
its time line slightly rejiggered, the newly reedited "Apocalypse Now Redux" 
was the hit of the Cannes Film Festival again.
Is the new version better?  No, I don't think so.  The French plantation
sequence tries to give some historical perspective, but it's dialogue is
clunky, particularly between Willard and Roxanne (Aurore Clement).  Coppola
had great instincts for what he wanted his score to sound like, but the newly
done piece for these scenes sounds like sappy synth. It does feature a lovely 
piece where Clean (a fourteen year old Laurence Fishburne) is buried, that 
further fleshes out Chief's (Albert Hall) character, but Coppola and his 
editor Walter Murch's instincts were right on this bit the first time.
In fact, "Redux" has the overall result of making us know all of Chief's
men - Sam Bottoms' surfer Lance, Fishburne's Clean and most of all, Frederic
Forrest's Chef - much better, while making Willard more of a blank slate.
Willard's at odds with himself in "Redux."  He has no time to delay his
mission when Chief wants to seach a boat or subsequently take a wounded
civilian for medical care, yet he'd trade two precious barrels of fuel for
a couple of hours with some Playboy bunnies?  Speaking of the bunnies,
their restored extra scene at a hellish medevac camp feels exactly like a 
DVD outtake thrown into the cut.  The concept of men operating without a CO 
is explored far more convincingly at the last American outpost where 
Willard asks a crazed soldier who his commanding officer is and is asked
in return 'Aren't you?'
Still, seeing "Apocalypse" in any form again on the big screen in a new
Technicolor print is a treat, although the print I saw suffered from more
blips and scratches than I would have expected.  We can appreciate that Robert 
Duvall's cracked Colonel Kilgore is one of the great film characters ever
to march across the big screen.  Extra footage is mostly welcome with his
character, although Kilgore's loudspeaker demands for the return of his 
surfboard, stolen by Willard's gang, carry the joke too far.  Brando gets his 
Time magazine reading added, showing a more rational Kurtz than any original 
scene ever did.  
Mostly what "Apocalypse Now Redux" points out is how much Coppola was indebted
to his editor (Murch began with 1.25 million feet of film!) and brilliant
cinematographer Vittorio Storaro.  "Apocalypse Now" packs every bit as much
punch now as it did in 1979 and we can thank "Redux" for reminding us.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Patriot, The (2000)
South Carolina. 1776. Benjamin Martin (Mel Gibson), a farmer and furniture
maker, is a pacifist. A hero in the French and Indian War, the recently widowed
planter has seven children to raise and the rebellion is not for him or his
family. Even when his eldest son, Gabriel (Heath Ledger), goes off to join the
rebel militia, ashamed of his father, Ben steadfastly maintains his
isolationism. But, fate takes a hand and, after a violent battle between
British regulars and the rag-tage rebels at Martin's front door, a cruel, 
sadistic British officer, Col. William Tavington (Jason Isaacs), brutally guns 
down one of the farmer's sons, sparking revenge and revolution in "The Patriot."
Director/co-executive producer Roland Emmerich has been the master of the 
cliche since his American debut with the Jean-Claude Van Damme-er "Universal 
Soldier."  He continued his record with "StarGate," "Independence Day" and 
"Godzilla."  While the latter film was not all that successful, it and the 
others gave Emmerich the clout to helm a big budget, Revolutionary War 
actioner starring Mel Gibson and a cast of thousands. Despite the budget and 
star, the director has, once again, made another formulaic, cliche-ridden flick.
The American rebellion against King George is an admirable backdrop for the
routine story by Robert Rodat ("Saving Private Ryan," another routine tale),
that could have been called "Braveheart 2." The peaceful Benjamin is driven to
the brink and beyond by a sadist who does something really cruel (and stupid)
to incense the hero to action. Lots of fighting takes place and just deserts are
delivered in the end and all the rebels live happily ever after. From the
beginning to the end, you know the story before it happens. There were moments
where the tale could have taken an interesting twist, but never does.
Originally, "The Patriot" was supposed to be based on the exploits of Francis
Marion, The Swamp Fox, but political correctness, due to some nefarious deeds
by Marion, made the makers switch to a fiction with only a real life backdrop of
the Revolutionary War.
There are three things, though, that put "The Patriot" a notch above the rest
of Emmerich's oeuvres - the aforementioned bucks, the star power and draw of Mel
Gibson, and one of the best production teams I have seen behind the camera. The
technical staff involved helps to overshadow the oft-used tale and, through the
magic of movement on screen, succeed in recreating the look and feel of the
period and of war.
Emmerich has assembled an often-awarded team of film crafters and their
collective experience is obvious in the finished product. Foremost is the
dazzling photography by the brilliant Caleb Deschanel ("The Natural," "Fly Away
Home"). The lenser has always been a favorite of mine and has given the movies
he shoots the most beautiful and striking images one will ever see on the
screen. His fine eye for composition makes "The Patriot" one of the best
looking films of the year. The huge, panoramic battle scenes are crystal clear 
and visually stunning. His close-up photography of the fighting is fast, furious
and frightening in its intensity. Even routine scenes have an artistry in how 
they are photographed.
Lending, strongly, to the look and period feel are the production design by
Kirk M. Petrucelli ("Mystery Men") and costuming by Deborah L. Scott 
(Oscar-winner for "Titanic"). The scope of "The Patriot" production is awesome 
and these folks and their creative teams provide Class A work. Attention to 
details - and the use of "recreators" as extras, fans of the Revolutionary War 
who spend their free time recreating battles for the sheer fun of it - is a 
major plus and propels the film beyond mediocrity.
The principle cast is OK, not great. Mel gives a cookie cutter perf, but is
still damn good looking and carries the physical demands of the role with his
usual ability. Heath Ledger made a nice little splash in his American debut
flick, "10 Things I Hate About You," and has an amiable likableness but lacks
the intensity needed for his character Gabriel. Jason Isaacs is wickedly wicked
as the evil bad guy, Col. Tavington -  I realize that atrocities happen in war,
but this guy is a mix of all the bad traits of Genghis Khan, Adolph Hitler,
Vlad the Impaler and Lizzy Borden rolled into one. No wonder the English press 
is up in arms over the way the Brits are depicted here.
Supporting cast is peppered with solid actors who help, thankfully, to flesh
out the background characters. Chris Cooper ("October Sky") gives credence as 
the embattled rebel commander, Col. Harry Burwell, who is struggling to defeat 
the enemy against enormous odds. Tcheky Karyo is amusing as the lead element of
French assistance to the American Cause. He's no one-man army, but provides the
needed wit against the French jokes delivered periodically through the film.
Tom Wilkinson gives his General Cornwallis a pompous arrogance of empire that 
rings true. Minor characters, like volunteer John Billings (Leon Rippy), add
dimension to the background cast. One false note is Joely Richardson in her 
vacuous perf as Ben's sister-in-law (and love interest), Charlotte Selton.
"The Patriot" is a mixed bag of a film. The tale is unoriginal and
unimaginative, but the depiction of the mundane story is handled in an
outstanding manner. The sheer force of the technical, artistic side of the
movie overshadows its trite tale of revenge. Even at 160 minutes long, I was 
visually entertained, at least, and I give it a B.
Producer (Mark Gordon) and screenwriter (Robert Rodat) of "Saving Private Ryan"
team up with the director (Roland Emmerich) of "Independence Day" on a tale
based on French and Indian War hero Benjamin Martin's (Mel Gibson) stand to 
keep himself and his family peaceful and safe during the American Revolution.
'Why should I trade a tyrant 3,000 miles away for 3,000 tyrants a mile away?'
he asks when declaration of war is being debated.  A recent widower with seven 
children ranging from pre-toddler to eighteen, Martin is also haunted by the 
brutality both endured and inflicted during his legendary heroics at Fort 
Wilderness, reminding less experienced men that 'this war will be fought
amongst us...your children will learn of it with their own eyes.'
His words turn out to be very prophetic, as the war can soon be viewed from
his South Carolina home's wraparound porch.  His eldest, Gabriel (Heath
Ledger, "10 Things I Hate About You"), who enlisted against his father's
wishes, crawls back into his home wounded.  The Martins and their free black 
workers tend the fallen from both sides of the battle, when Colonel Tavington
(Jason Isaacs, "The End of the Affair") arrives and instructs his men to
gather up the sticken British and massacre the enemy wounded.  Gabriel's
taken prisoner and his fifteen year old brother Thomas attempts to save him.
Tavington shoots the boy in front of his father's eyes.  Benjamin Martin
now has red-hot revenge burning in his brain.
First, Martin spirits a new legend, that of The Ghost, by slaying twenty
departing British officers (with the assistance of young sons Matthew and
Samuel,  the latter of which is traumatized by the event) in order to 
free Gabriel.  Then he forms a militia with the aid of his old friend Colonel
Henry Burwell (Chris Cooper, "October Sky") and Frenchman Major Jean Villeneuve
(Tcheky Karyo, "Addicted to Love"), claiming his son Gabriel in the bargain.
Martin's men are so successful, they capture the attention of General
Cornwallis (Tom Wilkinson, "The Full Monty") himself, whom Martin outwits
in a clever prisoner exchange gambit.  Cornwallis' pride is so damaged, he
orders the uncivilized and ungentlemanly Tavington to use any means necessary
to take Martin down.
Technically, "The Patriot" is first rate, featuring gorgeous cinematography
by Caleb Deschanel ("The Natural") realistic period design by Kirk M.
Petruccelli ("Blade") and costume by Deborah L. Scott ("Wild Wild West"),
although John Williams' score is forgettable.  Special effects include a
cannonball hurtling directly at the audience, brutal battle scenes and their
aftermath, and seamless matte shots - beautiful work.
Acting is a mixed bag.  While Gibson is good in the role it seems like a 
second rate William Wallace for him.  I for one am tired of seeing Gibson's 
tortured face as once again his character is called upon to endure unspeakable 
horrors, yet the man does convincingly play a heroic leader.  Heath Ledger 
acquits himself nicely as the son learning the complexities of his father and 
of life, although frankly, I found him more interesting in his teenage romantic
comedy debut.  Tcheky Karyo is always a pleasurable addition and his reactions 
to Gibson's French baiting lend a believable amount of levity.  Wilkinson is a 
fine Cornwallis.  Leon Rippy ("Stargate") is another good sidekick for Mel
as farmer recruit John Billings and Adam Baldwin has an interesting 'almost
cameo' as Captain Wilkins, an American loyal to the Brits.  The women don't 
fare as well, with Gibson's love interest, Joely Richardson (as his 
sister-in-law Charlotte Selton) delivering her lines as if she had marbles in 
her mouth and newcomer Lisa Brenner (as Gabriel's fiance Anne Howard) being 
far too modern for the period.  
The villain of the piece, Jason Isaac's Tavington, is a fatal flaw of
multiple dimensions.  Tavington is an unrelenting sadist whose only motivation
appears to be greed.  The actor was more than likely instructed to play
the part broadly, so fault lies more properly with the filmmakers who chose
to use every cliche in the book in making this film.  In a war fought by
thousands, it's a foregone conclusion that Tavington and Martin will come
head to head at every crucial moment until a climatic last stand.  Tavington
even gets a "Halloween" moment, 'rising from the dead' as soon as his opponent
drops his weaon (always the telltale sign).  It's sad to admit, but I was
hoping our hero was decapitated against the backdrop of an American flag just
to break the tedium of 'been there, done that.'  
"The Patriot" certainly isn't a bad film, just one that shows its commercial
molding all too blatantly.  Audiences who haven't been exposed to a lot of 
movies will more than likely enjoy it tremendously.  It has craftmanship of
the highest order in its look and sound and many scenes, particularly the
ones that take advantage of Gibson's comedic talents, play very well.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Novocaine (2001)
Dr. Frank Sangster (Steve Martin) enjoys a thriving dental practice.  His 
no-nonsense hygienist/fiance Jean (Laura Dern) keeps his life in order and
his bed on fire.  But when Susan Ivey (Helena Bonham Carter) pays him a visit,
successfully wheedling a drug prescription from him, Sangster's comfortable
life is turned upside down in "Novocaine."
The best part of "Novocaine" occurs during its opening credits where eerie 
X-rays, which will intermittently appear throughout the film, are paired with
Danny Elfman's "Edward Scissorhands" meets "Seven" score.  When the story
begins, in an office environment strongly reminiscent of Robert Altman's 
"Dr. T and the Women," it sustains interest for a while, before sinking into
a hopelessly over-plotted tale where the players are jerked around by the
whims of story line rather than character development.
Sangster discovers that the desirable Miss Ivey has doctored his prescription,
so it's no surprise when she doesn't appear for her 7 a.m. appointment the
next morning.  She does appear, all innocent confusion, at 7 p.m. that night,
however, and seduces Sangster in the dental chair, a scene Frank had suggested
to Jean and been denied that very afternoon.  The next morning he finds his 
entire office supply of drugs has been wiped out.  With law enforcement 
breathing down his neck, Frank lies, hoping to allay Jean's suspicions and
set things right on his own.  
Frank tracks Susan down at a seedy motel, only to be threatened by her
hot tempered brother Duane (Scott Caan, "American Outlaws").  This is the 
same guy Frank and his addict brother Harlan (Elias Koteas, "Crash"),
Frank's bane and recent pad crasher, had scuffled with in a bar earlier.
When Duane is found dead in Frank's home with Harlan missing, Frank becomes
the main suspect.
Screenwriter David Atkins ("Arizona Dreams") shows style in his directorial
debut, mainly by his aforementioned creepy use of X-Rays to punctuate the 
action and Frank's symbolic depiction with bunny rabbits.  However, the 
Hitchcockian 'innocent man thrown into circumstances beyond his control' genre
has far better representatives than "Novocaine" and this well assembled cast 
can't keep this one from spiralling out of control.
Steve Martin is capable of great physical comedy ("All of Me"), but here,
his actions merely seem foolhardy.  Helena Bonham Carter, in full "Fight
Club" Marla mode, is sexy in a slouchy, rundown way, but brings little
else to the table.  Scott Caan is menacing as her brother, but is dealt
out fairly quickly.  Laura Dern is bright and chirpy, willing to put her
kickboxing moves up against those that would bring down her man until her
own faith in him is derailed.  The uncreditted Kevin Bacon gets the most
mileage out of his character, Lance Phelps, a self-absorbed actor shadowing
police in research for an upcoming role.
Early on, Frank tells us 'The worst thing a man can lose is his teeth,'
and Atkins doesn't spare us a queasy climax, but "Novocaine" is no
"The Tenant," nor "Marathon Man."  What "Novocaine" eventually is, is 
numbingly convoluted.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Hedwig and the Angry Inch (2000)
After undergoing a botched sex change operation, Hansel becomes Hedwig, marries
and American GI and leaves East Berlin behind for rural Kansas.  Abandoned in
a trailer park, Hedwig turns to his love of glitter rock and creates a goth 
icon out of seventeen year old Army brat Tommy Gnosis (Michael Pitt, "Finding
Forrester") who steals Hedwig's music and leaves her.  Writer/director/star 
John Cameron Mitchell adapts his lyricist/composer Stephen Trask's smash 
off-Broadway musical, "Hedwig and the Angry Inch," for the big screen.
The rock musical is created anew with John Cameron Mitchell's dynamic, 
fearlessly individual vision and Stephen Trask's perfectly evocative music 
and lyrics.  "Hedwig and the Angry Inch" plays like a well-established cult
film the first time you see it.
Present day Hedwig is obsessed with her ungrateful creation, Tommy Gnosis.
As he tours huge rock arenas, Hedwig and her band, The Angry Inch, follow
playing a chain of seafood restaurants called Bilgewater's.  Hedwig's manager
(Andrea Martin) futilely tries to keep the still lovesick Hedwig from stalking 
Tommy while negotiating a law suit against him.  Meanwhile, Hedwig's husband
and backup singer Yitzhak (played by a woman, Miriam Shor) pines over Hedwig's
wigs while she pines over Tommy.
The stunningly androgynous Mitchell spins Hedwig's tale of two halves
straining to become one with wit, intelligence and bawdy humor (after his
botched op, Hedwig observes 'My first day as a woman and already it's that
time of the month').  He's taken his own experiences as an Army brat and 
melded them with a German babysitter he once knew to create Hedwig, introduced 
as young Hansel (Ben Mayer-Goodman) whose home town is itself divided in two 
by the Berlin Wall.  Weaned on Armed Forces radio, Hedwig (Hansel's mother's 
name, which he adopts along with her passport) worships a personal pantheon 
comprised of David Bowie, Iggy Pop and Lou Reed.
After a hilarious Gummi Bear courtship by the fickle Luther, Hedwig finds
herself in a dead end trailer park, ironically left for a young boy.  Plucky
Hedwig forms a band with Korean Army brides while sexually servicing their
husbands for cash.  Once her eyes lock with Tommy's, 'a seventeen year old
classic rock loving Jesus freak with a fish on his truck,' she's lost and
quickly seduces him while babysitting his infant sibling.  In present day,
Hedwig does meet up again with Tommy in ironically similar circumstances
before she learns how to heal herself and unite her two halves.
Mitchell hasn't simply recorded his musical, but inventively places his
camera and changes his locations (the play is smartly recalled when Hedwig's
Kansas trailer wall drops down to transform into a stage for an Angry Inch
performance).  In addition to the fine work by Directory of Photography
Frank DeMarco and Production Designer Therese DePrez ("I Shot Andy Warhol"),
costume design by Madonna's personal stylist Arianne Phillips ("The Crow")
nails the home made glitter rock look.  Wig and Make-up Designer Mike Potter,
who designed the original Hedwig look for the stage, repeats his fabulous
work for the film.
John Cameron Mitchell's confident, unique voice makes "Hedwig and
the Angry Inch" a true American original and the best American movie of the 
year.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Nightmare Before Christmas, The (1993)
Touchstone Pictures is rereleasing one of its modern classic this
holiday season, "Tim Burton's A Nightmare Before Christmas," in
which Jack Skellington (speaking Chris Sarandon/singing Danny Elfman)
yearns to ditch his Halloween gig and dispense gifts from a
sleigh, even if it is drawn by skeletal reindeer.
Tim Burton's 1994 production was directed by an animation friend of his,
Henry Selick, from 10 yrs before when Burton was a Disney animator 
but it has Burton written all over it.  Disney didn't want it back then but 
became very interested when their young animator turned into the director of 
Batman.  
Skellington, voiced by Chris Sarandon, is the Pumpkin King and ruler of 
Halloween land, where the Halloween holiday is worked on all year by its 
strange inhabitants.  Jack's getting bored, though, when an accidental trip 
to Christmas Land inspires him - why not take over this new fun holiday and 
let Sandy Claws have a rest this year!  Jacks sends his best trick or 
treaters, Lock, Shock and Barrel, out to kidnap the old man.
Lock, Shock and Barrel eventually get it right, and even though his
admirer Sally has premonitions of doom, Jack proceeds with his Christmas
production.  Unfortunately, his experience isn't what's required of
this job - the results are unusual.
This is an amazing looking film.  The stop motion animation required a
painstaking five days for five seconds of footage.  With a crew of
fourteen animators working on twenty sets, moving puppets a fraction of an
inch at a time, it took one week for every minute of this 75 minute film.
Their labor of love paid off.
Long time Burton collaberator Danny Elfman not only wrote the score and song
lyrics, but the former Oingo Boingo frontman did Jack Skellington's singing
as well.  The tunes are memorable.
This one shouldn't scare children any more than "The Grinch that Stole
Christmas," which would make a great double bill with this film.  I know
I had a grin on my face throughout.  It may be a weird holiday pairing, but
it works!

Title
Review for Une liaison pornographique (1999)
A woman (Nathalie Baye, "The Return of Martin Guerre") and a man
(Sergi Lopez, "Western") meet in a cafe.  After some nervous introductory
chitchat, they leave for a hotel where the woman has already reserved a
room.  This first successful meeting, a response to the woman's ad to act 
out a sexual fantasy, leads to regular weekly engagements, and maybe
something unexpected in "An Affair of Love."
This French language film by Belgian director Frederic Fonteyne
(screenplay by Philippe Blasband) is a compelling and unusual look at
both human interaction and the nature of love.  Fonteyne's protogonists
never learn each other's name, address or phone number and are almost 
exclusively only seen in a Parisian cafe, the hotel, and separately in 
interview sessions.
The documentary style interviews show she and he sometime later, both
looking different than they do in the flashbacks.  She recalls that they
met online and offered each other descriptions.  He says he responded to
her ad (he's kept the magazine as a souvenir) and they exchanged photographs.
She believes they met once or twice a week for 3-4 months while he says
they met weekly for half a year.  They both remember the emotional aspects
of their relationship, however, even more than the sex which presumably was
the only basis for their relationship.
Speaking of sex, for a film who's original title is "A Pornographic Affair,"
there's not a lot of sex shown in the film.  Usually, we're left behind
their hotel room door.  Significantly, the sex scenes which are shown, are
really love scenes.  The couple, who both refuse to divulge just what
the fantasy that was being acted upon was, decide to 'make love.'  "You mean
the missionary position?" he asks, startled and clearly pleased.
The couple reach a critical point when an old man collapses in the hallway
outside their hotel room.  He begs them not to contact his wife, whom he
hates.  They accompany the man to the hospital, then listen to his wife
(contacted by hospital authorities) grieve the loss of a man she knew
detested her.  For the first time, the outside world intrudes and it's
with the heavy subjects of marriage and death.
Fonteyne and his photographer, Virginie Saint-Martin, keep things intimate.
The color of the outside world leans to blues and grays, while the hotel
interior is a vibrant, sexy red.  Baye and Lopez are marvelously real 
together - their chemistry is deep.
"An Affair of Love" is a bittersweet small film where love is found by
dispensing with sexual courtship.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Traffic (2000)
When conservative Judge Robert Wakefield is asked to lead the President's war
against drugs, he takes the job seriously even as his predecessor (James
Brolin) gives him edgy advice.  From this springboard, director Steven 
Soderbergh takes us on a journey that stops at every link in the drug chain,
from Mexican state cop Javier Rodriguez (Benicio Del Toro, "The Way of the
Gun") to corrupt Mexican General Salazar, to Californian distributor
Carlos Ayala (Steven Bauer, "Primal Fear"), his fingerer Eduardo Ruiz
(Miguel Ferrer, "Robocop") and money launderer Artie Metzger (Dennis Quaid)
and the NARCs that tail them, Montel Gordon (Don Cheadle, "Boogie Nights")
and Ray Castro (Luis Guzman).  The circle is closed with the drug user,
Wakefield's sixteen year old daughter Caroline (Erika Christensen, "Leave It to 
Beaver") in "Traffic."
Adapted by Simon Moore from the 1989 British miniseries "Traffik" (by Stephen
Gaghan), "Traffic" presents a mosaic of the drug trade as something as 
inevitable as human greed.  Soderbergh gives his audience a lot to think about 
with this powerful film, while also delivering an entertaining crime thriller.
"Traffic's" 'good guys' are represented at opposite ends of the pole by
Douglas' ineffectual drug czar and Del Toro's melancholy Mexican cop.  As
Judge Wakefield makes the political rounds, Rodriguez encounters General 
Salazar (Tomas Milian) at a remote drug bust and gets pulled into the nuts 
and bolts of fighting the Tijuana cartel while trying to keep his partner 
Manolo (Jacob Vargas) from taking the low road.  
In San Diego, Gordon and Castro nab Ruiz who leads them to Ayala, one of the 
big guys.  Ayala's wife Helena (Catherine Zeta-Jones) is left in a financial 
predicament, discovering her husband's indebtedness to viscious drug lords
is jeopardizing their young son's life as well as her cushy lifestyle.
A hit man known as Francisco Flores/Frankie Flowers (Clifton Collins, Jr.)
is used in both countries.  Wakefield's chilly home life (wife Barbara (Amy 
Irving), a former drug using hippie, is the liberal to his conservative) is 
contrasted against Caroline's hanging with the philosophical cool crowd that 
leads her to heroin and inner city slums.
The story is fascinating, peopled with compelling characters.  Soderbergh
and his editor Stephen Mirrione bring an urgency to this film that makes
its 135 minute running time race by.  Acting as his own cinematographer,
Soderbergh visually separates the Mexican action from its corresponding
events in the U.S. by shooting in a sun baked golden hue that prisms into
a myriad of colors in monied San Diego before chilling to blue when shifting 
to the Ohio location of the Wakefield household.
"Traffic" showcases the best ensemble cast of the year.  Douglas
seems so much more right for Judge Wakefield than Harrison Ford,
who walked away from the role.  Douglas is believable as a righteous man
who takes on the world only to find he can only take on his own family.
It's Del Toro, though, who most fully encompasses the circular nature of
the beast.  He seems to carry the weight of the world on his shoulders, yet
has the humor to give over to the battles not worth fighting.  Caught between
a rock and a hard place, he can speak volumes just staring off into space.  
Surprisingly good is Zeta-Jones, who takes her character down very unexpected 
paths and has the chops to do it convincingly.   Cheadle and Ferrer interact to
represent the middle layer, with cool Ruiz expressing disgust that Gordon
will continue to fight drugs while never making progress.  Topher Grace of TV's
'That 70's Show' makes a strong impression as Caroline's boyfriend Seth,
the pied piper of bored, privileged teenagers.  The cast also includes cameos
by Albert Finney as the President's Chief of Staff, Salma Hayek as a drug
lord's mistress, Peter Reigert as the Ayalas' lawyer and James Brolin as
Wakefield's wry predecessor.  Playing themselves are former Massachusetts 
Governor William Weld and Iowa's Senator Chuck Grassley.
Soderbergh has had a boffo auteur year, first with the mainstream favorite
"Erin Brockovich," now with "Traffic," the best American movie of the year.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Jesus' Son (1999)
FH lives a life of doing drugs and committing petty crimes. He spend his days
getting high, stealing and scamming, trying to get the quick buck to support
his habit and that of a beautiful addict named Michelle (Samantha Morton). FH is
also a compassionate guy who has an overwhelming need to help those around him,
but he is a miserable failure as a savior. Redemption does come to our hero,
though, when he lands a job at an assisted care facility and discovers the true
depths of his compassion for his fellow man and the grace it holds for him in
"Jesus' Son."
Billy Crudup stars as FH, which is short for "nasty expletive that begins with
an F" Head.  FH is a kindly soul and a naif in the wilderness of life. He is 
also one that is easily led astray. He has a self-destructive passion that he
exercises liberally with the use of drugs, committing crimes to support his bad
habits. This passion is shared by Michelle, but for the young woman, becomes
deadly. Michelle's death is a catalyst for FH, causing him to pursue his need
to help others. FH's journey brings him to a number of life-affirming crossroads
where the young man can see the wonders of life beneath the despair.
Along the way of his metaphysical journey of both mind and geography, FH meets
a myriad of colorful characters. When he goes to work in a hospital emergency
room, he encounters Georgie (Jack Black, "High Fidelity"), a pill-pushing and
pill-popping orderly with a crazed streak. He meets and treats a victim of
domestic violence - a man walks in with a butcher knife jammed into his eye,
but no one seems too worried about because "his vitals are normal and his sight 
is excellent." FH takes the miracles he sees as a chance of redemption for his
careless ways. But before he can exercise his new devotion, he agrees to help a
hang dog divorcee, Wayne (Denis Leary), in the vengeful act of destroying the
suburban home he shared with his now-estranged wife. When the pair OD on
heroin, only FH recovers and seeks the help and shelter of a support group.
He meets a half-paralyzed woman, Mira (Holly Hunter), in the rehab center and
they begin a relationship. Mira has lost more husbands and lovers to the Grim
Reaper than she can count, but, she can also dance and helps teach FH a few
things about life and love. To further serve his desire to help people, having
journeyed from Iowa to Chicago and, finally, to sunny Phoenix, he takes a job
at Beverly Homes, an assisted care facility.
The plight of the elderly and handicapped residents of the home is hard for the
sensitive FH to take, at first. He perseveres, though, and comes to understand
the curative effect a farm touch or a kind word can bring to someone all alone.
He even takes the task of writing the home's weekly newsletter, bringing a
little more pleasure to the inmates' sheltered lives. FH attains a grace that
makes him realize that he has found the fulfillment he has searched for all of
his life.
Producer/co-writers Elizabeth Cuthrell and David Urrutia adapt the short story
collection, Jesus' Son by Denis Johnson, into an episodic little yarn that
follows the life and learning arc of an odd young man, but one who has an
innocent, beguiling charm and naivete. As FH first attempts to help people, he
doesn't have a very good track record, but succeeds in getting a little better
at it through each vignette.  The episodic nature of the film, as adapted from
the necessarily episodic short stories, causes a problem of flow for the
overall story. Much of the first hour of the tale involves FH and Michelle, but 
there is not emotional payback when that episode ends. The rest of the chapters 
are more rushed than need be with sometimes-perfunctory treatment given to the 
other stories.
Billy Crudup, while not giving an Oscar caliber performance, does a solid job
of depicting the underlying sweet nature of FH. FH is a likable guy, not too
bright, but with a good heart. He always tries to do the right thing, when his
mind and morals aren't addled with drugs, so his desire for redemption for his
sins is nicely tied up by the film's end. It's a good-natured performance and
shows ability and skill by Crudup.
The "name" cast fares unevenly. Samantha Morton ("Sweet & Lowdown"), as
Michelle, is pretty and needy, but too much time is spent on her chapter with
FH, with little satisfaction for their story. Denis Leary seemed uncomfortable
in his role as the troubled Wayne. Dennis Hopper as an asylum inmate under FH's
care has little to do and his interlude is not compelling at all. Holly Hunter,
as the handicapped Mira, puts a sound edge on her character and comes out as a
positive influence on FH, despite her countless past encounters with death.
There is an unexpected surreal quality that permeates the film and it is not
just due to the overt drug subculture depicted. Throughout the story, FH has
visions, like a naked pregnant woman floating on air or seeing the heart of
Christ beating in a gangster's breast. There is also an extended sequence in
the last portion where FH becomes a peeping Tom. He begins a voyeuristic
relationship with a young, Mennonite woman whom he heard singing one day as he
passed her home. This is a bizarre, but oddly touching sequence that departs
from the rest of the film and, at the same time, is an integral part of FH's
final redemption and freedom of spirit.
Tech credits are straightforward, but not exemplary. Hired gun helmer Allison
Maclean does a solid job with the adapted material and, with the production
team, puts a unique spin and feel on each of the chapters. The uneven telling
of the tales is what hurts "Jesus' Son," not the technical and artistic players.
A credible performance by Billy Crudup, supported by a cast of vets, makes
"Jesus' Son" a cut above average, but just a little one, and I give it a C+.
Adapted from short stories by Denis Johnson, "Jesus' Son" is an
episodic ramble of a film which chronicles the experiences of a drifter/junkie
tagged with the name F*&$Head (Billy Crudup, "Without Limits") because
everything he touches goes south.
FH meets up with Michelle (Samantha Morton, "Sweet and Lowdown"), a heroin
addict who provides more surreal encounters with a cast of oddballs who
do things like shoot one another by mistake in their doped out states of
being.  FH drifts downward with Michelle ('Oh Sweet Pea, come on and dance
with me'), alternating between fights and tenderness, until she eventually
ODs.  Then FH continues to drift through emergency rooms (where he'll meet
the infamous 'guy with a knife through his eye') and one rehab after another,
until he eventually finds redemption working in a nursing home and spying
on a blind Mennonite woman who sings hymns.
The large supporting cast features some good performances.  Holly
Hunter appears late and too little as woman whose boyfriends and multiple
husbands keep dying on her.  Denis Leary is another junkie ('all the good
vibes happen when Wayne's around').  Jack Black ("High Fidelity") is Georgie,
manic rehab nurse.  A quiet Dennis Hopper is a rueful rehab patient.
While the film's bizarre moments, such as FH's companion saving a litter
of bunnies by performing an on-the-spot road cesarean, are entertaining,
and its more serious moments, such as witnessing a palsied man find out his 
wife is divorcing him, are moving, the pieces don't connect well into a well 
rounded whole.  "Jesus' Son" earns most of its good will from Billy Crudup's 
likeable performance as a sort of holy fool.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Scary Movie (2000)
The Wayans Brothers ("I'm Gonna Get You Sucka, TV's "In Living Color")
go the way of the Zucker Brothers ("Airplane") with their parody of
recent teen scream flicks "Scream" "Scream 2" and "I Know What You Did 
Last Summer"  with the ironically titled "Scary Movie" ("Scream's" 
original title).
Not since "Kentucky Fried Movie" (written by the Zucker Brothers, directed
by John Landis) in 1977, has a parody flick been so gleefully vulgar.
"Scary Movie" pushes the limits of the R rating even further than last
year's "South Park: Bigger, Longer and Uncut."   It's also pretty funny
in the Zuckers' tradition - if one joke falls flat, two or three more
will come along rapid fire that work.  
The story most closely follows the plot of the original "Scream," with
Carmen Elektra gamely appearing in the infamous first scene (her character's
appropriately named Drew), being tormented by the Edvard Munch masked killer
over the telephone as she makes popcorn.  Within minutes, the Wayans have
established good will by larking on the likes of Dennis Rodman, Jiffy Pop,
and teen flick T&A.
Cut to seven friends.  Cindy and Bobby (nudge, nudge) are the Neve
Campbell/Jennifer Love Hewitt, Skeet Ulrich standins with virginal Cindy 
leading on the always enthusiastic Bobby.  Regina Hall ("Love and Basketball") 
is Brenda, a "Clueless" standin and girlfriend of the sexual 
identity-challenged Ray (Shawn Wayans, getting one of the best laughs early 
on while asking for fashion advice).  Greg's (Lochlyn Munro) obnoxiousness 
teamed with girlfriend Buffy's (Shannon Elizabeth, "American Pie") beauty queen
dreams recall the "Last Summer" couple played by Ryan Philipe and
Sarah Michelle Gellar.  Marlan Wayans is Shorty, a stoner who tries
to remind the others how a black man can survive a horror flick.
Just by the character's name (Gail Hailstrom), it's easy to guess
who SNL'er Cheri Oteri is spoofing, although she only gets to shine in
the Wayan's refreshing brief (and therefore more effective) "Blair Witch"
reference.  Hilariously over-the-top, to the point of near cruelty,
is their handling of "Scream's" Dewey (played in those films by David
Arquette) as Doofy, although actor Dave Sheridan gets to redeem Arquette's
name in an amusing coda.
David L. Lander (TV's "Laverne & Shirley") has a cameo as Principal Squiggy
(take that, Henry Winkler!) and Jayne Trcka gets the loudest howl as
the girls' gym coach, Miss Mann.
Along the way, the Wayans have a ball with the "Scream" killer and his
mask, particularly in a scene where he gets stoned off an aquarium bong set
up by Shorty and his pals after receiving an invite that spoofs
a popular TV ad.  The essential mask changes shape to fit
the mood, such as the killer's befuddlement at some of his victim's utter 
stupidity.
It's a credit to the Wayans (Keenen Ivory directs and cowrote with Shawn,
and Marlon as well as Buddy Johnson, Phil Beauman, Jason Friedberg and Aaron 
Seltzer) that even cultural references which seem already overmined for
parody still come off well in their hands.
It's tight, it's outrageous and it's definitely not for small kids.
"Scary Movie" will have audiences screaming - in either laughter or in
surprise at the lengths the filmmakers go to gross people out.
"Airplane" collides with the Wayans brothers' "In Living Color" as helmer
Keenen Ivory Wayans leads his ensemble cast of family and friends in the spoof 
that spoofs the spoofs, "Scary Movie."
>From its hilarious ode to "Scream" beginning to its "The Usual Suspects"
sendoff  ending, "Scary Movie" takes no prisoners and bars no holds. Strongly 
influenced by the zany, machine-gun paced humor of the Zucker brothers, the 
screenplay, with a bevy of credited writers including many of the Wayans 
family, hits the comic bull's-eye more often than not. The raunchy nature of 
a lot of the gags caused screams - mostly of laughter, but sometimes, of shock 
- at the screening we attended. Shock value is definitely an important aspect 
of the humor here, but it is certainly not the only humor.
"Scary Movie" takes on the task of making a parody of the film that
re-established the horror spoof as a genre, "Scream." At the start, we see Drew
Decker (Carmen Electra), a beautiful high school student with a flatulence
problem, being stalked a la Drew Barrymore in the original - but with slapstick
hilarious, not tongue-in-cheek witty, results. Electra shows one hell of a good
sense of humor in capitalizing on her voluptuousness in the film's extended
opening before the title. The film goes on to poke fun at "Scream" from
beginning to end.
"Scary Movie," though, is not just a spoof on "Scream." As you watch, the
sizable ensemble cast move on to make fun of a bunch of horror flicks like "I
know What You Did Last Summer," "The Sixth Sense," and "The Blair Witch
Project." The parodies are almost universally over the top as the
comedian-actors slap you along side the head with their nasty, in your face
gags. And horror movies aren't the only ones that are used for the fun of it.
"The Matrix" gets its nod, as does the aforementioned "The Usual Suspects."
But, they don't stop there as they move on to all sorts of teen cliches, with 
no sacred cow un-skewered. Gays, virgins, handicapped people, retarded people,
straight people, stoners, beauty queens, transvestites, weird sex practices,
snot, movie goers, fat people, pubic hair, penises, dildos and more are fodder
for the many gags. It's surprising how many of them work, too.
The big cast got the chance to adlib and put their own spin on their
characters.  The free flow of imaginative humor is evident here as the actors 
give their own personalities to their roles. You can match the characters to 
their counterparts in the films being spoofed. Marlon Wayans as the constantly 
stoned Shorty, is like the Randy character in "Scream." He knows everything 
about horror movies and what you shouldn't do - split up, go into a dark room 
alone, answer the phone - but is too wasted to be of any help. Newcomer Anna 
Faris makes her debut as the central character, Cindy Campbell, putting a 
good-natured spin on the dour Neve Campbell role in the original. Regina Hall 
("Love and Basketball") plays the girlfriend to the sexually uncertain Ray 
(Shawn Wayans), the BMOC football player who likes to take showers with his 
teammates and has Brenda dress up in his football pads and helmet. Hall is 
outstanding when she gets to be the movie-goer-from-hell and a film critic's 
worst nightmare. The other players - Dave Sheridan as town simpleton Doofy, 
Shannon Elizabeth as high school sex kitten Buffy, Cheri Oteri as the 
cutthroat TV reporter Gail Hailstorm, and the rest - also help make the 
humor happen.
The behind the camera work befits the efforts of those in front of it with
costuming, by Darryle Johnson ("The Wood"), matching the tone of the films
being spoofed. The same goes for the production design by Robb Wilson King 
("Rush Hour") and photography by Francis Kenny ("Harriet the Spy").
To tell you about all the gags, puns, funny bits and shocks of "Scary Movie"
would be to deprive you of the pleasure of having it all come as a nice
surprise. But, be forewarned, the "R" rating for this film is completely
warranted for the raunch factor. Some think that an "NC-17" rating would be
more suitable. I go with the hard "R" and it is very hard. Parents beware of 
taking younger teens and below to this one. I give it a giggling B.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for You Can Count on Me (2000)
Single, small town mom Sammy Prescott (Laura Linney, "The Truman Show") is
delighted to receive a letter from her younger brother Terry (Mark Ruffalo,
"Committed"), who's returning for a visit after some long term, aimless
travelling.  Tempers immediately flare, however, when Sammy learns Terry's
girlfriend is pregnant and he needs money.  The complex relationship of
these orphanned siblings is explored in writer/director Ken Lonergan's
Sundance Grand Jury and Waldo Salt screenwriting awards winner, "You Can
Count on Me."
Writer/director Ken Lonergan establishes his screenwriting abilities while 
making a tentative directorial debut with "You Can Count on Me."  While his 
fine cast keep the audience involved in their unique yet recognizable 
situtations, Lonergan's film is visually flat.
Sammy has clearly assumed the mother role in her relationship
with Terry, who acts the needy and irresponsible child.  (Her own child, 
Rudy (Rory Culkin), is overprotected.)  Sammy's in a jam at her job as
Scottsville's bank loan officer.  Her new ramrod straight boss Brian
(Matthew Broderick) demands that she discontinue her practice of taking
fifteen minutes of her lunch hour in midafternoon to pick up Rudy from school.
Terry steps in and begins to fill a big need, providing the male interaction
and law loosening Rudy's been craving.  In fact, Terry empowers Sammy to
begin to act irresponsibly as she slips into an affair with her married
boss while turning down her long-standing boyfriend Bob's (Jon Tenney)
proposal of marriage.
The cast is terrific and true.  Linney and Ruffalo, who bear no physical
resemblance whatsover, are emotionally on target as soulfully close siblings
who judge each other harshly.  Matthew Broderick takes his "Election" cheating
spouse and adds endearingly geeky quirks to hilarious and frustrating effect
(he's so uptight he bans employees from setting their computer monitors
background colors).  Jon Tenney plays the small town honest guy with a 
maturity issue recognizably while Rory Culkin acquits himself well.  Lonergan
gives himself a cameo as the local priest whom Sammy calls upon to 'help'
Terry.
Lonergan's writing here is far superior to his more commercial work in
"Analyze This," only ringing false in one scene where Sammy gives Terry
an uncharacteristic public scolding in a local restaurant.  His portrait of
a small, upstate New York town, where trailer dwellers mix with owners of 
sprawling colonial homesteads at the local pool hall is beautifully 
rendered, almost seeming frozen in time.  Unfortunately, the camera
(cinematography by Stephen Kazmierski, "The Myth of Fingerprints") is too
static, giving all interior scenes the feel of actors in a square frame.
"You Can Count on Me" is a small, regional feeling film which offers us several
rich character studies.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for House of Mirth, The (2000)
Lily Bart (Gillian Anderson) is a beautiful socialite trying to land a
rich husband in the shark infested waters of turn of the century New York
society.  She loves Lawrence Seldon (Eric Stoltz), but won't consider
marrying a working man.  Lily is adept at making bad choices and when
her acceptance of a married man's financial advise is perceived as an
affair, her fortunes quickly nosedive in writer/director Terence Davies'
Edith Wharton adaptation, "The House of Mirth."
British director Davies ("Distant Voices, Still Lives") has gathered an
unusual cast and set them in an unusual stand-in for New York (Glasgow, 
Scotland) to tell Wharton's tragic tale.  They (mostly) work.
Lily doesn't value her lover until she discovers she has a competitor,
Mrs. Bertha Dorset (Laura Linney, "You Can Count on Me").  (She later
comes into possession of Bertha's love letters to Seldon - she's mistakenly
blackmailed by a housekeeper at his apartment building, The Benedict,
who's seen Lily leaving Seldon's rooms - which could provide her only
means of salvation.)  Yet she still parades her prospects in front of 
Lawrence in a kind of 'we're all adults here' manner.  She doesn't treat
these men much better.  Mr. Gryce (Pearce Quigley) becomes discouraged
with her lack of attention and Mr. Rosedale (Anthony Lapaglia), while
rich, isn't deemed of proper social standing.
After she discovers that the investment earnings of $10,000 given her 
by a hopeful Gus Trenor (Dan Aykroyd) were really gifts, she's determined 
to repay the money which she's already spent.  Her social circle, however, 
shuns her, for having kept company with the married Trenor.  Her inheritance 
from her wealthy aunt (Eleanor Bron, "The Little Princess"), $10,000, is long 
in coming and her spiteful cousin Grace (Jodhi May, "A World Apart") refuses 
to help. Now Mr. Rosedale considers her damaged goods.  Only the eccentric 
Carry Fisher (Elizabeth McGovern) will remain her friend.  A position as a 
companion ends when her employer Mrs. Hatch (Lorelie King) enters society 
and an apprenticeship at a milliner's fails as well.  She refuses help from a 
truly distressed Rosedale, who somehow knows, and reminds her of, Bertha's 
incriminating letters.
Any who judge Anderson as wooden based on her portray of "The X-Files'"
Agent Scully will surely change their opinion after viewing her work here.
Although she seems a bit too modern at first (a problem that costars
Dan Aykroyd and Anthony Lapaglia don't overcome), Anderson turns that
into an asset as she gets into Lily Bart's skin.  As Lily's over confidence,
even snobbery, turns to disbelief, then resignation, Anderson fully engages 
us in Bart's complex and unfair situation.  The wash of emotions that
play over Anderson's face when Mr. Rosedale tells the impoverished Lily
that 'you could wipe your feet on them' (referring to society) is one of
the finest pieces of acting in the year 2000.  It's a brilliant performance.
Stoltz plays Seldon cooly, as a man of privilege, who retains control of
his emotions until it's too late.  McGovern, a fine, under utilized actress,
is solid as the unconventional Mrs. Fisher.  Laura Linney pulls out her
claws as the shrewish, manipulative Bertha.  Dan Aykroyd isn't quite right
as Gus Trenor.  Lapaglia also seems miscast as Sim Rosedale, although when
his character's standing rises above Lily's he wears the role more
successfully.
Davies' adaptation encompasses all the layers and below surface simmerings
of Wharton's story.  His modern use of cigarettes to signify passion is
amusing - where there's smoke, there's fire.  Things are said loudly,
without being said at all, such as when Rosedale tells Lily he owns The
Benedict and informs her that its name means confirmed bachelor.
The location choice of Glasgow, which is strong in Victorian architecture, 
doesn't capture a New York feel, but Davies uses intimate shots to focus on 
his characters rather than their surroundings.  This Wharton adaptation is 
very different from Scorcese's "The Age of Innocence," where costume and 
art production were lively and pushed to the forefront.  Davies' film is dark, 
brooding and a bit heavy feeling (cinematography by Remi Adefarasin 
("Elizabeth") and production design by Don Taylor ("Emma")).
"The House of Mirth" is an ironic title for a literary heroine with an
ironic fate.  Lily Bart's story is compelling and Gillian Anderson's 
portrayal of her is inspired.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Jay and Silent Bob Strike Back (2001)
Writer/director Kevin Smith ("Clerks") goes back to where he started, giving
an entire feature over to the Greek chorus who've appeared in all his films,
Jay (Jason Mewes) and Silent Bob (Kevin Smith).  When Jay and Silent Bob hear
that the 'Bluntman and Chronic' comic book characters based on them have been 
sold to Miramax for a feature film, they find Holden McNeil (Ben Affleck, 
"Chasing Amy") to get their cut.  Holden's sold off his share to Banky Edwards 
(Jason Lee, "Chasing Amy") but does introduce the boys to the Internet.  Jay 
becomes incensed when he sees all the rude comments on the web about his alter 
ego and the dynamic duo decide to take on Hollywood in "Jay and Silent Bob 
Strike Back."
Kevin Smith gathers just about everyone who's ever been in one of his films
(although Alanis Morrisette appears to have been cut) to have fun dissing
Miramax, Paul Thomas Anderson, the success of Ben Affleck and Matt Damon
and the stupidity of his own characters.  You'll find parodies of "E.T.,"
"Armageddon," "The Fugitive," and "Planet of the Apes" in this free-wheeling,
good-natured, foul-mouthed grab bag.
Jay and Silent Bob meet up with a hitchhiker (George Carlin) who informs them
that the 'unwritten book of the road' requires thumbers to orally service
their drivers - just before they're picked up by a nun (Carrie Fisher - "Star
Wars homage #2 after the "Star Wars-like" logo Smith's emblazoned across
his film).  Then Jay becomes smitten with Justice (Shannon Elizabeth, 
"American Pie"), a jewel thief travelling with Sissy (Eliza Dushku, "Bring It 
On"), Missy (Jennifer Schwalbach Smith, wife of Kevin Smith) and Chrissy 
(Ali Larter, "Legally Blonde").  Sissy makes Justice set up Jay and Silent Bob,
telling them they're out to set free lab animals.  
Jay and Silent Bob end up escaping with an Orangutan while the girls make off 
with a cache of diamonds, but now they've got idiot Federal Wildlife Marshall 
Wilenholly (Will Ferrell, "Superstar") on their trail.  Eventually the lads 
make their way onto the Miramax lot, where they crash the filming of "Good Will
Hunting 2:  Hunting Season" before encountering James Van Der Beek ("Varsity 
Blues") and Jason Biggs ("American Pie") in the Bluntman and Chronic outfits 
they appropriate.  They dazedly reply to a set call by director Chaka (Chris 
Rock, "Dogma") and Silent Bob finds himself in a light saber dual with 
Cock-Knocker played by none other than Mark 'Luke Skywalker' Hamill.
Smith's film is clearly an exercise for his extended filmmaking family to have
fun and they mostly let us in on it.  This lightweight comedy is wispy, though,
vanishing from memory within 24 hours of having seen it.  Smith does have a
talent for dialogue, making even excessive foul remarks still seem amusing,
but his visual style (or lack thereof) still needs attention (early scenes
in Holden's office look really subpar).
Most amusing is the trashing of Affleck by himself, Damon and Smith.  Affleck
is accused of having dead hookers in his trailer and his face adorns a giant
movie billboard titled 'Moonraper.'  Damon's introduced doing a 'lion face,
lemon face' acting exercise with an admirable 'straight' face.  A movie fan
site, presumably based on Ain't-It-Cool-News, is redubbed the 'Poop Shoot'
here.
While there are numerous references to things being 'gay' and Jay's sexual
identity being questioned, GLAAD's recent attack on Smith seems like misplaced
overkill.
Jason Mewes and Kevin Smith are front and center stage this time and prove
they can hold it.  The reliable Will Ferrell is amusingly clueless and just
about the entire cast of "American Pie" acquit themselves well.  A background
scene showing Jay and Silent Bob's first infant meeting features Kevin Smith's
baby daughter as his alter ego.  Gus Van Sant gives a fun cameo while Wes 
Craven gives an awkward one.  Chris Rock isn't funny at all as the shrill 
director.  Morris Day gives a send off right out of "Purple Rain."
"Jay and Silent Bob Strike Back" is fun while you're watching it, but with
the talent on hand, you can't help but feel it should have been a whole lot
better.

Title
Review for A.I. Artificial Intelligence (2001)
For over twenty years, the late Stanley Kubrick worked on developing "A.I."
Initally based on the short story "Super-Toys Last All Summer Long" about
a child robot yearning for the love of his human mother, Kubrick extended
the tale as a sci-fi retelling of 'Pinocchio.'  Having once been told by
Kubrick that the project was better suited to his sensibilities, Steven
Spielberg took over the reins after Kubrick's death.  Haley Joel Osment 
stars as the boy robot who wants to be real in "A.I."
Anticipation for "A.I." began with a web campaign built around a murder
mystery beginning with fictious researcher Jeanine Salla.  The film,
which doesn't touch on these elements, begins with Professor Hobby (William 
Hurt) explaining the next robotic advancement - a child substitute that can 
be programmed to 'love' human parents in a society where natural birth is 
largely restricted.  His prototype, David (Haley Joel Osment), is brought home 
to Monica Swinton (Frances O'Connor, "Mansfield Park") by her husband Henry 
(Sam Robards, "American Beauty"), hoping to snap her out of the despair she's
been in since their natural child, Martin (Jake Thomas, "The Cell") fell
into a coma.
Monica's resistent at first, but her need for a child's love soon has her
making the irreversible 'imprint' that will bind David to her (after
imprinting, these 'mechas' must stay with their owner or be returned to 
Cybertronics for destruction).  David's given Martin's supertoy Teddy (his
Jiminy Cricket) and all is well until Martin makes a surprise reversal and
is brought home.  Martin's competitiveness combined with misunderstandings 
result in Monica abandoning David (with Teddy), who begins his search for the 
Blue Fairy which will make him a real boy, regaining his mother's love.
His journey has him cross paths with other, zombie-like, abandoned robots
trying to keep clear of the Flesh Fair, where cheering fans watch their
like be tortured and destroyed.  David's picked up and meets Gigolo Joe
(Jude Law, "Enemy at the Gate" - this film's version of Honest John).  They 
escape and travel to Rouge City (evoking both Pinocchio's Pleasure Island 
and "The Wizard of Oz") where Dr. Know gives advise that lead theme to a 
submerged Manhattan and David's dreams.
"A.I." is a hybrid that suffers from not being fully Kubrick or Spielberg.
The film plays in three parts.  The first hour establishes David and his
life with the Swinton's and plays very much like Kubrick, slowly paced and
quiet, with a slightly ominous score.  Reflections are significant, making
us question what makes us human when we see David's reflection on the glass
over a Swinton family portrait.  Futuristic cars travelling through forests
recall "A Clockwork Orange."  This part of the film is wholly satisfying.
Spielberg begins to peak through in the second segment.  While Gigilo Joe
and his backstory are Kubrickian (by way of "Blade Runner"), the Flesh Fair's
flying mercenaries (Brendan Gleeson, wasted) and their spotlights begin
the parade of "Close Encounters" visuals (a film where Spielberg featured
Pinochhio's theme of 'When You Wish Upon a Star').  The Flesh Fair itself is a
half-baked concept, a colliseum for the destruction of broken, fleshless
mechas which has more in common with a monster truck rally.  A political
subtext is hinted at by Gleeson's character, but not enough to make the
sequence work.
Rouge City provides visuals which seem inspired by everything from "Metropolis"
to "Roger Rabbit."  Spielberg links religion to fairy tale when David mistakes 
a neon Lady of the Immaculate Heart for his blue fairy.
When the duo arrive in Manhattan, Gigolo Joe departs and the film's final
third begins.  It's here where Spielberg loses his grip with apparent
indecision.  Not content to leave his film at a natural ending point,
Spielberg unsuccessfully plays with multiple concepts involving alien-like
evolved mechas, memory and resurrection.
"A.I." represents Spielberg's second screenwriting credit after "Close 
Encounters of the Third Kind."  While his faithfulness to the Italian
fairy tale mostly serves him well, clearly he had difficulty resolving
the tale.  In fact, in this film which recalls so many others, a bit of
"Child's Play" would have had Teddy kill off Martin, making for a more
economical route to a Spielbergian happy ending.  Several nonsensical
pieces of plotting had me scratching my head as well - why did Monica
drive David out towards Cybertronics, then tell him not to go there?
Why did Professor Hobby tell David he'd meet his makers, only to vanish
from the story?  
Haley Joel Osment once again turns in a performance which belies his years,
although a tentativeness keeps him from hitting this one out of the ball
park.  O'Connor does well portraying Monica's confusion and wrings
real emotion in the abandonment scene, but Spielberg betrays her in the
film's finale.  Jude Law gives a witty reading of sexbot Joe, but the
character never feels fully intrigrated into the story.
"A.I." is certainly more thought provoking than any summer blockbuster
we've been presented with yet this season, but it leaves us wishing
Spielberg had applied more of Kubrick's obssessive fine tuning.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Chuck & Buck (2000)
When Chuck (Chris Weitz) gets a note from Buck (Mike White) informing him
that Buck's mother has died, Chuck and his fiance Carlyn (Beth Colt) fly
out to the funeral.  Chuck's in for a shock, however, because Buck,
whom he hasn't seen since they were eleven years old, hasn't changed at
all and wants to renew a particularly special best friendship in "Chuck
and Buck."
The audience is immediately signalled that Chuck and Buck's reunion is 
going to be weird.  When Chuck and Carlyn enter the church during the funeral
service, Buck immediately spots them and grins widely, waving at an
embarrassed Chuck from his coffin-side spot.  Later, Buck makes an
aggressive sexual move on Chuck who firmly turns him down, gets Carlyn and 
leaves.  Chuck's troubles have only begun, however, as Buck packs up his 
childish belongings and moves to L.A., where he will stalk Chuck unrelentingly.
When Buck begins to comprehend that Chuck is avoiding him, he writes
a play, 'Hank and Frank,' and convinces the house manager of a childrens'
theater (conveniently across the street from Chuck's office) to direct
the one-night-only production.
"Chuck and Buck" is a true original in more ways than one.  In addition
to its most unusual and complex story, the three main characters are 
non-actors.  Buck is played compellingly by the film's screenwriter Mike 
White, who's unafraid to portray himself as a needy geek.  White and his 
screenplay make Buck initially creepy and gradually turn the tables until 
it's Chuck that one begins to question.  Buck has the social nonawareness 
of a child.  He's emotionally arrested in time, if not in intellectual 
development, sucking his always present (and Freudianly chosen) BlowPop.  
Chuck is played by "American Pie" producer Chris Weitz (his brother Paul, 
who co-produced "Pie," plays Sam, the man who subs for him in Buck's play).  
Chuck, who's now known as Charlie, is a successful music producer, handsome 
and well adjusted.  He's compassionate (how many people would fly to a funeral 
for a friend they haven't seen in sixteen years), but increasingly 
uncomfortable with Buck's appearances in every aspect of his life.  It's a 
reactive performance, but an effective one, first playing as the audience's 
creeped out point of view, then becoming the man we want to answer for Buck's 
obssessive condition.  Carlyn is played by producer and talent manager Beth 
Colt in the tough 'girlfriend' role.  She's initially kind to Buck much longer 
than Charlie has patience for (he has a guilty secret after all), but when 
she's had enough she's still strong and supportive of Buck, attempting to get 
him help rather than merely acting shrewish.
Support also has it's treasures, beginning with Lupe Ontiveros' ("Selena")
Beverly, the director of Buck's play (which she declares 'a homoerotic,
misogynistic love story').  She's initially cuttingly dry, but becomes
a mother figure to Buck.  Paul Weitz is the 'doth protest too much' 
homophobe who takes Chuck's place in Buck's strange play.  He can't act
and is hostile to woman, but accepts Buck as 'normal,' (he almost has to - he's
as much of a social outcast) which redeems his character somewhat and Weitz is 
good in the role.  Also a natural is Maya Rudolph (daughter of singer
Minnie Ripperton and a former SNLer) as Jamila, Chuck's assistant, who
faces her own problems shielding her boss from Buck.  Like us, she's
creeped out, then sympathetic.
The film is tightly directed by Miguel Arteta (who's first film, "Star
Maps," was underwhelming - Arteta's reversed the 'sophomore jinx').  
Director of photography Chuy Chavez shot on digital video, giving a 
jittery sense of being amidst the action.  Production design by Renee 
Davenport conveys the less-than-stellar face of L.A. as well as one of 
the most psychological looks at an adult's bedroom since Norman Bates.
Mike White's screenplay delves into such issues as hiding the child
within when facing the modern world, obsession and loneliness.  "Chuck
and Buck" is not afraid to cross boundaries not normally crossed and
make its audience uncomfortable when it does so.  The only faults I
find in this thought-provoking film are that its antagnoists are not
in balance - we always know Buck's thoughts, but not Chuck's (he doesn't
ever really discuss Buck with Carlyn, except for an offscreen conversation
which she mentions to Buck).  The ending is also a little too clean.  Still, 
"Chuck and Buck" is unlike any movie I've seen before.
As boys, Chuck (Chris Weitz) and Buck (Mike White) were inseparable special
best friends.  Their friendship was broken apart when Chuck and his family 
moved away when the boys were 11-years old. Now, 18 years later, Buck's mother 
has died and he invites his old friend back for the funeral. Chuck, now called 
Charlie, is a music producer and executive and is surprised, even shocked, to 
find that his boyhood friend has, quite literally, not grown up. Buck still 
plays with toys and sucks Blow Pops like a pacifier. An invite, by Charlie's 
fiance Carlyn (Beth Colt), to come visit them in LA ignites new hope that his 
best friend is back in the unusual, original, new film, "Chuck & Buck."
Some people are going to call "Chuck & Buck" a gay stalker film and dismiss it
as such. They'll be making a big mistake, though, by doing so. This sophomore
feature by helmer Miguel Arteta is much more than that glib description implies
and reps an unusual, compelling work about two men who are rejoined after many
years of separation.
Charlie is on a career fast track in the LA music scene. He has a high paying
and exciting job, owns a fabulous home, and is about to marry his beautiful
girlfriend Carlyn. Buck, on the other hand, has lived with his parents all his
life, surrounds himself with all his boyhood toys, and hasn't matured much
beyond the 11-year old that Charlie left behind so many years before. Charlie
is surprised, even shocked, to see the arrested development of his friend. He 
is even more shocked when Buck tries to grope him after the funeral. After this
incident, Charlie just wants out, but Carlyn's invitation still hangs in the
air, like an omen of things to come.
Buck, unknown to Charlie, moves lock, stock and barrel to Los Angeles and
begins to clandestinely follow his old friend. He waits, every day, outside 
Charlie's office building and makes repeated calls to his home at all hours, 
not saying anything when Carlyn answers the phone. Charlie is freaked by 
Buck's behavior and wants nothing to do with him, getting creeped out by 
the apparent stalking.
In the meantime, Buck wanders into the theater across the street from Charlie's
workplace and becomes enthralled by the idea of writing a play. (His
inspiration is a kid version of "The Wizard of Oz.")  With the help of the 
theater's manager, Beverly (Lupe Ontiveros, "Serena"), he writes a play and 
agrees to pay her $25 an hour to help him stage it. He becomes obsessed with 
his idea, seeing the play as the catalyst needed to return his friend back to 
him. Unknown to Charlie, the play tells about the very "special" relationship 
that Chuck and Buck shared those many years before. The obvious homoerotic 
story stuns Charlie who vehemently denies any memory of any such events. 
Charlie doth protest too much and the film's last quarter resolves the 
difficult dilemma between the two friends.
The strong suits for "Chuck & Buck" are the terrific performance by Mike White,
as Buck, and the edgy, interesting screenplay by White. Buck is a child in a
man's body, which leads to some creepy impressions of the guy in the first half
of the film. You don't know, at first, if Buck is a dangerous character or a
naif. Is his creepiness an indication of an underlying violent streak, or is it
only a part of a truly quirky personality spawned by his arrested emotional
development? The answers come to the viewer as the film progresses. We learn
that Buck is harmless and only wants to return to the time when he was happiest
- when he was with his friend, Chuck. It's a striking performance by non-actor
White that perfectly complements his screenplay.
Chris Weitz was one of the producers for last year's hit "American Pie" and is
also a newcomer to the acting fold. His Chuck/Charlie is a very confused object
of Buck's attention as he rejects his childhood buddy and denies that there was
anything special in their boyhood relationship. Buck's appearance in LA, his
"stalking" and his play all lead to Charlie's remembrance of that time when
more than friendship existed between the boys. Charlie's is a role of vehement
denial, at first, and then resigned acceptance of that part of his life he
thought was buried. Weitz isn't the natural actor that White appears to be and
his performance is more studied and less fluid than White's. He is the object
of Buck's affection and, as such, has to cope with the symbolic nature of his
role.
The tiny supporting cast help to bring life to the secondary characters. Lupe
Ontiveros, as Beverly, provides some of the film's comic relief moments as she
takes on the task of directing Buck's play (called "Hank and Frank") and
becoming his friend. She recognizes Buck's childlike demeanor and is helpful,
rather than condescending, to the simple man. Ontiveros gives a wry and
endearing performance. Another surprise is Beth Colt's perf as Charlie's
soon-to-be bride. Her Carlyn is truly three dimensional and sensitive to Buck's
turmoil, even if it does cause Charlie great consternation. Carlyn is a good
guy and the non-actress gives a pro perf. Also, Paul Weitz (Chris's brother) 
gets some decent laughs as the talentless actor who takes a role in "Frank and 
Hank" and, ultimately, befriends Buck.
Techs are a little uneven. The film was shot in digital and transferred to 35mm
stock and has the look of video. The handheld camerawork by Chuy Chavez ("Star
Maps") is sometimes annoying in its shakiness, especially in close-ups. Helmer
Arteta makes a positive leap over his debut film ("Star Maps") and shows that
he is learning his craft well.
The critics and the press will likely play up the homosexual angles for "Chuck
& Buck," but that will sell the film short. It received raves at the last
Sundance Film Festival and, for its scripter and lead actor, these are 
especially deserved. It's an unusual film and, once you get past the creepy 
factor early on, an intelligently satisfying one. It may be a little tough to 
find in the theaters, probably getting only art house treatment for its 
theatrical run, but is well worth the effort to find it.

Title
Review for Virgen de los sicarios, La (2000)
OUR LADY OF THE ASSASSINS (La Virgen de los sicarios)
Worldly gay writer Fernando (German Jaramillo) returns home to family
inheritance, but no family, in Medellin, Columbia.  At a male gathering
in the elegant home of an old friend, Fernando meets teenager Alexis (Anderson
Ballesteros), the sole survivor of a gang that got wiped out on the city's
streets.  While Fernando opens his heart and pours out his bitter
philosophies to the young man, Alexis opens Fernando's eyes to the unremitting
violence that's taken over the places of his youth in the Columbian
submission for Best Foreign Language film, "Our Lady of the Assassins."
Adapted from his 1994 novel by Fernando Vallejo and directed by Barbet
Schroeder ("Reversal of Fortune"), "Our Lady of the Assassins" is a film of
contradictions, at once poetic and tender while also brutally violent,
where a machismo culture is shown matter-of-factly through the eyes of 
homosexual characters and gang members pay homage to the Virgin Mary before 
gunning people down in the streets.
Fernando rails against God as he visits old cathedrals overrun with the
homeless and drug abusers.  He's irritated by the music blaring from every
taxi he enters and the nighttime drumming of a young neighbor across the
courtyard even as he indulges heavy-metal punk loving Alexis in a stereo
system (which he later hurls off his balcony).  He relishes the irony of
finding bodies on a hillside posted with the sign 'No dumping of corpses.'
Fernando is shocked one morning as he crosses the street and witnesses
a man killed, literally at his feet, for refusing to turn over his car keys,
an act Alexis dismisses as stupid.  He's a little less shocked when
Alexis identifies his drumming neighbor on the street and shoots him dead,
decrying the senselessness of the act while attending to the practical 
matter of not getting caught.  Soon he's so inured to the environment that
he joins Alexis in making fun of the hysteria of a pregnant woman who
witnesses a gang murder, yet he continues to fret about food vendors and
restaurateurs who split paper napkins to save money ('a fly couldn't blow
its nose in this!').
As Alexis begins to get visits from the aptly named Deadboy, tipping him
off as to the nature of that day's assassins, Fernando seems to alternately
accept the surreal aspect of their existence and become suicidal.  In
saving Fernando from himself, Alexis loses his precious revolver, and
Fernando, perhaps now believing Alexis is invincible, naively professes
good riddance.
While Fernando's stance on violence never seems to be as strongly rooted
as he initially professes it to be, stage actor Jaramillo makes us feel
his nostalgic ache for more innocent times and the pain that would make
he himself pull the trigger.  Non-actor Ballesteros is astoundingly good as 
the handsome young Alexis, whose relationship with the older man reveals the
human side of a boy forced by his environment to deny one.  Juan David
Restrepo has less opportunity to prove his acting skills as Wilmar, the
second boy Fernando loves, as his character is largely symbolic, but 
he does make one important line a climatic, jolting revelation.
Schroeder, who was raised in Bogota, filmed his movie guerilla-style.
Warned by police that he was a strong candidate for kidnapping, Schroeder 
moved quickly, using high definition video to move through the streets
as unobtrusively as possible.  He captures both the beauty of a classical 
old city of plazas and cathedrals and the squalor of poverty and violence 
brought by the corrupt influence of powerful drug cartels.  His evocation of 
the religious fervor that still endures is most powerfully wrought in a 
Bunuelian scene of a street kid sharing sweet buns with beggars as if he 
were dispensing communion wafers at an altar.
"Our Lady of the Assassins" takes us on a poetic, nightmarish journey
into a spiralling cycle of violence and death that is all the life too many
people know.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Moulin Rouge! (2001)
In 1899, the summer of love, impoverished British writer Christian (Ewan 
McGregor, "Star Wars:  Episode I - the Phantom Menace") arrives in Paris
to find inspiration in Montmarte's bohemian artistic neighborhood.  When
a narcoleptic Argentian (Jacek Koman) and a midget dressed as a nun
(John Leguizamo as Henri de Toulouse Lautrec) fall through his ceiling,
Christian's cast in their alpine play, "Spectacular, Spectacular."  He breaks
their collective writers' block by belting out "The hills are alive!," 
is declared the play's new author and trundled off to meet Zidler (Jim
Broadbent, "Topsy Turvy"), the owner of their venue, the "Moulin Rouge."
Lautrec promises Christian that he'll meet with the play's star, Satine
(Nicole Kidman) alone, just as Zidler is promising the same to the Duke
(Richard Roxburgh, "Mission:  Impossible II"), a potential backer.  Satine,
Moulin Rouge's star and courtesan, gets mixed signals and sets to seducing
Christian, believing he's the wealthy Duke.
The story of "Moulin Rouge" (written by Baz Luhrmann and Craig Pearce, "William
Shakespeare's Romeo + Juliet") mirrors Dumas' "Camille," where another 
consumptive courtesan captures the heart of an idealistic young man, but 
director Luhrmann uses the age old tale as a springboard to dazzle his audience 
with lavishly colorful visuals, dizzily photographed, alarmingly editted and
musically propelled via snippets of countless pop tunes.
Our initial introduction to the Moulin Rouge is through the eyes of
Christian after imbibing in absinthe (guided by Australian songstress Kylie 
Minogue as the green fairy), the legendary hallucinogenic green liqueur.  The 
skirts of can-can dancers whoosh by with a kaleidoscopic effect as the 
performers sing the most unlikely medley of "Voulez Vous Couchez Avec Moi?" and 
"Smells Like Teen Spirit."  A wild assortment of freaks and fashionistas make 
the patrons of the Moulin Rouge the Studio 54'ers of their day.  Then Satine 
makes her entrance, dangling from above on a swing, brilliant red hair and lips 
spotlighted against chalk white skin.  Satine's introductory medley, "Diamonds
Are a Girl's Best Friend/"Material Girl," prove that Kidman can carry a tune,
but are an uninspired choice.
Luhrmann then gives us a dose of the ludicrous as Satine writhes around her
opulent Indian elephant abode as Christian recites the 'poetry' of Elton
John's "Your Song."  The real Duke's arrival calls for quick thinking on
Satine's part and aided by Christian's fellow playmates she
outlines the play's plot on the spot.  This sequence plays as if the Marx
Brothers collided with the Three Stooges.
After this, Luhrmann eases up on the hyperkinetic editting and "Moulin
Rouge" settles in with its first truly showstopping number in which Zidler
performs "Like a Virgin" for the Duke accompanied by a chorus of dancing
waiters.  Other highlights include the narcoleptic Argentian's advise to
Christian about getting involved with courtesans by way of a tango number
set to "Roxanne," and the climax of the play within a play.
Luhrman has created a great piece of eye candy, from his opening black and
white zoom through the streets of Paris leading to the Moulin Rouge (looking
like "The Cabinet of Dr. Caligari" crossed with "The City of Lost Children")
to the multi-level Indian set stages of a Bollywood Ziegfeld.  His "Romeo +
Juliet" team of cinematographer Donald McAlpine, editor Jill Bilcock,
and production designer/costume designer Catherine Martin are joined by
art director Ann-Marie Beauchamp and Set Decorator Brigitte Broch ("Chronos," 
"Amores Perros").
Yet all the film's spectular excesses don't add up to a completely satisfying 
experience, careening as it does from slapstick to melodrama.
Kidman looks ravishing, but her plight never pulls on the heartstrings.  
McGregor fares better, largely due to the real emotion he delivers with his 
full bodied singing voice.  Broadbent's Zidler is a pragmatic, rather than 
evil, version of Joel Grey's "Cabaret" emcee and he gives the film's most 
interesting performance (when Luhrmann lets us see it), yet his presence 
distractingly recalls the theatrical "Topsy Turvy."  Leguizamo is little more 
than a tearful clown - Toulouse who?  Roxburgh's Duke is as two dimentionally
villainous as the plot demands.
"Moulin Rouge" is itself like a courtesan, a lavishly oufitted, desirable
beauty who excels at artifice.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Contender, The (2000)
Former film critic Rod Lurie breaks the 'those who can't, teach' maxim by
writing and directing "The Contender," a pungent political drama with roots
in Otto Preminger's 1962 film "Advise and Consent."
The President (Jeff Bridges, wonderfully funny AND presidential) needs to
elect a new VP and chooses Senator Laine Hanson (Joan Allen, "Pleasantville") 
because he wants to get a woman in high office as part of his Democratic legacy.
In doing so, he's overlooking the popular Governor Jack Hathaway (William 
Petersen, "To Live and Die in LA"), who's just become a media darling for 
trying to save a woman from drowning.  Unfortunately, the chairman of the 
house committee that must pass the veep's nomination is Congressman Shelly 
Runyon (an almost unrecognizable Gary Oldman) who's both a political foe of
President Jackson Evans and one of Hathaway's best friends.  He uncovers
a sex scandal (a drunken gang bang) from Laine's college days and leaks it.  
Laine refuses to acknowledge the story by either confirmation or denial,
stating that it's no one's business.  The frustrated President continues
to back her, although it's clear Runyon is winning the battle and Hathaway
hovers in the wings.
This complex drama showcases the political process with all it's gameplay
centered with the issue of the right to privacy vs. the right to know.
There are thriller elements mostly represented by the character of FBI Agent
Wilhemina (Kathryn Morris) whose personal agenda is unclear while she
investigates Senator Hanson.  
Lurie's screenplay keeps us off base, never sure of characters' true 
motivations.  He makes clever associations with character development as 
well.  We're introduced to Laine as she's enjoying a passionate interlude 
atop her office desk with her husband, campaign manager William (Robin Thomas), 
so sex is implanted in our minds with the main character at the onset.  The 
President and his opponent are both food obsessed, with the President 
humorously trying to stump the White House chef (requests for shark steak 
sandwiches and hazelnut pudding are an amusing sideline, if done once too 
often) while Runyon is shown devouring rare steaks.  Senator Hathaway's
attemptto save a woman whose car plummets from a bridge into a river is
the anti-Chappaquiddick.  Laine's remark that President Clinton was 
'responsible but not guilty,' is later echoed in reverse by her mentor.
Lurie's screenplay is solid all the way, except for a major plot twist that's 
too perfunctorily coincidental to hold water.
The cast is fabulous.  Joan Allen has a firm grip on her first lead role
(Lurie wrote the screenplay for her).  She's clear eyed and strong through
overwhelming adversity, always sticking to her principles whatever the
country believes of her morals.  I'm sure she'll be remembered when Oscar
nominations are awarded.  Gary Oldman paints a complex, old world politician,
who'll pull any trick in the book to force his agenda.  He clearly believes
he's doing right, however.  The film's 'bad guy' is just not that black and 
white in the hand of this actor.  The vastly underrated Jeff Bridges gives the 
film's most purely entertaining performance as a down to earth President who 
doesn't showboat his intellect.
Christian Slater plays a young and idealistic congressman who compaigns to 
join Runyon's committee, only to have his eyes opened by what he learns from
the inside.  He hasn't been this good since his early teenage films.
William Petersen plays Hathaway as the modern equivalent of a good ol' 
governer with a knack for heroism and ambitions stoked by a nagging wife.  
Sam Elliott is brusquely outspoken and loyal as the Chief of Staff, who may 
disagree with Evans' support of Hanson (or any woman), but stays the course.  
Saul Rubinek fades into the woodwork as the communications officer.  Philip 
Baker Hall appears in one scene as Laine's Republican father and former state 
Governor.  Kathryn Morris makes an impression as the chirpy FBI investigator.
Technically the film is top notch, with Denis Maloney's urgent photography
keeping the audience in the midst of the action.  Costume design by Matthew
Jacobsen (who utilizes designers such as Armani, John Galliano, Pamela Dennis
and Brooks Brothers) is notable as well.
"The Contender" is slated to be a real contender itself when year 2000's
film lists are tallied.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Opportunists, The (2000)
Vic Kelly (Christopher Walken) is a responsible, honest, hard working man. In
his past life he did time for robbery and wants only to pull together his tiny,
fractured family. But, his auto mechanic business is not as lucrative or easy
as thieving and his debts are piling up. Vic decides to risk one more heist - 
the Big One - in "The Opportunists."
Vic's decision to go back to the old ways is not lightly made. His stint in the
slammer caused his family to break up and go their separate ways. Since he got
out, he's tried to go the straight and narrow, but, as Vic tells his patient
girlfriend Sally Mahon (Cyndi Lauper), "The regular citizen thing wasn't
working out too well." He has been trying to rebuild his estranged relationship 
with his daughter Miriam (Vera Farmiga) and foots the cost of keeping his aged 
Aunt Diedre (Anne Pitoniak) in an expensive nursing home. But, his checks are
bouncing left and right, he's in danger of losing his business and the nuns at
the nursing home are threatening to ship Aunt Dee off to Staten Island.
Life is tough for the ex-con and he's pretty vulnerable when he is approached
by Pat Duffy (Donal Logue), a security guard at a small armored car business. 
Pat tells Vic that the owner regularly skims cash from his customer accounts 
and has two big bags of illicit funds just waiting to be taken. Sally had 
repeatedly offered to lend him the money to get back on his feet, but the 
proud Vic won't accept the heartfelt offer of help. The die is finally cast 
when Vic tells Pat, "I'll check it out."
Meanwhile, a young man enters Vic's life. Mike (Peter McDonald) is just off the
plane from Ireland and tells Vic that they are cousins. The cautious Vic trusts
no one and keeps the young man at arm's length. Mike works his way into the
older man's familial affection and gets to go along on the job. Things go off
with perfect timing until Mike blunders and puts Vic in certain danger of being
caught. The inept Mike panics and runs away, leaving Vic to suffer the
consequences.
"The Opportunists" has to be the most subdued performance to date for
Christopher Walken. The actor is renown for his incredible intensity in such 
films as "The Deer Hunter" and "Prophesy." Here, as the put upon Vic, he is a 
working class guy who screwed his life up royally and now just wants a break. 
As his bank bounces his checks, Vic desperately scrabbles to pay the bills 
legitimately, but can't. The promise of easy money is too great a temptation 
as Vic makes the fateful decision to cross back across the line to a
life of crime.  
As portrayed by Walken, Vic is a victim of his own making, though you feel bad
when things go wrong for the man and glad when things go right. It's a strong,
subtle performance for the actor who is required, unfortunately, to carry most 
of the film himself.
There are some real problems with the movie that even Christopher Walken can't
help.  The screenplay by first-time helmer Myles Connell is so reality-based in 
its slice of life view of its Queens NY locale that it never really builds a 
compelling story about its main character. There is no real drama in Vic's 
story of loss of faith and his final redemption.  Sure, you feel good when Vic 
gets out of his jam, but, I wasn't satisfied by the author's overall tale or 
many of his characters. It's a blue-collar story about an average guy with
money problems at its core.
Another problem is co-star Peter McDonald. The newcomer from Ireland is
passive, at best, as Michael. He is portraying a young man who comes to America 
to bask in the fame of Vic, who is a legend in the old country for his career 
in robbery. Unfortunately, McDonald gives no life to his performance and walks 
through the role with little emotion or character development. The sullen, 
confused Michael seems to be merely a device to screw things up for Vic when 
the thief makes his fateful decision to return to a life of crime.
Of the supporting cast only Lauper, as Sally, and Tom Noonan ("What Happened
Was..."), as Mort Stein, Vic's safe-cracking mentor/trainer, are able to push 
themselves free of the mundane script. Cyndi Lauper, not known for her dramatic 
perfs, takes on the tough role of the loyal, supportive girlfriend and breaths 
life into her Sally. Sally may love Vic, but she isn't stupid. She'll go along 
with Vic's prideful stubbornness up to a point, but cuts him loose when he 
crosses back into the life of crime. Noonan gets to play up the quirky,
paranoid Mort, who agrees to help Vic, for a price, to crack the company safe
in under six minutes.  Another fresh face, Vera Farmiga ("Return to Paradise"), 
plays Vic's daughter, Miriam, and the newcomer gets to create a little bit of 
presence as Michael's budding love interest. She tries, but there is no 
chemistry between the two thespians.
The Queens locations lend to the blue-collar look of the film and photographer
Teo Maniaci enhances the working class environs where Vic lives and works.
Other techs are straightforward but not notable.
Christopher Walken is an under-appreciated actor who isn't usually given the
star role in a film. He gives himself over to his character study of Vic and
the veteran thesp gives a solid perf. Too bad the screenplay isn't in the same
league as Walken. I give "The Opportunists" a C.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Hua yang nian hua (2000)
In 1962 Hong Kong, Mr. Chow (Tony Leung Chiu-wai, "Happy Together") finds
out from Mrs. Suen (Rebecca Pan, "Flowers of Shanghai") that the room she
had for rent was just taken by Mrs. Chan (Maggie Cheung Man-yuk, "Irma Vep")
and directs him just down the hall, where another room is available.
Within these crowded quarters, Mr. Chow and Mrs. Chan frequently cross each
others paths, alone.  When they gradually realize their spouses are engaged
in an affair, the two begin a friendship, vowing to be 'nothing like them'
in director Wong Kar-wai's Cannes Prix du Technique (editing, cinematography
and production design) winner "In the Mood for Love."
Writer/director Wong Kar-wai, known for his hip, visually stylized,
modern films like "Chungking Express," steps back in time not only for his
story but for his presentation.
His Hong Kong of 1962 is a memory of a golden age where neighbors formed
mini-communities in close quarters, observing bourgeois proprieties.
The elegant beauty Mrs. Chan is married to a man usually away on business 
trips to Japan (he, like Mrs. Chow, is never really seen, just heard).  He
brings back foreign goods such as pocketbooks and rice cookers to the
delight of all, although the uniqueness of his gifts betrays his affair.
(In a beautiful foreshadowing scene, Mrs. Chan asks her husband to bring
back two pocketbooks for her boss, Mr. Ho (Lai Chin).  When her husband
inquires as to why he needs two, she wearily replies, 'you know,' referring
to the general ways of men rather than personal experience.)  Handsome Mr. 
Chow's wife is a modern woman working as a hotel receptionist who frequently 
calls her husband with stories of having to work late that eventually give way 
to visits to a sick mother.
The lonely two cross each others' paths on rain slicked streets fetching
dinners-for-one at a local noodle stall.  Their hesitant relationship
begins as they compare notes before confirming what they each already knew.
They practice what they will say to their spouses with each other, then
begin spending more time together collaberating on writing the martial arts 
serials they both love.  Soon neighbors begin to talk and the emotionally
restrained Li-zhen withdraws forcing Chow to declare his love and ask her
to leave with him for Singapore.
This heartbreaking tale of unrequited (or is it?) love is an elegant romance
for the ages and a masterpiece of its genre.  Kar-wai's cinematographers
Christopher Doyle ("Days of Being Wild," "Ashes of Time," "Fallen Angels")
and Mark Li Ping-bin ("Flowers of Shanghai") brilliantly set their camera 
as an interloper viewing his subjects on the sly, creeping along halls and 
from behind objects.  Slow motion is used several times to underline the 
melancholy aspects of the moment.  The cheating spouses are shown in shadow,
from behind, or via obstructed view.
Hyphenate William Chang Suk-ping, (production design, costume, editing)
who's worked on all of Kar-wai's films, is a maestro here, from his 
recreations of 1962 offices, apartments and restaurants to the stunning
dresses worn by Cheung (all of the same design, all boasting different
shades of personality in their fabric, always consumately elegant).
Western musical choices, such as Nat King Cole's Spanish version of 
'Perhaps, Perhaps, Perhaps' and other Latin music strongly aid in rushing
us back to another era while setting the stage for love.
Tony Leung, who won Best Actor at Cannes for this role, is an
honorable man of the time whose romantic nature is engaged by Mrs. Chan's
natural beauty, quiet nature and companionship.  Maggie Cheung evokes
the pathos of a splendid woman who, unjustly treated by her husband,
continues to cling to respectability even as her emotions are being
pulled to the surface for what may be the first and only time.  Never
has a more elegant creature (Cheung cites the costumes as a great aid
to her physical interpretation of the character) graced the screen.
The two have enormous chemistry without needing any histrionics to
convey their depth of feeling.
Wong Kar-wai has created a classic of the genre with "In the Mood for
Love" that can stand alongside David Lean's "Brief Encounter."  He's
capable of moving your emotions with a shot of a woman's embroidered slippers 
left abandoned on the floor.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Tailor of Panama, The (2001)
Andy Osnard (Pierce Brosnan, "The World Is Not Enough") has just about used
up 
the good will of MI6 when he's assigned to Panama to keep an eye on British
interests in the Canal.  In order to gain contacts and information, Andy
ferrets out Harry Pendel (Geoffrey Rush, "Quills"), an ex-convict with a
Saville Row front in "The Tailor of Panama."
Adapted from the John le Carre novel by the author, director John Boorman
("The General") and Andrew Davies, "The Tailor of Panama is a cheeky lark
about an immoral agent playing colleagues, superiors and countries against
each other to his own benefit while spinning an 'innocent' tailor into a
duplicitous stew.  While family man Harry Pendel doesn't deserve Andy's 
blackmailing, he's susceptible to it because he's duped his wife along 
with his customers and is facing financial difficulties.  Harry's a decent 
fellow who remains loyal to  anti-Noriega freedom fighters Marta (Leonor 
Varela, TV's "Cleopatra"), who was brutally disfigured, and Mickie Abraxas 
(Brendan Gleeson, "The General") now a brokendown alcoholic.  Yet he uses 
these two to concoct a story about "The Silent Opposition," a group 
purportedly arming up to defend the Panamian President's selling of the Canal 
to a) Japan, b) France or c) China/Taiwan. 
Andy's bs detector is on, but he figures Pendel's story will be bought.  
It is, and soon offers in the millions rain down from the U.S. via 
Osnard's boss Cavendish (Johathan Hyde).  That hasn't stopped Osnard 
from attempting to also get at Harry via his wife Louisa (Jamie Lee Curtis),
an American who just happens to work for U.S. Government interests in
the Canal with unshakeable loyalty.  She's already sensed something amiss
with Harry, though, and goes on the offensive.  Meanwhile, Harry's 
make-believe has caused events to take such a dramatic turn that he's 
shaken to his core.
"The Tailor of Panama" works wonderfully in its playful setup right up
through the beginning of an American invasion of Panama City (played
for yucks and getting them!).  Deceit is everywhere, from Harry's seemingly
sympathetic banker (Jon Polito, "Stuart Little") calling in a loan to 
naive Cavendish's handling of the U.S.  Osnard plays hard and fast to bed 
British diplomat attache Francesca (Catherine McCormack, "Braveheart").  
Harry amusingly gets advice from Uncle Benny (Harold Pintner), the 
deceased Jewish Uncle who set him up in Panama.
The film goes into a nose dive, however, as the two leads get into serious 
business trying to outmaneuver one another.  There's no satisfaction in 
the wrapup, in which the (marginally) 'good' guy barely squeezes out of 
harm's way as corruption still reigns.
Rush gives another delightful performance as the put upon Pendel, whether
he's chalking up a suit pattern, making breakfast for his kids or trying
to keep one step ahead of Osnard.  He gains audience empathy as a man 
deserving the second chance Uncle Benny provided.  Brosnan has a ball 
turning his suave Bond agent sideways with malicious glee and his is a 
fun performance to watch.  Gleeson is odd casting as a Panamian rebel, 
but he takes ownership of the character and makes us believe he's a 
Central American hero destroyed by his own fighting spirit.  Jamie Lee
Curtis brings little to her role as the bewildered wife in a lackluster
performance.  Get your first screen glimpse of the boy cast as Harry Potter, 
Daniel Radcliffe, as Harry and Louisa's son Mark.
The film, shot on location in Panama by cinematographer by Philippe
Rousselot ("Remember the Titans"), looks sweatily slick.  Editting is
comical while the film remains in hijinx mode.  Bush family supporters
will have their noses tweaked.  
"The Tailor of Panama" is best when it's shaken, not stirred.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Sunshine (1999)
An alcoholic elixer known as "A Taste of Sunshine" brings wealth and
social standing to the Jewish family Sonnenschein (German for sunshine)
under the helm of Emmanuelle (David De Keyser, "Yentl").  Ralph Fiennes
plays his son Ignatz as well as two subsequent generations as the family
is buffetted through almost a century of turbulent Hungarian history.
Director Istvan Szabo ("Mephisto") cowrote this epic with famed playwright
Israel Horovitz ("Growing Up Jewish") which takes its family through
the end of a monarchy, the subsequent decline into fascism (and the
Holocaust) and the reactionary institution of communism.  Ignatz makes
his father proud by studying law and becoming a judge loyal to the crown,
while his brother Gustave (James Frain, "Where the Heart Is") becomes
a doctor of more liberal politics.  Then there's Valerie (Jennifer Ehle,
daughter of Rosemary Harris who takes on the role as the character ages),
the orphaned daughter of Emmanuel's brother whom Emmanuel adopts and raises
as his own.  The sexual spark between Valerie and Ignatz causes grief
to their parents while making Gustave jealous, but it will not be denied
and the two marry.  However, Valerie's political leanings are aligned with
Gustave's and eventually she leaves one brother for the other.
Ignatz also changes his family name to the more Hungarian (and less
Jewish) Sors (which means destiny) at the suggestion of the chief justice
and Valerie and Gustave follow suit, much to their parents' sadness.
Valerie and Ignatz's son Adam (Fiennes again) lives a life of priviledge
and becomes a national hero as a fencing champion, even winning Olympic
Gold.  He too has women problems as his sister-in-law Greta (Rachel Weisz,
"The Mummy") bullies him into an affair ('We're a lucky family - everyone
loves everybody else,' Adam comments wryly.).  When the Nazi regime rises and
rules governing Jewishness are heard on the radio, the Sonnenscheins/Sors
family qualify for special standing due to war medals and that Olympic gold,
but the family still ends up in the death camps, which only Adam's son
Ivan (Fiennes) and his grandmother Valerie (Harris by this point) survive.
Ivan becomes a pawn of the communist movement, although he has a good man,
Andor Knorr, as a mentor.  Like his father and grandfather before him,
Ivan has a messy love life, becoming embroiled in an affair with the wife
(Deborah Kara Unger, "The Game") of a high ranking official.  When the
communist party begins to turn in upon itslef and Knorr is targetted, Ivan
is forced to condemn his old friend.
The story is always interesting, yet is harmed by its willingness to stoop to
soap opera level.  Even more serious of a flaw is that each generation
played by Fiennes is essentially a weak, comprised man overpowered by the
women who love him.  The three hour film seems too short in that scenes
are abbreviated while we barrel into the next one in order to cram all
the events in.  The film plays like a six hour miniseries that's been
editted for theatrical release.
There are some standout performances, chiefly Jennifer Ehle ("Wilde," 
"Bedrooms and Hallways") who resembles a young Meryl Streep in both looks
and talent.  Her strong character is never compromised as she searches
for truth and beauty in life.  Rosemary Harris picks up the reins admirably,
but the film suffers when Ehle leaves the screen.  (A far less smooth 
transition is achieved when John Neville ("The Adventures of Baron von
Munchausen") takes over for Frain, whom he resembles not in the slightest).
Also exceptional is David De Keyser as Emmanuel, the good father whose 
children perplex and try him while also filling him with pride.  Miriam 
Margolyes ("The Age of Innocence") gives another great turn as his embittered 
wife Rose who loves her own sons over her niece and resents a similar cousin 
who once tempted her own husband.  Fiennes himself is solid, creating three 
distinct characters whose bloodlines demand they still resemble each other, but 
his performance is passionless.  William Hurt stands out as the decent Knorr,
remaining honorable as he's besmirched by his own party.  Rachel Weisz is
appropriately hiss-worthy as Adam's selfish lover while Molly Parker ("Kissed")
is bland as his wife.  Kara Unger is good as a woman whose sexual appetites
override her sense.
The film looks stunning, with cinematography by Lajos Koltai ("Mother")
utilizing a marvelous color scheme.  The first hour of the film is bathed
in golds and ambers, reflecting the "Taste of Sunshine" upon which the 
family is based, as well as nostalgia for a lost age.  The subsequent two
hours begin with the blinding whites of the fencing sport, which evolves into 
the reds of Communism and sickly greens of institutionism - the three colors 
of the oft-seen Hungarian flag.  Koltai also makes great use of his Budapest
locations and leaves the audience with some memorable images, such as
Valerie sitting in a courtyard filled with yellow flowers or Adam, left
hanging from a tree in a Nazi death camp encased in ice.
Ralph Fiennes stars as father, son and grandson in the multi-generation drama
by veteran Hungarian filmmaker Istvan Szabo ("Mephisto," "Colonel Redl") in the
epic family film, "Sunshine." The story is told by grandson Ivan Sonnenschein
(which translates to the "Sunshine" of the title) and begins the tale of how
Great-great-grandfather Emmanuelle built his fortune using a secret family
recipe for a marvelous elixir called "A Taste of Sunshine." However, his sons
Ignatz (Fiennes) and Gustav (James Frain) refuse to follow in his footsteps and
seek more intellectual pursuits - Ignatz becomes a judge, while Gustav pursued
a career in medicine.
The family fable focuses on the ambitious Ignatz Sonnenschein as he abandons
his Jewish heritage in favor of advancing himself in the Hungarian Empire's
judicial system. His father is aghast when Ignatz changes his name to the more 
Christian sounding Sors and announces his amorous intentions for his cousin 
(almost a sister) Valerie. Ignatz's loyalty is to his emperor, not to his 
family, and he forsakes his Jewish past for personal advancement. His 
conservatism backfires, though, as the Europe is thrust into the throes of The 
Great War and beyond.  When Communism rears its ugly head, Ignatz falls from 
grace with the ruling regime and becomes a mere pawn in his country's 
political upheaval.
As Ignatz fades from the picture, his son, Adam (Fiennes), develops into an
outstanding athlete. He continues his father's denial of their Jewish faith,
converting to Catholicism in order to compete on the restricted national
fencing team. When he wins the gold medal at the 1936 Munich Olympics, his 
future in the again conservative regime seems assured. Then, with the rise of 
the Nazis to power in Europe, anti-Semitism rages and the Jewish Laws are 
issued. Adam steadfastly maintains that his exemptions - converted Catholic 
and national hero - protect him and his family from the fate awaiting Europe's 
Jews. In shock, Adam and his son, Ivan, are shipped to a concentration camp 
where Adam's demands that he is exempt and should be released end, literally, 
in his chilling death.
Ivan (Fiennes) survives the camp and, as a young man, becomes a police
investigator and embraces the Communist Cause as the savior for the survivors
of the Holocaust and Hitler's deadly fascism. But, changing masters does not
create the freedom that Ivan expected as the communist leaders, under the 
thumb of Josef Stalin, reprise the same brutal repression as Hitler's henchmen. 
Ivan, through the influences of his old grandma (Valerie, played in later 
years by Rosemary Harris) and aging uncle Gustav (John Neville), embraces his 
Hebrew past and rejects, even subverts, the communist oppression of the 
Hungarian people.  The final straw for the young man is when he is ordered to 
interrogate and expose his friend and mentor, Andor Korr (William Hurt), 
bringing the family tale full circle.
"Sunshine" is an ambitious film that spans decades, with the concentration on
Fiennes's several lives. The political and personal lives of each Sonnenschein
lad are influenced by the whims of history as one regime replace another, each
with a promise of a better life for its citizens. The promise is never kept,
though, and the people are mere duckpins in the political game as conservative
regime replaces liberal, then communist replaces fascist, ad infinitum. The
political scope of the film is impressive in it span of time and detail. The
upheavals that occur through Hungary's history are depicted with accuracy,
starting with the decaying opulence of the Austria-Hungarian Empire of Franz
Josef.
When World War One is thrust upon the countries of Europe, the political fabric
is torn asunder and traditional ways are destroyed forever. Chaos takes control
as followers of the left and right vie with each other to take control.
Communism takes command of Russia, while the rise of the Nazis grips Germany
and, eventually, the rest of the continent. Hungary sways first in one
direction, then the other, as the left and right struggle to take over the
government. This strife is shown in parallel as each of the Sonnenschein boys
makes his mark on their individual generations, trying to garner favor from the
powers that be.
While Ralph Fiennes is the nominal star of the film, it is really an ensemble
effort with some outstanding performances. Fiennes puts a unique spin on each
of his characters and does an impressive job of making each one different. It's 
a big creative challenge that the actor handles well enough, but there is a
flatness that permeates all three perfs. More impressive is the pair of
performances by the actresses who portray Valerie as, first, a young lady, and
later, an old woman. Jennifer Ehle is cast as Valerie the younger who becomes
the lover and wife of Ignatz. Ehle outshines Fiennes (and everyone else) in
every scene she is in, coming across as smart, independent, confident and
capable. Rosemary Harris, Ehle's real-life mother, plays Valerie in her
twilight years and carries forth the strengths developed by the younger Val. 
These two ladies are the best things in "Sunshine."
The rest of the large cast provides the requisite depth to their respective
roles, but are all so briefly presented that there isn't much time to develop
each character. Of the others, William Hurt stands out as the honest and
trusting Andor. He believes that his country is finally ready to care for its
people, only to have his ideals smashed by the brutal oligarchy of the
communists. His downfall also reps a significant turning point for Ivan.
There is depth in the screenplay by Szabo and Hungarian playwright Israel
Horowitz and they have no trouble in filling the film's 180 minute run time
with its three interlocking tales. But, 3 hours is a big investment of time 
for a moviegoer and Fiennes does not give a compelling enough performance to 
warrant the time for most. It's not the type of film I can "recommend" but I 
don't regret seeing it, either. It's an enigma.
Tech credits are first rate with Lajos Koltai providing the lush photography
that helps carry the sought after period feel. Costume, by Pedro Moreno, and
set design, by Attila Kovacs, recreate, nicely, the flow of Hungarian history 
over the last century. The score, by Maurice Jarre, suits the mood of the film.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for American Rhapsody, An (2001)
When Margit (Nastassja Kinski, "The Claim") and Peter (Tony Goldwyn, "The
Sixth Day") flea from 1950s Hungary with their daughter Maria, their infant
is supposed to follow, but grandmother Helen's (Agi Banfalvy) fears make
her keep the baby behind.  Heartbroken, the family continues on to America, 
while baby Suzanne is raised in the Hungarian countryside.  Writer/director 
Eva Gardos tells her own story of a life between two families and countries 
in "An American Rhapsody."
Childless farming couple Jeno (Balazs Galko) and Teri (Zsuzsa Czinkoczi)
give Suzanne (at 6, Kelly Endresz Banlaki) an idyllic peasant folk 
fairytale childhood.  The child is happy and adored and doesn't comprehend
the occasional gifts which arrive from the United States.  Peter and
Margit have worked hard and achieved a middle class home in California
where Maria has become a typical American child.  Margit toils at a 
letter writing campaign to have her daughter returned to her and finally
realizes her dream.  Suzanne is taken from the only parents she knows
(who believe she'll be returned) and sent to America, where her arrival
is a media event.
While Suzanne enjoys a good relationship with her father, she's at war
with her 'new' mother.  The teenage Suzanne (Scarlett Johansson, "Ghost
World") sneaks out of her bedroom window to drive around with her boyfriend,
drink and stay out all night.  Mom installs bars on the windows and a lock
on the door.  Suzanne loads a rifle and shoots up the room.  With the
family in crisis, Peter fulfills an old promise to send Suzanne to
Budapest, against Margit's wishes.  The trip allows Suzanne to become
whole and learn the secret her mother wished to protect her from.
"An American Rhapsody" is a personal story about the meaning of home
and family.  Suzanne's resentment at being left behind and torn from
the people who raised her is met with overwhelming mother love from the
woman who's dreamt of nothing but their reunion.  Elder sister Maria,
ironically, is the alien of the family, somewhat taken for granted and
completely assimilated into the new culture.  She drinks coke and slings
the slang while her babushka wearing sister gets lost in a neighborhood 
of identical tract houses.  While these early scenes are fascinating,
due in large part to the sensational Banlaki, the later teenage years
become wearying in their repetitiveness, with too many scenes of Margit 
standing in Suzanne's bedroom doorway while her daughter sulks.  Gardos 
doesn't get the mother's point of view across well and lets important
characters like sister Maria and Suzanne's boyfriend Paul all but
disappear (in fact, the shooting scene begins with Paul at the window,
but he's promptly forgotten, a jarring problem in such a climatic moment).
Kinski's fine as the overprotective mom, but Johansson fails to make us 
empathize.  Goldwyn is surprisingly good as the even tempered, practical dad.
The camera just loves Banlaki, and the film's at its best when she's
on screen.
Hungarian cinematographer Elemer Ragalyi ("Jacob the Liar")
shoots the early escape in a bluish black and white, letting full color bloom
when the family arrives in the West.  The film has a retro look, as if
it was filmed in the time period the story takes place in, which is
also complemented by the production (Alex Tavoularis, "Apocalypse Now") and 
costume design (Beatrix Aruno Pasztor, "The Wonder Boys").
Reminiscent of the equally uneven "The Man Who Cried,"
"An American Rhapsody" takes a bumpy road on its way home.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Shrek (2001)
Once upon a time a solitary ogre named Shrek (Mike Myers) was really annoyed
to discover that his swamp had been invaded by three blind mice, seven dwarves
and all the other fairy tale characters in the land, banished from their
home by Lord Farquaad (John Lithgow).  Unwittingly befriended by a non-stop
talking donkey (Eddie Murphy), Shrek travels to Dulloc to speak with Farquaad,
where he stumbles into a joust and comes up the winner.  His prize?  To save 
Princess Fiona (Cameron Diaz) from a tower surrounded by molten flame and 
protected by a dragon so she can become Farquaad's bride.  The ogre agrees to 
the task in return for getting his solitary lifestyle back in "Shrek."
It took four writers (Ted Elliott and Terry Rossio ("The Road to El Dorado"), 
Roger S.H. Schulman ("Balto") and Joe Stillman ("Beavis and Butthead Do 
America")) to adapt William Steig's children's book.  The bad news?  They've
genericized an already simple plotline while heavily under the influence of
William Goldman's "The Princess Bride."  The good news?  There's so much
wacky humor culled from both fairy tales and popular culture that this
movie should keep you in stitches.  
We get our first inkling that we're in for a real treat as one of Farquaad's
men, intent on rounding up magical creatures offers 'Five schillings for the 
possessed boy!' after observing Dreamworks' rendition of Disney's animated 
Pinocchio.  Meanwhile within the castle walls, a gingerbread man being tortured
by Farquaad spits icing and yells 'Eat me!' before breaking down and solemnly 
asking 'Do you know the muffin man?'
Shrek, a green giant with bobbly antennae-like ears, is a grumpy recluse who
really yearns to fit in (although who could put up with his habit of making
candles from his own ear wax?).  Donkey is a hyperactive, endearingly stunted
creature who can talk and, therefore, believes will make a great misfit pairing
with the uncooperative Shrek.  Donkey proves his worth sweet talking the
princess-guarding dragon.  The Princess proves to be more than a shade offbeat
after learning she's not getting the fairy tale issue rescue she's been
expecting.  When Fiona's true colors are exposed (including opportunies for
some tomboyish gross out humor), a spark develops between her and Shrek.
The script's details are gleefully impish, constantly poking fun at Disney 
from the theme park world of Farquaad's Dulloc with its turnstyle entrance and
'It's a Small World' parody of an information booth to the blue bird which
meets a most un-Disneyish fate after duetting with Fiona 'Snow White' style.
Popular culture is represented with film references to "Babe" and "Charlies'
Angels" via "The Matrix." 
Myers chooses his 'So I Married an Axe Murderer' Scottish brogue for Shrek
in order to give his voice some heft.  While this may prove distracting for
anyone familiar with that film, overall it works more than not.  Eddie Murphy
steals the show as the fast-talking, Motown-singing Donkey, proving once
again his talent as a vocal performer (is it another wink at Disney that 
Donkey is paired with a dragon, a creature Murphy portrayed in Disney's
'Mulan?').  Lithgow's a good choice for the supercilious, height-challenged
villain Lord Farquaad.  Diaz is energetic but ultimately nondescript voicing 
Princess Fiona.  (A better choice would have been Minnie Driver, who's proven 
herself a terrific vocal talent in such diverse animations as Disney's 
"Tarzan," "Princess Mononoke" and the "South Park" movie.)
The computer animation looks terrific (particularly Donkey), although it
won't elicit the types of oohs and aahs of Pixar's work ("Toy Story," "A
Bug's Life," "Toy Story 2").  In keeping with its hip style, pop music
is used, which like Myer's voice may be initially jarring, but ultimately 
satisfies (while surveying bridal candidates via a 'Dating Game' parody 
broadcast by Snow White's Evil Queen's mirror, Farquaad is told 'Fiona 
likes pina coladas' - cue Jimmy Buffet!).
"Shrek" has good lessons for kids and humor targetted at every age group
in the family.  While it may be derivative of the 1987's "The Princess Bride,"
"Shrek" addresses a new generation with similar sensibilities and doesn't
suffer in the comparison.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Don't Say a Word (2001)
New York psychiatrist Dr. Nathan Conrad (Michael Douglas) is just trying to
get home to his laid-up wife Aggie (Famke Janssen, "Made") and eight year
old daughter Jessie (Skye McCole Bartusiak, "The Cider House Rules") on 
Thanksgiving Eve when his friend Jerry Sachs (Oliver Platt, "Lake Placid")
sidelines him with the complex case of catatonic, but newly violent Elisabeth 
Burrows (Brittany Murphy, "Girl, Interrupted").  At home the next morning, 
Nathan finds his daughter kidnapped and himself in a race against time to 
unlock a number from Elisabeth's head in "Don't Say a Word."
After delivering two terrific performances as compromised characters last
year,
Michael Douglas ("Wonder Boys," "Traffic") takes the low road in this messy
children-in-distress potboiler from director Gary Fleder ("Kiss the Girls").
Nathan's presumed psychiatric expertise with teenagers is established by
his telling a panty-stealing preppie that 'we all did that.'  After
five minutes with Elisabeth, an eighteen year-old no one's been able to
properly diagnose in her last ten years of institutionalized life, Nathan
declares her a talented faker.  Elisabeth, creepily played by Murphy in
a first scene which recalls Linda Blair in "The Exorcist," apparently accepts
Nathan's analysis and begins to assist the doctor even though she fears
giving him the information 'they all want.'  So much for this film's tension.
Screenwriter Patrick Smith Kelly ("A Perfect Murder") serves up a bunch of
kidnappers who can set up security cameras and bugging devices anywhere they
want, but don't have the sense to move their kidnap victim out of her
mother's hearing range.  A scary looking kidnapper (Conrad Goode, "Tomcats")
begins to soften towards Jessie in a bit of character development that's
forgotten when it should count.  A police lieutenant (Jennifer Esposito,
"Made") remains on the outskirts of the action until coming into
play at the exact right moment during the film's never-ending climax.
The head of a Bellevue-like NYC hospital is stupid enough to deny knowledge 
of a woman who was not only his girlfriend, but interned under him, to a 
police detective.  
While Famke Janssen does her best with her "Sorry, Wrong Number" sideplot,
Michael Douglas is left to act determined while racing against an arbitrary
deadline.  The promising Brittany Murphy could have made something of her
role if the screenplay hadn't abandoned its intriguing setup as soon as it
introduced it.  Sean Bean ("Ronin") is a stock bad guy,  Oliver Platt
is saddled with a plot-driven character and poor Jennifer Esposito might
as well be in a different movie.  Young Skye McCole Bartusiak is believably
precocious as Jessie.
Cinematography by Amir Mokri ("Coyote Ugly") and production design by Nelson
Coates ("Kiss the Girls") are of higher caliber than the material warrants.
Director Gary Fleder, whose film has been leaking air throughout its entire
run time, lets the whole thing deflate as one climax leads to another which
leads to yet another, each seeming more like stalling for time than anything
else.
The old adage holds true - if you can't say something nice, "Don't Say a 
Word."
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Bubble Boy (2001)
Jimmy Livingston (Jake Gyllenhaal, "October Sky") was born without an immune
system and is cared for in his California home by his bigoted, religious
overprotective mom (Swoosie Kurtz, "Citizen Ruth") and silent bullied dad
(John Carroll Lynch, "The Next Best Thing").  Beautiful teenage neighbor 
Chloe (Marley Shelton, "Valentine") becomes friendly with the guitar-playing 
oddball, but Jimmy's mom-instilled fears keep him from letting her into his 
germ free bubble environment.  When Chloe tells him she's marrying obnoxious 
rocker Mark (Dave Sheridan, "Ghost World") in Niagara Falls, Jimmy designs a 
portable bubble and sets off on a cross country journey to declare his love 
in "Bubble Boy."
Let me state one thing up front - I find political correctness to be an
overvalued virtue and I found "Bubble Boy" to be both jaw-droppingly 
outrageous and funny with some sharply observed societal and religious
subtext.  I'm amazed this button-pushing movie, sure to be reviled by many, 
came from a Disney studio (Touchstone).
Mrs. Livingston is one of those religious nuts who teaches her child that
other religions are bad, TV only gets 1 mom-approved station, and 
all fairy tales end with the hero getting out of his bubble and dying.
Jimmy grows up to be a wild eyed innocent who dines on cross shaped soy
fiber cookies and loves watching "Land of the Lost" with 'the whore next
door.'
Adorned with the spiky hair and distancing false arms of "Edward
Scissorhands,"
Gyllenhaal (a much wiser casting choice than the more obvious Brendan Fraser)
makes us feel his innocent joy at seeing grass and walking outside in his
clear spherical suit.  He first meets a churlish, regimented bus stop guy
(Zach Galifianakis) who's no help in getting him to his destination, but
a busload of 'Bright and Shinies,' an 'Up With People'-like cult all named
Todd or Lorraine, pick him up instead.  Once Jimmy innocently declares them
a cult, he's thrown out of the bus and picked up by a friendly biker (Danny 
Trejo, "Spy Kids") who brings him to Las Vegas where he becomes a human beach 
ball at a rock concert.
Meanwhile, back at home hysterical Mrs. Livingston is reading the fake
ransom note she's had her hapless husband compose.  'From the Jews?  They're 
gonna want more than $100,000!' she screams, in perhaps the flick's most 
offensive, but in character, line.  Screenwriters Cinco Paul and Ken 
Daurio are attempting to do more than shock and offend, though.  They're
illustrating how a bad environment affects our new generations.
When the Livingstons hit the road in pursuit of Jimmy, they end up hitting
the lad off his Vegas-won scooter and he bounces right into a train car
filled with Dr. Phreaks' ("Austin Powers'" mini-me, Verne Troyer)
travelling sideshow of Flipper Boy (Geoffrey Arend), Li'l Zip (Beetlejuice), 
Chicken Man (Stephen Spinella) and the Human Sasquatch (Matthew McGrory).  
Meanwhile, the leader of the Bright and Shinies (Fabio!) tells them their 
messiah will look just like the bubble boy they discarded.  The Bright and 
Shinies go off in pursuit of the messiah the freaks wish to claim as their 
savior.
After being rescued by Indian ice cream and curry van man who has
a tragic run in with a sacred cow and earning $500 in a Chinese night club 
mud-wrestling contest with two bikini-clad babes to pay a 97 year old cabbie,
Jimmy eventually lands (literally) in Niagara Falls.  The romance is just
a plot contrivance for the hero's amazing journey and "The Graduate"
parody climax is obvious, but the wrap-up does provides a few character 
revelation chuckles.
Commercial director Blair Hayes does a pretty good job keeping all the 
elements interwoven, although things get confusing once or twice along the 
way.  "Bubble Boy" is bright, frantic, innocent, occasionally gross,
wickedly observant and just plain nuts.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for How the Grinch Stole Christmas (2000)
DR. SEUSS' HOW THE GRINCH STOLE CHRISTMAS
Earlier this year, Jim Carrey was the only reason to see "Me, Myself & Irene,"
a Farrelly Brothers mistep.  He's done it again.
Carrey simply *is* the Grinch, helped, of course, by Rick Baker's phenomenal
makeup design.  Whether he's gleefully tampering with Who mail ('jury duty,
pink slip, blackmail, eviction notice!'), going over his schedule
('4:00, wallow in self pity, 4:30, stare into the abyss') or lecturing
Max (Kelly, the film's other asset) on the art of being a reindeer, Carrey
had me sucked in.  However, when the focus shifts from Carrey, the movie
is abysmal.
Firstly, there's the story tampering.  We're given background as to how
the Grinch got this way (he was called names at school).  The Whos' Christmas
obssession has become crass commercialism, depressing Cindy Lou Who (newcomer
Taylor Momsen) to the point that she sings the maudlin 'Where Are You
Christmas?' mid-film.  The mayor (Jeffrey Tambor) is in a love triange
with Martha May Whovier (Christine Baranski) and the Grinch!  Screenwriters
Jeffrey Price and Peter S. Seaman ("Doc Hollywood") even have the poor
taste to include a couple of sex 'jokes' that seem seedy and woefully out
of place.
Secondly, there's the truly awful Whos (makeup again by Rick Baker).  They
look like rat-dogs.  Cindy Lou is too old and too normal looking in contrast
to the others.  Even the Grinch, when shown in flashbacks as a baby and an 
eight year old, looks awful, like a rejected monster from "Gremlins."
Thirdly, there's the art direction which is plastic and non-organic.
Whoville looks like Munchkinland crossed with the live action "Flinstones."  
I was always aware I was watching a soundstage covered in fake snow.  At one
point, the Grinch's quick entry/exit to Whoville is shown in an animated
sequence and the whole film is picked up for that one brief moment.  Otherwise
this is just a drab, grimy, bleak looking film.
I can't recommend "Dr. Seuss' How the Grinch Stole Christmas" as a film,
although I can recommend Carrey's performance and the casting of Max the dog.
Anthony Hopkins was chosen to narrate the film, perhaps to recall the
English accent of Boris Karloff from the vastly superior original animation,
a move the filmmakers should have avoided.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Little Nicky (2000)
After a 10,000 year rule, Satan (Harvey Keitel) decides to stay on the throne
instead of turning it over to one of his three sons.  That's fine by Little
Nicky (Adam Sandler), but not his brothers Adrian (Rhys Ifans, "Notting Hill")
and Cassius (Tommy 'Tiny' Lister, Jr.), who decide to leave their hellish
home and create their own on Earth.  Their departure freezes the gates of 
hell, causing Papa demon to begin to decompose, so it's up to Little Nicky
to save the world and his dad by returning his two brothers to Hell.
Adam Sandler movies are definitely an 'acquired' taste.  I've always found 
him likeable, even in his subpar outings ("The Wedding Singer" is really the 
only of his films that succeeds outside of his own genre).  While that's the 
case here as well, "Little Nicky" is otherwise so torturously awful that it 
makes one wonder how the highly paid Sandler could foist such bogus product 
into the marketplace.
This is the type of comedy that attempts to get yucks by having Hitler
appear in a French maid's outfit to have Satan place a pineapple where the 
sun don't shine.  The 'story' is just a long, drawn out 90 minute affair of 
having Nicky learn to do human things like eat (Popeye's Chicken is Sandler's 
fast food product placement of choice in this outing) and sleep,
and attempt to get his more powerful, smarter brothers info a magical flask
aided by Beefy, a talking demon bulldog (voice of Robert Smigel).  He also
falls in love with an awkward design student (Patricia Arquette) and ends
up with a roommate, Todd (Allen Covert, "Big Daddy"), implied to be gay
(more uproariousness!).
It's amazing to see all the misguided people who show up in this clunker.
First there's the seemingly brilliant casting of Keitel, who's never been
more dreadful.  His dad, Lucifer, is played by Rodney Dangerfield, milking
hoary laughs in a pitiful walk through.  Jon Lovitz appears as a sinner,
reminding us that any good performance he's gotten onto film must have
been an accident.  Michael McKean is the chief of police.  Quentin Tarantino
is a blind street preacher who 'smells' the devil (and overacts atrociously).
Clint Howard proves that he's the most shameless actor working
in film today.  Rob Schneider appears to repeat his 'you can do it'
encouragements from "The Waterboy."  Dana Carvey takes on Nicky on the
basketball court (amidst the real Harlem Globetrotters no less).  Carl
Weathers, Regis Philbin, Kevin Nealon, Ellen Cleghorne, Henry Winkler,
Ozzy Osbourne....what were they all thinking?  At least the terrifically
talented Reese Witherspoon provides a bubbly bright spot as a Valley Girlish
angel.
Technically the film averages out to mediocrity.  Hell's a blatant make
believe soundstage, costume is obvious, makeup nothing special.  Post dubbing
of dialogue appears to be synched incorrectly in several scenes.  Steven
Brill's (writer of all THREE Mighty Ducks movies) direction is pedestrian
at best.
There are maybe 3 laughs in the entire film (written by Tim Herlihy, Adam
Sandler and Steven Brill).  Nicky returns to hell whenever he dies, fairly
frequently and sometimes amusingly.  Sandler also gets a couple of laughs
from rock music references.  That's IT.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Curse of the Jade Scorpion, The (2001)
CW Briggs (Woody Allen) believes he's the top insurance investigator in
New York City, but the new efficiency expert brought into the firm, Betty
Ann Fitzgerald (Helen Hunt) thinks he's a dinosaur.  When the two are 
chosen to be part of a nightclub's hypnotism act, code words will turn them
into the criminals they should be investigating in Allen's latest, "The
Curse of the Jade Scorpion."
Finally, the Woodman's back in form with his best flick since 1996's "Everyone
Says I Love You."  Allen, who has a real knack for nostalgic period pieces,
has created a sweet mystery.
CW Briggs is a hard boiled, chauvinistic insurance investigator and one of
Allen's funniest characters.  He goes toe to toe with tough cookie Betty
Ann Fitzgerald, who delivers some of the sassiest insults ever to be volleyed
in a battle of the sexes.  Betty Ann has a secret that makes her appear
suspicious to Briggs, but when revealed, uncovers her vulnerability.
When Briggs gets a late night call from Voltan (David Ogden Stiers, "Everyone
Says I Love You") whispering "Constantinople," he robs the wealthy Kensingtons,
stashes the jewels in his bedroom and has no memory of it.  Investigating
the next day, he meets spoiled Kensington daughter Laura, (Charlize Theron)
the type of gal who swims in fountains and drives fast cars.  She's turned
on because he's different ('I find it strangely exciting standing here in 
this grungy hovel with a myopic insurance investigator,' she purrs when
visiting his apartment).  When Briggs leaves her in his bed to heed another of
Voltan's calls, Laura finds his behavior suspicious.  Briggs discovers that
his boss Magruder (Dan Aykroyd) has taken on Coopersmith detectives who've
interviewed Laura and that he's now a suspect!  As much as Betty Ann presumably
hates Briggs, she doesn't believe he's a crook, but when he's put away, Voltan 
uses her code word 'Madagascar.'
Beautifully shot in a golden glow by cinematographer Zhao Fei ("Raise the
Red Lantern," "Sweet and Lowdown"), "The Curse of the Jade Scorpion" has
both the look and feel of a 40's film.  Allen's plot is like a loving
restoration of a caper from a more innocent time.  His interweaving
suspicions and code words ('Paris' is used by the married Magruder to
convey sweet nothings to his mistress Betty Ann in mixed company) snake 
throughout his screenplay masterfully.  Allen's impeccable choice of music 
includes recordings of Duke Ellington's "Sophisticated Lady" and Glenn 
Miller's "Sunrise Serenade."
"The Curse of the Jade Scorpion" is a solid mid-range effort from the prolific
writer/director that's a delight from start to finish.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Drôle de Félix (2000)
THE ADVENTURES OF FELIX (DROLE DE FELIX)
When Felix (Sami Bouajila, "The Siege") loses his job, he decides to travel
from Dieppe to Marseilles to visit the father he never knew.  He buys his
teacher boyfriend Daniel (Pierre-Loup Rajot) a ticket to meet him in a week's 
time and sets off on a journey that will net him a family of a different kind
in "The Adventures of Felix" (Drole de Felix).
The writer/director partnership of Olivier Ducastel and Jacques Martineau
("Jeanne and the Perfect Guy") begin their film by establishing Felix'
loving relationship with Daniel in the coastal Normandy town of Dieppe.
Daniel is amused to discover that Felix has become addicted to a soap opera
during his job on a commuter ferry boat, Felix has a run-in with an
inexperienced kite flyer and he visits the local clinic for his HIV cocktail.
These three experiences will gain new significance as part of Felix' trip.
Once Felix hits the road, his adventures are titled as 'My little brother,'
'My grandmother,' 'My cousin,' 'My sister,' and finally 'My father.'  These
relationships are all symbolic and recognized by the audience well before
Felix makes the connection.
Sami Bouajila has our good will before he sets out on the road, where his
tendency to break out into song and dance as he travels makes him even more
endearing.  His first significant encounter, where he witnesses a fellow
Arab being beaten in a racist attack in Rouen, will haunt the rest of his
journey.  Felix bounces back by assisting a young art student, Jules (Charly
Segue), a seventeen year old who sneaks Felix into his bedroom for the night
hoping for romance.  The two 'borrow' a car and later Felix takes Jules into
his first disco (they get thrown out when Jules' age is discovered).  Felix
defines their relationship as like a younger/older brother, disappointing
Jules but leaving him with new life experiences, and moves on.
Felix is prodded awake by Mathilde (cabaret singer Patachou in a marvelous
comedic performance), a firecracker of an older woman who insists that he 
carry her groceries.  This sequence is rich with warm humor, as Felix does the 
chores Mathilde's son never gets around to while his sexuality makes her 
relive her wild youth ('I was a hot tomato.').  Their shared morning ritual of 
pill taking and soap opera viewing over breakfast highlights the similarities
between two diverse individuals.
'The Cousin' sequence, where Felix meets a railroad worker (Philippe Garziano)
and shares outdoor sex and some kite flying, is perfunctorily handled and
doesn't mesh well with the film's themes or pacing.  Felix moves on to assist a
woman on the side of the road.  Isabelle (Ariane Ascaride, "Marius et
Jeannette") is going in Felix' direction, but must make stops along the way
to deliver her three children to their three respective fathers.  The kids
provide some hilarity, especially when young Tonio (Adrien Auzias) challenges
Felix' conventional ideas about family.  Felix' final encounter with an
old fisherman (Maurice Benichou) leaves them both with fresh outlooks on
life and is satisfyingly poignant.  A worried Daniel meets up with a more
self aware, but still boyishly engaging, lover ready to take a romantic
holiday.
Director of Photography Matthieu Poirot-Delpech captures the glories of 
his north to south French locations in brilliant color while the classical
guitar score provides a Middle Eastern flavor.  Except for that one abruptly
handled sequence, Ducastel and Martineau deliver a socially conscious,
humanistic, funny road movie that's always engrossing.  "The Adventures of 
Felix" and its star have charm to spare.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Meet the Parents (2000)
When Chicago nurse Greg Focker (Ben Stiller) tries to propose 'cute' to
his schoolteacher girlfriend Pam (Teri Polo, TV's "Felicity"), she's 
interrupted by cell phone news that her younger sister is getting married.
As Pam discusses her sister's doctor fiance's courtly ways, including
his having asked her father for her hand in marriage, Greg realizes he'd better
follow suit and packs the ring away for a trip to "Meet the Parents."
Written by Jim Herzfeld ("Tapeheads") and John Hamburg ("Safe Men"),
"Meet the Parents" is every prospective son-in-law's nightmare.  Greg's
luggage is lost (along with the ring), forcing him to accept clothers
from his girlfriend's father.  His gift of a rare flower bulb to is met 
with apathy and he later learns Jack Byrnes (Robert DeNiro) isn't a 
horticulturist, but an ex CIA profiler.  Pam lets slip that Greg hates cat 
while Jack dotes on an arrogant Himalayan called Mr. Jinx.  A gift of 
champagne is uncorked to shatter the urn holding Jack's mother's ashes.  
Greg's told to 'keep his snake in a cage for 72 hours' and is enconsed in 
the den and told not to flush the toilet.  To top things off, he inadvertently 
finds Jack's hidden office, complete with polygrapher equipment and Jack 
arrives in time to 'treat' him to a demonstration.  Twenty-fours have yet to 
pass and things will get far worse.
Ben Stiller and Robert DeNiro are an inspired pairing.  Stiller can be
sexily romantic, painfully clueless, physically brilliant and hilariously
enraged.  He almost manages to rise above the fact that the script paints
Greg Focker as an obsequious schmuck, a character who is only likeable at
the beginning and end of the film.  DeNiro spends most of the film as
the personification of disdain and paranoia when he isn't loonily swooning 
over Mr. Jinx or obsessively little-girling his eldest daughter.  He, too,
is unlikeable until the film's denouement allows him to warm up a little
(and set us up for a sequel that appears to prove that warmth false).
Additionally, the script strains occasionally, as when it would have us
believe a well-to-do family would allow their septic system to get perilously
close to full days before a backyard wedding.  More often than not, however, 
the laughs are honestly come by.  The two most brilliant setpieces concern
Greg's attempt to rescue Mr. Jinx from the roof while sneaking a frowned upon 
smoke and a pre-wedding barbeque and the best man (and former fiance of Pam)
Kevin's (Owen Wilson, "Shanghai Noon") house.
Suppport is hit and miss.  Blythe Danner ("The Prince of Tides") is
endearingly ditzy as Dina Byrnes, all huge blue eyes and blonde halo of
hair.  She's the type of mom who serves food with baby names (hors
d'ouvres are 'pu-pus').  Brother Denny Byrnes, (Jon Abrahams, "Scary Movie") 
however, seems like an ill-advised homage to the demented brother in "Annie 
Hall."   Newcomer Nicole DeHuff resembles Parker Posey lite as bride to
be Debbie while her fiance Bob Banks (Thomas McCarthy, "30 Days") is a
loud jock.  His dad Larry (James Rebhorn, "The Talented Mr. Ripley")
is amusingly played as an almost Greek chorus to Jack.  Owen Wilson is
dead-on great as the so-perfect-he'd-be-obnoxious-if-he-weren't-so-damn-saintly
Kevin, a filthy rich Wall Street investor who creates elaborate carvings
because Jesus was a good role model as a carpenter.  ("Greg's Jewish,"
Pam advises him.  "Great!  So was JC!" Kevin enthuses.)
"Meet the Parents" had all the pieces in place to be a comic masterpiece.
While it doesn't quite live up to its potential, it's still a heck of a lot 
funnier than what usually passes for comedy in these days.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Chocolat (2000)
The French village of Lansquenet, ruled by the morally rigid Comte De
Reynaud (Alfred Molina, "Boogie Nights"), prides itself on its tranquility.
That surface peacefulness is churned up when a cold North wind blows the
red cloaked Vianne Rocher (Juliette Binoche, "The English Patient") and
her daughter Anouk (Victoire Tivisol, "Ponette") into town in director
Lasse Hallstrom's ("The Cider House Rules") "Chocolat."
Ironically, the first resident Vianne meets turns out to be the like-minded
Armande (Judi Dench, "Shakespeare in Love"), an old woman estranged from
her daughter (Carrie-Anne Moss, "The Matrix," as Caroline) and grandson 
(Aurelien Parent Koenig as Luc), who is renting the dilapidated patisserie
Vianne is interested in.  After applying art and elbow grease, Vianne
opens Chocolatier Maya at the beginning of Lent, outraging the Comte yet
intriguing many of his townspeople.  Soon her chocolates have sparked the
love life of a middle aged couple, started a senior romance between dog lover
Guillaume (John Wood, "An Ideal Husband") and war widow Madame Audel (Leslie
Caron, "Funny Bones"), engaged timid battered wife Josephine 
(Lena Olin, "Mystery Men") and secretly reunited Armande and Luc.
The Comte tries to run Vianne out of business by spreading rumors at the 
local hair salon and having Pere Henri (Hugh O'Connor, "The Young Poisoner's
Handbook") denounce her wares as sinful in his sermons, but he can't
argue with her harboring of Josephine.  The Comte makes Josephine's loutish
husband Serge (Peter Stormare, "Dancer in the Dark") his mission by
attempting to turn the man into a gentleman and save the sanctity of his
marriage.
The standoff is intensified when Irish gypsies known as river rats dock
along Lansquenet's river to sing, dance and sell trinkets.  The Comte
declares them morally bankrupt and posts signs at the town's businesses,
but Vianne not only welcomes them, she falls for the dashing Roux (Johnny Depp).
Vianne further tweaks the Comte by planning a fertility festival on Easter
Sunday.
Adapted by Robert Nelson Jacobs ("Out to Sea") from Joanne Harris' novel,
"Chocolat" is one of those prefabricated fables about a life affirming
stranger who rails against the repressed status quo and wins.  Yet, while it 
sounds sickly sweet, it plays better than it has a right to, largely due
to a grounded yet glowing performance from Juliette Binoche.  She makes
Vianne a non-pushy puppetmaster whose gentle guidance rewards all who
allow her influence into their lives.  Vianne, after all, tempers the
sweetness of her confections with chili pepper.  This fiesty flavor also
symbolizes the firey nature of Armande, a woman who lives life to its
fullest.  Dench, like Binoche, tempers the gooeyness which keeps her
refound relationship with her grandson from becoming overly sentimental.
Of the supporting cast, Depp (who's in, maybe, ten percent of the film)
gives some juicy line readings, but is really relegated mostly to the
sidelines.  John Wood is touching as the elderly courter and Hugh O'Connor
is amusing as the pop eyed young priest.  Young Aurelien Parent Koenig
brings layers of darkness to budding artist Luc while Thivisol makes for
a determined Anouk.  Alfred Molina, however, drifts into caricature as
the Comte, barely toning down the mustache twirling he brought to "Dudley
Do-Right."
The film looks terrific with fairy tale production design by David Gropman
("The Cider House Rules").  Roger Pratt's ("The End of the Affair")
cinematography captures the sparks of color which dot the gray, walled
medieval town of Flavigny.  Costume design by Renee Erlich Kalfus ("The
Cider House Rules") is particularly inventive for Binoche.
Hallstrom's confection may be nothing new, but it goes down easyily.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Veuve de Saint-Pierre, La (2000)
THE WIDOW OF SAINT-PIERRE (LA VEUVE DE SAINT-PIERRE)
In 1850, a ship captain is brutally murdered by Neel Auguste (director Emir 
Kusturica) and Louis Ollivier (Reynald Bouchard) in the remote outpost of 
Saint-Pierre, a French owned island off the coast of Newfoundland.  Neel is 
sentenced to death while Louis gets a life term, yet ironically Louis is 
killed in an accident on the way to the prison.  Taking pity on Auguste is 
Madame La (Juliette Binoche, "Chocolat"), the unconventional wife of the 
captain (Daniel Auteuil, "Girl on the Bridge") responsible for carrying out the
execution.  As Saint-Pierre awaits the arrival of a guillotine, August becomes
popular with the townspeople in "The Widow of Saint-Pierre."
Written by Claude Faraldo from the original court records, "The Widow of
Saint-Pierre" is a tragic period piece.  While the outcome of the story may
be telegraphed, director Patrice Leconte ("Girl on the Bridge") shrouds his
film in many layers of mystery.
The Captain is a good and moral soldier, elegant horseman and husband madly 
in love with his wife.  While respected by the island's governors, he's seen 
as odd.  We're told that Madame La has given up a prestigious name to marry
the Captain, yet do not know why they've been banished to such a barren and
remote post.  Was their passion a scandal back home?  In turn, Madame La's
request to have Neel assist her with a garden is equally odd.  While her
instincts about the man prove to be right, her extreme nervousness upon meeting
him make us question her motives, even more so when it's clear that Neel 
comes to adore her and gossip develops as the twosome traipse about the island
performing good deeds.  (Neel also impregnates a widow on one of these jaunts, 
whom he is later allowed to marry.)
As Neel's popularity grows (he's made an honorary member of the Cafe du Nord
for 'the rest of your long life' by it's owner after saving the building)
and the guillotine makes its way from the island of Martinique,
tension mounts between the Captain and his wife and the island's governors,
who insist upon carrying out the execution in order to save face with France.
Their lack of an executioner, or anyone willing to become one, remains the
Captain's trump card - for a time.  As the Captain supports his wife's 
statements and actions almost to the point of insubordination, he gains the 
admiration of the wives of his superiors, further infuriating them.
Auteuil, so marvelous in Leconte's last film, is a completely different 
character here.  While still a romantic, he's believable as a military man,
cutting a dashing figure on his black stallion Salt Cod.  Auteuil creates
a totally sympathetic man whose honor is unquestioned even though all we 
really know about him is that he truly loves his wife (and his horse).
Binoche as the absurdly pretty gentlewoman projects kindness, but her
mysteries are a bit more frustrating as we're never really clear on her
feelings for Auguste.  The odd casting of director Emir Kusturica ("When
Father Was Away on Business") as Auguste works - he's a burly bear of a man
of few words, a St. Bernard trotting at Madame La's heels.
Leconte's cinematographer Eduardo Serra captures beautiful images, such
as Auguste pulling Madame La along in a sled upon an endless expanse of snow.
The movie was filmed on locations in Nova Scotia and Quebec with careful
attention to period details.

Title
Review for Hearts in Atlantis (2001)
Bobby Garfield (Anton Yelchin, "Along Came a Spider") lives in a Connecticut
mill town with his widowed, bitter, self-involved mother (Hope Davis, "Next
Stop, Wonderland").  It's 1960, still an innocent time, and Bobby finds 
support from his two best buddies Sully (Will Rothhaar) and Carol Gerber 
(Mika Boorem).  When a strange older man, Ted Brautigan (Anthony Hopkins) 
moves in upstairs, Elizabeth Garfield's wary, but Bobby's found a father 
figure in the Stephen King adaptation "Hearts in Atlantis."
Screenwriter William Goldman ("The Princess Bride") has solved what makes
so many of King's more recent writings problematic by stripping out the silly 
supernatural aspects of his novella and focusing on the human drama.
While there are a couple of small, forgivable bumps in the adaptation (which 
may be attributable to editing and only slightly affect story clarity), 
director Scott Hicks ("Shine," "Snow Falling on Cedars") has turned in a film 
in the tradition of King adaptations "Stand By Me" and "The Shawshank 
Redemption."
Bobby-o, as his mother calls him, is disappointed when his eleventh birthday
gift isn't the Schwinn bike he's had his eye on, but a library card.  Yeah,
it's an adult library card, but he knows it was the fact that it was free
that caused his mother to choose it.  Buddy Carol's quick to point out that
Bobby's mom always has new clothes, but he defends her, noting her job in
an office requires her to look nice.
When Ted offers Bobby a job reading him the newspaper for $1 a week, Bobby's
thrilled - he can save for his bike.  Mom reluctantly agrees, as long as 
they remain on the porch.  But what Ted really needs is for Bobby to keep an 
eye out for 'the low men' in their flashy cars, men out to exploit Ted for
a mysterious power he has.  While Ted enriches Bobby's life with literature 
and friendship, Bobby's exposed to violence and treachery, becoming a young 
adult in the process.
Scott Hicks brings us his third period tale of a tortured adult reflecting 
on the lost innocence of his youth.  This is a beautiful production, with
Virginia perfectly standing in for an old New England town (production
design by Barbara Ling, Art Direction by Mark Worthington, Set Decoration
by Leslie E. Rollins).  Kids eat dinner on TV trays in front of black and
white televisions playing "The Lone Ranger" and Providence pool halls are
cool and shadowy.  The sound mix by Tod A. Maitland adds to the nostalgic
feel with a background composed of barking dogs, wind chimes and cicadas.
Cinematographer Piotr Sobocinski ("Red") composes with a golden, backlit glow
in his last screen credit (the film is dedicated to him).
Hopkins never once recalls Hannibal Lecter in his sensitive portrayal
of a man on the run willing to make time for a young boy.  His accent is 
too refined for a man who moves in with all his belongings in a paper bag,
but that's a small quibble.  Hope Davis gives her best performance to
date as a self-centered woman who gets more than she deserves before her
eyes are opened to her own selfishness.  Yelchin and Boorem are great
as the kids (we've had a wealth of child actors of late).  Celia Weston
("Snow Falling on Cedars") adds as a bartender who helps Bobby connect 
with his late father and Alan Tudyk ("A Knight's Tale") plays a pivotal 
three-card monte pitchman with just the right amount of hucksterism and 
growing frustration.  Adam Lefevre ("You Can Count on Me") personifies
the piggish machismo of Liz' Garfield's boss, Donald Biderman.  David Morse 
("Dancer in the Dark") plays the adult Bobby in the films' bookending scenes.
"Hearts in Atlantis" is a moving nostalgia piece where an underlying
darkness encroaches on a small town summertime childhood.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Bring It On (2000)
Torrance Shipman (Kirsten Dunst, "The Virgin Suicides") thinks her dreams
have been answered when she's chosen as captain of her high school's award
winning cheerleading squad in her senior year.  But newcomer Missy (Eliza
Dushku, "True Lies") clues Tori in - the Toros' routines were all stolen 
from LA's Clovers, an urban squad who intend to challenge Tori's in 
"Bring It On."
"Bring It On" is a strange hybrid of a film - it features the usual, routine
competition-set-against-romance teen story, yet maintains a certain freshness
due to the high-spirited cheerleading choreography, the novelty of presenting
cheerleading as a coed competition sport and the appeal of its cast.  Simply 
put, this is more entertaining than a script (by former Spin magazine and MTV 
News writer Jessica Bendinger) read might indicate.
Tori would seem to have it all when 'Big Red' (Lindsay Sloane) passes down
the captain's mantle.  Immediately, problems begin to mount.  First, a
cheerleader suffers a multiple leg break during Tori's first practice.
Efforts to find a replacement result in the standard tryout montage, with
goth chick Missy, who's only slumming looking for a gymnastics substitute,
being the obvious standout.  Tori faces opposition from catty cheer girls
Courtney (Clare Kramer) and Whitney (Nicole Bilderback), but convincing Missy 
to join the team opens a new world to Tori.  Not only does she discover Big 
Red's underhanded methods of stealing routines, but she gets to know Missy's 
brother Cliff (Jesse Bradford, "The King of the Hill").  Supportive, offbeat 
Cliff will come in awful handy when Tori's off-to-college cheerleading 
boyfriend proves disloyal in more ways than one.
While the script does go through the expected paces, it also features some
offbeat humor (a dream sequence cheer routine delivers a delightfully nasty
message, a flirtatious toothbrushing scene).  The relationship
between Tori and Isis (Gabrielle Union, "Ten Things I Hate About You"),
the rival Clovers captain, is also more nuanced than one would expect from
a teen comedy. We still have to put up with the obvious romantic manipulations,
inconsistently used teenspeak ('She puts the itch in B****') and the de rigueur 
vomit gag, but the actors pull the weak bits up a notch, while making hay
with the more original scenes.
Kirsten Dunst grounds the film with her fresh faced optimism and 'spirit,'
and she gets commendable support from Dushku, the talent with 'tude who's
surprised at her own enthusiasm for cheerleading.  Bradford has the appeal
of Paul Rudd in "Clueless" crossed with a young Ben Chaplin ("The Truth 
About Cats and Dogs") and gives a cheekily offbeat performance.  Kramer 
and Bilderback are fun representing the witchiness/popularity of the sport
with Kramer's Courtney being the squad slut (she doesn't wear panties
beneath her spankies the better to enjoy her stunts with male colleagues) 
and Bilderback finagling to get her talentless sister on board.  Gabrielle 
Union is almost patrician as the urban underdog captain, bringing elegance
and dignity to Isis.  Her squad includes the members of singing group Blaque, 
of whom Brandi Williams stands out most as the rambunctious LaFred.  Ian 
Roberts plays hired choreographer Sparky Polastri like as a tyrannical Bob 
Fosse wannabe.  Cody McMains is realistically obnoxious as Tori's little
brother Justin, believably pulling off the film's requisite fart gag.
Feature debut director Peyton Reed has done an impressive job here, instilling
an inspiring energy level in his film.  The mixture of professional
cheerleaders and actors is seamless (there were 12 coed cheerleaders to
8 actors per squad) and the climatic competition is rousing.  For anyone 
who's never watched a real national cheerleading competition on cable, "Bring
It On" will be a relevation.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Town & Country (2001)
Porter Stoddard (Warren Beatty) is a successful architect married to
successful fabric designer Ellie (Diane Keaton) for twenty-five years.
They and best friends Mona (Goldie Hawn) and Griffin (Garry Shandling)
are about to face marital crises in a film most well known for its
torturous path to the screen, "Town and Country."
"Town and Country" has a pedigree befitting it's title with an all star
cast photographed by Oscar nominated cinematographer William Fraker and 
mouthing the words of screenwriter Buck Henry ("The Graduate")
under the direction of Peter Chelsom ("Funny Bones").  After years of
reports of budget overruns and reshoots and the racking up twelve different 
release dates, the media has been prepped for Beatty's next "Ishtar."  So,
is it that bad?  The answer is no.  But it's not very good either.
The major problem with "Town and Country" is that it's unstructured and
random.
Stoddard is immediately established as a philanderer, having just
bedded a flaky cellist (Nastassja Kinski).  Next scene finds him and Ellie
celebrating their anniversary in Paris with Mona and Griffin.  Then Mona
spies Griffin hustling a redhead into a motel and begins divorce proceedings
(Buck Henry cameos as both couples' divorce lawyer).
Ellie thinks she's overeacting, but sends Porter to support Mona on a trip
to check out her family's Mississippi manse.  The two childhood friends end
up in bed together, making us wonder why they'd never become a couple to
begin with.  Back home, their second coupling is interrupted by Ellie 
bursting in to tell Mona she thinks Porter's cheating on her.  Porter goes
off on a trip with Griffin to Sun Valley, Idaho to have more comic
misadventures with wacky women as Griffin attempts to tell him that he's
gay.  The four friends, along with every woman Porter's dallied with, all
end up back in New York City somewhat happily ever after.
Although the film begins promisingly, resembling a Woody Allen take on
New York City wasps, too many strands drift off into nowhere.
The Stoddard household is huge, containing two adult children (Josh Hartnett,
"The Virgin Suicides" and Tricia Vessey, "Kiss the Girls"), their colorful
bedmates and a maid who's just imported her shirtless boyfriend from the
rainforest back home.  After an amusing early scene that has Porter 
overhearing three bouts of lovemaking while in search of a nocturnal snack, 
the six supporting players are dropped except for an out-of-nowhere
appearance 
by the formerly forgotten son.  Porter's romantic misadventures with women
(other than Mona) are equally mishandled.  Once the marital discord begins,
the film seems as if it was editted with a machete, stopping and starting, 
never regaining its rhythm.
While Beatty gets off a few tart observations, his character is mostly
passive and bemused.  Maybe we're supposed to feel sympathy for an adulterer
who doesn't initiate his own sex romps?  Keaton's Ellie has a
trusting nature that's a result of her own self involvement resulting
in an unlikeable character.  Hawn smartly recycles her mature sex kitten
wives 
of "The Out of Towners" and "The First Wives' Club" while Shandling's
relegated 
to true second banana status.  Kinski is bland and unmotivated.  Andie 
MacDowell takes a weirdly unappealing role and does what she can with the 
screenplay's most bizarre subplot, which finds Charlton Heston as her rifle 
toting, billionaire daddy and Marian Seldes as her alcoholic,
wheelchair-bound, 
foul-mouthed mother.  Heston and Seldes are fun, as is Jenna Elfman 
as a Sun Valley bait and tackle salesgirl who brings Porter and Griffin to a 
Halloween party.
Oscar nominatored cinematographer William Fraker gives the film a nice look,
but director Chelsom shows none of the quirkily and blackly humorous depth 
he brought to films like "Hear My Song" and "Funny Bones."  The script is 
this film's weakest link - it's telling that most of the (few) laughs come 
from old-fashioned physical slapstick and the sight of Beatty in a bear suit.
While "Town and Country" isn't exactly painful to sit through, it mostly
just lays there.  
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for X-Men (2000)
Director Bryan Singer ("The Usual Suspects") takes on a task that has had fans
of The X-Men comics frothing at the mouth for years - bringing their beloved
super heroes to the big screen. This daunting mission, with its many special
effects and giant budget, is now finished and the talented helmer has succeeded
in bringing the comic characters to life for both fans and newcomers alike in
"X-Men."
Every few millennia, man undergoes certain changes, or mutations, that help
humankind to evolve into the next level of being. But, when these mutations
occur, the current residents of Earth fear the changes and strike out at the
mutants. Now, the world is in the midst of another round of mutations and the
'normal' humans, led by firebrand Senator Kelly (John Davison), want a final
solution for the problem. The senator and his followers do not want the
mutants, called X-Men, to roam free and a new Holocaust is brewing.
Psychic Professor Charles Xavier (Patrick Stewart) heads a government program
that trains and educates the next generation of mankind, nurturing his wards to
develop the various changes they are undergoing. He also leads the X-Men,
good-guy mutants who use their power to protect Earth from the evil Magneto
(Ian McKellen). Magneto is a magnetically charged tyrant mutant who wants to 
take over the world for his own selfish purposes. The only thing standing 
between him and world domination is Xavier and his X-Men.
The professor is joined in the battle by his protigi of psychic power, Dr. Jean
Grey (Famke Janssen), Storm (Halle Berry) and the laser-eyed Cyclops (James
Marsden) in his quest to defeat the wicked plans of Magneto. The good guys are
well matched by the evil boss's minion - the shape shifting Mystique (Rebecca
Romijn-Stamos), the agile Toad (Ray Park, "Star Wars: Episode One") and the
powerful and mean Sabretooth (Tyler Mane). Thrown into the mix of this looming
battle is a surgically altered mutant and loner named Logan (Hugh Jackman).
Both sides vie for the loyalty of the battler, who also goes by the moniker
Wolverine, as Magneto hatches a plot to mutate the entire membership of the
United Nations and take over the world.
Director Singer walks a very fine line in this adaptation of the nearly four
decade old Marvel comic book series. The trick in adapting such fan-dedicated
source material to a feature film lay in appealing to an audience that is not
exclusively made up of just the fan base. A recent example of the difficulty of
maintaining such a balance can be seen in the 1997 sci-fi film, "Spawn."  That
actioner went under the assumption that catering to the fans, alone, was enough
to generate substantial box office bucks. It wasn't and the film didn't do as
well as its producers had hoped.
Singer strikes a balance for the fan and non-fan that does two things. The
newcomer to this potential film franchise is fed enough background information
so that there is a basic understanding of what "X-Men" is all about. The
makers don't dwell on the education process for the novice viewer, providing
the gist of the material needed to move things along. It gets down to business 
once the viewer is told, basically, that stuff happens - people mutate.
When the story kicks in, the characters are introduced with little fanfare as
the individual powers of each are explained or displayed. This is where the
copious special F/X kick in and the super powers of Storm, Cyclops, Toad and
the rest are displayed with all kinds of flash and smoke. Not a lot of time is
spent on character development, but the crew of talented actors help flesh out 
their assignments, in some cases quite well.
Much of the focus of the story is on Logan. He's a sullen loner, a mutant who
was altered to accommodate a super strong skeletal frame. He can also thrust
saber-like blades from his hands and has astonishing healing powers. The
Wolverine takes on the task of protecting a young mutant named Rogue (Anna
Paquin). Rogue is pivotal in Magneto's plans and it's up to Logan and the rest
to stop him. Hugh Jackman gives dimension to his super hero performance with his
dark wit and brooding demeanor. Of course, his hairdo and mutton chop sideburns
help lend to his Wolverine image, too.
The rest of the cast, led by Patrick Stewart, fare unevenly. Stewart is his
usual stalwart self and is made for the role of Charles Xavier. He exudes
leadership quality and kindness as he guides his X-Men into battle. Ian
McKellen looks good as chief bad guy Magneto, but his evilness is not bad ass 
enough.  Halle Berry, as stormy Storm, gets few lines and isn't allowed to 
break out the F/X laden character who can conjure up a tempest at the drop of 
a hat. Famke Janssen has a nice presence as Jean Grey, though her telekinetic 
powers are no where near as flashy as the others' are.  Anna Paquin is bland 
and emotionless as Rogue, who can suck the life from a person. Paquin's 
performance does much the same to the character. Romijn-Stamos puts it on the 
line as the shape-shifting Mystique, undergoing grueling makeup prep for many 
hours each day. It pays off as the former model's lithe gracefulness fits the 
sexy, somewhat reptilian character that can become an identical copy of whoever 
she wants. Ray Parks provides terrific athletic ability as the super tongued 
Toad.
The production befits the material. If you expect flashy F/X, you get 'em here.
Each of the X-Men has a unique power and the effects team does a solid job of
making each special. Costuming takes a real departure from the colorful dress
of the comics, replacing colors with sleek black uniforms. The stylish set 
designs give the film a stunning look - make note of the futuristic prison 
setting - that suits the comic book feel of the film. There is also some nice 
homage to such classic films as "Forbidden Planet" and, with a battle royale 
atop the Statue of Liberty, Alfred Hitchcock's "Saboteur."
As expected, the film ends with a couple of set ups that are, undoubtedly,
intended as the basis for the X-Men franchise. There are two more films in
development and the material should flow quite easily for the sequels. The deft
way that Singer and company have transferred the action comics to the big
screen reps one of the best efforts since "Superman II" and will win some new 
fans.  Older auds may not be too taken by "X-Men," but the demographic it aims 
at hits the bull's-eye. I give it a B.
Director Bryan Singer, who last cast Ian McKellen as a Nazi war criminal
in "Apt Pupil," begins his comic superhero movie "X-Men" with McKellen's
character of Magneto as a victim of his former self, establishing his
metal bending powers as his parents are herded into a gated Jewish ghetto.  
This backstory also signals what's good about the X-Men tale - the bad
guy isn't simply evil for badness' sake but fears persecution for his
difference, while the good guys, led by Patrick Stewart's telepathic Professor
X, protect a human race that often acts reprehensibly.  This is no simple
morality play.
The story (story by Tom DeSanto and Bryan Singer, screenplay by David Hayter)
very effectively sets up the world of X-Men even for those like myself who
have no familiarity with the comicbook series.  In a near future Senator Robert 
Jefferson Kelly (Bruce Davison, "Longtime Companion") is fighting for
legislation that would require mutants to be 'outed' because of their 
potential danger to humans.  In response, Magneto and his camp (wrestler
Tyler Mane as Sabretooth, swimsuit model Rebecca Romijn-Stamos as Mystique
and Phantom Menacer Ray Park as Toad) wants to take over the world and
plans to begin by using the life force powers of Rogue ("The Piano's" eleven
year old Oscar winner Anna Paquin, now an adolescent) to juice a machine
in the Statue of Liberty which will irradiate the entire population of New 
York City, killing Rogue in the process.  
The real star of this ensemble piece is Australian newcomer Hugh Jackman's
Wolverine, a conflicted loner with heightened senses and the ability to
shoot longer razor claws out of his knuckles (he resembles Quentin from
the old 70's gothic soap "Dark Shadows").  When Rogue runs away from home
after putting the first boy she's kissed into a coma, she recognizes Wolverine 
as a fellow mutant in a smoky bar and becomes his protegee.  When they're 
attacked on the road by Sabretooth, they're aided by Cyclops (James Marsden, 
"Gossip") and Storm (Halle Berry) and whisked away to Professor X's school for 
mutants.  Rogue does well, but Wolverine still bristles, loner that he is, 
even as he falls for Cyclops' girlfriend, Dr. Jean Gray (Famke Janssen, 
"Rounders"), setting up a nice overlapping love triangle as Rogue develops a 
crush on the wolfman.  The Wolverine/Cyclops friction opens the door for some
refreshing humor to lighten the dark film.
"X-Men" is story and character driven, yet it does feature some fine
fight scenes, where Ray Park and Romijn-Stamos really shine.  Toad scrambles
across ceilings and flicks a grossly extended tongue while Mystique
flexes her perfect bod attired in nothing but blue paint and scales (which
required fifteen hours a day to put on and remove!).  Jackman (who replaced
Dougray Scott when M:I-2's shooting schedule ran over) will surely become
a star with this vehicle, although not all the oddly-assembled cast fare 
as well.  The bad X-Men have practically zilch in the way of dialogue
except for Magneto and the Oscar-nominated McKellen is a little bland in the
role.  On the flip side, Patrick Stewart seems born to play the
wheelchair-bound Professor X and former friend of Magneto (they still enjoy
a good game of chess).  Janssen is an appropriately sensitive Gray and
Marsden portrays Cyclops as a gung-ho hotshot, but Berry does little more
than look cool with her white hair and black cape while Paquin is stuck in
the victim role.  Davison is sleezy as the rabble rousing Senator who
meets a spectacularly inventive demise.
Special effects range all over the map from cheesy lightening bolts to
rather cool stepping slates that appear in front of Magneto as he walks
through mid air.  Cinematographer Tom Sigel, who brought such a unique
look to "Three Kings," does little to distinguish himself here, with the
overall look of the film being too dark.  Claustrophobic sets (Production 
Design by John Myhre, Art Direction by Paul D. Austerberry, Tamara Deverell
and Rando Schmook) also give the film a low rent feel.  Hopefully the
sequels will be brightened up and opened out.  Costume design (Louise 
Mingenbach, Bob Ringwood) is pedestrian while Makeup (Ann Brodie) is
outstanding.
Far more serious than the ragtag "Mystery Men," "X-Men" are like 
live action "Pokemon" for adults.  This franchise seems destined to
outlive the superhero series that came before.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Spring Forward (1999)
When ex-con Paul (Liev Schrieber, "A Walk on the Moon") begins work as a
municipal parks worker, he's full of self doubt.  He's partnered with the
much older Murphy (Ned Beatty, "Cookie's Fortune"), a most unconventional
blue collar worker.  Over the course of a year and the change of the 
seasons, a deep and moving friendship will form between the two men in
writer/director Tom Gilroy's feature film debut "Spring Forward."
Paul and Murphy begin to bond when the uppity son of a gardening supply
store (Campbell Scott, "Big Night," perfectly capturing the unctuous manner 
of a man born to wealth unused to being challenged) tries to manipulate them 
into shovelling the manure his father's donated to the city.  Paul, emboldened 
by Murph's refusal to back down to Frederickson, calls Frederickson a vicious 
name and is rebuked by Murph for his language.  Frederickson claims Murphy's
reaction is because the term could be applied to Murphy's son, a gay man.
Paul is devastated that he's caused Murphy hurt.
"Spring Forward" progresses through six additional, real time scenes each
punctuated by a seasonal interlude in the author's home town of Ridgefield, 
Connecticutt.  Paul and Murph discuss religion and get high.  Murph
takes Paul to a house where there are puppies for sale by a woman who
might need companionship as much as Paul does ('Frasier's' Peri Gilpin).
Murph tells Paul about the hurt caused by a lifelong neighbor who refused
to stand up for his son, then the two meet that same neighbor (Bill Raymond)
at Murph's son's wake.  The two find a hysterical woman and her terrified
daughter by the side of the road.
"Spring Forward" is above all an actors' showcase, particularly for Beatty
and Schreiber who are simply sublime together.  Beatty's Murph looks like a 
blue collar everyman on the verge of retirement, but has an unexpectedly 
sensitive soul and Beatty never once makes us doubt this unconventional
package.  Schreiber's Paul has more beneath the surface than one would
expect, having substituted voracious reading for institutional education.  
He too, seems like a potential redneck who's instead opened his mind
beyond where his background should have led him.  Their verbal sparring and 
generational gap give the film a gentle humor.
Gilroy has provided these character riffs in his writing.  Murph has a
habit of making bakery allegories rather than use foul language ('I'd have
been frosted too,' 'He's got a cupcake mentality').  Paul expounds on
Asian spiritual concepts, and, just when he thinks he's flown over Murph's
head, Murph sums up his ideas with a simple cliche - the concept of karma
is translated into 'What goes around, comes around.'
Gilroy's playwright background is stamped all over his film debut to its
detriment, however. Gilroy's decision to film over the course of a year
was a plus for the actors, allowing them to form their bond gradually. 
Yet, every moment is jam packed with a philosophical or heavy moment, never 
giving his characters a chance to breath or his film to form more naturally.  
Director of photography Terry Stacey captures the beauty of his locations,
a rural New England utopia.  Composer Hahn Rowe's score features a folky,
yet plaintive fiddle, accentuating the film's bittersweetness.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Before Night Falls (2000)
'My mother returned to her parents' home with me as proof of her failure.'
So Cuban author Reinaldo Arenas (Javier Bardem, "Jamon, Jamon," "Live
Flesh") describes his earliest memories where he equated complete poverty with
absolute freedom.  Educated by the revolution which put Castro into power
when he was just sixteen, Arenas won a national book award at twenty with
his first novel "Singing From the Well."  From that point on, his homosexuality
made him a pariah in communist Cuba and he was constantly being
hunted or imprisoned until 1980 when he left Cuba in the Mariel Harbor
boatlift.  Artist/director Julian Schabel ("Basquiat") adapts Arenas' final
memoir for the screen in "Before Night Falls."
"Before Night Falls" is an artistic interpretation of a life, shown in an
impressionistic manner.  We're given a mosaic of memories, shards of
recollections and frequently left to fill in the gaps.
Arenas' earliest childhood was spent in a dirt poor and rural area where he
was essentially ignored.  A dark man approaches and gives him two pesoes
while his mother screams and throws rocks.  Reinaldo discovers this
man is his father - the only time he ever sees him.  (This event is evidently
significant enough to be included, yet never given perspective within the 
film, nor is the obviously strong bond with his mother (played by Schnabel's
wife, Olatz Lopez Garmendia) explored in depth.)  Then the family moves to 
Holquin ('a town of 200,000 people and one garbage truck') where he becomes 
acquainted with hookers before being swept up in the romance of the 
revolution, which is presented in what appears to be old news footage and 
home movies.
Arenas is given the first five of the '150 all encompassing works of
literature' by an encouraging professor (Melvile, Robert Louis Stevenson, 
Proust, Flaubert and Kafka), which he accepts like treasures.  A good
author must also be a great reader and Arenas is given a plum job in the
national library.  His homosexuality is first hinted at by the furtive 
looks he exchanges with a young man while at work.  Soon he's hanging 
with the wealthy Thomas and his crowd, who drive about in his white 
convertible.  Not long after, his troubles begin.
"Before Night Falls" was adapted for the screen by the director, Cunningham
O'Keefe and Lazaro Gomez Carriles, Arenas' lifelong friend (played in the
film by Olivier Martinez, "The Horseman on the Roof").  This story about an
author concentrates more on his general biography than his writing (which, I
presume, is conveyed more within the film's visuals).  What caused his books 
to banned in Cuba?  If it was exclusively the author's homosexuality, that 
is never made clear in the film.  In fact, the scattershot approach to telling 
this story, while sometimes effective, is often equally frustrating.  
Characters appear out of nowhere and disappear.  Relationships and locations 
are often unclear.  We only know Arenas was dying of AIDs (he committed 
suicide in New York City in 1990) by deduction.  (On the other hand, Schnabel 
makes sure we get his use of irony in his last scene by prominently featuring 
the 'I 'heart' NY' logo on a plastic bag at least three times.)
Bardem has a great shaggy head, expressive Raul Julia-like eyes and a
Greco-Roman nose, a rugged handsomeness which he combines with a geeky body
language, curving his shoulders inward and allowing his arms to hang limply
at his sides.  While his is a good performance, the alienation of the
character and the disorienting filmmaking kept me at arms length
emotionally.
Johnny Depp has a dual role as Bon Bon, a flamboyant prison transvestite
(with a talent for smuggling impressive amounts in his nether regions) and as
a cruelly seductive prison Lieutenant.  Depp is a fearless actor and comes
across well, even in these showy, brief roles.  Not so lucky is Sean Penn
who appears in the film for 1-2 minutes as an overly made up Cuban peasant.
This bit of stunt casting seems right out of John Huston's 1963 film "The
List of Adrian Messenger" and is more distracting than the star presence
is worth.  (Another distracting moment in the film comes when Arenas
attempts an escape to Florida in an inner tube - Schnabel uses the same
haunting recording Herzog used in "Aguirre, the Wrath of God," which 
immediately yanked me to Peru.)  Michael Wincott ("The Crow," "Basquiat") 
is almost unrecognizable as another oppressed poet.
The film has some great imagery (cinematography by Xavier Perez Grobet and
Guillermo Rosas, production design by Salvador Parra), such as Reinaldo
sitting on the rocks by a sparkling sea, the aftermath of a hedonistic,
bohemian sendoff for a hot air balloon, and Reinaldo and Lazaro lying on
the trunk of a convertible driving through the snow of nighttime New York
City.
Schnabel clearly has great admiration for his subject, but while he
attempts to share the artistry and feeling of Arenas' work, his historical 
account of the man's life is lacking.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for O Brother, Where Art Thou? (2000)
Ulysses Everett McGill (George Clooney, "Three Kings") takes his ball and
chain mates Delmar (Tim Blake Nelson, "The Thin Red Line") and Pete
(John Turturro, "Rounders") on an escape from a 1930s Mississippi hard 
labor camp.  The three embark upon an adventurous road trip in a race against
time as Everett's gold is buried in an area slated to be flooded by the
Tennessee Valley Authority in Joel and Ethan Coen's "O Brother, Where Art
Thou?"
The Coen brothers excel at recreating American film genres and styles.
The ambitious "O Brother, Where Art Thou?" bears more than a passing
resemblance to its namesake, Preston Sturges' "Sullivan's Travels"
(it was the name of the serious film comedy director John L. Sullivan 
(Joel McRea) wanted to make in that film before he discovered the value
of comedy).
The threesome are immediately in hot water when Pete's cousin, whom they
went to for shelter, turns them in.  ('Damn, we're in a tight spot!'
pronounces Everett.)  Menancing Sheriff Cooley (Daniel
Von Bargen, "The General's Daughter") and his pack of bloodhounds is
never far behind them from this point on.  After stealing a car, they
pick up a black blues guitarist, Tommy Johnson (Chris Thomas King),
hitchhiking at crossroads in the middle of nowhere after selling his soul 
to the devil.  After a brief interlude where Delmar and Pete get baptized
they're cutting a record at a remote radio outpost as the Soggy Bottom
Boys.  Unbeknownst to them, their record climbs the charts as they
cross paths with Baby Face Nelson (Michael Badalucco, "Summer of Sam"),
lose Pete to a trio of river Sirens (Delmar's convinced they've turned
him into a toad), get beaten and robbed by a maniacal bible salesman,
Big Dan Teague (Coens' vet John Goodman), and rescue Tommy from the Ku
Klux Klan in a scene straight out of the "Wizard of Oz!"  Then there's
the film's double climax as Governor Pappy O'Daniel (Charles Durning)
challenges rival Homer Stokes (Wayne Duvall, "The Deep End of the Ocean")
at a political rally while Everett attempts to woo back his wife Penny 
(Holly Hunter) followed by the final showdown with Sheriff Cooley.
The film is surreally funny, featuring oddball Coen humor such as Baby
Face Nelson shooting at cattle ('Oh George, not the livestock!' wails
Delmar) and Everett's constant search for his brand of hair pomade (Dapper
Dan's).  While it doesn't reach the heights of the Coens' very best
("Fargo," "Millers Crossing," "Blood Simple") because of its meandering
ways, it's a solid middle effort with charm to spare.
George Clooney channels the comedic charm of Clark Gable in a stylized,
yet pitch perfect performance.  Preening in a mirror or issuing the goofiest
of dance moves as a Soggy Bottom, Clooney fits into the Coen brothers' brand
of comedy like a custom tailored suit.  Tim Blake Nelson, known more for
his writing/directing skills behind the camera ("Eye of God"), is sweetly
stupid as the trusting, animal loving Delmar (butterflies are always drawn
to this character).  John Turturro is the high strung, manic member of the
threesome.  Of the supporting players, Stephen Root (TV's "Newsradio") gets
some mileage out of a brief appearance as a blind radio station manager
while Durning blusters and flusters as Pappy O'Daniel with his two yes
men and lookalike son Junior (Del Pentecost).  Other cast members mostly
go through the motions.
The film is beautifully shot in a golden glow by the Coens' frequent
cinematographer Roger Deakins ("Fargo").  T Bone Burnett provides the
authentically antique sounding music.

Title
Review for Evolution (2001)
Glen Canyon Community College's biology students are thrilled to be getting A's
from their disillusioned professor, Dr. Ira Kane (David Duchovny).  
(Unbeknownst to all, Kane's a former Army scientist, fired and disgraced over 
an experimental anthrax vaccine he administered to troops with dire results.)
When Kane's friend and colleague, geology professor and women's volleyball coach
Harry Block (Orlando Jones, "The Replacements") gets called to investigate a
meteor crash site, Kane goes along for the ride.  Kane begins to smell a 
nobel when he finds ooze coming from the meteor.  Twenty-four hours later,
though, what they have on their hands is a serious case of extraterrestrial
"Evolution."
Three writers (David Diamond & David Weissman and Don Jakoby) are creditted
with coming up with this unfunny, totally unoriginal piece of screen fodder
which creates a danger that pits the military against our inept heroes
in their efforts to overcome it.  The special effects team, led by Phil
Tippett ("Jurassic Park," "Starship Troopers"), provide a bunch of creatures
ripped right out of director Reitman's overrated "Ghostbusters."
"Evolution" is made almost tolerable by the easy chemistry between stars
Duchovny and Jones, a terrific pairing offunny guys with very different
styles in search of a funny script.  Julianne Moore, however, should be ashamed 
of herself for playing a character who's supposed to be funny because she falls 
down and walks into doors a lot.  Seann William Scott ("Road Trip") is a third
wheel aspiring fireman dumbell who exists to be made fun of.  Ethan Suplee,
so fine in the recent "Blow," does stupid fat schtick as one of Kane's 
students.
Director Reitman, creditted by star Jones as "one of the great comedy directors
of all time" in the press notes, has made exactly one good movie ("Dave")
and a few semi-amusing ones ("Stripes," "Meatballs," "Ghostbusters") largely
due to the talents of the likes of Kevin Kline and Bill Murray.  "Evolution" 
bottom feeds with his "Legal Eagles," "Twins" and "Junior" oeuvre.
The film's insulting climax features our mismatched team of misfits underneath
what looks like a painted dropcloth (it's supposed to be the underbelly of an
alien) to insert a product placement enema via firehose.  Enough said.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Dancer in the Dark (2000)
Selma Jezkova (Bjork) is a Czech immigrant living in the Pacific Northwest
where she supports herself and her ten year old son by working at a tool
and die factory.  She and her best friend Kathy (Catherine Deneuve) escape
their dull lives by going to musicals and staging an amateur production
of "The Sound of Music."  However, Selma is slowly going blind and is
frantically saving money to save her son from the hereditary condition.
When that money is stolen, tragedy ensues in director Lars Von Trier's
musical Cannes Palm d'Or winner, "Dancer in the Dark."
How you feel about this film may largely depend on how you felt about
von Trier's "Breaking the Waves," another hand-held shot film about a 
woman who martyrs herself for a loved one.  While more flawed that that film,
"Dancer in the Dark" gets its audience more emotionally invested in its
story.
While von Trier again portrays womanhood as martyrdom, a tendancy that is
sure to exasperate his audience if repeated, his central character here
doesn't go through the character arc that Emily Watson did in "Breaking the
Waves."  Selma is instead immediately established as a sacrificier.  Not
only is she going blind, but she must place metal plates into dangerous
machinery where they are pressed into sinks.  When she's not at work, she's
engaged in the tedious labor of pinning cards on the side.  She and her
ten year old son Gene (Vladica Kostic, a symbolic character only, as his
name headlines his weakness) live in a small trailer in the backyard of local
cop Bill (David Morse, "The Green Mile") and his wife Linda (Cara Seymour,
"American Psycho") who've become good friends of Selma's.  However, it's
Bill's inability to tell Linda that she's spending beyond their means that
will result in Selma's ultimate tragedy.
Bjork's performance is a natural wonder.  She may be no actress (and she
claims she will never act again), but she embodies Selma and allows a
charming, off-kilter humor to sneak through her sunny naivete.  Peter
Stormare gives the most moving turn as Jeff, a simple man who arrives
at Selma's factory each day to offer her a lift home in his pickup truck
even though she constantly rejects him (kindly).  It's Stormare who takes
up the arc of slowly discovering the buildup of tragedy which engulfs Selma
and it's a terrific performance.  Deneuve and her director accomplish the
impossible by making Kathy believable as a factory worker.  When (single 
and childless) Kathy's unflagging support of Selma ends in outrage at Selma's 
refusal to save herself, the baton is picked up by prison guard Brenda 
(Siobhan Fallon), a mother.  Fallon is also terrific, having a similar effect 
as Stormare, syphoning our emotions as witness to Selma's fate.
Cara Seymour is effective as the pathetically 'high flying' wife, while David
Morse's Bill gains our sympathy (and Selma's) as a decent guy with a 
relatively trivial problem, although his performance suffers in a pivotal scene.
Joel Grey has a small scene as Oldrich Novy, a Czeck Fred Astaire.  Former
von Trier stars Stellan Skarsgard ("Breaking the Waves") and Udo Kier ("The
Kingdom") have cameos as optometrists.
Von Trier's camerawork, criticized by many, works completely for this reviewer.
His washed out colors and shaky, hand held digital video work portray reality
in a documentary-like (and Dogma 95 like) fashion.  When the rhythm of
machinery, a train on its tracks or marching feet cause Selma to segue into
a musical interlude, the fantasy glows in bright colors and fluid camerawork
(achieved by use of 100 cameras).  Von Trier's collaberation with Bjork (and 
choreographer Vincent Paterson, "Evita") make the musical numbers transporting, 
particularly when Bjork declares 'I Have Seen It All' to Jeff (who's just 
realized the state of her eyesight) as she dances along a flatbed.
In von Trier's script, two scenes misfire.  Maybe real life murders are every 
bit as sloppy as the one shown here, but Morse's acting evokes titters even as 
Selma's actions become more desparately violent.  Kathy's last ditch 
communication with Selma, literally at the gallows, seems forced, in a scene 
which begins devastatingly but is allowed to go on too long.  (Both this and 
the final scene recall Kieslowski's "A Short Film About Killing," although that 
film handled them expertly while this film stumbles over them.)  Overall,
though, this over-the-top melodrama, which by its nature should be laughable,
works.  Von Trier's vision may be maddening to some, but he's a unique and
bold filmmaker.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Shadow of the Vampire (2000)
In 1921, the great German film director F.W. Murnau shot "Nosferatu"
with his singular star Max Schreck as Count Orlok.  So little is known
about Schreck, that screenwriter Steven Katz and director E. Elias Merhige
("Begotten") suggest the fantastical - what if Schreck really *was* a
vampire - in their new film "Shadow of the Vampire."
F.W. Murnau was a fascinating man.  A seven foot tall homosexual, he
was a true artist, covering theater, writing, music as well as film.
The young Alfred Hitchcock journeyed from London to Germany to learn from
him.  Murnau died in a Hollywood car crash shrouded in mystery at the peak 
of his career.  He had helped create and epitomized the German Expressionism
movement in film.
Merhige professes to wanting to delve into the director, the method actor,
the camera itself as vampire with "Shadow of a Vampire," but that seems just
a hairsbreadth away from the 'camera and audience as voyeur' theme which has
been explored by the likes of Hitchcock and William Powell ("Peeping Tom").
Not only does he not provide any new insights with his vampiric filmmaking
study, he gives us a one dimensional Murnau (John Malkovich).
The film opens with a title card (credit to Merhige for recreating the
silent film) informing us that "Nosferatu" is being shot in 1921.  The
drug addicted diva Greta Schroeder (Catherine McCormack, "Braveheart")
is petulant about leaving the stage sets for Murnau's remote locations
(he advises her to make a sacrifice for her art, ahem).
The troupe, including Udo Kier ("Andy Warhol's Dracula") as producer Albin
Grau, Eddie Izzard ("Mystery Men") as actor Gustav von Wangenheim and
Ronan Vibert as cinematographer Wolfgang Muller arrive in the spooky
Transylvanian setting and commence shooting ('Albin, a native has wandered
into my frame!' shouts Murnau).  Schreck is staying in character and out of
sight, Murnau tells the cast and crew, even as we see an offering of a small
caged animal taken by inhuman hands.
Schreck (Willem Dafoe) finally makes his appearance as the cameras roll in
the dead of night, scaring Gustav silly.  Soon Schreck is upon Wolfgang, who
disappears with little explanation.  Murnau's pact with the undead is brought
to light when he admonishes his star for taking a bite of the cameraman.
Murnau wants Schreck to wait until the end of the film, where he's promised
he'll have Greta as Murnau's payment for his 'acting.'
The cast is wildly uneven.  John Malkovich is miscast as Murnau (although
the script doesn't serve Murnau well either).  Malkovich simply acts obsessed
with a ludricous German accent.  Dafoe has garnered a lot of attention (and
Oscar buzz) as Schreck.  His performance is certainly entertaining, never
more so than when he plucks a bat out of the air and devours it.  Yet it's
a performance built out of superb makeup and  a stable of ticks, such as the 
clicking of his overly long, yellow nails or the gutteral grunts Kinski used 
in Herzog's "Nosferatu" remake.  He doesn't find his character's voice, which 
should be unsettling but isn't.  
Catherine McCormack is surprisingly effective as the spoiled morphine hound
Greta Schroder.  She captures the decadence of 1920's Germany.  Udo Kier is
restrained and able as Albin which he easily could have played for camp.
Cary Elwes arrives at the film's midpoint as replacement cinematographer
(and drug supplier/user) Fritz Wagner, reprising his overly theatrical
turns from "The Princess Bride" (where the technique worked) and "Coppola's
Dracula" (where it didn't).  Here, it's one more crazy patchwork in the quilt.
Katz' script, with Merhige's changes, plays more like Murnau's "Faust"
than "Nosferatu."  Murnau is simply an obsessive filmmaker willing to sell
his soul to get his vision on film.  He's used as a device, a conceit, not
a true character.  Humor is well utilizied - Merhige got his licks in by 
having Schreck proclaim, hungrily, that perhaps the writer was no longer 
necessary.
Technically the film is good, aping the silent look of "Nosferatu" when
not recreating it.  However, why, why, why does Merhige choose to accompany
his camera POV of the recreations with sound produced to recall the era - 
this was a silent film!  Overtures from "The Flying Dutchman" and "Tristan
and Isolde" are apt accompaniments to the visuals.  (Herzog again - Merhige
stages a scene of a ship set being built that strongly recalls an image
Herzog used in "Aguirre, the Wrath of God.")
This film keeps getting compared to "Gods and Monsters," probably because
they're both about homosexual directors who made early monster flicks.
"Gods and Monsters" painted a beautiful and complex portrait of James
Whale.  "Shadow of the Vampire" tells me practically nothing about Murnau.

Title
Review for Swordfish (2001)
Gabriel Shear expounds on what's wrong with Hollywood - not enough realism.
An admirer of "Dog Day Afternoon," he believes that Sonny should have 
ruthlessly blown away his hostages, gotten his bus to an awaiting plane, 
and walked away.  As the camera pulls back, we discover that Gabriel's in 
the midst of an Al Pacino moment and he's prepared to follow the agenda he 
just laid out in "Swordfish."
"Swordfish" opens with a bang, with the newly slimmed down Travolta sporting
the most villainous hairdo since Sam Jackson's in "Unbreakable," riffing on
Al Pacino like he hasn't since "Saturday Night Fever."  He's got hostages
rigged out with C4 and ball bearings 'like the world's biggest Claymore
mines,' and when the FBI interferes, one hostage sets off a firestorm that
looks like a 360 degree shot from the British nuclear holocaust film
"Threads."
Now settle down for the mundane and pedestrian as the film flashes back
to the preceding four days.
Skip Woods' script features high tech espionage and an attempt to keep
the audience guessing via the eyes of Stanley Jobson (Hugh Jackman, "X-Men"),
a hacker extraordinaire who's gone straight after a jail stint.  Stanley's 
offered $100K by Gabriel's colleague Ginger (Halle Berry, "X-Men") to just
meet with the man.  Of course he can be tempted, as his beloved daughter is
in the custody of his alcoholic ex-wife (Drea de Matteo of HBO's "The
Sopranos"), now married to a wealthy pornographic filmmaker.  He takes
the $10 million assignment to create a worm that will divert a $9.5 billion
DEA slush fund (code named Swordfish) to multiple accounts funding Gabriel's
anti-terrorist terrorism.  FBI Agent Roberts (Don Cheadle) tries to tail 
Stanley and a rigorous foot chase follows.  A corrupt Senator (Sam Shepard) 
tries to have Gabriel killed and a high speed car chase scene ensues.  This
is pretty much all just filler to get us back to where we began.
With a tip of the hat to "Dog Day Afternoon" again, Gabriel gets his bus,
but the twist is that he has it airlifted by a Sikorski helicopter (Gabriel
makes much of misdirection).  While one must admire the stunt crew who
really flew a bus through Los Angles skyscrapers, much of this segment seems
borrowed from the likes of "True Lies."
Travolta does really good bad guy - a return to his "Face/Off" form.  Young
soap actress Camryn Grimes makes Stanley's daughter Holly intriguing.  The
rest of the cast has little to do and makes little impression.
"Swordfish" just doesn't live up to its protagonist or do justice to his mind
games, but that incredibly complex opening segment and a cool, sleek Travolta 
almost make it worthwhile.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Vénus beauté (institut) (1999)
Angele (Nathalie Baye, "An Affair of Love") works at the Venus Beauty
salon with her much younger colleagues Marie (Audrey Tautou) and 
Samantha (Mathilde Seigner, "Dry Cleaning").  Marie is a naive young girl 
being courted by an elderly widowed client (Robert Hossein, "Rififi").
Rebellious Samantha has too many boyfriends.  Angele, emotionally
hurt by a love affair which left her lover (Jacques Bonnaffe, "Lucie
Aubrac") literally scarred, promiscuously seeks one night stands. 
Then the young and handsome Antoine (Samuel Le Bihan, "Red") insists he
is in love with her and begins to follow her in writer/director
Tonie Marshall's 1999 Cesar Best Film winner, "Venus Beauty Institute."
Venus Beauty is a pink and blue microcosm of female society where males 
hover at the periphery of its harp chiming glass door.  Its chic owner
Madame Nadine (Bulle Ogier, "The Discreet Charm of the Bourgeoisie")
advises Angele that she should own her own salon as she 'won't be one
of the girls forever,' yet Angele persists in her depressing, emotionally
angry lifestyle.
Ironically, for a woman who apparently seeks no relationship ties, Antoine
first falls for Angele when he observes her being dumped at a train station
by a weekend lover she clearly wishes to see again.  Angele treats the
impassioned young man horribly, getting drunk on their first 'date.'
Antoine rejects her sexual advances because of her agressive, unaffectionate
manner.  It's not until Angele sees Antoine speaking with Samantha in
the salon that she realizes she may reciprocate his feelings.  There's
another hitch, though - Antoine has a 20 year old fiance (Helene Fillieres)
who begins to shadow him just as he shadowed Angele.
Meanwhile, life in the salon goes on with customers such as Madame Buisse
(Claire Nebout), an exhibitionist who struts her buff stuff in the reception
area much to Madame Nadine's dismay and passersby's delight.  Director
Claire Denis is also on hand as an asthmatic massage client.  Samatha fights 
with Nadine and becomes suicidal.  Angele dissaproves of Marie's flirtation 
with Monsieur Lacheney until her and Antoine's spying upon the consummation of
that relationship fires their own spark.
Marshall's Cesar-winning script perfectly captures the life of the salon 
business and spins an intriguing subplot with Marie's April/December romance.
However it's main character Angele is a frustrating one - you want to reach
into the screen and shake her.  Her relationship with former lover Jacques
is perplexing.   Does she love him?  Did he dump her?  What keeps them from
entirely breaking their bond?  The ending of the film, which can be taken
at face value or seen as a fantasy, is not only downright weird but
terrifically unsatisfying as it makes you dislike the very conclusion you've 
been hoping for.
Technically, the film is terrific featuring strong art direction for the
shop (Michel Vandestien, "Nobody Loves Me") and fluid camera by Gerard de
Battista ("French Twist").
Acting is strong all around.  Samuel Le Bihan is a shaggily appealing
obsessive.  Newcomer Audrey Tautou is one to watch and plays beautifully
opposite veteran actor Robert Hossein, who never comes across as a dirty 
old man, but a courtly suitor.  Veteran actress Bulle Ogier shows just the
right amount of businesslike tartness peeking from behind her outward style 
and charm.  Baye makes us feel Angele's troubled emotional state by the 
strain we can see around her eyes.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Miss Congeniality (2000)
An infamous psychopath, called "the Citizen," has terrorized the nation
with a rampage of bombings, shootings and arson. His next chosen target is
the hallowed home of American beauty, the Miss United States Pageant, and
it's up to the FBI to stop him. Enter Special Agent Grace Heart (Sandra
Bullock), pretty but lacking, shall we say, in the social graces, who is
chosen to go undercover as a contestant in the national beauty contest and
nab the felon in "Miss Congeniality."
Sandra Bullock has come a long way since her star-making debut in 1994's
blockbuster, "Speed." Since then the actress has turned producer and "Miss
Congeniality" is the product of that change. Working from a script by Marc
Lawrence, Katie Ford and Caryn Lucas, the film is a combo of crime caper
and "Pygmalion," with Bullock as a super cop crossed with Elisa Doolittle.
A Unibomber style nutcase is terrorizing the country with his senseless
mayhem. When another of "the Citizen's" cryptic letter arrives at the FBI,
Special Agent Eric Matthews (Benjamin Bratt) is put in charge of the case.
The letter is deciphered and shows that the Miss United States Beauty
Pageant is the target for his next nefarious crime. The only way to uncover
the madman, the plan and his victim is to place an agent into the pageant
as a contestant. The only agent that fits the bill (read that: looks good
in a swimsuit) is Grace Heart. There is only one problem. Grace acts more
like a guy than the guys around her do.
The Bureau hires a master beauty pageant consultant, Victor Melling
(Michael Caine), to turn the sow's ear that is Grace into a silk purse.
Henry Higgins has nothing on the challenge that Vic must face in trying to
change the uncooperative agent not just into a beautiful woman, but one who
is good enough to make it as one of the pageant's final five contestants.
Special Agent Heart is against the plan and refuses to join a "bunch of
bikini stuffers who only want world peace." But, her career is on the line
and, reluctantly, she undergoes the make over that will turn her into Miss
New Jersey.
This is all a cute premise for a film and the story takes the direction
that one expects. As Grace undergoes her metamorphosis from bedraggled,
cynical and tough law officer to sleek, poised and elegant national beauty
contestant, she realizes that changes are happening within her, too.
Against her prejudiced will, Grace begins to get to know the other
contestants and realizes that they aren't the bikini stuffers she thought
they were. In particular, Cheryl (Heather Burns), Miss Rhode Island, takes
a liking to Grace and, against the agent's will, she makes friends. Grace's
mission to protect her, now, friends takes on an even greater urgency when
she learns that pageant organizer and former contestant, Kathy Morningside
(Candice Bergen), is a prime suspect. You can take it from there.
"Miss Congeniality" has a hard time getting past its by-the-numbers,
routine plot that pulls in the usual chestnuts of undercover cop tale, "My
Fair Lady," fish-out-of-water story and, for good measure, a romance. It
also attempts to show the makings of a big-time beauty pageant and how they
are really scholarship programs and not just swimsuit shows. There is a lot
of stuff going on here and it gets muddled as the story progresses.
This is the likable Sandra Bullock's show. The writing focuses of Grace and
her gruff personality that you know will undergo a change the same way her
whole look is altered by artiste Victor Manning. The camera never leaves
the actress for long as we see her go from mannish FBI Agent Grace Heart to
megababe and beauty finalist Gracie Lou Freebrush. Bullock has the
personality and a comic ability to hold the center of the film, but this is
virtually a one-woman show. The only exception is the funny, fey
performance by Michael Caine as the mysteriously blackballed pageant
consultant. Caine gets the only chance to steel the star's limelight and is
an epiphany in a nicely developed comic role.
The rest of the cast, including Benjamin Bratt, get little to do but fill
the screen around Bullock. Bratt is handsome enough and may have talent,
but he has yet to get a role that is a break through. Other characters are
generic and unmemorable. William Shatner is wasted as Stan Fields, the long
time pageant emcee who is being fired because he is "too old," a la Bert
Parks and the Miss America pageant. Nothing ever happens with the character
or his dilemma in a poor piece of story crafting. I could not watch Candice
Bergen without thinking, "Murphy Brown."
"Miss Congeniality" doesn't bring you any closer to the world of beauty
pageants. Nor does it deliver more than a few chuckles as we see Agent
Grace stumble and fall repeatedly because of her high heels. It worked
once, maybe twice, but not six or seven times. There could have been a
better film in there. I give it a C+.
Special Agent Gracie Hart (Sandra Bullock) despises all things culturally
regarded as feminine and is considered one of the guys by her male 
coworkers at the F.B.I.  When she makes a wrong choice during a bust,
she's passed over for an operations lead to nab the infamous "Citizen"
bomber.  That honor goes to her competitive coworker Eric Matthews (Benjamin
Bratt, "The Next Best Thing"), who doesn't have a clue where to start.
Gracie figures out from the Citizen's clues that he intends to hit
the Miss United States pageant in San Antonio, and before she can say
'high heels', she's picked to go undercover as a contestant in "Miss 
Congeniality."
This Sandra Bullock produced vehicle is just that - a Sandra Bullock vehicle
and nothing more.  The film is completely derivative (see "My Fair Lady,"
"Never Been Kissed," etc.).  It also suffers from 'traileritis' in that
there are very few laughs outside of what's already been presented in its 
marketting.
The screenplay, by Marc Lawrence ("Forces of Nature"), Katie Ford and Caryn
Lucas, features F.B.I. agents who act like a pack of frat boys (their mission
is named Operation Thong), an unappealing love interest, the heroine stumbling 
over her heels over and over and over, an easily detected false suspect, and 
forty-eight contestants with no personality (Heather Burns as Cheryl, Miss 
Rhode Island, is the only one who's the least bit fleshed out).
The Bureau hires pageant consultant Victor Melling (Michael Caine) to transform
the klutzy, dishevelled Gracie into Miss New Jersey, which he does in short
order in an airplane hanger with a huge staff.  Once this segment is completed,
the comedy deflates.  We're introduced to Miss Morningstar (Candice Bergen),
the head of the pageant, her inept assistant Frank (Steve Monroe, "The Nutty
Professor"), and long-time emcee Stan Fields (William Shatner) and surprise -
all have axes to grind.  Then the film just goes through its paces as Gracie
gets in and out of scrapes, cozies up to Matthews (a character presented as a
shallow, juvenile womanizer who's not too good at his job either), saves 
the day and realizes that beauty contestants are people too.  Yawn.
Bullock should be commended for shining as much as she does with this material.
Her comic abilities are firing on all cylinders and Gracie gets the audience
on her side quickly.  Physically, she's convincing wrestling a man or diving
onto a suspect.  Bullock also really adds sizzle when the material gives
her something to work with.  Her only support here comes from Michael Caine as 
a humorously sarcastic Henry Higgins.  The rest of the cast is shrill or bland.
Technically the film is of commercial standards.
Bullock fans may be happy with "Miss Congeniality," but those in search of
a real comedy should look elsewhere.

Title
Review for Charlie's Angels (2000)
With so many big screen adaptations of old television shows falling flat,
the "Charlie's Angels" project sounded dubious except for one important
factor - Drew Barrymore.  Barrymore is a likeable young actress and a
proven producer ("Never Been Kissed") and she succeeds once again
with this project.
Written by Ryan Rowe ("Tapeheads"), Ed Solomon ("Men In Black") and
John August ("Go"), this "Charlie's Angels" keeps the TV show basics intact
while tweaking it with good-natured tongues in cheeks.  The film kicks
off parodying "Mission Impossible 2" in as high-flying a manner as any
Bond opening, while getting a joke in at the expense of "T.J. Hooker:  
the Movie."  Then we're introduced to the three angels as widely different 
children.  Natalie's (Cameron Diaz) a brace wearing, girlie girl who loves 
Soul Train.  Alex (Lucy Liu) is a silver-spooned equestrian.  Dylan 
(Barrymore) is a smoking-in-the-girls'-room rebellious orphanned teen.
Back in current times, the three are assembled by Bosley (Bill Murray) to
get their assignment from Charlie (uncreditted voice of John Forsythe,
the original Charlie).  Eric Knox (Sam Rockwell, "Galaxy Quest"), a 
nerdy software magnate, has been kidnapped.  His partner Vivian Wood (Kelly
Lynch, "Drugstore Cowboy"), fingers Roger Corwin (Tim Curry) as an enemy
while the Angels identify a slick flunky in the kidnapping tape as the
Thin Man (Crispen Glover, "Nurse Betty").  They then begin their pursuit
of the bad guy(s) masquerading as beautiful party women, belly dancers,
Bavarian yodellers and office efficiency experts.  They also all pursue
romance - Natalie with bartender Pete (Luke Wilson, a Barrymore ex and
former costar "Home Fries"), Alex with action star Jason (Matt LeBlanc,
TV's "Friends") and Dylan with Knox himself (while flirting with Chad,
Barrymore's new husband Tom Green) - while maintaining their covers.
The story is lightweight, but features plenty of action (all Matrix style
and well exaggerated) and lots of goofy humor (slo-mo shots of hair being
'flipped').  Only Alex' romance with LeBlanc and Barrymore's indulgent
inclusion of Tom Green bog the film down.
Acting is fun all around with Diaz shining brightest as the excessively
cheerful, completely ditzy Natalie.  Liu struts her femme fatale stuff.
Barrymore keeps her costars more front-and-center, yet still makes her
own mark playing a woman scorned.  Sam Rockwell hits broad comedic high
notes in two very different modes while the ever reliable Murray settles
for slapstick (and a great prison parody sequence).  Tim Curry is
underutilized, but fine while he's on screen.  Crispen Glover resembles
a deranged Steed from "The Avengers."
Costume and art direction harkens back to the mod 70's time period while 
still being current while effects are sometimes given a little appropriate
cheese factor.  The soundtrack is stuffed with everything from oldies 
from Jimi Hendrix to more recent tunes from Pizzicato Five.  "Charlie's 
Angels" may seem a tad overlong at 92 minutes, but it mostly flies across 
the screen with good-natured giddiness.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Scary Movie 2 (2001)
After the surprise success of "Scary Movie," a sequel was inevitable.  
The survivors of the first are joined by some newcomers, including Tim
Curry posing as a dream research professor right out of "The Haunting"
who wants to subject the old gang to Hell House in "Scary Movie 2." 
"Scary Movie 2" opens with an "Exorcist" parody teaming with bodily
fluid gross-outs before the title credit comes up.  It's also the only
worthwhile part of this flabby affair.  The film got a lot of publicity
when Marlon Brando was withdrawn as the Max von Sydow character due to
heath problems.  James Woods is a hilarious replacement as the child molesting
Father McFeely, trading tongue with an unrecognizable Natasha Lyonne 
("Slums of Beverly Hills") as 'Megan.'  Ex-Conan O'Brien sidekick Andy
Richter is Father Harris, who literally ejects his mother from Megan's 
bed while Veronica Cartwright steps into Ellen Burstyn's role.  Then the
real movie begins and demonic possession suddenly seems like a better
alternative than remaining in the theater.
"Scary Movie" succeeded mostly because of its sheer audacity.  It went
too far, but it was funny.  This "The Haunting" parody, directed by the
first's helmer Keenen Ivory Wayans, just goes through the motions of parodying
one movie after another without any apparent stab at wit or humor.
Initially, Chris Elliott seems intriguing as Hell House's handyman with 
a grossly disfigured hand, but by his second scene the 'laughs' are being
forced from the same gross-out bits he was introduced with and the boredom
squirming sets in.
"Scary Movie 2" wastes a lot of talent (one even almost feels sorry for Tori
Spelling appearing in this mess) referencing "MI: 2," "Poltergeist," "Hollow
Man," "What Lies Beneath," etc.  Clearly this movie's demographics are those
who will feel entertained by recognizing bits from other, all better, films.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Girlfight (2000)
Diana's (Michelle Rodriguez) getting into trouble at her Brooklyn High School 
over her pugilistic tendencies while her single dad Sandro (Paul Calderon, 
"Out of Sight") is pushing weekly boxing lessons on her artistically inclined
younger brother Tiny (Ray Santiago).  When Sandro won't give her an allowance,
Diana secretly takes matters into her own hands and convinces Tiny's trainer 
Hector (Jaime Tirelli, "City of Hope") that she can come up with his $10 per 
lesson fee in this year's Sundance Grand Jury and Director winner, "Girlfight."
"Girlfight" cops a tough feminine 'tude from the get go when star Rodriguez,
leaning on a locker, glares up at us from beneath her eyelashes, recalling
Malcom McDowell's punk in "A Clockwork Orange."  Soon Diana's beating on
a pretty classmate who's dared to steal the less attractive
Marisol's (Elisa Bocanegra) boyfriend and insult her in the process.  She
picks up Tiny at the Brooklyn Athletic Club and hauls off and belts Ray,
a boxer and classmate ('I couldn't resist,' she says).  When Diana goes home, 
she glowers as she performs the womanly duties of serving dinner and cleaning 
up, listens to a TV news report of a woman whose boyfriend set her on fire, 
and watches a neighborhood woman struggle with her small children on the 
street below.
Diana's not all about feminist brooding sullenness, however, as can be seen 
when she begins formal boxing training and the top amateur featherweight, 
Adrian (Santiago Douglas) catches her eye.  She listens to Hector, but watches
Adrian flirt with his oh-so-feminine girlfriend.  Soon they're thrown into
each other's company after an amateur bout, sharing dinner at a diner (she
orders a rare cheeseburger with extra bacon, he has a salad with a cup of
soup) and a ride home.  Adrian's intrigued by this woman he can talk to, and,
after squiring his trophy girl to an event Diana also attends, is forced
to realize Diana's the one for him.  Then the real confrontation presents
itself - Hector is entering his prize boxer, Diana, in the finals for the
amateur featherweight championship - against Adrian.
Writer/Director Karyn Kusama (one time John Sayles' assistant, supported here
by his long time producers Sarah Green and Maggie Renzie) has fashioned a
film whose main character is so immediately in your face you reject letting
her in.  Gradually, however, Kusama's screenplay and newcomer Rodriguez' 
performance win you over before you realize it because they're just so real.
Diana, we learn, has a reason to be angry and has very wisely channelled
it into something productive.  She's also not all fight, caring for Tiny
and Marisol, while trying to establish trust with Adrian.  She's believable
physically, training and sparring in the gym.  She subtly projects emotions
as well, such as when, discovering a home totally unlike her own, her eyes 
dart around, taking in all the family pictures.  She can be plain (particularly 
with an eye blackened!) or show smoldering sexiness.
Support is equally strong and well cast, particularly Santiago Douglas'
Adrian who undergoes an anti-macho catharsis because of knowing Diana and
Jaime Tirelli's good-hearted Hector, a small time trainer whose mind is opened 
when he finds talent in an unexpected package.
The screenplay never lets its characters take routine paths and builds
with a graceful arc.  The climatic scene is preceeded by a beautiful
silhouette shot of Hector asking Diana 'Do you know him inside?  Do you 
know yourself inside?'  The denouement is beautifully realized in front of
the dingy window in the broom closet that's been deeded to Diana for a locker
in the all-male domain.
Kusama's direction is sure and strong.  Along with her cinematographer
Patrick Cady and production designer Stephen Beatrice, a real sense of 
place is created.  Whether on the streets, in homes, at school or the gym, 
we know we're in a real, urban neighborhood.  Fight scenes are immediate, 
with some punches coming right at the camera lens.  
The unique score by Theodore Shapiro is heavily percussive, often sounding like 
castanets backing a metronome.  Sound by Mary Ellen Porto is sharp, punctuated 
with thematic bells and buzzers from school halls to ringside.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Kid, The (2000)
Russ Duritz (Bruce Willis) is fast approaching his 40th birthday. He's a
successful image consultant, makes a lot of money, and has an expensive home
and a fancy car. But, he's a loser when it comes to the things that count in 
life - a family, friends, and people who care. Russ is at an emotional 
crossroads and, though he doesn't realize it, needs help. A pudgy 8-year old 
boy named Rusty (Spencer Breslin) arrives on his doorstep. When Russ realizes 
that Rusty is himself, 32-years ago, he makes a start on the road to personal 
redemption in "Disney's The Kid."
It gives me a chill when I see a movie title include the name of the company
that made it. When I saw the title of "Disney's The Kid," I knew that the
family entertainment giant was trying a little misdirection, as if to say, 
"Pay no attention to this movie. Just look who made it! That's the important 
thing." It isn't. The story is the important thing and "The Kid" lacks a good 
one.
"If only I knew what I know now when I was growing up...." Everyone has said
this to himself or herself at least once and probably many times over the
years.  It's an interesting premise, like time travel, and one that is ripe 
with possibilities. Unfortunately, the screenplay by Audrey Wells
("Guinevere")
doesn't capitalize on the idea. Basically, the story for "The Kid" is about a
pretty unlikable character, Russ, who happens to be very good at what he does.
His consultation business is lucrative and his clients are happy with his
efforts, but nobody likes the man. Even his loyal assistant, Janet (Lily
Tomlin), seems to tolerate the taciturn, often rude, style that defines Russ.
When Russ's alter ego, Rusty, arrives on the scene, there is no explanation,
aside from some vague magical incidents that don't explain anything. The boy
just appears out of the blue with a toy airplane, which Russ believes is his
from 32 years ago. Matching birthmarks and scars, the pair realizes that they
are the same person, but separated by decades. From here on in, it's a matter
of who helps whom. Rusty sees his future life as, "I'm 40, I don't fly jets 
and I don't have a dog. I'm a loser!" Russ sees his past life as something to 
be forgotten. This odd little couple must come to grips with their life
crises 
and turn to each other for help. Russ shows Rusty how to defend himself
against
bullies, while Rusty teaches Russ the importance of nurturing the kid within.
Bruce Willis seems to have made a career choice to star in film with kids.
"Mercury Rising" and "The Sixth Sense" come to mind with the former a
thriller,
the later a horror flick, and both starring a little boy, too. "The Kid" is a
comedy, but no one apparently told Willis that his latest is supposed to be
funny as he gives a humorless performance as Russ. Compounding Willis's wooden
perf is the unendearing one by little Spencer Breslin as Rusty. The kid
schleps
around and endlessly complains of not having a dog (and you know where that's
going to go. As you do with just about everything in the movie.) Young Breslin
doesn't have the personality or charm to make you like him. In the end, you
don't care about either Russ or Rusty.
The supporting cast is lightweight in number and the players are allowed to be
symbols only. Emily Mortimer, as Russ's assistant Amy, is the obvious love
interest in the film, though why she would deign to be seen in the company of
her rude boss is a question I asked more than once. The script covers this by
having Amy declare to Russ, "I [sometimes] see the kid in you." I'm glad she
does, because I never did. Nonetheless, Mortimer is pretty and perky in the
role. Jean Smart gets some mileage as a middle-aged southern belle who
relocates to LA as a news anchor. Her Deirdre becomes Russ's muse and
advisor, 
basically telling him the obvious - let the inner kid out.
The production, led by helmer John Turteltaub, is straightforward. There is
little to take note of as the team behind the camera goes through the motions
of capturing the action. There's not a lot of passion in front of or behind
the
camera.
When I first saw the trailers for "Disney's The Kid," I was less than
enthusiastic about seeing it. Now, having been there, I find my instincts were
correct. Save your money (or, go see "Chicken Run" instead). I give it a D+.
Bruce Willis once again braves sharing the screen with a child (and TWO
dogs, including a handicapped one!) in "Disney's the Kid."  He's Russ Duritz, 
an image consultant with a long-suffering assistant (Lily Tomlin) who buffers 
him from his father and an employee, Amy (Emily Mortimer, "Love's Labour's 
Lost") who keeps having her hopes of finding his good side dashed.
We witness a day in the life of Russ, where he treats people rudely (although
the script, by Audrey Wells ("Guinevere"), needed some real toughening up
in this regard) and engineers a media moment with a bunch of kids recruited
at a baseball game to save a dishonorable client.  Amy protests (script
problems again - why would she work for this guy if she constantly rejects
his 
methods?) and Russ redeems himself by tossing the video.  Of course, he then 
has to spoil the good will he's generated by shoving her childlike enthusiasm 
for a perfect moon back in her face.
Then things get really weird when it appears a little kid is breaking into
his highly secure LA home.  (And, oh yeah, he's been buzzed by a bright red
biplane, too.)  A toy plane is left on Russ' doorstep and then he catches
the kid, who claims the plane because his name, Rusty, is painted on the
bottom.  Turns out - surprise - that this is Russ' plane and he's just been
introduced to himself as a child.
"Disney's the Kid" is an odd hybrid of a movie - the Disney inserted in the
title implies a kids' film, but it's really a midlife crisis flick mixed
with some fantastical time travel elements (the pilot plus multi-generational
male bonding aspect recalls Mel Gibson's "Forever Young").  Unfortunately the
story never seems to get out of the concept phase and Turteltaub's
("Phenomenon," "Instinct") direction is bland, but the cast can't be faulted.
Willis generously lets his costars shine, even as his character is undone
by writing that can't live up to its convictions (Russ doesn't seem unhappy
with his lot until he's made aware that he should be).  Young Spencer Breslin
(TV commercials) is a solid foil, never playing for the sap factor and 
able to pull off his disdain for 'a dogless, chickless guy' as being a loser
(he also does a pretty good job with the 'Holy smokes' signature line he
must say repeatedly).
Support really shines in this centerless film with Lily Tomlin's Janet 
leading the pack in a naturally comic performance as the power behind the
throne.  Jean Smart (a vet of screenwriter Wells' "Guinevere") exudes warmth 
in a small but pivotal role of a new LA news anchor who gets free advice from 
the early, begrudging Russ in order to pop up later and return the favor more 
generously.  Emily Mortimer finally establishes herself with a character that
actually has a personality (her performances in "Scream 3" and "Love's
Labour's
Lost" hardly being memorable).  She holds her own against both Willis and
Breslin with adroit charm.
"Disney's the Kid" continues to waste its potential with an overly
sappy, overly 'happily ever after' ending that would actually make life
almost 
not worth living for the two different-aged Russes if any of these pedestrian 
filmmakers stopped to think about it.  

Title
Review for Patriot, The (2000)
South Carolina. 1776. Benjamin Martin (Mel Gibson), a farmer and furniture
maker, is a pacifist. A hero in the French and Indian War, the recently widowed
planter has seven children to raise and the rebellion is not for him or his
family. Even when his eldest son, Gabriel (Heath Ledger), goes off to join the
rebel militia, ashamed of his father, Ben steadfastly maintains his
isolationism. But, fate takes a hand and, after a violent battle between
British regulars and the rag-tage rebels at Martin's front door, a cruel, 
sadistic British officer, Col. William Tavington (Jason Isaacs), brutally guns 
down one of the farmer's sons, sparking revenge and revolution in "The Patriot."
Director/co-executive producer Roland Emmerich has been the master of the 
cliche since his American debut with the Jean-Claude Van Damme-er "Universal 
Soldier."  He continued his record with "StarGate," "Independence Day" and 
"Godzilla."  While the latter film was not all that successful, it and the 
others gave Emmerich the clout to helm a big budget, Revolutionary War 
actioner starring Mel Gibson and a cast of thousands. Despite the budget and 
star, the director has, once again, made another formulaic, cliche-ridden flick.
The American rebellion against King George is an admirable backdrop for the
routine story by Robert Rodat ("Saving Private Ryan," another routine tale),
that could have been called "Braveheart 2." The peaceful Benjamin is driven to
the brink and beyond by a sadist who does something really cruel (and stupid)
to incense the hero to action. Lots of fighting takes place and just deserts are
delivered in the end and all the rebels live happily ever after. From the
beginning to the end, you know the story before it happens. There were moments
where the tale could have taken an interesting twist, but never does.
Originally, "The Patriot" was supposed to be based on the exploits of Francis
Marion, The Swamp Fox, but political correctness, due to some nefarious deeds
by Marion, made the makers switch to a fiction with only a real life backdrop of
the Revolutionary War.
There are three things, though, that put "The Patriot" a notch above the rest
of Emmerich's oeuvres - the aforementioned bucks, the star power and draw of Mel
Gibson, and one of the best production teams I have seen behind the camera. The
technical staff involved helps to overshadow the oft-used tale and, through the
magic of movement on screen, succeed in recreating the look and feel of the
period and of war.
Emmerich has assembled an often-awarded team of film crafters and their
collective experience is obvious in the finished product. Foremost is the
dazzling photography by the brilliant Caleb Deschanel ("The Natural," "Fly Away
Home"). The lenser has always been a favorite of mine and has given the movies
he shoots the most beautiful and striking images one will ever see on the
screen. His fine eye for composition makes "The Patriot" one of the best
looking films of the year. The huge, panoramic battle scenes are crystal clear 
and visually stunning. His close-up photography of the fighting is fast, furious
and frightening in its intensity. Even routine scenes have an artistry in how 
they are photographed.
Lending, strongly, to the look and period feel are the production design by
Kirk M. Petrucelli ("Mystery Men") and costuming by Deborah L. Scott 
(Oscar-winner for "Titanic"). The scope of "The Patriot" production is awesome 
and these folks and their creative teams provide Class A work. Attention to 
details - and the use of "recreators" as extras, fans of the Revolutionary War 
who spend their free time recreating battles for the sheer fun of it - is a 
major plus and propels the film beyond mediocrity.
The principle cast is OK, not great. Mel gives a cookie cutter perf, but is
still damn good looking and carries the physical demands of the role with his
usual ability. Heath Ledger made a nice little splash in his American debut
flick, "10 Things I Hate About You," and has an amiable likableness but lacks
the intensity needed for his character Gabriel. Jason Isaacs is wickedly wicked
as the evil bad guy, Col. Tavington -  I realize that atrocities happen in war,
but this guy is a mix of all the bad traits of Genghis Khan, Adolph Hitler,
Vlad the Impaler and Lizzy Borden rolled into one. No wonder the English press 
is up in arms over the way the Brits are depicted here.
Supporting cast is peppered with solid actors who help, thankfully, to flesh
out the background characters. Chris Cooper ("October Sky") gives credence as 
the embattled rebel commander, Col. Harry Burwell, who is struggling to defeat 
the enemy against enormous odds. Tcheky Karyo is amusing as the lead element of
French assistance to the American Cause. He's no one-man army, but provides the
needed wit against the French jokes delivered periodically through the film.
Tom Wilkinson gives his General Cornwallis a pompous arrogance of empire that 
rings true. Minor characters, like volunteer John Billings (Leon Rippy), add
dimension to the background cast. One false note is Joely Richardson in her 
vacuous perf as Ben's sister-in-law (and love interest), Charlotte Selton.
"The Patriot" is a mixed bag of a film. The tale is unoriginal and
unimaginative, but the depiction of the mundane story is handled in an
outstanding manner. The sheer force of the technical, artistic side of the
movie overshadows its trite tale of revenge. Even at 160 minutes long, I was 
visually entertained, at least, and I give it a B.
Producer (Mark Gordon) and screenwriter (Robert Rodat) of "Saving Private Ryan"
team up with the director (Roland Emmerich) of "Independence Day" on a tale
based on French and Indian War hero Benjamin Martin's (Mel Gibson) stand to 
keep himself and his family peaceful and safe during the American Revolution.
'Why should I trade a tyrant 3,000 miles away for 3,000 tyrants a mile away?'
he asks when declaration of war is being debated.  A recent widower with seven 
children ranging from pre-toddler to eighteen, Martin is also haunted by the 
brutality both endured and inflicted during his legendary heroics at Fort 
Wilderness, reminding less experienced men that 'this war will be fought
amongst us...your children will learn of it with their own eyes.'
His words turn out to be very prophetic, as the war can soon be viewed from
his South Carolina home's wraparound porch.  His eldest, Gabriel (Heath
Ledger, "10 Things I Hate About You"), who enlisted against his father's
wishes, crawls back into his home wounded.  The Martins and their free black 
workers tend the fallen from both sides of the battle, when Colonel Tavington
(Jason Isaacs, "The End of the Affair") arrives and instructs his men to
gather up the sticken British and massacre the enemy wounded.  Gabriel's
taken prisoner and his fifteen year old brother Thomas attempts to save him.
Tavington shoots the boy in front of his father's eyes.  Benjamin Martin
now has red-hot revenge burning in his brain.
First, Martin spirits a new legend, that of The Ghost, by slaying twenty
departing British officers (with the assistance of young sons Matthew and
Samuel,  the latter of which is traumatized by the event) in order to 
free Gabriel.  Then he forms a militia with the aid of his old friend Colonel
Henry Burwell (Chris Cooper, "October Sky") and Frenchman Major Jean Villeneuve
(Tcheky Karyo, "Addicted to Love"), claiming his son Gabriel in the bargain.
Martin's men are so successful, they capture the attention of General
Cornwallis (Tom Wilkinson, "The Full Monty") himself, whom Martin outwits
in a clever prisoner exchange gambit.  Cornwallis' pride is so damaged, he
orders the uncivilized and ungentlemanly Tavington to use any means necessary
to take Martin down.
Technically, "The Patriot" is first rate, featuring gorgeous cinematography
by Caleb Deschanel ("The Natural") realistic period design by Kirk M.
Petruccelli ("Blade") and costume by Deborah L. Scott ("Wild Wild West"),
although John Williams' score is forgettable.  Special effects include a
cannonball hurtling directly at the audience, brutal battle scenes and their
aftermath, and seamless matte shots - beautiful work.
Acting is a mixed bag.  While Gibson is good in the role it seems like a 
second rate William Wallace for him.  I for one am tired of seeing Gibson's 
tortured face as once again his character is called upon to endure unspeakable 
horrors, yet the man does convincingly play a heroic leader.  Heath Ledger 
acquits himself nicely as the son learning the complexities of his father and 
of life, although frankly, I found him more interesting in his teenage romantic
comedy debut.  Tcheky Karyo is always a pleasurable addition and his reactions 
to Gibson's French baiting lend a believable amount of levity.  Wilkinson is a 
fine Cornwallis.  Leon Rippy ("Stargate") is another good sidekick for Mel
as farmer recruit John Billings and Adam Baldwin has an interesting 'almost
cameo' as Captain Wilkins, an American loyal to the Brits.  The women don't 
fare as well, with Gibson's love interest, Joely Richardson (as his 
sister-in-law Charlotte Selton) delivering her lines as if she had marbles in 
her mouth and newcomer Lisa Brenner (as Gabriel's fiance Anne Howard) being 
far too modern for the period.  
The villain of the piece, Jason Isaac's Tavington, is a fatal flaw of
multiple dimensions.  Tavington is an unrelenting sadist whose only motivation
appears to be greed.  The actor was more than likely instructed to play
the part broadly, so fault lies more properly with the filmmakers who chose
to use every cliche in the book in making this film.  In a war fought by
thousands, it's a foregone conclusion that Tavington and Martin will come
head to head at every crucial moment until a climatic last stand.  Tavington
even gets a "Halloween" moment, 'rising from the dead' as soon as his opponent
drops his weaon (always the telltale sign).  It's sad to admit, but I was
hoping our hero was decapitated against the backdrop of an American flag just
to break the tedium of 'been there, done that.'  
"The Patriot" certainly isn't a bad film, just one that shows its commercial
molding all too blatantly.  Audiences who haven't been exposed to a lot of 
movies will more than likely enjoy it tremendously.  It has craftmanship of
the highest order in its look and sound and many scenes, particularly the
ones that take advantage of Gibson's comedic talents, play very well.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Keep the River on Your Right: A Modern Cannibal Tale (2000)
KEEP THE RIVER ON YOUR RIGHT:  A MODERN CANNIBAL TALE
In 1950's New York City, Tobias Schneebaum was an artist who became
an anthropologist, an out gay man at a time when most were closetted ('He
was our house homosexual,' recalls author Norman Mailer).  When Schneebaum
heard about the Incan ruins of Macchu Pichu, he decided he had to visit
Peru.  With an art grant, he did so, but a restlessness of spirit, an
emptiness of the soul, took him even further.  With only the clothes on his
back and only a river to guide him, Tobias walked into the jungle for
eight days, where he found the headhunting tribe of the Amarekaire and
lived among them for a year.  Directors David and Laurie Shapiro
convinced Schneebaum, at the age of 78, to make the trip once more in
"Keep the River to Your Right:  a Modern Cannibal Tale."
Tobias Schneebaum is a fascinating subject.  Artistic, intellectually curious, 
a great storyteller, he is above all, a humanist with a spiritually uplifting 
outlook on life.  The Shapiro's not only found a compelling, charismatic 
subject, but a unique way to capture it, shaping their film the way a great 
conversationalist talks, playfully following side threads that always weave 
back into the big picture.
As the film's credits roll, we follow senior citizen Schneebaum through a
grocery store, immediately bringing to mind the cannibalism of the title.
While this is the sensationalistic aspect that may draw some
viewers in, it becomes insignificant in the scheme of things (even though
Schneebaum says that the four words 'I am a cannibal,' haunt him every day).  
Amusingly, the Shapiros illustrate that as people recoil from this part of 
Tobias' experience, they inevitably follow up with 'How did it taste?'  (Like 
pork, if you're wondering.)
Today Schneebaum makes his living by lecturing on the Asmat people of Papua
New Guinea, another headhunting tribe with whom he lived.  Forty-five years
later, Tobias travels back, and is not only recognized, but finds his lover,
Aipit, whose photograph he had just shown as part of a cruise ship talk.
(Asmat men all take a male lover in addition to procreating with women.)
The gentle treatment these people show the old man speaks volumes (Schneebaum
is worried about breaking his hip a second time) and the filmmakers capture 
poetic images from such mundane occurrences as feet trudging through mud.  
It's here, in New Guinea, that we begin to here Tobias' philosophy, as he 
reflects on finding inner peace after 50.  The melancholy projected as he
takes leave of Aipit is palpable.
The filmmakers flit about present day New York City, as Tobias visits with
Mailer, recalls a childhood exposure to the Wild Man of Borneo at Coney
Island and takes a gondola ride in Central Park with a much younger lover.
The return to Peru, which Tobias clearly dreads, caps this lifelong journey 
with great drama.  Schneebaum begins to have nightmares every day.  He 
contemplates death as the camera records his profile in shadow against the 
stones of Macchu Pichu.  It was here that he went on what he thought was a 
hunting expedition with his friends that turned into the massacre of another 
village (he never witnessed headhunting in New Guinea).  Lightning strikes
twice as Tobias is again recognized after almost half a century and 
welcomed with open arms.  The old people make jokes about wearing clothes
now while the younger generation tell us that, although their people used
to headhunt, they don't like to talk about it - the same reaction we
got from the Asmat almost a half a world away!
In the end, Schneebaum professes to be glad that he returned and so are we - 
not only because we were allowed to take the journey with him, but because in
getting to know him, we've come to care about him.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for AntiTrust (2001)
Young computer genius Milo Hoffman (Ryan Phillippe, "The Way of the Gun")
plans on partnering a hi-tech startup with his best friend Teddy (Yee Jee Tso) 
to provide digital convergence as open source software.  Then he gets a call 
from Gary Winston (Tim Robbins), the Bill Gates-like owner of N.U.R.V. (Never
Underestimate Radical Vision), who wants Milo's expertise for his similar
SYNAPSE project.  Milo's charmed by Winston and disappoints his friend by 
going with 'the enemy,' only to learn that the big corporation is indeed
a dangerous foe in "AntiTrust."
"AntiTrust" is like "The Firm" without the suspense or romantic intrigue,
(I suppose that's what one would expect exchanging software nerds
for lawyers) with a dash of "Enemy of the State" thrown in for good measure.
The film, written by Howard Franklin ("The Man Who Knew Too Little") has
an intriguing enough, albeit unoriginal, premise - what if a Microsoft-like 
behemoth was squashing the little guys by stealing their software and then,
well, squashing them.  Unfortunately, the film's so obvious it invites
laughter in all the wrong places.
Milo leaves southern California for the misty Northwest (Portland rather than
Seattle) with his girlfriend Alice (Claire Forlani, "Meet Joe Black") and
falls for the apparent programming eutopia that is N.U.R.V's campus.  He
gets Winston as his personal counselor (a first time honor at N.U.R.V), a
beautiful new home, flashy new car and a look from Lisa, (Rachael Leigh Cook,
"She's All That") the loner female programmer that has the nerds drooling.
He also gets unexpected help from Winston in programming the highly complex
adapter that will allow any digital device to communicate with any other
digital device.  The first time Gary presents him with a CDROM, Milo's
desktop is displaying CNN footage of the car accident death of a top MIT
software engineer - my, could there be a connection here?  Milo doesn't get
a clue until it's hammered into his head - not only does his best friend
get murdered in an apparent hate crime, but Gary parrots back Teddy's very
words as he slips Milo yet another disk.
"AntiTrust" is the type of ludicrous flick that has a CEO whipping up his
team to produce a highly sophisticated product within 49 days, then shows 
that project's lead programmer playing Nancy Drew while the rest of the team 
generally keeps 9-5 hours.  A supposedly exotic plot twist involves an allergy
to sesame seeds.
Director Peter Howitt, whose last film, "Sliding Doors," was a pleasant 
enough entertainment, doesn't just take a step back, he falls wildly
backwards into a ditch.  He gets little in the way of performances.  Phillippe,
who showed surprising depth in "The Way of the Gun," acts by way of his
eyeglasses in this one.  Robbins pulls out his "Arlington Road" villain and
makes him less interesting.  Rachel Leigh Cook is a statue while Forlani fares
somewhat better by at least using facial expressions.  
John Bailey's ("For the Love of the Game") cinematography is nice enough, but 
relies on 360 degree camera swirls once too often.  Editting by Zach Staenberg 
("The Matrix") throws the film's pacing off - it flows along too leisurely then 
lurches forward with too many important plot points compressed into too little
time - repeat cycle.  Some special effects are interesting, such as the
changing digital art in Winston's palatial home. 
The climax of the movie requires one too many leaps of faith from its audience
(as if it hasn't already been taxed at this point).  "AntiTrust" is a hack.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Saving Silverman (2001)
Long time buddies and Neil Diamond tribute band members Wayne (Steve Zahn,
"Happy, Texas") and J.D. (Jack Black, "High Fidelity") watch in horror
as third mate Darren Silverman (Jason Biggs, "American Pie") disappears under 
the thumb of his new fiance Judith, (Amanda Peet, "The Whole Nine Yards") a
controlling psychiatrist.  They're doubly troubled when the return of Darren's 
'one and only love' Sandy Perkins (Amanda Detmer, "Final Destination") returns 
to their home town but doesn't cause a ripple in Darren's devotion to Judith.
There's only one thing Wayne and J.D. can think of doing - they kidnap
Judith and fake her death in "Saving Silverman."
Written by Hank Nelken and Greg DePaul after seeing a friend engaged to
the wrong woman, "Saving Silverman" is directed by 'hit comedy director'
Dennis Dugan of such films as "Big Daddy," " Brain Donors" and "Problem
Child."  It's a dismal, third-rate Farrelly Brothers rip off that
attempts to milk humor from such inspired bits of whimsy as having Darren's
love interest come from a family of circus freaks AND be about to become
a nun.  Gross out gags include a visualization of Darren getting butt cheek
implants.
"Saving Silverman" is almost saved by stars Zahn and Black.  These two are so
comically talented they can take bad material and still deliver the goods.
They're in "Animal House" mode while the rest of the film trawls along and
comes up empty.  Jason Biggs can attribute his entire career to the luck of
having been cast in the smash hit "American Pie."  Peet shows some physical
moves but no flair for comedy here while Detmer slaps a brave, sweet smile
onto her face and soldiers through.  R. Lee Ermey ("Full Metal Jacket") is
one note in an embarrassing performance as a psychopathic ex-football coach.
Neil Diamond appears at the film's climax as himself and miraculously enlivens
the proceedings by belting out some of his old standards.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Two Family House (2000)
Buddy Visalo (Michael Rispoli, "Summer of Sam") dreams of becoming a singer
after Arthur Godfrey catches him at an armed forces show and asks him to
audition.  Once Buddy's back from WWII, his fiance Estelle (Katherine Narducci, 
HBO's "The Sopranos") and her parents refocus him into a more
'practical' career working at a local factory and living with the in-laws on
Staten Island.  Eleven years later, when a ramshackle two family house is
within his financial reach, Buddy thinks he and Estelle can live upstairs and
convert the downstairs into a tavern where he can entertain in this year's 
Sundance Audience Award winner, "Two Family House."           
Estelle hates the house, but just knows that Buddy will lose it anyway.  She 
appears to be right when they can't get rid of their upstairs Irish immigrant 
tenants, the O'Nearys (Kevin Conway, "The Quick and the Dead," and Kelly 
Macdonald, "Trainspotting").  Things get even worse when the woman, Mary, who 
is hugely pregnant, gives birth to a black child.  Mary's abusive husband Jim 
abandons her and Estelle demands that Buddy throw her out to quell the 
neighborhood gossip.  This he does, but guilt nags at him and, even though
he's short on cash himself, he sets her and her child up in a pleasant little
local walkup.  Soon, Mary becomes the encouraging sounding board he's never
had in Estelle.
This is a nice little film, featuring some good performances.  Rispoli
is genuinely likeable, a decent man with modest ambitions.  His quandary
when Estelle demands he throw a young mother out on the street is written
all over his face.  When he finally lets his emotions out (to Mary), he
sinks to his knees and balls his fists in his eyes, then regains his
composure and tries to convince Mary (who's not buying it) that that really
wasn't like him.  His final scene with Estelle contains a simple gesture
that's incredibly moving.
Katherine Narducci makes Estelle frustrating for the audience when she
not only refuses to support Buddy, but belittles him to her girlfriends, 
yet we can only sympathize with her knowing that her behavior is driven by
fear and the parochialism of her 1950s community.  (De Felitta's script
helps her when Buddy's failed business ventures are chronicled in an
amusing montage.)  She's willing to help Mary until the color of Mary's 
child introduces concepts beyond her grasp.
Kelly Macdonald ("Trainspotting") is less engaging than the two leads,
initially suspicious, she barely warms up.  She is sweet when attempting
to purchase Italian groceries, mispronouncing everything, to learn cooking
from Buddy.
Writer/director Raymond De Felitta ("Cafe Society") has based his story
on his uncle, although he's given him a happier ending.  De Felitta shows
more strength in his direction than his writing.  While his dialog rings
true for its time and place (a lot of ethnic and racial slurs are flung
around), his story telegraphs its every move.  The film's climax begins
powerfully, but devolves into a stickily sweet romanticism that logically
doesn't ring true.
Still "Two Family House" is an engaging slice of life that I would particularly
recommend to the generation portrayed, the ones that begat us baby boomers.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Pollock (2000)
When actor Ed Harris' ("The Truman Show") father saw the book 'Jackson Pollock:
An American Saga,' he initially thought he was looking at his son on the cover.
The father-to-son gift inspired the actor to make his directorial debut while
also starring in "Pollock."
As adapted from Steven Naifeh and Gregory White Smith's book by Barbara Turner
and Susan Emshwiller, Jackson Pollock is portrayed as a simple man, an unknown
artist and alcoholic leaching off his family in New York City until fellow 
painter and future wife Lee Krasner (Marcia Gay Harden, "Space Cowboys") took 
on the burden of selfless caretaker and nurturer.  Krasner put her own career
on hold to promote Pollock's because she believed in his genius.  She had the
connections he did not and was able to first get the attention of Howard Putzel
(Bud Cort, in an endearing performance) who led to the all important
sponsorship of Peggy Guggenheim (Harris' wife Amy Madigan, almost
unrecognizable).  Krasner also got Pollock away from the bottle and the city,
moving out to an old Long Island farmhouse where Pollock stumbled upon the
splatter technique which would become his defining style.  
As his fame rose and his ego swelled, Pollock drew the city to him and alcohol 
regained its grip.  He became abusive to the woman who saved him and began
openly having affairs until Krasner left for Europe.  Pollock's last affair
with the much younger Ruth Klingman (Jennifer Connelly) ended in tragedy when 
he lost control of his car, killing himself and Ruth's friend Edith Metzger 
(Sally Murphy, "Fearless").  Klingman survived the crash.
While Ed Harris captures the all the surfaces of Jackson Pollock, his subject
remains an enigma.  Pollock speaks simplistically ('You're a damn good woman
painter,' he tells Krasner on his first visit to her loft) or not at all.  His
eyes portray hurt and bewilderment when coming out of one of his drunken 
stupors, yet we never understand what drives him to paint nor what it is he's
expressing in his art.  (When Krasner first sees his initial splatter painting
and proclaims 'You've done it Pollock.  You've cracked it wide open.'  My 
reaction was 'huh?')  Pollock the man appears to get more pleasure out of
rubbing his extended family's noses in his fame than in the act of creation
itself.  His emotional connections to the women in his life, including his
mother Stella (Sada Thompson), are not explored.
Marcia Gay Harden's Krasner, on the other hand, is a complex picture of a
woman whose strong beliefs drive her to action.  Harden makes us understand
why this woman stood beside this difficult man for so long.  When she finally
breaks after Pollock throws a drunken Thanksgiving dinner tantrum, our 
sympathy is with her.  She's a muse grounded in hard-nosed reality.
Support is hit and miss with the aforementioned Cort ("Harold and Maude")
appearing all too briefly and Madison's Guggenheim coming off as a bit of a
circus freak.  Jeffrey Tambor is Clement Greenberg, Pollock's personal critic.
Val Kilmer is too attention-drawing an actor to disappear into the small
role of Willem de Kooning.  Jennifer Connelly, so affecting in "Requiem for
a Dream," is relegated to window dressing here.
Harris as director tells his story in what sometimes comes across as
disconnected snippets, although they're artfully framed snippets.  He does
capture the physical energy, if not the inspiration, that went into Pollock's 
painting.  Bright, colorful cinematography by Lisa Rinzler ("Three Seasons")
is particularly effective in the country locations.
When asked to comment on his art, Jackson Pollock tells a Life reporter 'It's 
like looking at a bed of flowers.  You don't tear your hair out over what it
means.'  That could be said of Ed Harris' portrait of Pollock as well.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Thomas and the Magic Railroad (2000)
Thomas the Tank Engine is facing a crisis on the Island of Sodor even the 
magical Mr. Conductor, (Alec Baldwin) who's losing his sparkle, can't help 
him with - the evil Diesel 10 has returned to threaten the magic.  Help
arrives in the form of twelve-year old Lily (Mara Wilson, "Miracle on 34th 
Street"), a passenger travelling to visit her lonely grandfather (Peter 
Fonda, "Ulee's Gold") in "Thomas & the Magic Railroad."
Writer/director Britt Allcroft brings to the big screen the character
she brought to the British small screen in "Thomas the Tank Engine and
Friends," which was narrated by Ringo Starr (who also later starred as
the conductor in "Shining Time Station").  The character of Thomas was
created in a series of 1940s childrens' books by the Reverend Wilber
Awbry.  I am completely clueless as to why this story has any appeal.
It's a jumble of moral lessons ('I must be responsible, reliable and
really useful') and magic that has no logical story structure.
There are happy, shiny people in Shining Time Station such as Stacy the
Station Master (Didi Conn) and Billy Twofeathers (Russell Means, "Natural
Born Killers").  This is the 'real' world, where Mr. Conductor (Alec Baldwin) 
appears only about one foot high.  He shuttles between Shining Time and
the magical Island of Sodor (where he's the right size) with its talking 
trains and mysterious magical railroad that may disappear, along with Mr. C's 
supply of gold dust, because its engine is missing.  Gold dust is the 
'sparkle' that allows Mr. C. to transport himself and is the stuff of magic.
Meanwhile the dour Burnett Stone is hiding Lady, that selfsame missing
engine, within Muffle Mountain, near Shining Time.  He's bereft, having 
recently lost his wife, but also because he let Lady down when the evil 
diesel chased her until she ran out of coal and crashed.  He's not been 
able to find any coal to make her steam again.  When his granddaughter
Lily arrives for a visit, she's soon transported off to the Island of
Sodor with Junior, Mr. C's irresponsible cousin.  Mr. C's lost all his
his sparkle trying to find its source and Thomas has been trying to help,
even discovering the buffers (a device to stop a train) that mark the
entrance to the Magic Railroad, but Diesel 10 has discovered them as well.
If all that sounds pretty incoherent, well, that's how it plays.
The purpose of the Magic Railroad is never explained.  For that matter,
there appears to be no reason for the Island of Sodor and its talking
trains, either.  The trains are bright and sport round faces which
change occasionally to project different emotions, however their lips
don't move when they 'talk,' making the whole film seem like child's
play.
The children at the screening I attended all seemed pretty wrapped up
in this, however, so it apparently has appeal for the six and under crowd.
Adults will find little to entertain, although there always is
the sight of Alec Baldwin in a sleep cap that says 'Thinking' on one
side and 'Sleeping' on the other.  While the wee ones may enjoy "Thomas
and the Magic Railroad," I just can't recommend it.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Startup.com (2001)
Just after Jehane Noujaim quit her MTV job to take up filmmaking, her roommate
Kaleil Tuzman left a job with Goldman Sachs to team up with friends in founding
a dot.com.  Documentarian Chris Hegedus ("The War Room") met Jehane while 
looking for a project on the Internet and the two teamed up to co-direct the
rise of govWorks.com from ground zero.  They didn't get what they had expected,
but they did capture drama aplenty in "Startup.com."
As much the story of the rise and fall of a dot.com as of the unravelling of
a lifelong friendship, "Startup.com" focusses on govWorks cofounders Kaleil
Tuzman and Tom Herman.  Friends since childhood, Kaleil is the darkly exotic,
charismatic money man who convinced multiple venture capitalists to invest
millions of dollars in govWorks.com while Tom is the all American kid who
stayed in the background guiding development.  Kaleil's ruthless, workaholic
drive contrasts so sharply with Tom's laid back, trusting nature we know
we're in for major conflicts.  The cracks begin to show early on, when Tom's
enthusiasm for the technology during an investment meeting causes Kaleil
to accuse him of being unfocussed.  On the flip side, Tom makes design
decisions without waiting for Kaleil to return from one of his countless
business trips.
The film is frequently, often unintentionally, funny.  Reporting from an
early meeting in the Silicon Valley, Kaleil sputters on about how their
proposal was criticized for being presented in hardcopy rather than
computerized presentation, for their lack of IT experience, lack of startup
experience and for being 2-3 years behind the curve.  'He just doesn't get
it!' Kaleil remarks on the obviously prescient investor.  Later on, when
their company's grown to over 50 employees, they're all trooped
out to Tom's parents' Camp Interloken retreat for a mandatory morale
weekend.  Tom hikes them into the woods where he tells them he likes to
meditate - the wind whistling through the pine needles is particularly
inspirational he tells the awe-struck group as the video camera records
utter silence.  Occasionally, we're treated to Kaleil's girlfriend Dorita
complaining about his refusal to understand that just one phone call from
him can 'keep her going' for up to three weeks (another relationship hitting 
the skids).
Kaleil 'I refuse, reFUSE, REFUSE to lose!' Tuzman's chutzpah knows no bounds,
as he invites competitors to visit their office (Atlanta's ezgov.com eventually
beats them at their own game) or slips President Clinton his business card
right in front of CNN's cameras.  On the eve of their launch, though,
govWorks' search engine is declared a dud and the company never regains its
footing.  Tom gets philosophical and is sacked by Kaleil, who can't believe
Tom no longer trusts him when Tom begins to protect his own self interests.
"Startup.com" is conventionally filmed on video by a filmmaking team with
exceptional access to their subjects.  While they've captured the story of a
generation who surfed the Internet wave with dreams of untold wealth, when
their own subject was one of the ones who wiped out, Jehane and Hegedus
seem to reel with them.  The documentary has a long and dramatic build,
marking time with the build up in govWork's employee base, yet suddenly,
it all drops off.  Tom's ejection is given weight, but the gradual
disintegration of govWorks is not.  The abrupt feel of the film's wrapup
is also a casuality of the filmmakers' decision to concentrate on Kaleil and
Tom without so much as naming almost any other employee.
Still, "Startup.com" packs more drama than most fictional films currently in
release and documents a distinctive moment in America's business landscape.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Hardball (2001)
Conor O'Neill (Keanu Reeves) is a drunk up to his neck in gambling debts.
When he turns to investment banker buddy Jimmy Fleming (Mike McGlone, 
"The Brothers McMullen") for yet another loan, Jimmy pitches him a deal -
coach a Cabrini Green Little League team to fulfill Jimmy's corporate
pledge and he'll pay Conor $500 a week.  Conor reluctantly agrees and is
surprised by his own feelings for the kids he comes to know in "Hardball."
Screenwriter John Gatins ("Summer Catch," "Ready to Rumble") Hollywoodizes
Daniel Coyle's book "Hardball:  A Season in the Projects" and serves up
an uneven "The Bad News Bears" hybrid.  Conor serves more as symbolic
outside masculine interest than effective sports coach and is forced to
sway wildly to the plot's mechanics, turning his concern for the kids and
romantic interest in their teacher Elizabeth Wilkes (Diane Lane) off
and on like a faucet.
Conor's a lowlife who exists by gambling on and scalping tickets to local 
sporting events with his best friend Ticky Tobin (John Hawkes, "The Perfect 
Storm").  He uses his deceased dad's betting account to place another bet 
when his own account's being called in and loses again.  Now he's being hunted
by two bookies, yet uses Ticky to introduce him to a third.
When he finds himself the coach of the Kekambas, eight ten year olds and an
underage mascot G-Baby (DeWayne Warren), Conor needs to make a deal with Miss 
Wilkes and a suspicious mom to help Kofi Evans (Michael Perkins) deliver a 
book report in order to have enough kids to play.  Then Conor finds out his
responsibilities also include getting his kids home safely after he callously
sends asthmatic Jefferson (Julian Griffith) home after dark and the poor kid
winds up in the hospital, beaten up by the ever present drug dealers and
gang members outside his home.  Although Conor lives in a rundown, inner city
apartment, his eyes are opened to the violence of daily life in Chicago's
projects.  He begins to take a real interest in the kids whose sole joy is
found on the baseball field.
Ironically, the Keanu Reeves who's accused of only being able to deliver
'whoas' and 'dudes' is more believable in roles such as the investment banker
he (unbelievably) tries to pass himself off as here than the lowlife he's
cast as.  Reeves has charm to spare with the kids and Lane but fails to
convince in his drinking, gambling scenes.  The guy just exudes too much inner
peace to ever seem truly desperate.  Diane Lane is solid as the inner city 
teacher who takes an interest in the unlikely guy who's fired up her students. 
The kids, all but two making their film debuts, are all naturals, with young 
DeWayne Warren a standout as the crowd pleasing G-Baby.  Also good is A. Delon
Ellis, Jr. as the silent star pitcher who needs the rhythm of The Notorious 
B.I.G.'s 'Big Poppa' rap on his walkman in order to win.  D.B. Sweeney wears 
the false bravado and shifty eyes of a competing coach in the game for himself
"Hardball" is directed by Brian Robbins ("Varsity Blues") in a straightforward
manner, although he yanks his lead too abruptly through emotional shifts
(Conor's boorish behavior towards Elizabeth on their first date and later 
abandonment of his team just don't wash as handled here).  The PG-13 rated
film has been criticized for the bad language spouting from the mouths of
its kids, but it would seem unnatural for these kids to speak otherwise.
Admirably, "Hardball" avoids schmarm and offers numerous crowd-pleasing
moments, but it only delivers a base hit instead of hitting one out of the
park.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Enemy at the Gates (2001)
The WWII Battle of Stalingrad was the critical political battle of Hitler's
annexation of Europe.  Nikita Krushchev (Bob Hoskins) was sent in to ensure
a face-saving victory for Stalin when the Russians were overpowered in every
way.  Young propaganda journalist Danilov (Joseph Fiennes, "Shakespeare in
Love") sways Krushchev from his intimidation tactics towards building morale 
through hope pinned on a young heroic soldier, sniper Vassily Zaitsev (Jude 
Law, "The Talented Mr. Ripley) in writer/director Jean-Jacques Annaud's 
"Enemy at the Gates."
Annaud begins his based-on-fact tale of the heroic Russian sniper and the 
German officer sent to stop him (Ed Harris as Major Koenig) with 
a remembrance of Vassily as a young boy.  A dappled horse is tethered in a
snowy field as bait to draw wolves.  The shepherd's son, being taught how
to shoot by his grandfather, watches in horror as the wolf attacks the helpless
horse.  This metaphor for the sniper battle to follow is stunningly shot,
recalling Annaud's nature flick "The Bear."
As adult Vassily travels by train towards the fighting in Stalingrad, he
notices a lovely young woman (Rachel Weisz, "The Mummy"), but at their
destination, he's herded off the train to boats crossing the Volga to a city 
under bombardment.  This opening sequence recalls that of "Saving Private 
Ryan," as the Russians are mowed down before most can reach shore - even by 
their own officers if they attempt to flee the boats.  Once ashore, Vassily 
is greeted with the following orders, repeated over and over as one man
receives a gun and the next ammunition - 'The one with the rife shoots.  
When the one with the rifle gets killed, the one that follows picks up the 
rifle and shoots.'
Vassily (a holder of bullets) meets Danilov (who's retrieved a gun from a
corpse) when both are playing dead amidst scores of dead Russian soldiers
in a city square water fountain.  They're within shooting range of a high
ranking Nazi and his valet when an additional three Germans pull up.  Vassily
kills all five providing Danilov with a hero around whom he builds a legend.  
Danilov's newspaper for the Russian military reports on the extraordinary 
number of German officers Vassily shoots.  The Germans take note of this
Russian hero and we next see the elegant Major Koenig, the Germans'
best sharpshooter, arriving by train smoking gold tipped cigarettes and 
drinking champagne.
Danilov introduces Vassily to Mrs. Filipov (Eva Mattes, "Woyzeck") who 
provides an underground shelter and food.  Her young son Sascha (Gabriel 
Thomson) will become a resourceful go-between, trading information for 
chocolate from Major Koenig.  They also meet Tania, that beauty from the 
train, an educated Jew who wishes to fight the Nazis.  Danilov is smitten and 
insists her education be used at headquarters, but she wants revenge for the
murder of her parents and joins the sniper group.
Annaud and cowriter Alain Godard have taken the legend of Vassily Zaitsev,
his lover Tania and his German foe Koenig (whom the Russians have
documented, but not the Germans) and fashioned an intimate story of a lovers
triange (Danilov's character is their concoction and the weak point of the 
screenplay) and two man battle amidst an epic battle.  This first class 
production scores on almost every front, from Annaud's taut, suspenseful 
direction to the realistic recreation of Stalingrad under siege (production 
design by Wolf Kroeger, art direction by Steven Lawrence and Dominic Masters).  
The match between 'the nobleman from Bavaria who hunts deer and the shepherd's
son who poaches wolves' is like a life and death game of chess.  Annaud
also grittily turns up the heat between Law and Weisz with a uniquely
erotic lovemaking scene in the trenches.  Unfortunately, James Horner's 
("The Perfect Storm") emotionally obvious score plays down to the audience.
The stunning beautiful Jude Law looks the part of the young Russian peasant,
although his characterization doesn't go too deep.  Ed Harris is exemplary as
the German officer with piercing blue eyes.  Harris projects a wounded and
world weary aristrocrat.  Weisz is believable as the fiercely passionate
Tania.  Not so successful is Fiennes whose Danilov seems a reject from a
dinner theater production of "Fiddler on the Roof" while Hoskins is apparently
on a mission to protray as many tyrants as possible.  The film also features
Ron Perlman ("The City of Lost Children") as Koulikov, a student of Koenig's
on the Russian side and esteemed German actor Matthias Habich ("Beyond
Silence") as General von Paulus.
Many Americans may not be familiar with the events of the Battle of Stalingrad
(note that there's an even better film on this battle, told from the German 
perspective, "Stalingrad," available for rental).  Annaud's "Enemy at the 
Gates" is a rousing historical drama and worthy addition to the recent revival 
of WWII films.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Krieger und die Kaiserin, Der (2000)
THE PRINCESS AND THE WARRIOR (Der Krieger und die Kaiserin)
Sissi (Franka Potente, "Run Lola Run") is a quiet psychiatric nurse beloved
by the long-term patients in her care but lonely in her personal life.
Bodo (Benno Furmann) is a troubled man living with his brother Walter
(Joachim Krol, "Run Lola Run").  When Bodo's chased through the streets for
thievery, he dances through traffic, startling drivers.  Sissi, in town
with her blind charge Otto (Melchior Beslon), is hit full force by a truck.
 Bodo saves her with an emergency tracheotomy and disappears, but fate has
dealt these two a hand which must be played in writer/director Thomas
Tykwer's "The Princess and the Warrior."
Mix together "Run Lola Run" with "One Flew Over the Cuckoo's Nest" and pull
the result out slowly light salt water taffy and you've got "The Princess
and the Warrior."   Once again, Tykwer examines fate from the height of his
extreme overhead shots and his own self-importance.  "Run Lola Run" was a
fun piece of pop filmmaking, but while "The Princess and the Warrior"
contains some beautiful imagery, in the end it covers no new ground.
Once again Tykwer's star Potente holds the screen, but this time she's a
blank slate, a sleepwalker who doesn't come to life until she almost dies.
She becomes obsessed with Bodo and tracks him down by taking Otto back to
the scene of the accident.  In a ridiculous scene, Otto (this film's Billy
Bibbit) remembers a sound which identifies which direction Bodo came from -
two months later.  (This type of contrivance makes Tykwer's plot rigging
painfully obvious.)
Bodo has been established as an extremely sensitive type (he cries at the
funeral of a stranger and loses his job as a gravedigger), but when Sissi
finds him in the chalet/shack he lives in with brother Walter, he wants
nothing to do with her.  Bodo is tortured by the accidental death of his
wife and Walter is planning a bank heist so the two can go to Australia to
get away from past memories.  Sissi, however, persists, returning on a
rainy night in a bright yellow slicker that beams an alternative to the
kangaroo crossing sign hanging on the brothers' wall.  She's still turned
away, but it's clear that Tykwer is moving his game pieces for a
confrontation midst robbery, where Sissi will be provided a chance to save
Bodo.
Tykwer and his Director of Photography Frank Griebe favor shots used in
"Run Lola Run" - Potente lying prone with her hair fanned about her,
overhead shots which render towns in miniature where so many ants scurry
about, dolly shots as characters are propelled down streets and hallways.
Tykwer offers up objects as talismans - a seashell, a locket, a button, -
to create a mythology around his fantastically titled story.  Editor
Mathilde Bonnefoy has slowed down the rhythm ("Lola" was an economical 80
min. while "Princess" runs a bloated 135), but the effect often goes over
the line from dreamy to somnambular.  Tykwer's minimalist score is effective.
Once Bodo (a much stronger costar for Potente than Lola's Manni) enters
Sissi's world, the "Cuckoo's Nest" comparisons come more fast and
furiously. Sissi's back story is finally filled in before the overtly
romantic climax, but once again Tykwer goes overboard - there are just too
many accidents (hair dryers in bathtubs, gas station explosions) propelling
his central character towards a choice that only happens in movies.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for What's Cooking? (2000)
It's Thanksgiving and all kinds of family trauma is occurring within one
cross cultural L.A. suburb.  The African American Williams deal with a
rebellious son amidst a traditional mother-in-law/daughter-in-law kitchen 
tussle while the Mexican Avilas face the breakup of a matriarchal marriage 
and two new boyfriends.  
Meanwhile the Jewish Seeling family daughter has come home with a suitor
of the wrong gender while the Vietnamese Nguyens argue tradition across a
generation gap in director/cowriter Gurinder Chadha's ("Bhaji on the Beach")
"What's Cooking?"
There hasn't been a good Thanksgiving movie since 1987's "Planes, Trains 
and Automobiles" (Jodie Foster's "Home For the Holidays" was a misfire
and "The House of Yes" isn't exactly traditional fare).  Indian eyes
bring a cross-cultural look at this most American of holidays, extended 
families with all their complications, and not incidentally, the glories
of world cuisine.
Of the four families, there's really only crossover between the Mexican
Avilas and Vietnamese Nguygens.  Their college age children are a couple,
just being introduced to the Avila clan while being hidden from the Nguygens.
Elizabeth Avila (Mercedes Ruehl, "The Fisher King") is also the teacher
of the Nguygens' youngest and rents videos from their family store.  These two
families represent the extremes in acceptance of other cultures and
close-mindedness (ironically, it's Trinh Nguygen (Joan Chen), not her
husband or her mother, who clings most to the Vietnamese way of life).
The story deals with father and son conflict (Ronald Williams (Dennis Haysbert,
"Love and Basketball) and his son Michael) and father and son bonding
(Javier Avila and his son Tony embarrassingly both try to relate to
daughter/sister's boyfriend Jimmy Nguygen by praising Bruce Lee).
Acceptance of non-traditional relationships (Kyra Sedgwick as Rachel Seeling
and Julianna Margulies as Carla), marital infidelity, premarital sex, 
education, gang warfare and the proper side dishes to serve with a turkey are 
all explored.
The large ensemble cast is one of the most cohesive of the year and are
too numerous to mention.  Mercedes Ruehl gives a sexy, confident performance 
as a middle aged mom blooming within a new relationship.  Alfre Woodard 
(Haysbert's costar in "Love and Basketball") is a mother on the verge of a 
nervous breakdown, trying to hold her family together.  Sedgwick and Margulies 
are a believable couple dealing in their different ways with Rachel's mystified
parents.  Maury Chaykin ("Mystery, Alaska") is terrific as Herb Seeling,
a man mad about his dachshund Marty, his hot tub and his twin grandchildren,
but bewildered by his daughter Rachel's dinner announcement.
Lainie Kazan ("The Crew") completes the Seeling couple.  Newcomer Will Yun
Lee ("Witchblade") makes a strong impression as Jimmy Nguygen.
Chadha keeps multiple story lines going not only within each family, but
across the four, without ever losing her audience, nicely allowing the
families to intersect at the film's climax in a rather surprising visual.
Camera by Jong Lin is immediate and intimate with both the characters and the
food preparation and presentation.  The film's score begins 
with salsa and remains lively until the film's latter section where Chadha
wisely dispenses with the music to rachet up the growing tension of her
(and cowriter Paul Mayeda Berges') story lines.
"What's Cooking" is a solid little film that should endure as a holiday
favorite.  Which dinner looks the best?  Well it's a toss up between the
Avila's Mexican al fresco spread and the drumstick Marty's overjoyed to
find in his dog bowl.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Baby Boy (2001)
Jody (Tyrese Gibson) is a 20-year-old African-American who has fathered
two children by two different women, yet still lives at the South Central
home of his 36-year-old mother Juanita (A.J. Johnson, "The Inkwell").
Juanita is embarking on a new relationship with reformed old gangsta
Melvin (Ving Rhames, "Pulp Fiction") and wishes Jody would get a job, move
out and become a man.  So does Jody's current girl Yvette (Taraji P.
Henson), the mother of his son, who has a steady job, car and place of
her own.  Producer/writer/director John Singleton examines the social
ramifications of Black men being brought up by single women in his companion
piece to "Boyz in the Hood," "Baby Boy."
Singleton hits us over the head with his first image - Tyrese Gibson in
a fetal position within the womb.  Jody isn't really a bad kid, having resisted
the pull of violence and being protective of his momma (although the latter
impulse could be self-motivated), but he can't commit to a woman or stand
on his own two feet.  When he does decide to make money, he does so by 
stealing women's clothing and charming the ladies at a local hairdressing 
shop into buying.  Jody's smart enough to consider what's said to him, though, 
unlike his homie Sweetpea (Omar Gooding, younger brother of Cuba) who presents 
an angry face to a world he believes owes him a living.
Jody's relationship with Melvin is a volcano waiting to erupt.  He believes
his mother's last boyfriend was the reason his younger brother was thrown
out of the house and ended up dead.  Jody becomes self-righteous over Melvin's
past rather than acknowledging the man's present as the owner of a successful 
landscaping business.  Jody also believes that his love for and honesty with 
Yvette should make up for his dalliances and refusal to move in with her.  When
Yvette's former boyfriend Rodney (Snoop Dogg) gets out of jail, his decision
to make her home his crash-pad is the catalyst for Jody's confrontation with
adulthood.
Singleton's story about one young man finally denying the repetition of history
is meandering and features a climatic moment straight out of the Hughes'
"Menace II Society," yet its sloppiness can be forgiven for the truth and humor
that permeates it.  While Singleton's decision to include violence as part
of Jody's crossing at first seems disappointing, the truth of the matter is
that in this society violence can breed respect.  The hopeful aspect here is 
that Jody normally rejects that route and Melvin has put it into his past 
(watch for Melvin's 'guns and butter' speech, a great piece of writing, not
to mention advice).
All of his characters, with the exception of Rodney (Snoop Dogg's really oily
in the role), are endearing as they struggle for their piece of happiness.
Singleton's directed one of the year's best ensemble casts.  Recording artist
and MTV veejay Tyrese Gibson delivers a star-making performance as the 
titular baby boy.  A.J. Johnson should be considered as a Best Supporting
Actress nominee at year's end for her warm and funny young mom, a woman put
into much the same position as Jody's put Yvette, who's now looking for a life 
of her own.  The ever-great Ving Rhames is powerful as the bullish Melvin who
turns out to have a lot to offer Jody once Jody lets him.  (Rhames also gets
some great laughs for a sexual move that Singleton's described as 'the African
squat' and the surprise breakfast cooking scene which follows.)  Taraji P.
Henson is also fine as Yvette.  Gibson and Henson have good chemistry as
they vacillate between childish bickering and mature love.
The film's soundtrack features a diverse representation of Black music,
including Snoop Dogg, Tyrese Gibson and Mr. Tan on the film's theme "Just
a Baby Boy."  All technical aspects of the film are top notch.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Hollow Man (2000)
Sebastian Caine (Kevin Bacon) is a thrill jock genius leading a team of
scientists on a U.S. government project to create invisibility.  While
he's been successful, he's having trouble cracking 'reversion,' or the
ability to make the invisible visible again.  A middle-of-the-night idea
results in the reappearance of the team's transparent ape, but Sebastian
isn't ready to tell his bosses about his success until he's tested the
process on a human subject - himself - in director Paul Verhoeven's 
"Hollow Man."
While "Hollow Man" features some truly eye-popping special effects, its
lack of character and story development make it one of the most disappointing
of Verhoeven's ("Starship Troopers") career.  The film opens with a pow
as we see a lab rat going through its paces.  Suddenly, it's clenched by
something unseen, which proceeds to rip its head off, outlining the 
suspended jaw of a gorilla in blood.  This incident is never referred to
within the film, yet is one of the only portents that invisibility may
breed disturbing side effects.
Caine is quickly established as rather arrogant, a young Turk whose genius
causes others to give his behavior leeway.  Very efficiently, it's established 
that his right-hand staffer, Linda (Elizabeth Shue, "Leaving Las Vegas") is a 
former lover who Caine would like to have back.  She's hiding the identity
of her current lover Matt (Josh Brolin, "The Mod Squad") from Sebastian
because Matt's another high level staffer on Sebastian's team.  More 
workplace complexity is embodied in Sarah (Kim Dickens, "The Zero Effect"),
the compassionate veterinarian who clashes with Sebastian's sensibilities
(he jokes - or is he? - about vivisecting the ape which almost died from the
shock of being brought back to visibility).
Once Sebastian's invisible, the whole group becomes uneasy in their
subterranean complex.  Janice (Mary Jo Randle) keeps her thermal goggles on 
while in the ladies room.  Sarah awakens with too many of her buttons undone 
and gets tense.  When Sebastian's reversal fails (his skeletal and muscular
structures begin to rebuild, then fade back away), a fleshtone mask and
gloves are made for him to give him appearance while the group works the
problem.  This disguise also allows Caine to leave the complex, where
he's soon wrecks havoc with the power of his invisibility (although a
long-rumored rape scene is cut perfuntorily and never referred to again).  
Linda ultimately decides to come clean with their funders, but Caine turns the 
tables by murdering the project head and locking the entire team into the 
underground bunker.
Kudos to Kevin Bacon for putting up with the grueling labor required to
blank himself out for the camera - he was required to wear three different
body suits (complete with colored full eye contacts) in order to 'appear'
when hit with water/liquids, steam, smoke, etc.  However his leap from
arrogant jerk to murderous maniac doesn't allow him to do much in the way
of acting.  Shue should stay away from scientest roles as demonstrated by
"The Saint."  While she's not required to wear knee socks with a lab coat
in this film, she is required to run from mark to mark proclaiming each
subsequent victim's death before going into Sigourney-Weaver-in-"Alien"-mode.
Brolin's OK as the second banana who touches off Caine's rage while the 
remaining cast are simply dead meat.
The effects are pretty neat, but I was always aware I was watching computer
generation - the scaling back and subsequent rebuilding of the human body
from the inside out looked like 3D modelling conducted on a lab bed.  Slicker
were the partial impressions of the invisible when exposed via another
medium.  
The screenplay (Andrew W. Marlowe, "End of Days") does nothing but move
the action along with little in the way of explanation for Caine's moral
degradation other than the concept that invisible eyelids don't allow one
to catch many Z's.  A long, drawn out climax is hoary indeed.  I've seen
one too many film's end where the surviving hero(es) climb up a tall shaft
while water or fire approaches and wouldn't it be refreshing indeed for
the bad guy to stay dead the first time he's offed?
In 1933, director James Whales scared and titillated people with his adaptation
of the H.G. Wells story "The Invisible Man." That film, with the wonderful
special effects created by John Fulton and the introduction of Claude Raines to
the screen, set a level of achievement that has been often sought, but rarely
attained. Director Paul Verhoeven ("Starship Troopers") makes a valiant, but
vain, attempt to bring the classic tale into the new millennium with "Hollow
Man."
Sebastian Caine (Kevin Bacon) is a brilliant, egotistical scientist who has
broken new ground with his research in invisibility. His experiments in making
his lab creatures invisible have been quite successful, but he has had major
problems bringing them back. The protocol he designed is too unstable to safely
bring back visibility until he has a brainstorm that may be the breakthrough he
needs. When Sebastian and his lieutenants, Linda McKay (Elizabeth Shue) and
Matt Kensington (Josh Brolin), go before a government committee, the scientist 
lies about his latest idea and asks for more time.
Sebastian, before he publicly announces his anticipated achievement, wants to
take the next crucial step in the experiment - use a human test subject. He
lies to the rest of his staff, telling them that the committee approved the 
leap to human subjects. Caine then subjects himself to the invisibility serum 
and enters a brave new world - the first invisible man. But, his brainstorm 
wasn't quite right and, when Linda and Matt attempt to bring him back to 
visibility, the return to normal fails. To complicate matters, the invisibility 
drug has side effects that make the subject uncontrollably violent. It's a race 
against time as Sebastian goes power mad and Linda, Matt and the rest of the 
staff have to stop him.
Paul Verhoeven may believe that he has created a modern version of the Whales'
classic horror/monster flick with "Hollow Man." He hasn't. What he has done is
to make a version of a cool story that capitalizes on the F/X technology of
today, but fails to capture the essence of what made the 1933 film such a
landmark event. The problem is, there isn't a fresh approach to the story.
Instead, the screenplay by Gary Scott Thompson and Andrew W. Marlowe is a
rehash of many of the mad scientist movies of the 50's and journeys into 
well-traveled science fiction territory.
Why is it that every genius scientist in films like "Hollow Man" always forgoes
the rigid rules of research and use themselves as guinea pigs in experiments
that are doomed to disaster? The answer is, of course, because we wouldn't be
spending our time and money watching a movie about a guy who follows the rules
of science and never strays beyond them. That would be boring. Unfortunately,
so is the cookie cutter approach made by Verhoeven and company in attempting to
recreate the mood and feel of the '33 original. There is nothing new in this
latest rendition of the Invisible Man tale, except for some first-class F/X.
Though Kevin Bacon plays the title character, Elizabeth Shue is top billed. The
actress does not reprise the power she showed in Mike Figgis's "Leaving Las
Vegas." Of course, there is a big difference between the character intense
nature of her earlier film and the F/X extravaganza of "Hollow Man." Shue
doesn't get to show any thesping ability here as she, basically, runs around
through most of the film and delivers lines like, "He's dead," with no
inflection or drama to her delivery. So far, the wow perf that Figgis got out
of her has not been duplicated since.
Kevin Bacon, as expected, is a non-person through much of the film. His
Sebastian Caine is a smart, arrogant egomaniac in the beginning and, until he
becomes a monster, pretty much stays that way. Josh Brolin and the rest of the
cast are relegated to background, though Brolin gets a bit more air time as
Linda's secret (from Sebastian) boyfriend and subject of invisible Sebastian's
ire. The remains of the cast are fodders for the monster to prey on and little
more.
Production values are high, especially in the set design by Allan Cameron
("Starship Trooper") and the F/X, led by Scott E. Anderson ("Babe"). The
sterile, high tech laboratory is slick in design and, despite the usual cheesy
computer stuff, lends a good look to the proceedings. The visual effects are
superior with the computer-generated invisibility process and, more subtly
done, Sebastian's return to visibility in water, smoke or the spray of a fire
extinguisher. Too bad high production values can't save a movie. (See the 1999
Jan de Bont film, "The Haunting," as another example of great F/X and
production design wasted.)
A final note to the screenwriters - when you kill the monster the first time,
leave it dead, please. "Hollow Man" is yet another example of a film where the
monster, beyond all reason, does not die, no matter what the hero does. Here,
Sebastian is blasted by searing flame, then electrocuted but he just keeps on
coming. The same gaff was seen in the recent, "What Lies Beneath." There the
monster wouldn't die either. The cheap shocks get tired.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Jurassic Park III (2001)
Dr. Alan Grant (Sam Neill, "Jurassic Park") is becoming disillusioned.  
Paleontology is no longer the sexy science it once was since the Ingen 
Corporation cloned his subject matter.  His lectures bring people 
interested in his adventures on Isla Nubla rather than his research and 
funding dollars are drying up.  When the Kirbys (William H. Macy, "Fargo"; 
Tea Leoni, "The Family Man") ask him to be their guide for an anniversary 
flyover of Isla Sorna (the notorious Site B of "The Lost World") he's 
disdainful, but once they wave their checkbook, he reconsiders.  However 
the Kirbys haven't given Dr. Grant their real agenda in "Jurassic Park III."
Of course, we, the audience, have been tipped off, given that the film begins
by showing us Eric (Trevor Morgan, "The Patriot"), a young boy, and Ben (Mark 
Harelik, "Election") going for a paragliding adventure off that same island
that goes awry (and looks like cheesy rear projection).  Grant's established
back home with a new right hand man, Billy Brennan (Alessandro Nivola, "Love's
Labour's Lost") on site at a dig in Montana sorely lacking funds.  He also
pays a visit to old flame Dr. Ellie Sattler (Laura Dern, "Jurassic Park"), now
married to another with a young son who calls Grant 'the dinosaur man'
apparently for the sole purpose of dredging her up again for the film's poorly 
imagined finale.
Grant takes Billy along on the Kirbys trip, which is really an illegal gambit
to save their son, that young paraglider.  The couple aren't millionaires,
making Grant's check bogus, and they're separated as well (Eric was with
Amanda's new boyfriend, not that that makes much sense), meaning we're in
for some gooey family dynamics while waiting for the dino dining.  The Kirbys
hired hands (and obvious bait) are a threesome led by Mr. Udesky (Michael
Jeter,
"The Gift").  (Didn't anyone consider that casting Michael Jeter and William
H. Macy together and not having them be related was a little odd?)
As directed by Joe Johnston ("October Sky," "Jumanji") (Spielberg only produced
this one) from a risible script by Peter Buchman and the "Election" team of
Alexander Payne & Jim Taylor, "Jurassic Park III" is nothing more than a
quickie monster flick with a couple of new dinos (a Spinosauraus, which goes
head to head with the T-Rex, and Pteranodons).  The plot, as it were, is
a series of coincidences combined with extreme leaps of faith and a
trifecta of stupid cell phone tricks.  The effects are no longer
new, and, as shot by television cinematographer Shelly Johnson, rather
murky looking at times.  Film Editing by Robert Dalva ("October Sky") was
presumably done by machete, to keep this down to a 90 minute run time.  I
know of no other reason to explain the ridiculous ending which features the
survivors confronting a pack of raptors, then being saved by the most
ludicrous of logic jumps within a few minutes.  'Original' music by
Don Davis just repeats John Williams' original themes.
While Neill and young Morgan attempt to inject some humor and humanity
into the proceedings, the rest of the cast are plodding unexceptional.
"Jurassic Park III" will probably provide some quick entertainment for those
who go into it knowing what to expect, the same crowd who maybe liked "The
Lost World:  Jurassic Park."
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Down to Earth (2001)
A remake of the 1978 Warren Beatty vehicle "Heaven Can Wait" (which in turn
was a remake of "Here Comes Mr. Jordan"), "Down to Earth" tells the tale
of Lance Barton (Chris Rock, "Lethal Weapon IV"), a young Black standup 
comic trying to win over the audience at Harlem's Apollo Theater.  When
he's taken to heaven prematurely by bumbling angel Keyes (Eugene Levy, 
"Best in Show"), his only recourse is to return in another body.  He chooses 
that of Charles Wellington, the tenth richest man in the United States.  Of 
course, Wellington is not only rich, but white and 53 years old, which makes 
Lance's bid for closing night at the Apollo, as well as his desire to woo 
Suntee (Regina Taylor, "Jerry Maguire"), a tad tricky.
The original Elaine May/Warren Beatty script has been reworked by
Chris Rock, Lance Crouther, Ali LeRoi, and Louis C.K. to turn Beatty's 
vehicle as a football player into Rock's vehicle as a comic and add some
racial humor.  As directed by Chris Weitz and Paul Weitz (codirectors of 
"American Pie" and costars of "Chuck & Buck"), the whole affair comes off 
as amateur hour.
Initial scenes play like filmed line reading rehearsals.  Production
values are shoddy.  Most serious of all is the use of Rock when his
Wellington counterpart would have been more appropriate.  This problem
is clearly attributable to the fact that the old white guy is never lip or
action synched when he IS on screen.
Rock does get the chance to do some fun schtick, such as his turnaround
on Wellington's plans for a poor neighborhood hospital ('Bullet in the head?
You got a bed!'), but he's uneven when interacting with the rest of the cast.
Regina Taylor fares well amidst the mediocrity as the young activist who
confusedly ends up falling for the man she believed to be her nemesis.
Also good is Frankie Faison ("Hannibal") as Whitney, Lance's compassionate 
manager - the only human who's made privy to Lance's body body switch.
Chaz Palminteri and Levy are pretty much wasted as heaven's ambassadors.
Another "Best in Show" alumnus, Jennifer Coolidge, is poorly used as 
Wellington's cheating wife (AND shown several days apart wearing the SAME
outfit?!) and Greg Germann (TV's "Ally McBeal," "Sweet November") continues
display his sitcom roots as her lover and husband's lawyer.  Mark Addy
("The Full Monty") is sorely underutilized as Cisco, Wellington's fake
English butler.  Stealing the show in every scene she's in is Wanda Sykes
("The Chris Rock Show") as Wellington's disgruntled maid.
"Down to Earth" is for Chris Rock fans only.  All others should go rent
"Heaven Can Wait" or truly be brought down to earth.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Rush Hour 2 (2001)
Beginning right where the original left off, "Rush Hour 2" finds Hong Kong
Inspector Lee (Jackie Chan) hosting his LAPD buddy James Carter's (Chris
Tucker) vacation while trying to break a counterfeiting ring that's just
bombed the U.S. Embassy.  While screenwriter Jeff Nathanson's plot pulls
in dual bad guys in Asian gang leader John Lone and L.A. magnate Alan King
and dual babes in Zhang Ziyi ("Crouching Tiger, Hidden Dragon") and
Puerto Rican beauty queen Roselyn Sanchez for the leads to tussle with,
director Brett Ratnor wisely keeps the focus on action and comedy over
story.
"Rush Hour 2" is one of those rare sequels that surpasses the original.
While breaking no original or artistic ground, the problems with the first
effort (over-emphasis on an unexciting plot and an imbalance between the two 
leads) have been fixed.
Chan and Tucker's non-PC repartee has been criticized for its reliance on
racial jokes, but its delivered with no ill will ('In Hong Kong, I'm Michael
Jackson and you're Toto' Chan garbles.  Later, presented with a bevy of
Asian beauties Tucker advises 'Never get in front of a black man in a buffet
line.'  Tucker's case-cracking advice to always 'follow the rich white man'
proves worth heeding in this film as well.).
Chan delivers his amazing stunts with his appealing charm yet again, but this
time Tucker holds his end up whether performing a hilarious karaoke rendition 
of 'Don't Stop Til You Get Enough' or getting directions from a non-English
speaking chicken vendor.  Tucker's climatic choreographed fight with Zhang
Ziyi is a comedic ballet, while Chan's given a potential love interest
(and plot mechanism for part 3) in Sandra Bullock lookalike Sanchez.  
Jeremy Piven is amusing as a flamboyantly gay Versace salesman and an
uncredited Don Cheadle ("Swordfish") plays straight man to Chan and Tucker as 
a Chinese restaurateur/martial artist.
"Rush Hour 2" is the first commercial summer movie that's actually
entertaining.  Make sure to stay for Jackie Chan's habitual end credit
outtakes and you should leave the theater with a smile on your face.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Dr. Dolittle 2 (2001)
Eddie Murphy's back as the San Franciscan doctor who can talk to the animals.
Just as he's coming to terms with daughter Charisse's (Raven-Symone, "Dr.
Dolittle") sixteenth birthday and dating, Dr. D's given a message from a possum
(voice of Isaac Hayes) that he must meet with a beaver in the forest. When the
possum's ignored, a rather mobster-like raccoon (voice of Michael Rapaport)
appears with smooth birthday wishes and a more forceful request. Dr. D meets
the beaver (Richard C. Sarafian) and learns they need his assistance to keep
developers from destroying their forest.  Dr. D's at a loss, until he discovers
that a lone, endangered Pacific Western bear lives there - if he can find a
mate and establish the forest as breeding grounds, the government will step in
to protect their habitat.  Dr. D finds Archie (voice of Steve Zahn), a circus
bear who likes the plush life, and attempts to turn him into a macho suitor in
"Dr. Dolittle 2."
"Dr. Dolittle 2" features a new director (Steve Carr) and the film's original
screenwriter (Larry Levin).  This is a sequel with the same strengths and the
same (albeit fewer) flaws as the original.
Once again, the story sags when focus is on the human characters, although some
spirit is injected by Lil' Zane as Charisse's new boyfriend.  (It's fun to
watch Murphy rif on the protective dad thing.)  The bad-guy developers (Jeffrey
Jones and Kevin Pollack) aren't as obtrusive as the evil medical practice
partners of the original, either.  However, once again Mrs. Dolittle (Kyla
Pratt) is painted as a shrew when painfully obvious miscommunications have her
ordering her husband out of the bedroom and onto to the couch.
When the filmmakers and special effects maestros turn to the animals, however,
"Dr. Dolittle 2" mostly works.  Eva, the forest's wild female bear (charmingly
voiced by Lisa Kudrow) immediately declares Archie weird, but his funny antics
and persistence begin to make inroads.  We do learn more than we need to about
Archie's wild and domesticated bathroom habits, and there's Lucky's territory
marking competition with a wolf, but the toilet humor comes with the film's
demographics.  The mob societal structure of the forest denizens is a nice
anthropomorphic touch.  New character, Pepito, a chameleon who can't change
color, doesn't have much to do with the story, but gets a healthy share of the
funny lines.
As with the original, the technical budget has gone towards making the animals
interact over making the forest locations seem real.
Eddie Murphy delivers, as do the effects crew, but "Dr. Dolittle 2" is clearly
for the kiddies.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Josie and the Pussycats (2001)
In a Riverdale, California of the future, three best friends, Josie McCoy
(Rachel Leigh Cook, "AntiTrust"), Valerie Brown (Rosario Dawson, "Kids")
and Melody Valentine (Tara Reid, "American Pie") are a band trying to
get their breakthrough gig in "Josie and the Pussycats."
The old 1960's Archie comic book and 1970's animated cartoon have been given
a very modern update by writer/director duo Deborah Kaplan and Harry Elfont
("Can't Hardly Wait").  Although the 'take-over-the-world via subliminal
brainwashing' plotline is trite and cause for brash product placement, the 
characters are fresh and fun enough to make for a sprightly entertainment.
The film begins by introducing us to reigning boy group Du Jour performing
on an airport runway to wildly appreciative fans.  Aboard their private plane,
heavily adorned with Target and Tide ads, petty squabbling among the group
has made evil manager Wyatt Frame (Alan Cumming, "Spy Kids") grow weary, so
he and the pilot parachute out leaving the group to their fate.  Wyatt
spots Josie and her pals outside a record shop and signs them up MegaRecords.
Meanwhile MegaRecords CEO Fiona (Parker Posey, "Best in Show") is demonstrating
to the FBI and representatives of foreign nations her high tech gizmo for 
putting subliminal messages like 'Orange is the new pink!' and 'Josie and the 
Pussycats are the best band in the world!' designed to control teenagers and 
their buying power into the pop music she sells.  Cleanup of bands who 
cotton onto her scheme and become dangerous are dealt with, she explains,
by the "Behind the Music" documentary she produces for VH1.
Wyatt wings the girls into a city coated with promotional neon and dominated
by Mcdonalds' golden arches where they begin a whirlwind week of photo
shoots, recording and video production that culminates with their single
at the top of the charts.  When the trio prove too tight for manipulation,
Wyatt brainwashes Josie into a meglomaniacal rock star and dispatches Valerie
and Melody to certain death at the hands of MTV's Carson Daly.
The cast is game if not all equally necessary.  Cook, Dawson and Reid all
learned to play their instruments and really look like a working pop group
(Kate Hanley of Letters to Cleo provides Josie's vocals).  Cook's perky
and resilient while Dawson projects intelligence and doubt.  Tara Reid's
the most delightful as a warm and bubbly ditz who fantasizes about realizing
such turns of phrase as 'I can't be everywhere at the same time.'  Alan
Cumming, who's not always prudent in choosing his roles, is a delight here
as the scheming Wyatt although Posey's camping doesn't show much inspiration.
Gabriel Mann ("Outside Providence") is charming as Alan M., Riverdale's sexiest
guy who Josie wants more than friendship from.  Alexander (Paulo Costanzo,
"Road Trip") and Alexandra (Missi Pyle, "Galaxy Quest") Cabot are around
because they were in the comic book, as Alexandra informs us in the film,
but add little to the overall mix.  The oddly uncreditted members of the
hilarious parody boy band Du Jour include Seth Green ("Austin Powers").
Technically, the film is first rate featuring trippy camera tricks by
Matthew Libatique ("Requiem for a Dream"), eye popping production design
from Jasna Stefanovich ("The Virgin Suicides") and Leesa Evans' ("American
Pie") wildly colorful costumes.  While the script's basic outline is lame,
it delivers some funny dialogue and pithy music industry observations (when 
Du Jour's plane is lost a TV newsman reports 'The record label didn't issue 
a statement, but they did issue a commerative box set which will go on sale 
tomorrow.')  Original songs produced by Kenneth "Babyface" Edmonds could
all achieve radio play on their own merits.
"Josie and the Pussycats" is a surprisingly fun lark that should appeal to
the same audience that enjoyed last year's "Charlie's Angels."
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Rat (2000)
A Dublin family is under siege by neighbors, curious onlookers and reporters
after suffering a uniquely tragic event - husband and father Hubert
(Pete Postlethwaite, "The Lost World: Jurassic Park") returned from the pub
the night before and turned into a rat!  While Conchita (Imelda Staunton,
"Shakespeare in Love") encourages her husband to clean his breakfast plate, 
daughter Marietta (Kerry Condon, "Angela's Ashes") tries to keep the latest 
journalist, Phelim Spratt (David Wilmot, "I Went Down"), from forcing his 
front door foothold into entry.   Then he says the magic words 'book,'
'film,' and 'book of the film,' turning Conchita's head in director Steve
Baron's "Rat."
Phelim Spratt takes over dad's room after convincing Conchita that she'll be
rich and famous after he helps her write a book about the support and loyalty 
shown to Hubert by his family.  Conchita, who earlier was convinced that her 
shiftless husband turned into a rat solely to annoy her, now casts a more 
approving eye upon him.  With the ever affectionate Marietta's prodding, the 
family takes him out to visit his local haunts.  Hubert's old flame and current
neighbor Daisy (Veronica Duffy) proclaims she'd know him anywhere, as do 
several friends, but after Hubert downs a pint at the local pub, he escapes, 
causing a panic.  Back at home, the stout drenched rat bites his wife and the
family gathers to decide his fate.
Son Pius (Andrew Lovern), an aspiring priest, holds with his earlier, shocking
idea that dad should be killed in their oven.  Marietta, concerned with
genetic possibilities for her future children, suggests a kinder poisoning,
then recants.  Phelim notes that any rat could substitute at book signings
should Hubert be executed, but wise Uncle Matt (Frank Kelly) comes up with the
best solution - drive Hubert to a maggot farm and leave clothing with bus fare
in case Hubert returns to human shape.
Director Barron ("Teenage Mutant Ninja Turtles") has assembled a game cast
and keeps things moving along at a sprightly pace.  The film has some truly
side-splitting moments, particularly with the mysteries of the Catholic
faith, a strength reliably found in Irish filmmaking and the occasional Woody 
Allen movie.  Father Geraldo (Niall Toibin) ponders whether an ill Hubert
should
be given an exorcism or last rites first and decides on the exorcism because
the devil isn't entitled to last rites.  Conchita frets over droppings on
her doilys while Uncle Matt expounds on the animal kingdom ('The rat's a horse 
of a different color than the budgie.') and explains why Hubert isn't eligible
for unemployment benefits.
Barron doesn't succeed, however, in drawing the theme of Wesley Burrowes'
script (particularly the obvious connection to Kafka's "Metamorphosis") into 
focus.  Rather than exploring why Hubert became a rat we instead return to 
familiar territory about the corrupting influence of fame and the media.  In 
fact, when Hubert's bite turns out to have a vampiric effect, it leads to 
uncovering the devil in the family's midst.  Yet we've never been convinced 
that Hubert was worth the devil's time in the first place.
While "Rat" offers some boisterous fun, in the end it doesn't add up to much
more than paean to family values.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Poketto monsutaa: Maboroshi no Pokemon X: Lugia bakudan (1999)
Ash Ketchum and his gang of humans and pocket monsters, including the prized 
Pikachu, are back and this time he's saving the world in "Pokemon: the 
Movie 2000."
"Pokemon:  the First Movie" was perplexing in its anti-violence message when
its titular subjects are pitted in battle against one another by humans.
Nintendo (who own Pokemon rights) have apparently lightened up this time
around as the new film's message is that it's bad to collect Pokemon simply
for the joy of possession.
Firstly, though, the film is once again preceded by a short, "Pikachu's
Rescue Adventure."  While these 22 minutes were nowhere near as excrutiating
as "Pikachu's Vacation," once again we must endure the Pokemen at summer
camp where the little starry-egg guy gets into trouble so Pikachu can get
a group to cooperate and save him.  At one point, five eggs transform into a
three-headed walking pineapple.  (I'm surprised this series doesn't have the 
same reputation as the Teletubbies for drug trippers.)  At least the animators 
have relaxed the editting style which once caused Japanese children to suffer 
seizures.
The film itself is both better and worse than its predecessor.  It opens
as a lone man in a spaceship converses with his computer about the three
Pokemon he intends to capture for his collection - Moltres, bird of fire; 
Zapdos, bird of lightning and Articuno, bird of ice.  According to the lore, 
having these three in one place will draw out his real prize, Lugia, the beast 
of the sea, which will result in the disruption of the world's weather
patterns.  Ash and friends are on a pleasure sail when a sudden squall forces 
them to land at Shimuti Island, just as an island ritual is about to be 
performed.  The weather is being caused by the collection of 
the three birds and legendary ritual decrees that 'the world will turn to Ash,' 
who must collect three treasures, to prevent the destruction of the planet.
(That Ash is constantly referred to as 'the Chosen One,' is a bit of religious
symbolism in the weirdest place.)
The animation is a mixed bag of impressive looking high-tech effects and 
Saturday morning cartoon sweat shop, but at least it's taking steps in the 
right direction.  The spaceship is beautifully done, as well as some of the 
weather effects.  The human characters are fleshed out and their ranks added 
to, although the returning Team Rocket duo are annoyingly superfluous.  Oddly, 
the Pokemon almost take a back seat in this story, which frankly,
has far less to it than the first, yet takes the same amount of time in the
telling.  Environmentalism is once again a strong message.  A pretty tune's
played on a conch shell.
The kids at the screening I attended were mostly captivated, laughed at some
of the inane jokes and applauded at the end, so I'd guess the target audience
will be happy with the product.  For adults, however, a few jokes and
improved technical aspects can't quite counter overall boredom.
Ash Ketchum is a Pokemon master par excellent. He and his favorite pocket
monster, Pikachu, are about to embark on a new adventure, but, this time, it's
not just to do battle with other Pokemon. An unscrupulous collector,
named Lawrence III, is hatching a plan to capture three powerful Pokemon birds
- fire, ice and lightning. These magical creatures, while free, maintain 
harmony in the world's weather. Their capture will disrupt that harmony and 
allow Lawrence to seize the most powerful Pokemon of all - the water borne 
Lugia. The havoc the collector creates draws Ash into the fray as the Chosen 
One, the only person who can save the world in the feature portion of "Pokemon 
the Movie 2000," "The Power of One."
Following the same formula presented in "Pokemon the First Movie," the sequel
is in two parts, too. Part One is a 22-minute short called "Pikachu's Rescue
Adventure," where the title character, with his Pokemon buddies, must brave the
elements, including other creatures, to save one of their number. It's light on
dialogue, which consists mostly of the inane babble that the little creatures
constantly voice - it's amazing the volumes that can be said by repeating
"pikachu" over and over and over again. The visuals are geared to the
pre-school crowd with lots of movement and color to please the tiny eyes of the 
target audience. For anyone over age 8, I think it may cause brain lesions.
Part Two of "Pokemon 2000," "The Power of One," has a little more meat to its
story than the short and reps the main draw for the more hardcore pocket
monster fans. The story owes more than a nod to Toho Pictures and the Godzilla
franchise, with the action of the battling birds straight out of such films as
"Godzilla on Monster Island." As such, the setup from the first feature -
Pokemon fighting Pokemon - is laid to rest as the more "conventional" monster
against monster and save the world yarn kicks in.
Ash is, again, the hero, but this time, instead of pitting his prized Pokemon
against those of Team Rocket, he is a boy on a quest to save the world from
destruction. It's a daunting task as he throws himself into his mission and
gets the help of friend and Pokemon alike. Of course, he accomplishes his 
assignment and returns the Earth to its former harmony, before Lawrence reared 
his conniving head. Of course, as the hero, Ash is expected to accomplish the
impossible - no job is too big that it can't be tackled - and he does. The
young Pokemon master is a good role model for kids.
There is a distinct split in the demographics targeted for this two-part anime.
"Pikachu's Rescue Adventure" is for the very young fans of the franchise.
Dialogue is simple and visuals are geared toward the short attention span of
smaller kids. "The Power of One" is a more mature story with its complexity and
variety of action. It, too, has the visual eye candy that will entertain the
little ones, but the action and fights will definitely appeal to the older of
the Pokemon fans. There is even some humor that will appeal to the parents
accompanying their kids to the theater, but, be warned - there isn't anywhere
near enough adult-level humor in "Pokemon 2000" to warrant calling it "family
entertainment." For me, if Pikachu said "pikachu" one more time, my head would
have exploded.
But, the kids like "Pokemon the Movie 2000" and that's what counts, so I rate
it solely from their viewpoint and give "The Power of One" a B- and "Pikachu's
Rescue Adventure" a C.

Title
Review for Best in Show (2000)
It's a dog eat dog world out there and the tension is tangible as hundreds
of contestants from across America come together to participate in the
greatest event of their lives - the Mayflower Kennel Club Dog Show.
Director Christopher Guest follows five sets of contestants and their prize
canines as they journey to Philadelphia to compete in the prestigious event
in the mock documentary, "Best in Show."
Helmer and co-writer Guest got his mockumentary chops when he teamed with
Rob Reiner, Michael McKean and Harry Shearer in creating the brilliant fake
docu in the 1984 film, "This is Spinal Tap." In 1996, Guest joined with
Eugene Levy to create another mock doc in the charming tale about the
trials and tribulations putting together a small town pageant in "Waiting
for Guffman." Now, again with Levy, he tackles the wild and wacky world of
dog shows. Inspired by the trappings and scope of the famous Westminster
Kennel Club's annual event, Guest and his ensemble cast of the usual
suspects bring us into a world where pooches reign and owners vie for that
precious blue ribbon of a winner.
Joining Guest is a bevy of regulars who have worked with the helmer over
the years, along with some newcomers to his creative acting team. Michael
McKean is New York City hair salon owner Stefan Vanderhoof whose longtime
partner, professional dog handler Scott Donlan (John Michael Higgins), has
entered their precious Shih Tzu, Miss Agnes, as a contender for the
Mayflower doggie throne. Gerry and Cookie Fleck (Levy and Catherine
O'Hara), a mild-mannered salesman and his popular wife from Fern City,
Florida, have entered their handsome Norwich Terrier, Winky, as a
contestant in the show. Meanwhile, a pair of neurotic yuppie lawyers, Meg
(Parker Posey) and Hamilton Swan (Michael Hitchcock), have hopes that their
nervous Weimaraner, Beatrice, will be the big winner. Harlan Pepper (Guest)
from Pine Nut, North Carolina, thinks that his prime specimen of a
Bloodhound, Hubert, is the one to win. Finally, the wealthy and very aged
Leslie Ward Cabot (Patrick Cranshaw) and his voluptuous trophy wife, Sherri
Ann (Jennifer Coolidge), are certain that their two-time champion Standard
Poodle, Rhapsody in White, will once again go home with the gold.
Guest follows this group of contestants as they prepare to leave for the
Mayflower show, interviewing each as they tell him their hopes and
aspirations to win the prestigious event. They all take to the road, in a
variety of ways, and head toward their collective destinies at the
important canine event. Color is added to the various preparations and
journeys, particularly for Gerry and Cookie as she convinces her husband,
against his will, to make a side trip to visit an old boyfriend. Gerry soon
learns that Cookie didn't have dozens of boyfriends before meeting him, she
had hundreds! And these old boyfriends keep popping up though out the film,
much to Gerry's chagrin and our amusement.
The film meanders through the first half with the preparation and journey
to Philly for each team of dog and owner(s). At the mid-point, I was
declaring "Waiting for Guffman" as far better than "Best in Show." Then,
the "show" really begins. The second half takes an upturn as the filmmakers
recreate the pageantry of a top-notch, pure-breed dog show while the actors
interleave their improvisational humor with the seriousness of the event.
If you've ever spent the two days a year watching the Westminster dog show
on TV, you'll find that Guest and company did their homework well.
The mainstay of part two, in addition to the little, humorous dramas
unfolding for the contestants, is Fred Willard's outrageous perf as the
unlikely color man for the TV coverage of the Mayflower show. Buck Laughlin
is a sportscaster by trade who is brought in to commentate on the action
with the real dog show expert, Trevor Beckwith (Jim Piddock). Buck doesn't
have a clue about dogs and dog shows, but that doesn't stop him from making
off-color remarks and non-sequiturs about the action on the floor.
Willard's not stop, wacky chatter helps make the second half the funniest.
The large ensemble cast is given a lot of latitude in their mostly
ad-libbed performances of some rather eccentric characters. Chris Guest is
a true chameleon and puts a deft spin on his North Carolina bait shop
owner, Harlan, coming across every bit as the kind cracker who loves his
dawg Hubert. John Michael Higgins steals the show as the flamboyant dog
handler extraordinare and Stefan's lover. He plays up his naughty role,
making lewd sexual innuendo one of his favorite pastimes. Of the rest of
the cast Jane Lynch makes the next greatest impression as the self-assured
dog handler Christy Cummings, who trains Sherri Ann's prize poodle and has
a thing for her boss, too.
Coolidge, as Sherri Ann, strikes the right bosomy bimbo note as a lady who
didn't get to where she is, fabulously wealthy, because of her brains.
Guest's frequent collaborators -  Levy, O'Hara, McKean and Bob Balaban, as
Mayflower Kennel Club President Dr. Theodore W. Millbank III - all give
funny perfs and put a human spin on their individual characters. Another of
the director's regulars, Parker Posey, and Michael Hitchcock, fare the
least well as a pair of shrill, noisy yuppies who are the reason their dog
is neurotic. The dogs are champions, every one.
Guest and crew do a decent job of creating a real looking mock doc that
captures the essence of a big deal dog show. The characters that he follows
are uniformly amusing (though Meg and Hamilton grate on the nerves early
on) and their ability to improvise give the film the feel of a real group
effort.
The behind the camera efforts are first rate. "Waiting for Guffman"
cinematographer Roberto Schaefer creates a genuine looking faux doc,
shooting in super 16mm with handheld camerawork to add to the reality.
Another of Guest's usual suspects, Joseph T. Garrity, handles the
production design, from the households of the contestants to the show
itself, with distinctive flair.
"Best in Show" doesn't have the homey, even-handed charm of "Waiting for
Guffman," but it stands on all fours as a movie for and about dog lovers
and what those, at the levels shown here, are willing to go through to
bring their beloved pets to victory. The first half bogs down, but once the
show itself starts up, it all becomes OK. This is good, clean fun (there's
even a bit by Ed Begley Jr. that discusses the merits of doggie cleanup
products) that is true family entertainment. I give it a B.
Director/cowriter/star Christopher Guest follows up his sweet small town show
comedy "Waiting for Guffman" with a loony look at a wildy assorted bunch of
nuts who live for their pooches in "Best in Show."  While not as even as
his prior effort, "Best in Show" offers some inspired comic performances
wrapped up neatly at the climatic (and fictious) Mayflower Dog Show.
Guest and his cowriter and star Eugene Levy introduce us to the cast in
their own environments.  Appropriately Meg and Hamilton Swan (Parker Posey 
and Michael Hitchcock, "Waiting for Guffman") are first found in a 
psychiatrist's office because their Weimaraner Beatrice is depressed after 
witnessing them recreating a Kama Sutra act.  Of course, it's really Meg and 
Hamilton, catalog shopping, brace wearing yuppies, who have the problems.  
Their freakouts are initially funny, but become shrill with repetition, making 
them the least engaging of the dog owners.
Cookie and Gerry Fleck (Catherine O'Hara and Eugene Levy, "Waiting for 
Guffman") are a blue collar couple who compose and sing songs praising the 
charms of the Norwich Terrier for their neighbors.  Gerry is dismayed to
discover just how many former boyfriends his bubbly wife Cookie had, but
that's nothing compared to the trauma of having to show Winky when Cookie's
injured because Gerry literally has two left feet.  O'Hara and Levy are
reliable members of Guest's troupe and work good comic improvisation here.
Stefan Vanderhoof (Michael McKean, Guest's costar in "This Is Spinal Tap")
and Scott Donlan (John Michael Higgins, "Jeffrey") are a gay couple with
joint Shih Tzus who hope their Miss Agnes will win.  Stefan's the older,
more grounded but lovingly indulgent partner while Scott camps outrageously
(and hilariously) while constantly fussing over his wardrobe.
Steel baron Leslie Ward Cabot (Patrick Cranshaw, "Everyone Says I Love You")
and his trophy wife Sherri Ann (Jennifer Coolidge, "American Pie") own
Mayflower's two time winning standard poodle Rhapsody in White.  Sherri Ann's
affections appear to be won by their handler, however.  She's Christy
Cummings (Jane Lynch, "The Fugitive"), a butch kennel owner who's climbed
atop the heap via the Cabots' sponsorship.  Lynch gives a terrific performance
as a tightly wound dog person who's over confidence covers deep rooted
insecurities.  Coolidge is a ditz who believes her way with a makeup
trowel makes her an artist while her plastic surgery enhancements approach
those of real life socialite Jocelyne Wildenstein.  Cranshaw has no
dialog, appearing to have one foot in the grave already, and quickly drops
out of the picture.
Guest himself is Harlan Pepper, a Southern fly-fishing shop owner who just 
adores his bloodhound Hubert.  He's the most low key, but listen for his subtle
comedy when he discourses on fly-fishing tackle at the pre-show reception.
The true star of "Best in Show," however, isn't one of the competitors, but
the Mayflower's vapid color man Buck Laughlin (Fred Willard, "Waiting for
Guffman").  His jaw-droppingly inane, non-stop prattle is an inspired
parody of any TV commentator who's tried to fill dead air space with the
sound of his own voice.  Playing beautifully against Willard is Jim Piddock
as Trevor Beckwith, a British dog expert who gives up even attempting to
converse with Buck.  
Guest allowed his cast to improvise based on his and Levy's story outline
and shot sixty hours of film, which he's whittled down to just over 90 minutes.
This collaborative effort looks like it was about as much fun to make as
it is to watch.
